
<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20473 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst005___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-005 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China Selections from the Guide to China's Science and Technology </ABS>



<TEXT>
Policy (White Paper on Science and Technology, No. 5) 
<DATE1>  8 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<H3> <TI>     Guide to China's Science and Technology Policy (White Paper </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Guide to China's Science and Technology Policy (White Paper </PHRASE></F></HT>
  on Science and Technology, No. 5) 

<F P=102> 93FE0870E Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE JISHU ZHENGCE ZHINAN [GUIDE 
TO CHINA'S SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY POLICY] in Chinese No 5, Jun </F>

92 pp 1-134 
<F P=103> 93FE0870E </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE JISHU ZHENGCE ZHINAN [GUIDE 
TO CHINA'S SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY POLICY] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Book by the State Science and Technology Commission: ``A </F>
Guide to China's Science and Technology Policy (White Paper on 
Science and Technology, No. 5)''] 
<H5>  New Materials </H5>
  New materials refer to materials that have been recently 
developed or which are now being developed that have superior 
properties or special functions. Information, energy resources, 
and materials are considered the three big pillars of modern 
civilization. The generation and development of a new technology 
are often determined by new materials, and new technical 
breakthroughs may arise after the birth of several new materials 
and have a major impact on industrial structures and social 
life. New materials are a field of extremely vigorous 
development at present and for the materials that create 
entirely new concepts such as superlattices, metastable state 
non-crystalline materials, and so on, besides their own applied 
value, they also open up new realms for scientific development. 
Thus, new materials are an important part of high and new 
technology and all of the world's industrially developed nations 
have treated new materials as an important realm for 
preferential development. 
  The primary characteristics of new materials and their 
generation are a high degree of technology intensity, rapid 
renewal and replacement, high R&amp;D inputs, powerful secrecy, 
high 
product added value, intensely international properties in 
production and the market, and a decisive role of product 
quality and special properties in the market. Their overall 
development directions are toward compound structures and 
integrated functions. The requirements for materials include 
light weight, thinness, fineness, high purity, and so on. 
  Accelerate China's development of new materials, reducing 
our 
lag behind advanced international levels, and further meeting 
China's economic development and national defense construction 
requirements is an extremely important task that we face. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
<H5>  A. Development strategies. </H5>
  From the important status and international development 
trends of new materials and in integration with China's concrete 
conditions, we should adopt the principle of ``limited 
objectives, key breakthroughs, combining tracking with 
innovation''. The guiding ideology is: First, on a foundation of 
adhering primarily to reliance our own efforts and relying 
primarily on our own strengths and resource characteristics, do 
R&amp;D concerning new materials, establish and develop China's 
new 
materials system, and engage in international cooperation 
through a variety of routes to absorb advanced technology and 
information and accelerate the course of development. Second, 
new materials development must emphasize integration of 
materials science with materials engineering and must have clear 
applications objectives, and development must be closely 
integrated with applied development and applications. Third, the 
development of new materials must both guarantee military 
industry requirements as well as make major efforts to develop 
new materials that are urgently needed by key state projects and 
that have significant technical economics benefits. Fourth, we 
must focus on deployment in depth in R&amp;D work, which means 
doing 
intensive R&amp;D on new materials that we already have or that 
we 
urgently need while at the same time focusing on making 
arrangements in a focused and step-by-step manner for new 
materials with long-term significance that are required by high 
and new technology. Fifth, reinforce basic research and applied 
basic research on new materials, open up new product varieties, 
and expand the scope of their utilization. 
  The goal in developing new materials is to make a 
contribution to the development of China's economy toward a 
benefits type, S&amp;T vanguard type, and intensification during 
the 
last part of this century and the early part of the next century 
while at the same time satisfying the requirements associated 
with military industry. Thus, we must give preference to R&amp;D 
on 
electronic and optoelectronic materials, high-performance 
composites, high-performance ceramics, new types of metallic 
materials, new types of polymer materials, non-crystalline 
materials, superconducting materials, functionally gradient 
materials, and artificial intelligence materials, and to 
automated production technology, intelligent processing 
technology, and other modern materials science and technology 
for new materials. 
<H5>  B. Strategic objectives. </H5>
  Year 2000 
  1. Supply the metallic, inorganic non-metallic, organic 
polymer, composite materials, and other key and matching new 
materials in a timely manner for the development of China's 
strategic and tactical weapons to guarantee the requirements of 
national defense modernization. 
  2. Provide all types of key new materials required for the 
development of the state's key project construction, especially 
in the energy resources, communication, electronics industry, 
and other areas and base the primary basic materials for nuclear 
power plants, microelectronics technology, electronic computers, 
etc. on domestic sources. 
  3. For several new types of materials with broad development 
prospects such as optoelectronic materials, composites, fine 
ceramics, new metallic materials, separation membrane materials, 
non-crystalline materials, superconducting materials, optical 
fibers, and other areas, make breakthroughs with key 
technologies, develop new product varieties, and achieve the 
applications stage. 
  4. For those new materials where we already have a 
substantial foundation and that also have important technical 
economics benefits, use the development of industrialized 
technology and applied research to expand product varieties, 
stabilize quality, reduce costs, and for several industries. 
Strive to attain a direct value of output of more than 27 
billion yuan from new materials by the year 2000. 
  5. Strengthen basic research applications for materials, 
develop materials designs at different levels with 
microstructure theory guidance, develop materials science 
technology related to techniques and technology to guide the 
development of new materials, reduce our lag behind advanced 
world levels, and sustain and develop China's advantages in 
certain areas and strive to make breakthroughs. 
  6. During the process of completing new materials S&amp;T 
tasks 
during the Eighth 5-Year Plan and Ninth 5-Year Plan, perfect and 
establish several new materials R&amp;D centers and base areas, 
train and create a group of key middle-aged and young new 
materials S&amp;T personnel, for a specialized staff with a 
rational 
structure, and lay a good foundation and create the conditions 
for the continual development of China's new materials industry. 
  Year 2020 
  Further satisfy the new materials required for national 
economic construction and national defense construction, make 
important contributions to raising China's overall industrial 
levels and spurring the development of high and new technology. 
In certain important materials vanguard realms, make important 
technological breakthroughs and move China into advanced 
international ranks. Reduce our lag behind foreign countries in 
mode materials realms and strive to attain or approximate levels 
of foreign countries of the period. Make major efforts to 
promote the course of industrialization of new materials in 
China and, besides satisfying domestic demand, move some 
products into the international market. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
<H5>  A. Military industry matching materials. </H5>
  During the Eighth 5-Year Plan, concentrate forces to make 
breakthroughs in several key materials and technologies to meat 
the development requirements of key weapons models during the 
Eighth 5-Year Plan. Focus on developing the key materials and 
technologies requiring breakthroughs to move into model 
development during the Ninth 5-Year Plan, lay an excellent 
foundation for developing several relatively advanced and 
precision weapons and equipment during the last part of this 
century and the early part of the next century, and reduce our 
lag behind advanced levels in foreign countries in certain 
technical realms. In addition, actively induce the development 
and application of military new materials and their technologies 
in our national economy, extend some military materials into 
civilian uses, and achieve their commercialization. 
<H5>  B. Electronic, optoelectronic, and information materials. </H5>
  1. Silicon, gallium arsenide, indium phosphide, and other 
semiconductor materials, multilayer epitaxy, non-crystalline, 
heterojunction, superlattice, and other membrane materials. 
  2. Ultrapure materials, pulps, and reagents used in 
microelectronics and optoelectronics and materials used in 
gaseous cohesive sealing. 
  3. All types of sensing materials. 
  4. Organic and inorganic nonlinear materials used in 
optoelectronics, photorefractive materials scintillation 
crystals, and so on. 
  5. Optical memory and display materials and 
magnetooptical-type, phase change-type, and erasable-writeable 
optical disk materials. Photon selective passing materials, 
organic photochromic materials, and all types of liquid crystal 
and optical materials. 
  6. Explore molecular electronics materials and 
bioelectronics 
materials. 
<H5>  C. High-performance composite materials. </H5>
  1. High-performance composite materials. 
  --Develop high-performance resin base, metallic base, 
ceramic 
base, and carbon base composites, actively develop new product 
varieties, make breakthroughs in the industrialized production 
technologies for finished composite products with market 
prospects; 
  --We must form a production capability for the 
high-performance reinforcing agents used in carbon fiber, 
aromatic fiber, silicon carbide, and other composites. Based on 
China's high-tech developments and market demand, continually 
develop new product varieties and raise product grades; 
  --Develop high-performance modified epoxy, polyimide, and 
other thermosetting and thermoplastic matrix resins to meet 
composite finished product scientific research and production 
requirements; 
  --All types of supplements and assistants used in 
high-performance composite matching. 
  2. Functional composites. 
  --Functionally gradient composites; 
  --Multifunctional composites; 
  --Elastic bodies that have irradiation-resistant, 
media-tolerant, high temperature resistant, and other special 
properties; 
  --While further perfecting and improving fluorosilicon 
organic materials production technology, also actively develop 
new product varieties, meet the utilization requirements of 
nuclear power, automobile, military industry, and other areas. 
<H5>  D. New metallic materials. </H5>
  1. Do research to improve the purity and fineness of low 
alloy steel and alloy steel. Focus on developing steel for use 
in energy resources, communication, the petrochemical industry, 
and engineering machinery. 
  2. Non-ferrous metal materials. Do R&amp;D on all types of 
target 
materials for new types of aluminum-lithium alloys, 
magnesium-lithium alloys, high-strength high-ductility aluminum 
alloys, corrosion-resistant alloys, high-temperature resistant 
titanium alloys, and on copper, nickel, beryllium, zirconium, 
hafnium, and other special alloy materials. 
  3. Non-crystalline materials and technology. Develop new 
types of non-crystalline materials and place them into use; 
attain an industrial scale for soft magnetic alloys and 
components; develop fast-hardening microcrystalline materials 
with special properties and develop the corresponding splat 
cooling technical equipment and techniques. Develop 
non-crystalline silicon and other materials and apply them in 
the area of solar energy utilization and attain an industrial 
scale. 
  4. Functional materials. We must achieve systemization and 
several types of technical production of Nd-Fe-B permanent 
magnet materials and control a portion of the international 
market for rare earth permanent magnet materials; undertake 
development of a new generation of rare earth permanent magnet, 
supermagnetostriction and magnetic recording materials, and so 
on. Undertake research on hydrogen storage and energy storage 
materials and their applications and form an industry; do 
research on magnetic cooling materials and devices, damping 
materials, shape-memory alloys, and magnetic fluid materials. 
Develop precious metal materials, metallic membrane materials, 
and surface characteristics technology used in high-performance 
precision instruments. 
  5. Structural materials. Do research on ultrapure and ultra 
micropowdered materials preparation technology and the material 
structure of materials; develop new types of high-temperature 
alloys. Do research on surface metallurgy and surface 
modification technology for metallic materials. 
<H5>  E. New types of organic polymer materials. </H5>
  1. High-performance engineering plastics and their alloys. 
  --In high-performance engineering plastics production 
technology development, the focus is: polyimides, polyphenyl 
ether, polysuphones, liquid crystal polymers and polyketones; 
  --Engineering plastic alloys and their mixtures; 
  --Manufacturing technology for special-purpose organic raw 
materials and their matching assistants; 
  --Reactive processing, high-temperature resistant plastics 
processing, and other new types of processing technology and 
equipment. 
  2. Membrane separation technology and separation membrane 
manufacturing. This includes: high gas permeability oxygen-rich 
membranes, gas separation membranes, complete fluorine ion 
exchange membranes, high-performance permeable membranes and 
permeable gasification membranes, and so on. 
  3. Functional polymer materials. The focus is on the 
development of polymer materials with electromagnetic functions, 
optical functions, separation functions, catalysis functions, 
and other functions. In the short term, we must form a 
production capability for conductive polymer materials, actively 
develop plastic optical fibers, optical disks, and their 
associated materials. 
  4. Provide other organic polymer materials for special uses. 
<H5>  F. Functional ceramics. </H5>
  1. Development of ultrapure and ultrafine powder raw 
material 
preparation technology and batch output or industrialized 
production equipment. 
  2. High-performance ceramic special molding, sintering, 
precision processing, coated fiber-reinforce composite 
technology and technical equipment development. 
  3. Brittle materials evaluation technology, non-destructive 
testing, breakage standards, and sintering and composition 
mechanisms; 
  4. High-temperature engineering ceramics. These include 
development of ceramic non-coolers, gas-burning wheels, 
high-temperature sealing valves, bearings, pumps, blowers, steel 
smelting machinery, rollers, and so on. 
  5. Sensitive ceramics and electronic ceramics. Examples 
include all types of gas-sensitive, heat-sensitive, 
light-sensitive, sound-sensitive, pressure-sensitive, and other 
types of sensitive components, high heat conductivity and high 
insulating baseplates and magnetic recording materials, and so 
on. 
  6. Development of ceramics with optical functions (such as 
light transmission, light polarization, light gathering, 
fluorescent, etc.) and photoelectric, photomagnetic, nonlinear 
optical ceramics. 
  7. Development of ceramics with chemical functions (such as 
corrosion resistance, catalysts and their carriers, fuel cells, 
ion exchange, adsorbents, etc.). 
  8. Research on ceramics with organic functions (such as 
bioactivated and affinitive artificial bones, teeth, heart 
valves, etc.) and solid enzyme carriers, with trial manufacture 
and systematic production as well as in medical clinical 
practice and industrial applications. 
<H5>  G. Superconducting materials. </H5>
  1. Improve the performance of existing high-temperature 
superconducting materials, develop the associated technology, 
and develop wire material, band material, and membranes with 
practical value. 
  2. Explore high-temperature superconducting materials to 
make 
them more effective for producing materials and applications. 
  3. Do R&amp;D on low-temperature superconducting materials 
and 
corner the international market. 
  4. Strengthen basic research to gain an understanding of the 
mechanisms of high-temperature superconduction. 
<H5>  H. Organic functional materials. </H5>
  1. New materials for biomedical engineering uses. 
  --Do R&amp;D on artificial organs, polymer drugs, and new 
materials used in family planning and new types of therapeutic 
instruments and new product varieties for their manufactured 
products, achieve systematization of type determination, and 
further develop batch production technology, solve problems with 
medical-grade raw materials and assistants matching, and design 
and manufacturing of the specialized technical equipment; 
  --Focus on development of anticoagulant and antithrombotic 
materials, synthetic polymer membranes used in biomedicine, 
medical adhesives, fatigue-resistant and wear-resistant 
materials, hydrophilic gel and microcapsule materials, 
oxygen-carrying artificial blood, and so on. 
  2. New materials used in biotechnology. The focus is on 
development of new materials used in solidified enzymes (or 
cells), bioreactors, large biomolecule separation and 
purification, and so on. 
  3. Biosimulation materials. Create ``intelligent materials'' 
capable of sensing and detecting environmental changes and 
immediately changing their structure and properties and that 
have self-restoration, self-breeding, self-decomposition, and 
other characteristics. 
  4. Do research on technologies for analyzing and evaluating 
the functions and structural properties of biofunctional 
materials. 
<H5>  I. Modern Materials S&amp;T. </H5>
  1. Carry out research on the relationships of the structure 
and composition of materials with their performance and 
applications, develop materials science. 
  2. Use computers for R&amp;D on microstructural design and 
performance forecasting systems for materials to guide new 
materials creation and application. 
  3. Do research on measures for optimization and modification 
of materials including ion injection, laser processing, all 
types of coating technologies, and so on. 
  4. Develop new materials characterization, testing, and 
price 
marking methods and technologies. 
  5. New materials automated production and intelligent 
processing technology. 
  6. New materials databases and knowledge bases. 
  Consumer Products Industry 
  The consumer products industry is an important part of our 
national economy and a processing industry composed of many 
categories, many disciplines, and many techniques and 
technologies (skills). Its products concern people's clothing, 
food, housing, activities, uses, recreation, sports, and other 
areas. Besides satisfying the fundamental living needs of urban 
and rural people and their material and spiritual consumption, 
it also bears the heavy burden of accumulating capital for the 
state and exporting to earn foreign exchange along with 
producing materials and products associated with agriculture, 
industry, national defense, medicine, and other sectors. This it 
has major significance for our nation's economic development and 
improvement of the people's quality of life. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
<H5>  A. Industry development objectives. </H5>
  Development of the consumer products industry must begin 
with 
our national conditions, use domestic and international market 
demand as a guide, fully estimate China's political and economic 
situations and the international environment, be established on 
our existing foundation, use exports to earn foreign exchange as 
a breakthrough point, rely on S&amp;T progress, strive to 
readjust 
the industrial structure, product mix, and technology structure, 
and comprehensively invigorate the consumer products industry. 
By the year 2000, the gross value of output of the consumer 
products industry is estimated at 840 to 870 billion yuan, 4 to 
5 times the amount in 1980 and an average yearly increment of 7 
to 8 percent. Its export foreign exchange earnings will be $56.5 
billion, 8 times the amount in 1980, and an average yearly 
increment of about 11 percent. 
  From 2000 to 2020, the gross value of output of the consumer 
products industry will grow at an average annual rate of 6 to 8 
percent; export foreign exchange earnings will grow at a rate of 
15 percent; and product varieties, quality, and quantity will 
meet the requirements of the people's relatively prosperous 
levels and appropriate consumption and have a relatively 
powerful competitive ability in foreign markets. It will form a 
renowned and top-quality new product production and marketing 
system with Chinese characteristics. 
<H5>  B. S&amp;T development strategies and objectives. </H5>
  S&amp;T development in the consumer products industry must 
closely surround economic development goals, give comprehensive 
consideration to the coordinated development of S&amp;T, the 
economy, and society, adhere to close integration of S&amp;T and 
the 
economy, adopt advanced domestic technology and advanced and 
appropriate imported technology to upgrade old enterprises, 
accelerate attacks on key S&amp;T problems, and shorted the 
cycle of 
commercializing S&amp;T achievements. With improvement of 
economic 
results as the center, strive to improve product quality and 
grades, development new products, produce more inexpensive 
top-quality products, meet demand in the domestic market, 
actively develop a generation of products adapted to 
international market demand, raise product grades, and increase 
our export foreign exchange earnings capabilities. Begin by 
developing new resources, new materials, new technical equipment 
and components and technology and management software, 
comprehensively spur development of consumer products industry 
production and construction. 
  --Actively apply modern S&amp;T, strengthen industrial 
design, 
develop superior quality new colors, new product varieties, new 
products, and new realms that have appropriate market avenues 
and gradually form an emerging industry. Do research on 
improving product quality, grades, and added value, satisfy 
domestic consumption demand at different levels, adapt to 
changes in the international market. 
  --Coordinate with the relevant departments in adopting a 
variety of arrangements and multiple channels to do active 
R&amp;D 
and construction of raw materials and components production and 
supply base areas. Do research on reducing energy consumption in 
the raw materials used in production, strengthen R&amp;D on 
resource 
comprehensive utilization and renewable materials recovery and 
utilization. 
  --Rely on the military industry, heavy industry, 
institutions 
of higher education, and other social S&amp;T forces to undertake 
technical cooperation to digest and absorb advanced domestic and 
foreign technology, do R&amp;D on common technologies and key 
matching technologies in the industry. Actively adopt S&amp;T 
achievements, advanced appropriate technology, and patents to 
improve the technical equipment and production technology levels 
of enterprises. In addition, do research on improving the export 
foreign exchange earnings levels of consumer products industry 
technical equipment. 
  --Establish and perfect technology development organizations 
to promote close integration of S&amp;T with production, 
establish 
scientific research and enterprise groups and technology 
development organizations at many levels in large and 
medium-sized enterprises. 
  --Strengthen skilled personnel training, improve the quality 
of personnel, pay attention to information and publishing work, 
transmit knowledge, exchange experiences, provide better 
services to scientific research, production, and education. 
  Based on the S&amp;T development strategies outlined above, 
S&amp;T 
work in the consumer products industry must strengthen industry 
management, systematically integrate attacks on key S&amp;T 
problems, technology development, technology importing, and 
technical upgrading, link together scientific research, design, 
and production, and accelerate the extension and application of 
S&amp;T achievements. Reliance on technical progress as a 
proportion 
of the gross value of output in the consumer products industry 
should increase from 20 percent in 1980 to 30 to 40 percent by 
the year 2000 and achieve the following objectives: 
  --Establish raw materials R&amp;D supply base areas. On a 
foundation of basically satisfying the consumer products 
industry's production and development requirements for the 
primary raw materials product varieties, specifications, 
quality, and quantity, gradually move toward base areas for the 
production of raw materials, product quality optimization, and 
standardization and systemization of specifications. We must 
reinforce comprehensive utilization of resources and recovery 
and utilization of renewable materials. We must find proper uses 
for all useable waste gases, liquids, dregs, waste and old 
fiber, and discarded materials, which means we must broaden 
sources of income and reduce expenditures as well as reduce and 
eliminate pollution from the three wastes. 
  --Raise technical equipment levels. Some key industries and 
emerging industries and those traditional industries with have 
relatively good basic conditions must lead the way in 
approaching or attaining levels of the internationally developed 
nations of the 1980's and a few of them should advanced 
international levels of the period. Strive to improve the 
matching set manufacturing capabilities and comprehensive 
matching up capabilities of the specialized equipment in key 
products. Moreover, do innovation on the basis of digestion and 
absorption and increase the proportion of electromechanical 
products in exports and levels of electromechanical integration 
in consumer goods. 
  --Increase product varieties, improve quality. Do R&amp;D 
on new 
products and new product varieties, increase them from the 
present 100,000 types to 300,000 types, stabilize and improve 
product quality, actively adopt international standards or 
advanced foreign standards for primary products, strive to 
attain levels of the 1980's in the developed nations in the 
quality and performance of about 60 percent of primary products. 
There should be substantial developments in the colors, 
varieties, quality, and styles of textiles and clothing and 
greater variety in the domestic market. Primary export 
commodities should attain international levels of the period. 
There should be substantial developments in new-tech and 
high-tech products and high added value products and they should 
enter the international market. 
  --Establish a scientific research and development system at 
different levels and a cooperative division of labor. Strengthen 
close cooperation between specialized scientific research 
organizations in the consumer products industry with enterprises 
and institutions of higher education inside and outside of the 
system and form a vigorous modernized and multilevel S&amp;T 
system 
(including scientific research, development, and production) for 
scientific research, technology development, and economic 
information as well as S&amp;T information, testing, standards, 
environmental protection, and so on with clear levels and a 
clear division of labor that is mutually intersecting. The 
proportion of the total number of employees that S&amp;T 
personnel 
account for the consumer products industry should rise from 1-2 
percent to 3-6 percent. 
  Between 2000 and 2020, supplies of raw materials in primary 
sectors should basically satisfy production and development 
requirements. The technical equipment in primary sectors should 
attain international levels of the 1980's in the year 2000. By 
2020 we must innovate so that key sectors approach and catch up 
with international levels of the period, gradually form a 
consumer products industry technology system with Chinese 
characteristics, a new-tech and high-tech industry basically 
takes shape, modern products and electromechanical products in 
the consumer products industry occupy a significant status in 
the international market, high-tech products and high added 
value products account for a substantial proportion, and an 
S&amp;T 
development system at different levels is more rational and 
perfect. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
  The focal tasks of S&amp;T work in the consumer products 
industry 
are to develop common technologies that have a broad coverage 
area in production, solve problems with key matching 
technologies in primary sectors, and open and expand 
applications of high and new-tech in the consumer products 
industry. 
<H5>  A. Make major efforts to develop common technologies for </H5>
production in the consumer products industry. 
  1. Mold design and processing technology. 
  Improve design levels of molds and the matchup with 
processing technology, focus on developing plastic products 
molds (mainly large and precision molds), multiple work position 
progressive molds, precision stamped molds and metallic cold 
compression and pressure injection molds, household odd-shaped 
glass bottle molds and household utensil multilobe molds and 
decoration pressing rollers, and so on. Do research on mold 
shape hollow surface processing technology, strengthen research 
into mold applications theory and design, improve mold 
processing and manufacturing technology. By 2000, strive to make 
breakthroughs in the areas of mold design and manufacturing 
technology, establish the design and manufacture of primary 
molds in the consumer products industry on domestic sources, 
basically transform the situation of reliance on imports for 
molds, and gradually form a three-way integrated mold industry 
composed of mold research, design, and processing. 
  2. Surface processing and decoration technology. 
  Focus on develop electroplating production automation 
technology and on all types of electroplating additive and 
powdered coating technology, metallic surface hardening and 
coloring technology, and artificial leather and plastics 
products surface decoration technology. In addition, strengthen 
research, extension, and applications of a shift to domestic 
production of raw materials. By 2000, strive to make surface 
processing technology approach international levels and achieve 
rather substantial improvements in the exterior quality and 
grades of household appliances, common machinery, the five 
metals, furniture, kitchen implements, artistic products, lamps, 
artificial leather and plastic products, and so on. Do R&amp;D on 
surface processing technology for textile implements and special 
components and improve their useful lifespans and technical 
quality. 
  3. Packaging technology. 
  Focus on developing canning technology suitable for use with 
liquids, solid packaging technology suitable for use in 
block-shaped and powdered products, shrink-wrap packaging 
technology suitable for use in toys, glass bottles, batteries, 
artistic products, and other products; sterile packaging 
technology suitable for fresh packaging of food products and 
high-grade health and beauty products; and textile product 
folding and stacking, rolled tube heat shrinking, hanging, and 
vacuum packaging technology. Do R&amp;D on various types of 
packaging equipment and the associated packaging materials, 
undertake research on standardization of small packages, 
medium-sized packages, and centralized container loading, 
gradually achieve standardization of packaging to improve 
transportation capacity. 
  4. Energy-saving and water-saving technology. 
  Make improving the efficiency and surplus heat recovery in 
ovens and kilns, boilers, evaporators, dryers, and other 
equipment the center, focus on developing energy-saving 
technology for the ceramic, glass, papermaking, and food product 
(including the sugar-making and salt chemical industries) 
industries and cold storage, do research on and extend 
oil-saving, coal-saving, and electricity-saving technology and 
low heat value steam recovery technology, do research on 
technology for producing methane from highly-concentrated 
organic waste water and on waste residues and waste liquid 
renewable energy resource technology, do research on and extend 
high efficiency low pollution coal gasification technology, 
develop top-quality fire-resistant materials and insulating 
materials. For textiles, energy conservation in the dyeing, 
sizing, and chemical fiber industries should be the center for 
research on heat recovery, waste steam utilization, and 
coal-conserving boiler technology, developing energy-saving 
drive belts, special components and devices, and so on. Energy 
consumption in the main energy-consuming sectors of the consumer 
products industry should basically attain levels of the 
developed nations in the early 1980's by the year 2000 and 
approach or attain advanced international levels of the period 
by the year 2020. Focus on R&amp;D on water-saving technology in 
the 
papermaking, food product, leather, dyeing, chemical fiber, and 
other large water-consuming industries. 
  5. Environmental protection technology. 
  Focus on development of ``three wastes'' recovery, 
utilization, and control technology for the papermaking, food 
product, leather, dyeing, chemical fiber, and electroplating 
industries. In papermaking, control of waste water pollution in 
medium-sized paper mills should be the center, do research to 
improve papermill waste liquid recovery and comprehensive 
utilization technology, actively undertake R&amp;D on 
non-polluting 
and low-polluting pulp making and new bleaching technologies. In 
edible oils, the center should be on controlling dust, oil 
refining, and waste water explosions. For food products, the 
center should be on controlling highly-concentrated organic 
waste liquids and reinforcing comprehensive utilization of oil 
(soap) residues, skins and hulls, distillers' grains, and food 
product residues. For leather and electroplating, controlling 
waste water that contains chromium is the center for research on 
waste chromium liquid recovery and utilization technology and 
active development and extension of electroplating no-treatment 
zero-discharge technology, research on improving low-temperature 
chrome-plating technology and waste water ion exchange and 
evaporation treatment technology. Do research to reduce the dust 
content of air in workshops and noise in the textile and edible 
oils industries. Do research on waste water control and waste 
steam purification technology in the chemical fiber and dyeing 
industries. Basically control the pollution sources listed above 
in the consumer products industry by the year 2000. Attain state 
standards for water discharges and achieve effective control of 
waste gas, residues, and dust pollution. 
  6. Testing technology. 
  Study on-line testing for production processes and on 
testing 
methods and measures for semi-finished products, finished 
products, and technical parameters, reinforce public health 
testing of food products, beauty products, and toys and safety 
checking of household appliances, inspection of cotton maturity 
and the homogeneity and defects of textiles, and inspection of 
the overall quality of export products. Strengthen research on 
standardization technology, actively adopt international 
standards. 
  7. Storage and preservation technology. 
  Focus on research to resolve problems in the matching 
technologies involved in the commodity circulation process. Do 
research on air conditioning, low temperatures, cold storage, 
spoilage prevention, mold prevention, anti-oxidation, and 
various other storage and preservation technologies and on new 
technologies for monitoring, control, and prevention of disease 
and insect pests. Do R&amp;D on high-efficiency, low-toxicity, 
low 
residual pesticides, herbicides, and spoilage prevention agents 
and do research on countermeasures on insect resistance to 
pesticides. Do research on the laws of aging and degradation for 
commodities during periods of storage, explore the use of 
microelectronics technology in preservation and mathematical 
modeling and control technology. Do research on advanced 
freezing technical equipment and thawing technology. Strengthen 
research on warehouse (including cold storage) stacking and 
transport mechanization and automation. Do research on 
monitoring technology for storage and preservation periods and 
their associated instruments and equipment. Do research to 
formulate storage quality standards. 
  8. Soft science research. 
  Strengthen research on consumer products industry S&amp;T 
development strategies, principles and policies, outline 
programs, information forecasting, reform management, project 
evaluation, strategies and decisions for participation in large 
international cycles, and so on, provide a scientific 
theoretical foundation for making decision making more 
scientific and democratic strengthening macro regulation and 
control. 
<H5>  B. Actively open up applications of high and new technology </H5>
in the consumer products industry. 
  1. Microelectronics technology. 
  Do research on extension and application of microcomputers 
in 
consumer products industry production parameter inspecting, 
display, monitoring and control, automatic regulation systems, 
and commodity circulation information communications and 
management systems, improve production and management autonomous 
region and network levels, actively apply microelectronics 
technology to upgrade traditional industry in the consumer 
products industry, strengthen development and applications of 
CAD, CAM, and CAT technology design, processing, and mold-making 
for chemical fibers, textiles, clothing, mold, shoe making, 
leather, plastics products, furniture, household appliance, 
industrial sewing machines, common machinery, toys, and artistic 
products, do R&amp;D concerning matching application-specific 
integrated circuits for household appliances, common machinery, 
toys, household products, and other products and office 
automation products, actively development mechanical hands and 
robots application technology and use them in hazardous product 
production and toxic work procedures. Develop 
electromechanically integrated equipment and products. 
  2. Biotechnology. 
  Do research on applications of biotechnology in nurturing 
improved varieties of raw materials for the consumer products 
industry. Do research on applications of genetic and cellular 
engineering for selective breeding of high-output microorganism 
bacteria varieties and the matching technical equipment. Do 
R&amp;D 
on new technologies and new products and on separation and 
purification technology in enzyme engineering and fermentation 
engineering and on technology for their application in the 
consumer products industry, and on cell and enzyme fixing 
technology and carrier development and applications. Do research 
on using modern biotechnology to upgrade the traditional 
fermentation industry. 
  3. New materials applications. 
  Actively develop all types of functional textile fibers, 
optical waveguide fiber and conductive plastics, engineering 
plastics, new types of ceramic materials, rare earth and PTC 
components, paper used in static electricity and heat-sensitive 
computers, fluorescent powder used in high optical efficiency 
lamps, and other new types of materials, and pay attention to 
applications of new materials in the consumer products industry 
realm. 
<H5>  C. Conscientiously solve problems with the key matching </H5>
technologies for primary sectors. 
  1. Food products industry. 
  Rationally readjust the industrial structure and product mix 
in the food products industry so that diets develop toward 
nutrition, convenience, and socialization. 
  Strengthen improvement and selective breeding and of the 
grains, oils, fruits and vegetables, livestock and poultry, 
aquaculture products, edible fungi, tea leaves, and other 
product varieties used in food product processing, domestication 
of famous and valuable wild animals and plants, and establish an 
improved variety breeding system. Pay attention to increased 
varieties and systematic development of basic raw materials for 
food products (including all types of food additives) and to 
R&amp;D 
on new types of processing technology and equipment. 
  Do R&amp;D on reinforced nutritional rice, plumule rice, 
special-purpose flours, granular flours, fine processing of 
coarse grains, and other new rice products and to processing 
technology and equipment. Develop comprehensive utilization of 
corn, legumes, tubers, and so on and multilevel processing 
technology and equipment. Do research on eliminating harmful 
factors in the raw materials for legumes and other food 
products, reinforce nutritional technology for primary grains. 
Do research on intensive processing development and applications 
technology for plant proteins, gradually establish an edible 
plant protein industrial production system. 
  Do R&amp;D on new types of special purpose oils for food 
products, do research on selective hydrogenization, enzyme-ester 
exchange, and physical fine refining technology for fats and on 
low-temperature detoxification and extraction technology. 
Strengthen research on comprehensive utilization of fat sideline 
products, actively develop polyamides, alcohols, phospholipids, 
sterols, waxes, vitamins, and other products. Develop new 
exfiltration, low-temperature desolving, and continuous refining 
equipment, raise equipment levels in the fats industry. 
  Focus on research on hog carcass continuous slaughtering and 
dissection technology and equipment. Actively develop new small 
packaged meat products. Do research to improve the flavor, 
color, and other physiochemical functions on meat products. Do 
research to improve comprehensive utilization technology for 
blood, bones, and internal organs. 
  Actively develop convenience foods, infant and childrens' 
series products, nutritional and health foods, traditional food 
products and beverages, and other new products and new product 
varieties. Do research on industrialized production of 
traditional food products, edible fungi, tea leaves, dried fruit 
and vegetable products, and other new technologies, new 
techniques, and new equipment. Do research on intensive 
processing and comprehensive utilization technology for food 
product leftovers. 
  Actively develop low-proof liquors (including lower proof 
rice liquor), amino acids, organic acids, yeasts, fermented 
spices, microorganic polysaccharides, and other fermented food 
products as well as new series of products and product varieties 
for beverages. Do research on rapid and continuous fermentation 
technology and new technical equipment to improve acid 
production rates, conversion rates, and extraction rates. Do 
R&amp;D 
on traditional fermented food product industrial production 
technology and equipment. 
  Do research on applications of ultrafiltering, reverse 
osmosis, far infrared, microwave, enzyme preparation, 
irradiation, and other new technologies in the food products 
industry, digest and absorb automated can and beverage 
production lines and key technology and equipment for beer and 
malt production and fermented products, develop high efficiency 
continuous production technology and equipment. Do research on 
advanced can-making technology and superior quality coatings for 
cans and on can and beverage sterilization technologies. Do 
research on new mixtures and processing technology for bean 
products, candy, and cakes (including cookies). Do research on 
low-temperature air conditioned storage and preservation 
technology and on food organization technology. Strengthen 
R&amp;D 
on food product packaging and inspection technology. Focus on 
basic scientific research for food products. 
  On a foundation of making rational readjustments in the food 
structure by the year 2000, basically achieve a shift to 
production base areas, optimization of product quality, 
systemization of product varieties, and standardization of 
quality for the raw materials used in the food products industry 
so that the quality and colors of product varieties for primary 
food products basically meet the requirements for socialization 
of the people's lives and gradually form an industrialized 
staple and non-staple food products and mixed food products 
production system. 
  2. Sugarmaking industry. 
  Focus on doing good development of sugar, make increasing 
unit yields and sugar content the direction of the primary 
attack, breed improved sugar varieties that have high sugar 
contents, high yields, and powerful resistance to reversion with 
good technical properties, breed and extend early maturing 
sugarcane varieties and beet polyploid and genetic single-seed 
improved varieties, strengthen importing of all types of sugar 
variety resources, strive to improve breeding technology, do 
research on improved high sugar content comprehensive and 
matching tillage and cultivation technology and disease and 
insect pest forecasting and prevention technology. 
  Actively adopt new types of high-efficiency large-capacity 
advanced equipment, do research on ion exchange purification 
technology, do research on energy conservation technology for 
large sugar mills, import, digest, and absorb key large 
equipment for making sugar from beets and key technology and 
equipment for sugarcane exfiltrators and bagasse grinding 
boards, actively adopt microcomputers to gradually achieve 
single-machine automatic control for all working procedures in 
sugarmaking, actively develop beet sugar intensive processing, 
and further develop comprehensive utilization technology for 
sugar mill wastes and molasses. 
  By the year 2000, strive to make significant improvements in 
unit yields for sugar by increasing sugarcane by about 50 
percent and beets by 100 percent, and increase the sugar content 
by 1.5 to 2 percent compared to the present. The unit yields and 
sugar content of sugar should attain advanced world levels by 
2020. 
  3. Saltmaking industry. 
  Fully utilize beach resources, actively develop and expand 
the area of salt fields, do research on highly concentrated 
seawater extraction technology, do research on comprehensive 
utilization of seawater and brine, strive to improve overall 
results in salt fields, fully develop underground brine 
resources, strengthen salt resource distribution surveys in 
mines, do research on new extraction technology, raise 
extraction rates, do research on technology to prevent ``sand 
hazards'' and comprehensive protection technology in salt lake 
regions. 
  The focus for marine salt should be on improving unit area 
yields in salt fields and mechanization of production in the 
salt industry, while making major efforts to develop specialized 
machinery for the salt industry, reduce physical labor, and 
improve labor productivity, do research on salt field leak 
prevention technology and salt field integrated protection 
technology, actively do research to improve production 
technology levels and unit area yields in the salt field 
breeding industry. Further develop multilayer salt extraction 
technology for mines, strengthen comprehensive utilization of 
rock salt resources, actively develop the salt chemical 
industry, do research on saltmaking corrosion prevention 
technology, and actively utilize wind energy in salt regions 
having the proper conditions. 
  Make major efforts to develop purified salt and all types of 
health and nutritional salts, and gradually form systems. 
  By the year 2000, production technology levels in the salt 
industry should attain the levels of the developed nations of 
the late 1970's and early 1980's. 
  4. Tobacco industry. 
  Breed superior quality new disease-resistant tobacco 
varieties, develop Burley tobacco, perfumed tobacco, and 
sun-cured tobacco with high industrial use value, do research on 
improved breeding, insect pest and disease prevention, soil 
surveys and fertilizer application, and other technologies. 
Gradually achieve regionalization of cropping, improvement of 
varieties, standardization of technology, and leaf stripping and 
redrying in producing areas. Actively extend tobacco film 
production, move quickly to achieve comprehensive utilization of 
tobacco wastes and low-grade tobacco. Do selective breeding of 
low-tar tobacco varieties. 
  For cigarette products, gradually develop toward multiple 
categories in which mixed types are the primary factor, actively 
develop new mixed variety cigarettes containing Chinese herbal 
medicines and low-tar cigarettes, imprve the quality and grades 
of finished products, increase product varieties, change the 
product mix, abandon grades D and E tobacco. Use multiple 
product varieties and multiple categories of finished tobacco 
products to satisfy consumer demand. 
  With the objectives of improving the mix of cigarette 
products, improving quality, reducing consumption, and 
increasing economic benefits, make major efforts to develop 
advanced cigarette production and processing equipment, 
accelerate the pace of digestion and absorption of imported 
technology. Move quickly to achieve standardization, 
systemization, and general use. Do research on tobacco flavoring 
components, actively develop essences and perfumes, improve 
flavor regulation technology, and strengthen research on 
cigarette rolling and mixing technology. Do R&amp;D and new 
cigarette filter materials and all types of packaging materials, 
develop high-penetration cigarette papers and compound filters. 
  By the year 2000, technical levels in cigarette production 
should attain the levels of the economically developed nations 
in the early 1980's. The quality of export cigarettes should 
attain international levels. Consumption per crate of tobacco 
should be less than 45 kg, filtered cigarettes should exceed 50 
percent, and the average tar content of cigarettes should be 
less than 20 mg/cigarette. 
  5. Feed industry. 
  Do R&amp;D on protein feed resources, energy feed 
resources, and 
additive feed resources, especially on processing technology for 
leftover feeds from the agricultural sideline product processing 
industry, food products industry, fermentation industry, and 
others. Do resource on processing technology for oil cakes and 
sterilization of raw materials for making feeds. Do research on 
industrial production technology for the utilization of 
industrial waste water, residues, and so on as raw materials for 
producing monocellular proteins. Do research on algal protein 
development and utilization technology. Do research on 
development and utilization technology for livestock and poultry 
blood, bones, and feathers, aquacultural production leftovers, 
and other animal proteins. Do R&amp;D on new routes for energy 
feeds. 
  Do research on production technology required for amino 
acids, vitamins, mineral elements, antibiotics, growth 
promoters, antioxidants, antitoxics, vermifuges, adhesives, 
colorants, spices, and other types of additives used for feed 
grading. 
  Do research on granular, powdered, suspended, liquid, and 
other different state feed processing techniques and their 
systematic complete sets of processing equipment. Do research on 
processing technologies for premixed feeds, concentrated feeds, 
and other types of feeds. Do research for formulation of feed 
quality standards, regulations, and monitoring technology. 
  Do research on the effects of all types of nutrients on 
animal growth mechanisms, improve their organic efficacy for 
livestock and poultry. Do research on all types of livestock, 
poultry, and aquaculture feed optimum mixing, shorten feeding 
schedules, reduce costs, and increase feed conversion rates. 
  6. Cotton and hemp processing industry. 
  Do research on cotton processing technologies and on 
energy-saving, high efficiency, ventilation, dust removal, 
hydraulic transmission, and other advanced technical equipment. 
Import, digest, absorb, and develop drying, boll cleaning, boll 
rolling, fiber cutting, ginned cotton cleaning, and packing 
continuous production lines. Make major efforts to develop 
machine-processed cotton compaction and cotton padding, do 
research to improve combed cotton padding production lines. Do 
R&amp;D on comprehensive utilization technology for cotton seed. 
  Improve cotton inspection technology levels, develop several 
fast, accurate, operationally convenient, low-cost, practical, 
and effective testing instruments such as cotton length, 
maturity, strength, coloring, cotton cloth grading, and other 
types of inspection instruments and gauges. 
  Do research to improve peeling machinery and gum removal 
technology for jute, bluish dogbane, and ramie and jute and 
bluish dogbane retting processing technology. 
  7. Chemical fiber industry. 
  Develop polyester devices and rapid-growing artificial fiber 
pulping technology. Do research on dacron filament high-speed 
spinning technology, dacron short fiber short-course high-speed 
spinning and new acrylic spinning technology. Develop functional 
and differentiated chemical fibers and industrial chemical 
fibers, focus on research to resolve problems with artificial 
fiber in pure chemical fiber artificial woolen fabric and 
artificial silk and on key technologies for resistance to strand 
loosening and balling, static electricity resistance, flame 
retardance, high shrinkage, high curling, ultrafine fiber, and 
so on, increase the proportion of functional and differentiated 
chemical fibers among chemical fibers from the present 10 
percent to 20 percent by 2000, and actively extend and apply 
them in textile processing. Do research on high-tech fibers and 
special fibers, focus on developing liquid crystal, 
antibacterial, highly elastic, high strength, high modulus, high 
temperature resistant, irradiation resistant, separation, and 
other functional fibers and on new types of polyester fibers, 
high density spun fibers, and so on. 
  8. Textile printing and dyeing industry. 
  Do R&amp;D on new types of spinning and new types of weaving 
technology. For revolving cup spinning, the primary attack is on 
key components, raising domestic production rates, adding 
series, developing from the present nearly 300,000 nozzles to 
1.0 to 1.3 million nozzles, basically covering coarse cotton 
yarn production, and doing research on applications in 
medium-count yearn. Develop high-speed, fully-automatic 
revolving cup spinning machines. Expand applications of air-jet 
spinning, friction spinning, wrapped winding spinning, and other 
new types of spinning in all self-adapting spinning product 
varieties. Do R&amp;D on automatic winders and new types of 
automatic filatures. Do R&amp;D on rapier looms, air-jet looms, 
water-jet looms, and gripper looms, increase series, increase 
from the present nearly 20,000 units to about 100,000 to 120,000 
units by 2000 and account for about 9 percent of the total 
number of all types of looms at that time. The focus in knitting 
should be placed on making breakthroughs in making cloth 
directly using spinning bonding and new high-speed new making 
technology, and on research on non-woven cloth making printing, 
rolling, coating, and other treatment technologies. Along with 
developing clothing textiles, actively develop new decoration 
and industrial textile products. Actively utilize and foster 
China's silkworm, cashmere, rabbit fur, ramie, flax, and bluish 
dogbane raw material resource advantages, do research on 
processing techniques and technologies, develop new intensively 
processed products, raise grades and foreign exchange earning 
levels. 
  Do R&amp;D on high-speed high-efficiency preprocessing 
equipment, 
do research on technical equipment suitable for dyeing small 
batches of a wide variety of products, further develop circular 
net printing, flat net printing, and effusion spray dyeing, form 
small batch multiple product variety printing and processing 
technical systems in coastal and in interior export base areas 
prior to 2000, increase the competitiveness of our export 
products on the international market. Do R&amp;D on mechanical 
treatment and chemical treatment, focus on developing dry 
method, wet method, and transfer coating technology and on 
liquid ammonia, permanent setting, and multifunction organic 
silicon treatment technology. Do R&amp;D on textile dye treatment 
and coating treatment technology. Do research on cotton, silk, 
hemp, and other permanent crease-resistant and shrinkage 
prevention treatment technology. Do R&amp;D on real silk 
low-temperature dyeing technology, high-speed woolen goods 
washing and shrinkage, continuous kettle evaporation, and 
continuous moist heat setting treatment technology. Do research 
to improve ramie and flax textiles dyeing and post-processing 
technology, strengthen development and applied research on 
dyeing assistants, improve product quality and added value. 
  9. Clothing industry. 
  Focus on R&amp;D on new techniques for processing all types 
of 
clothing, reform traditional old techniques. Develop clothing 
computer-aided design systems for clothing patterns, colors, 
textile quality sensing, and so on. Employ automatic material 
arrangement, automatic cutting, high-efficiency special-purpose 
sewing equipment, and automatic hanger systems, 
three-dimensional ironing and three-dimensional packaging and 
transportation, make clothing processing equipment develop from 
high plane technology to three-dimensional processing 
technology. Reinforce clothing compatibility and arrangement, do 
R&amp;D on mid and high-grade lining materials and auxiliary 
materials. Strengthen research on clothing consumption 
structures, fashion trends, and market consumption predictions 
and forecasts. 
  10. Leather industry. 
  Take full advantage of China's abundant pig skin, focus on 
developing pig skin, actively and rationally utilize leather, 
sheepskin, and other types of hides, rationally develop wild 
resources, do research to improve preservation technologies for 
raw hides, strengthen comprehensive utilization of leather 
leftovers, undertake R&amp;D on the leather chemical industry and 
shoe materials. 
  Do research on new technologies for leather coating and 
decoration treatments, do research on new tanning techniques, do 
research on fur dyeing treatment and post-treatment decoration 
technology, develop high precision leather sheeting machines and 
evening machines, low energy consumption drying equipment and 
all types of new integrated decorative treatment machinery 
units, do research to improve fur post-treatment equipment, do 
research on computer design, piece standardization, and 
systematic production technology for shoes and on shoe making 
technique and assembly technology. 
  Actively develop exports of finished fur and leather goods 
and the associated decorative metal components, improve product 
quality and grades. 
  By 2000, put together in a preliminary fashion a stable raw 
materials supply system based on hogs, cattle, and sheep in 
which pig skin is the main factor, basically achieve superior 
quality, high efficiency, and matching up of leather chemical 
industry materials. Basically achieve a shift from exporting raw 
hides to exporting finished leather goods. 
  11. Papermaking industry. 
  Do research on comprehensive development technology for 
timber, paper, and chemical fiber pulp, actively develop 
superior quality fast growing abundant yield forests for 
papermaking, strengthen cultivation of fast-growing forests and 
their applications in pulp making and papermaking, do 
comprehensive research on nurturing cutting in forest regions 
and papermaking technology for processing leftover materials, 
actively study protection technology and improve variety 
selective breeding for reed resources, further expand the depth 
and breadth of development and applications for bluish dogbane, 
bamboo, bagasse, cotton stalks, and other non-woody raw 
materials, strengthen recovery and utilization of waste paper. 
  Do research on storage, preparation, and purification and 
bleaching technology and equipment for grass resources; do 
research on high gathering rate, how energy consumption, and 
limited polluting and non-polluting new pulp making and 
bleaching technology for poplar and other broadleaf materials; 
actively develop chemical mechanical pulp and high recovery rate 
pulp, strengthen importing, digestion, and absorption of key 
technical equipment, actively do R&amp;D on special-purpose 
equipment for pulp making and papermaking that conform to 
China's characteristics. Do research on long and short fiber 
mixture utilization technology and neutral sizing papermaking 
technology, develop special-purpose chemical assistants and 
applications technology for use in papermaking, do research to 
improve matching technology for grass pulp alkali recovery and 
comprehensive utilization technology for treatment of the 
``three wastes'', focus on basic theoretical research. Strive to 
move up to an advanced international status in non-woody fiber 
pulp making and papermaking technology. 
  Strive to improve the quality of offset printed newsprint, 
stretched paperbag paper, low ration paper, high fill paper, 
high lustre coated paper and cardboard, paper series used in 
industrial, national defense, and daily life, and other new 
products. Actively develop bagasse and bluish dogbane newsprint 
making; poplar wood mechanical hot grinding pulp; cardboard 
making from bamboo, cotton stalks, and bluish dogbane, and other 
products. 
  By 2000, strive for continual increases in the proportion of 
woody material used in papermaking fiber raw materials, 
continually improve waste paper recovery rates, basically 
achieve a shift to domestic production of primary large 
papermaking machinery, basically satisfy domestic demand for the 
quality and variety of paper and cardboard, make new 
breakthroughs in waste liquid treatment, substantially improve 
technology and equipment levels in the papermaking industry, 
achieve new increases in the proportion of woody material by 
2020, achieve more rational utilization of waste paper, form a 
series of matching manufacturing systems for papermaking 
equipment and try to export them, basically treat ``three 
wastes'', adapt the quality and variety of paper and cardboard 
to the requirements of our economic development and people's 
lives. 
  12. Plastic processing industry. 
  Actively develop plastic resin and matching assistant 
product 
varieties. Develop comixing, modification, filling, 
strengthening, and anti-aging technology. Develop degradable 
plastic film, plastic alloys, and engineering plastics. Do 
R&amp;D 
on waste and old plastic recovery and utilization technology and 
equipment. 
  Do research on new plastic finished product molding 
technology, do R&amp;D on advanced machine heads, molds, mold 
control, and other advanced technologies, do R&amp;D on 
applications 
of printing, bagmaking, welding, hot molding, spraying, hot 
press printing, color impressing, combination, and other new 
secondary processing technologies, strengthen development of 
special-purpose plastic equipment, focus on developing sets of 
special-purpose machinery units. Actively develop plastic series 
products, strengthen development of agricultural film and 
research on its applications technology. 
  13. Common chemical industry. 
  Fully utilize domestic resources, develop natural animal and 
plant oil preparation surface activators, increase the number of 
varieties of resin and alcohol products, readjust raw materials 
structures, develop washing products and new surface activator 
products and their applications in the industrial area. 
  Digest, absorb, and develop already-imported alkyl benzene 
and carbonyl synthetic fatty alcohol manufacturing technology, 
develop advanced carbonization, neutralization, mixing, 
spraying, and post-mixing technical equipment and procedure 
automatic control technology. Develop perfumed soap molding 
technology, fat hydrolysis technology, and glycerin recovery 
technology. Digest and absorb makeup emulsification devices and 
packaging equipment, develop series of makeup principles, do 
research on the mechanisms of pharmaceutical makeup action and 
their safety. Along with focusing on the development of 
synthetic perfumes, make major efforts to develop natural 
perfumes, do research on natural perfume blending, processing, 
storage, and precision refining technology, develop high-quality 
perfume product series, do research to improve perfume blending 
technology. Do further research on photosensitive materials 
silver-conserving and silver recovery technology, increase 
silver recovery rates, accelerate the digestion and absorption 
of color photosensitive materials production technology and the 
shift to domestic production of the primary raw materials, make 
major efforts to develop non-silver photosensitive materials. Do 
R&amp;D on new types of high-capacity high-power batteries. 
  14. Household appliance industry. 
  Strive to improve the safety performance and the quality and 
grades of existing products, increase added value, actively 
develop low energy consumption, safe, and high added value 
appliance products, increase designs and product varieties, 
accelerate the raising of product grades. Do R&amp;D on solar 
energy 
and multiple types of energy resource (coal gas, biogas, wind 
energy, geothermal, etc.) household appliance products. Actively 
develop small appliance products. Do R&amp;D on new types of 
electric light source materials and energy-saving electric light 
source products. Gradually reduce the proportion of incandescent 
lightbulbs in the electro-optical source product mix. 
  Raise product design levels, do R&amp;D on the use of 
electronics 
in products and automated production control technology. 
  Develop program controllers, compressors, temperature 
controllers, heating components, high-speed micromotors, 
transducers, and other key assembly manufacturing technology, 
accelerate the pace of a shift to domestic production of key 
assemblies and components, strengthen digestion, absorption, and 
innovation of imported technology and equipment, develop 
stamping, welding, large mold, and automatic monitoring function 
specialized high-efficiency precision processing technology and 
equipment. Do on new types of coolants that do not contain CFCs, 
new types of high-efficiency compressors and semiconductor 
cooling technology, do R&amp;D on flexible production components 
and 
production lines for household appliance products, strengthen 
thermodynamics, acoustics, materials science, fluid dynamics, 
and other related basic research. 
  By 2000, base supplies of key assemblies and components used 
in appliance production on domestic sources, develop several new 
appliance products, basically attain advanced international 
levels in quality. For a rational and modernized large-scale 
production household appliance production system with 
coordinated development and more rational deployments on a 
national scale. 
  15. Common machinery industry. 
  Focus on watches, bicycles, and sewing machines, strive to 
increase products designs and varieties, improve product 
quality, raise export foreign exchange earning levels, actively 
study and adopt new materials, do research on improving 
electroplating, gold plating, oil paint, and other surface 
decoration technologies, do R&amp;D on external watch components 
cold forging and precision forging processing technology and on 
domestically produced quartz watch assembly component 
(integrated circuit small quartz vibrators, stepping electric 
motors, etc.) and external component production technology. Do 
R&amp;D on bicycle welding and heat treatment technologies, and 
on 
automated assembly lines and automated packaging lines. Develop 
key component precision processing technology. Strengthen on 
product design and mold making. Do research in ergonomics. 
  Make major efforts to develop new quartz electronic watch 
(focusing on those with hands in the near term) products, 
actively develop all types of watches and timers used in 
industry, the military (including aviation and marine 
navigation), urban government construction, sports, and other 
areas. Develop electric-powered and internal combustion 
engine-powered bicycles, actively develop lightweight cars, 
multispeed cars, health cars, and racing cars. Develop household 
multifunction sewing machines, industrial sewing machines, 
computer embroidering machines, and other new products. 
  By 2000, form a multi-grade high, mid, and low structure for 
watch, bicycle, and sewing machine products, move toward or 
basically attain advanced international levels in product 
quality. Attain levels of the economically develop countries of 
the 1980's in techniques and technologies. 
  16. Common silicates industry. 
  Do research on mineral raw material resource protection, 
rational exploitation, comprehensive utilization, and precision 
processing technology, implement unified extraction and grading, 
comprehensively utilize natural resources, do research on the 
adoption of advanced superior quality energy-saving ceramic and 
enamelware kilns and glass ovens, do R&amp;D on molding, surface 
processing, and other advanced technologies, improve existing 
tunnel kiln and combustion technology, develop advanced molding 
machine units and key decoration equipment. Do research on 
mixing and preparation automated technical equipment, develop 
series of matching superior-quality fire-resistant materials, do 
research on glass product high-efficiency energy-saving 
annealing technology. Do research on lightweight bottle 
manufacturing technology and mold development technology, pay 
attention to exploring and improving traditional civilian 
techniques and technologies, accelerate research on copying 
ancient techniques. 
  Strive to raise product design levels, actively develop new 
products, focus on developing high-level sets of ceramics and 
technique display ceramics for export. For glass articles, focus 
on lead crystalline glass, handicraft products, and 
heat-resistant kitchen utensil series, tempered glass articles 
and assemblies and product series. For enamelware, the focus 
should be place on products that sell well in the international 
market. 
  By 2000, attain international standards in the quality of 
export products and basically attain international levels of the 
1980's for technical equipment. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20474 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    2 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Science &amp; Technology Policy </F>
<H3> <TI>   State To Focus on 35 Hi-Tech Industries Vital to China's </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    State To Focus on 35 Hi-Tech Industries Vital to China's </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Economy 

<F P=102>   40101004A Beijing CHINA DAILY in English 2 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 40101004A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CHINA DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Sun Shangwu: ``35 Hi-Tech Industries Singled Out </F>
for Support''] 
  [Text] Three State commissions have targeted 35 technology 
industries in seven fields as the key link for applying research 
to economic development. 
  These highlighted fields will see increased government 
funding after technological sectors as well as more scientific 
aid from the State. 
  Government officials yesterday called the fields vital to 
China's economy in the remaining years of this decade and into 
the 21st century. 
  They cover the following fields and technologies: 

  -  Agriculture: improving crop quality and two technologies 
of breeding crops and tackling problems in low-yielding crops. 


    -  Energy and Environment: nuclear, oil extraction and coal 
industries. 


    -  Transportation: high-speed railway system, high-grade 
roadways and inland water transport. 


    -  Raw Materials and Resources: iron-smelting, refined 
chemical products and engineering plastics. 


    -  Information and Communication: integrated circuits, 
computers, software, electronics, automation and fiber-optics 
communication. 


    -  Manufacturing: digital-control, laser and the 
manufacturing of equipment used in large-scale thermal power. 


    -  Biotechnology has also been selected as a key technology 
in the 1990s. 

    These were jointly selected by the State Planning 
Commission, 
the State Science and Technology Commission and the State 
Economic and Trade Commission. 
  Officials from the State Planning Commission said that China 
will concentrate on tackling technological problems which are 
linked closely with the country's economic development. 
  The technological applications expect to promote industrial 
adjustments, intensify economic strength and improve 
international competition. 
  These key technologies have been included in State-level 
scientific development projects, including the State Science 
Research Project, the High-tech Development Project and the 
State Industrial Experiment Project. 
  Local government as well as enterprises, colleges and 
research institutes have also been urged to supporting the 
application of these technologies. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20475 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    11 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Science &amp; Technology Policy </F>
<H3> <TI>   Excellent Young Scientists Honored </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Excellent Young Scientists Honored </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   40101003A Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN ZHOUKAN [BEIJING REVIEW] 
in English Vol 37 No 3, 17-23 Jan 94 p 32 </F>

<F P=103> 40101003A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN ZHOUKAN [BEIJING REVIEW] 
in English Vol 37 No 3, 17-23 Jan 94 p 32 </F>

<F P=105> English </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Feng Jing: ``Rewards Honor Excellent Young </F>
Scientists''] 
  [Text] In December 1993, 40 out of 140 candidates were 
given awards at the Third Prize Ceremony of Young Scientists of 
the Chinese Academy of Sciences (CAS). Among them, 10 were first 
prize winners, and another 30 ranked second. The youngest was 26 
years old, and the average age was 32. They were all selected 
from research institutes under CAS. Among them, 34 were Ph.Ds., 
with 31 having earned their doctorates at home. Altogether, they 
had published 1,159 academic papers in Chinese and foreign 
academic periodicals. The scientific research projects which 
they presided over or participated in as key members had won six 
prizes of state-level scientific and technological achievements 
and 22 awards from CAS, provinces and ministries. Their 
achievements have been prominent in scientific and technological 
fields. 
  Research fellow Zhang Zhile, aged 30, was the youngest among 
the first prize winners. Zhang received his doctorate from 
Shenyang Metal Research Institute. He has obtained outstanding 
research results in the fields of magnetics, magnetic materials 
and applied magnetics, with publication of 57 academic papers in 
foreign and domestic periodicals. A research group led by him 
succeeded in developing a new permanent magnetic material of 
world advanced level. He and his colleagues have advanced a new 
theory of magnetic colloidal effects through analysing 
phenomenon associated with handling of permanent magnetic 
material, thus solving a knotty problem of several decades at 
global level. Many specialists praised his efforts as an 
absolutely first-class job. Wider dissemination of magnetic 
technology, a project in which he was involved, has brought over 
100 million yuan to oilfields. Due to his stirring efforts, he 
was granted the title of Liaoning Provincial Outstanding Young 
Scientific and Technical Worker, awarded at the Third Prize 
Ceremony of the China Association for Science and Technology. 
  Wang Xiaofang, born in 1967, was the youngest prize winner. 
A 
Ph.D. of the Shanghai Optical Machinery Research Institute, he 
is known for his creative accomplishments in the study of laser 
plasma X-ray spectrum and X-ray lasers. Wang has published more 
than 20 academic papers in influential local and overseas 
journals. He was the key member of the first research project to 
set up a soft X-ray spectrometer with penetrating strap raster. 
Other national firsts by Wang and his colleagues have included 
the systematic study of the equilibrium of linear focus X-rays, 
the course of their evolution and the space-time character of 
composite X-ray lasers. In addition, Wang has designed a new way 
to drive lasers and a new laser target. As a key member, he 
participated in research for the state-designated ``863'' 
high-tech project, as well as a key project designated by CAS 
and another by the State Natural Sciences Fund. In 1992, he was 
given first prize for Natural Sciences by CAS, and his treatise 
was chosen in 1993 as an excellent one for the National Young 
Scientists' Academic Paper Exchange Meeting on Laser Science. 
  Qi Zhixue was the only woman among winners. Shortly after 
she 
finished her master's degree at the Electronic Industry Research 
Institute in 1988, she was assigned a job in the institute. In 
1992, Qi went to Canada for one year of further studies. At the 
end of this, she was advised her excellent marks warranted her 
staying on to continue toward a doctorate. However, feeling she 
was badly needed at home, Qi politely declined the Canadian 
offer. After returning to China, she participated in the study 
and manufacture of line-cutting machine tools. She was in charge 
of software programming which solved technical problems in 
handling of non-circular curves. This feat won the second prize 
for Beijing Scientific and Technical Progress. The 
program-control system for the new machine tools which involved 
Qi's major efforts took the third prize for scientific and 
technical progress of CAS in 1991. The same year, she was 
conferred the title of ``Outstanding Contributor With Chinese 
Masters'' by the Academic Degrees Committee of the State Council. 
  Other winners included Li Jinghai, Yuan Yexiang, Chen 
Zhaoxiong and Wang Zhixin, whose research projects all earned 
prizes for scientific and technical achievements from the state 
or CAS. 
  The young scientist awards are presented biennially in a bid 
to discover and encourage talented young scientists. In 1989, 
there were 21 winners. In 1991, the number increased to 25. 
Recipients gain not only awards but also special housing, 
promotions and professional study opportunities. 
  Zhou Guangzhao, president of CAS, said, ``Our academy is 
passing through a crucial stage. The burden of work is shifting 
to fledgling scientists. Having the young replace their elders 
is one of the three important tasks we face in the 90s.'' 
  CAS is honored as a state team. Under its umbrella are some 
150 research institutes, with 60,000 scientific workers. Among 
them, there are 30,000 young scientific workers under the age of 
40, accounting for half its total employment. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20476 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    7 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Advanced Materials </F>
<H3> <TI>   Major New Advance in Atomic-Scale Surface Modification </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Major New Advance in Atomic-Scale Surface Modification </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Reported 

<F P=102>   94P60136B Beijing KEJI RIBAO [SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY DAILY] 
in Chinese 7 Feb 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60136B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing KEJI RIBAO [SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY DAILY] 
in Chinese 7 Feb 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yu Xiaohan [0060 1420 2498]: ``Major Advance in </F>
Atomic-Scale Modification and Machining: Good News Transmitted 
From Nation's Nanometer Science &amp; Technology Research''] 
  [Summary] Beijing, 4 Feb -- in 1992, scientists from the 
CAS Institute of Chemistry pioneered domestic research in direct 
nanoscale lithography -- they succeeded in ``writing,'' with a 
10-nm line width, the two characters ``Zhongguo'' and the three 
letters ``CAS'' on a graphite surface via a domestically made 
scanning tunneling microscope (STM) [see JPRS-CST-92-017, 24 Sep 
92 p 25 and JPRS-CST-93-013, 27 Jul 93 pp 10-11]. Now, 
scientists from the CAS Beijing Vacuum Physics Laboratory 
(BVPL), researching a new atomic surface modification technique, 
have succeeded in room-temperature direct manipulation of Si 
atoms on a surface with a single-crystal silicon (SCS) atomic 
arrangement. Average line width for these lines drawn on the SCS 
surface via the STM probe is 2 nm (3-4 Si atoms). An STM image 
of some sample lines, shown in the accompanying micrograph, 
clearly reveals these lines forming the three characters ``Mao 
Zedong,'' as well as the neatly laid-out Si-atom lattice in the 
background. These are the world's smallest characters 
``written'' on a Si surface to date: average character size is 2 
millionths of a cm [i.e., 20 nm]. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-CST-006-03A>      STM Micrograph of Characters ``Mao Zedong'' Written on Si-Atom Surface Via STM by CAS BVPL Scientists; 500 Angstroms </FIG>

  The BVPL scientists were also able to move, or transplant, 
Si 
atoms from one straight line to form another, raised straight 
line. Finally, these scientists were able to neatly transplant 
the atoms on the Si surface along a lattice orientation to form 
a new straight line in a technique they called ``sequenced 
transplantation.'' 
  These three breakthrough achievements in atomic-scale 
surface 
modification and machining represent a major advance in a high 
technology generally recognized as being of major significance 
in the coming century, especially in areas such as high-density 
information storage, nanoscale-device and quantum-well-device 
development, and new materials synthesis. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20477 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    11 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Advanced Materials </F>
<H3> <TI>   Synthesis of Fe/C/Si Ultrafine Particles by Laser Induced </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Synthesis of Fe/C/Si Ultrafine Particles by Laser Induced </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Vapor-Phase   Reaction Method 

<F P=102> 94FE0224A Shanghai ZHONGGUO JIGUANG [CHINESE JOURNAL OF 
LASERS] in Chinese Vol A20 No 9, Sep 93 pp 688-692 </F>

<F P=103> 94FE0224A </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai ZHONGGUO JIGUANG [CHINESE JOURNAL OF 
LASERS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Guo Guangsheng [6753 1639 3932], Wang Kaiyan </F>
[8001 7030 7346], Zhang Jingchang [1728 2417 2545], Wang Weijie 
[3769 0251 3381], Gao Xiaoyun [7559 0879 0061], and Yang Fuming 
[2799 4395 2494] of the Department of Applied Chemistry, Beijing 
Institute of Chemical Technology: ``Synthesis of Fe/C/Si 
Ultrafine Particles by Laser Induced Vapor-Phase Reaction 
Method''; MS received 21 Jul 92, revised 21 Sep 92] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Abstract </H5>
  Fe/C/Si ultrafine particles (UFPs) are synthesized by laser 
induced vapor-phase reaction with a 150-W CW CO[.sub]2[/] 
laser using Fe(CO)[.sub]5[/], SiH[.sub]4[/] and 
C[.sub]2[/]H[.sub]4[/] as raw materials. Instantaneous 
temperature of the reaction flame is measured by a SCIT 
[Scientific, Inc.] infrared thermometer and its dependence upon 
parameters such as laser power density, reaction pressure and 
gas ratio is determined. The Fe and Si content in the product is 
analyzed by the EDTA volumetric method and potassium 
fluorosilicate method. This ultrafine particle is fully 
characterized by X-ray diffraction, electron diffraction, 
transmission electron microscopy, infrared spectroscopy and 
laser fluorescence spectroscopy. 
<H5>  1. Introduction </H5>
  Laser induced vapor-phase synthesis is a highly advanced 
technique for preparing UFPs. It has been used to prepare a 
number of UFPs[.sup]1,2[/] that cannot be fabricated via 
conventional chemical techniques. Because of advantages such as 
small particle size, narrow particle distribution, controllable 
composition and large specific surface area, the study of UFPs 
prepared by laser induced vapor-phase synthesis in catalysis has 
become an important branch in UFP applications. The Fe series of 
UFPs is the original catalyst that attracted a great deal of 
attention. Laser induced Fe-based UFPs were found to be 
extremely selective in F-T synthesis.[.sup]3[/] Fe and Fe/C 
UFPs have been prepared using a 10.6-m CW CO[.sub]2[/] 
laser as a light source for thermal 
decomposition.[.sup]4,5[/] The influence of various 
parameters on the synthesis of Fe/C/Si UFPs is discussed in 
detail in this paper. The reaction mechanism is also explored. 
Furthermore, the behavior of Fe/C/Si UFPs is characterized. 
<H5>  2. Experimental Method </H5>
  Laser-induced UFPs are prepared using a reaction apparatus 
and based on principles similar to those employed by an MIT 
group.[.sup]1[/] An improved experimental system is described 
in detail in a previous paper.[.sup]5[/] In this work, a 
150-W CW CO[.sub]2[/] laser is the light source. The raw 
materials used include liquid Fe(CO)[.sub]5[/], high-purity 
SiH[.sub]4[/] and C[.sub]2[/]H[.sub]4[/] gas and 
high-purity N[.sub]2[/] and Ar as the carrier gases. All 
reactive gases and carrier gases are individually controlled 
with a mass flow regulator. The pressure in the reaction zone is 
stable and adjustable. 
  Pre-mixed reaction gas comes out of a 2-mm-diameter nozzle. 
Reaction takes place after the gas stream meets a focused laser 
beam perpendicularly. The reaction flame is stable and conically 
shaped. Its temperature is measured with a SCIT infrared 
thermometer having a range of 600-2000C. A 5-mW He-Ne laser 
may be used to monitor the formation of these UFPs. The UFPs 
produced are carried by the carrier gas into the collector. They 
are removed from the collector and treated under an inert gas 
atmosphere and then characterized. In this experiment, Fe/C/Si 
UFPs are produced at a rate of approximately 2-3 g/h. 
<H5>  3. Results and Discussion </H5>
<H5>  3.1 Characterization of Fe/C/Si UFPs </H5>
  Table 1 shows the reaction conditions and experimental 
results in the preparation of Fe/C/Si UFPs. For comparison, 
FSC-107, FSC-111 and FSC-112 are UFPs of Fe/Si, Fe/C and C/Si, 
respectively. Various analytical methods are employed to 
characterize the UFPs, including conventional chemical analysis, 
XRD (X-ray diffraction), TEM (transmission electron microscopy), 
and IRS (infrared spectroscopy). 



  Table 1. Experimental Conditions and Results of Fe/C/Si Particles 

Sample     Reaction    Laser intensity    Gas flow rate (SCCM)                                          Fe(CO)[.sub]5[/]    Reaction       Composition (wt%) 
number     pressure    (W/cm[.sup]2[/])                                                                  temperature*       temperature 
           (KPa)                                                                                        ( C)               ( C) 

                                          SiH[.sub]4[/]    C[.sub]2[/]H[.sub]4[/]    Ar         Ar                                           Si        Fe 
                                                                                  (inner)    (outer) 

FSC-101    50          1520               20              50                      0          300        20                 906            44.4      14.3 

FSC-102    30          1520               20              50                      0          300        20                 782            32.7      22.3 

FSC-103    70          1520               20              50                      0          300        20                 1001           44.2      6.6 

FSC-104    50          1520               10              50                      10         300        20.5               787            30.7      29.4 

FSC-105    50          1520               20              30                      20         500        23                 826            35.6      18.0 

FSC-106    50          1520               30              30                      20         500        24                 840            47.2      7.5 

FSC-107    50          1520               20              0                       30         200        25                 805            55.7      7.7 

FSC-108    50          970                20              30                      20         500        25                 880            39.1      10.7 

FSC-109    50          2700               20              30                      20         400        25                 870            37.1      13.5 

FSC-110    50          1520               20              30                      20         500        50                 855            20.6      62.7 

FSC-111    50          1520               0               70                      0          300        23.5               760            --        82.6 

FSC-112    50          1520               50              50                      0          300        --                 970            65.1      0.7 

*Saturated vapor pressure of Fe(CO)[.sub]5[/] vs. temperature: lg P (torr) = -(2096.7 K/T) + 8.4959 


  Conventional chemical analysis is primarily used to 
determine 
the Fe and Si content in the UFPs. In this work, the EDTA 
volumetric method and potassium fluorosilicate method are used 
to analyze the Fe and Si content, with results shown in Table 1. 
It is worthwhile noting that a number of unexpected problems may 
be encountered in using conventional methods to assay UFPs due 
to their unique properties. Hence, some correction may be 
required. To verify our analytical results, the Fe and Si 
contents of specimen FSC-105 are determined by atomic absorption 
and fluorescence spectroscopy. The results show that our method 
is valid. In addition, the specimen is also examined by atomic 
emission spectroscopy. It is found that besides Fe and Si as 
major constituents, the specimen's Ca and Mg contents are below 
one ten-thousandth. There are no other metallic elements 
present. Oxygen analysis is not done on all samples. However, 
total carbon analysis is done on specimens FSC-105, FSC-111 and 
FSC-112. By way of calculating the percentages for Fe, C and Si, 
the analysis indicates the presence of a small amount of oxygen. 
We believe that oxygen, as an impurity, exists as 
H[.sub]2[/]O, SiO[.sub]2[/] and 
Fe[.sub]2[/]O[.sub]3[/]. In the IR spectra, in addition to 
Fe-Si and Si-C absorption bands, H[.sub]2[/]O and 
SiO[.sub]2[/] bands are also found (see Figure 1). A 
comparison to the IR spectra of binary specimens shows the 
presence of at least one Fe-Si compound and SiC in the Fe/C/Si 
UFP. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-CST-006-05A>      Figure 1. Infrared Spectrum of Fe/C/Si Particle </FIG>

  XRD analysis is chosen to determine the crystalline 
structure 
of the specimen. In all tertiary Fe/C/Si UFP specimens, 
Fe[.sub]5[/]Si[.sub]3[/] is found to be the principal 
crystal. SiC, _a_-Fe, Fe[.sub]3[/]C and FeSi[.sub]2[/] 
begin to emerge after varying the reaction conditions. Figure 2 
shows the XRD patterns of FSC-101, FSC-103 and FSC-105, where 
the 2_th_ diffraction angles of 52.0, 58.0 and 
59.3 and face distances of 0.221 nm, 0.1997 nm and 0.196 nm 
are characteristics of Fe[.sub]5[/]Si[.sub]3[/]; 2_th_ 
diffraction angles of 45.2 and 78.0 and face distances 
of 0.253 nm and 0.153 nm are characteristics of _a_-SiC; and 
the 
2_th_ diffraction angles of 55.4 and 57.1 and face 
distances of 0.208 nm and 0.202 nm are characteristics of 
Fe[.sub]3[/]C and _a_-Fe, respectively. the low and wide 
diffraction peaks are due to the small crystal dimensions. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-CST-006-05B>      Figure 2. XRD Patterns of Fe/C/Si Particle </FIG>

  The presence of Fe[.sub]5[/]Si[.sub]3[/] can also be 
determined by electron diffraction. A diffraction ring 
corresponding to SiC is also apparent. Figure 3 [photograph not 
reproduced] shows the electron diffraction pattern of specimen 
FSC-103. It agrees with the XRD result. TEM is employed to 
observe the UFPs. Figure 4 [photograph not reproduced] is a TEM 
picture of specimen FSC-103. The particles are close to 
spherical and they are linked together in the form of a chain. 
The average particle diameter is 25 nm and the UFP has a narrow 
particle-volume distribution. Over the entire range of 
experimental conditions, the average diameter is 7-35 nm. In 
specimen FSC-OA (obtained under conditions such as 
C[.sub]2[/]H[.sub]4[/] : SiH[.sub]4[/] = 5 : 2, 
Fe(CO)[.sub]5[/] : 14C; pressure 70 kPa), small crystals 
of the order of 1 nm in diameter are found in such particles 
under TEM [see Figure 5 photograph, not reproduced]. The effect 
of experimental parameters on UFP diameter will be discussed in 
a separate paper. 
  In addition, a Digisorb 2500 specific surface-area analyzer 
is used to measure the specific surface area of specimen 
FSC-111, which is 195.3 m[.sup]2[/]/g. The absorption 
isotherm of the UFP is the classical S type (type II), which is 
often seen in non-porous materials.[.sup]6[/] Hence, most of 
the particles produced by laser induced vapor-phase synthesis 
are non-porous. 
<H5>  3.2 Reaction Temperature as a Function of Experimental </H5>
Parameters 
  Table 1 shows reaction flame temperature as a function of 
different experimental conditions. A series of experiments was 
also designed to study reaction temperature as a function of 
pressure. In this series of experiments, with the exception of 
pressure, other parameters remain the same as those for specimen 
FSC-105. It is found that the reaction flame temperature rises 
with increasing pressure and SiH[.sub]4[/] flow rate (see 
Figure 6). This is because an increase in reaction pressure is 
equivalent to an increase in the concentration of the reactant. 
Consequently, more laser light is absorbed. SiH[.sub]4[/] is 
a good absorber for the laser. An increase in its flow rate also 
increases the absorption of laser energy. Hence, the reaction 
temperature also rises. The preparation of FSC-104, FSC-105 and 
FSC-106 happens to prove this point (see Table 1). In addition, 
parameters such as laser power density, reaction-zone light spot 
size, and ratio of reactant gas to carrier gas also affect the 
reaction temperature. In this work, laser power density is 
regulated by varying the spot size in the reaction zone at a 
stable laser power level. Therefore, the effect of laser power 
density and spot size on the reaction temperature cannot be 
discussed separately. In conclusion, several parameters will 
affect the reaction flame temperature in the preparation of UFPs 
by laser. This temperature has a direct impact on the property 
of the UFPs. Therefore, it is critical to study the relation 
between these experimental parameters and the characteristics of 
the UFPs in detail. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-CST-006-06A>      Figure 6. Reaction Flame Temperature vs. Pressure </FIG>

<H5>  3.3 Reaction Mechanism </H5>
  In a laser chemical reaction, the most basic condition is 
that the reactant must be able to directly or indirectly absorb 
the laser energy. In the preparation of Fe/C/Si UFPs, 
SiH[.sub]4[/] can be excited by intensely absorbing the 
10.6-m photons emitted by the CO[.sub]2[/] laser. 
C[.sub]2[/]H[.sub]4[/] molecules can also absorb such 
photons. Fe(CO)[.sub]5[/], however, cannot directly absorb 
this laser energy. On the basis of the composition of the 
product and the above discussion, we believe the reaction 
mechanism is fairly complex and can be expressed in the 
following steps. 
  3.3.1 Energy absorption 
&lt;graphic&gt; &lt;/graphic&gt;

  3.3.2 Energy transfer 
  SiH[.sub]4[/]* + Fe(CO)[.sub]5[/] 
Fe(CO)[.sub]5[/]* + SiH[.sub]4[/] 
  C[.sub]2[/]H[.sub]4[/]* + Fe(CO)[.sub]5[/] 
Fe(CO)[.sub]5[/]* + C[.sub]2[/]H[.sub]4[/] 
  SiH[.sub]4[/]* + C[.sub]2[/]H[.sub]4[/] 
C[.sub]2[/]H[.sub]2[/]* + SiH[.sub]4[/] 
  3.3.3 Reactions 
  Fe(CO)[.sub]5[/]* Fe* + 5CO 
  SiH[.sub]4[/]* Si* + 2H[.sub]2[/] 
  C[.sub]2[/]H[.sub]4[/]* 2C* + 2H[.sub]2[/] 
  Fe* + C* Fe/C 
  Fe* + Si* Fe/Si 
  Si* + C* SiC 
  Fe* + Si* + C* Fe/C/Si 
  3.3.4 Deactivation 
  Fe* + M Fe + M 
  Si* + M Si + M 
  C* + M C + M 
  Therefore, the composition of the Fe/C/Si UFPs is very 
complicated. It may include Fe, Si and C individually, or binary 
compounds of Fe/C, Fe/Si and Si/C, or tertiary compounds of 
Fe/C/Si. Instead, we use Fe/C/Si to represent these compounds 
collectively. 
References 
  1. W. R. Cannon, J. S. Haggerty, et al., J. AMER. CERAM. 
SOC., Vol 65 No 7, 1982, p 324. 
  2. Toshiuki Ohyama, CHEMICAL EQUIPMENT (in Japanese), No 11, 
1988, p 46. 
  3. A. Gupta, J. T. Yardley, PROC. SPIE, Vol 458, 1984, p 
131. 
  4. Gao Xiaoyun, Zhang Jingchang, Guo Guangsheng, et al., 
ZHONGGUO JIGUANG [CHINESE JOURNAL OF LASERS], Vol 19 No 3, 1992, 
p 235. 
  5. Gao Xiaoyun, Zhang Jingchang, Guo Guangsheng, et al., 
BEIJING HUAGONG XUEYUAN XUEBAO [JOURNAL OF BEIJING INSTITUTE OF 
CHEMICAL ENGINEERING], Vol 18 No 4, 1991, p 67. 
  6. C. N. Satterfield (U.S.), translated by Pang Li [1690 
4409], ``Practical Multi-Phase Catalysis,'' First Edition, 
Beijing University Press, 1990, p 121. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20478 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Advanced Materials </F>
<H3> <TI>   PBZT High-Performance Composite Passes Ministry-Level </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    PBZT High-Performance Composite Passes Ministry-Level </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Appraisal 

<F P=102>   94P60136A Shanghai WEN HUI BAO in Chinese 10 Jan 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94P60136A </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai WEN HUI BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: ``High-Performance New Material </F>
Passes Education Commission Appraisal''] 
  [Summary] Achievements from the ``Synthesis of 
High-Performance New Material PBZT [poly(p-phenylene 
benzobisthiazole)] and Liquid-Crystal Spinning'' research 
project undertaken by scientists in the Polymer Materials 
Department at East China University of Science &amp; Technology 
[in 
Shanghai] recently passed State Education Commission-organized 
expert appraisal, at which academicians from the CAS Institute 
of Chemistry and CAS Institute of Silicates judged the research 
to be world-class. PBZT is a new high-strength aerospace and 
armaments-oriented composite with superior high-temperature 
resistance, environmental stability, and chemical corrosion 
resistance. This new [conducting] polymer material, now under 
development in the United States, Japan, and a small number of 
other advanced Western nations, has been included by the State 
in the ``863'' High-Tech Plan in an effort to catch up with the 
international state-of-the-art. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20479 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    11 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Achievements in Biological Research in 1993 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Achievements in Biological Research in 1993 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P60149A Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE BAO [CHINESE SCIENCE NEWS] 
in Chinese 11 Feb 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60149A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE BAO [CHINESE SCIENCE NEWS] 
in Chinese 11 Feb 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article provided by the ``Basic Science Research Express''] </F>
  [Excerpts] In 1993, Chinese researchers scored significant 
achievements in biological sciences: 
  1) Dr. Tang Jianguo and other researchers at Beijing 
University developed a genetic engineering human insulin with 
similar constituents and biological functions to natural 
insulin, by directly expressing the encoded pro-gene of human 
insulin in E. coli. The method is believed to be more 
cost-effective and more productive than the conventional methods 
using E. coli system and yeast system. 
  2) Ten new proteins were designed and synthesized by 
researchers at the Department of Chemistry of Beijing 
University. First the researchers designed and synthesized 10 
templates of these peptides including polypeptide segments 
having completely new sequences, branch-shaped hexopeptides, 
linear dodecapeptides, and cyclic dodecapeptides. The templates 
were then used to synthesize six new tetraspiral proteins 
containing 54, 60, 70, and 76 amino acid residues respectively. 
All proteins synthesized in this laboratory are not naturally 
found. 
  3) The CAS Institute of Biophysics launched a project on 
``Three Dimensional Structure and Functions Research of 
Phycoerythrin,'' and successfully obtained the 5 Angstroms 
resolution structure of phycoerythrin crystal. It is the protein 
research project on third large protein conducted by Chinese 
researchers using multi-paired isomorphism replacement method 
following insulin and trichosanthes protein research. Research 
work on phycoerythrin structure is believed to be much harder, 
because of large molecular weight of phycoerythrin (260,000 
Dalton), which is about 45 times of insulin molecule and 10 
times of trichosanthes molecule. 
  4) Dr. Lu Fengmin at the Harbin Medical University developed 
a new method to research anticancer gene to stop the spread of 
cancer cells. Dr. Lu creatively uses anti-sense technique to 
research the first Chinese-isolated and cloned P[.sup]14-6[/] 
cDNA, and constructs the first P[.sup]14-6[/] cDNA antisense 
RNA clone. Through transfection, antisense RNA can cleverly 
block the expression of homologous genes in cells and stop the 
homologous genes' biological activity, which in turn inhibits 
transformation of normal cells into malignant cells. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20480 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    11 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Research on Genetic Engineering Growth-Promoting Vaccine </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Research on Genetic Engineering Growth-Promoting Vaccine </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P60149B Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE [SCIENCE IN CHINA-SERIES B] 
in Chinese Vol 23 No 12, Dec 93 pp 1272-1278 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60149B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE [SCIENCE IN CHINA-SERIES B] 
in Chinese Vol 23 No 12, Dec 93 pp 1272-1278 </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Xu Wenzhong [1776 2429 1813], Du Nianxing [2629 </F>
1819 5281], Department of Animal Medicine, Nanjing Agricultural 
University, Nanjing; Li Guangdi [2621 0342 0966], Wang Yuan 
[3076 0997], Li Zaiping [2621 6528 1627], Institute of 
Biochemistry, Chinese Academy of Sciences, Shanghai] 
  [Abstract] Today's new approach to promote animal growth is 
the use of animal growth inhibition hormone (somatostatin, ss). 
Because animal growth is controlled by the secretion of growth 
hormone (GH), which is in turn controlled by the inhibition of 
somatostatin. Since Chinese researchers failed their first 
attempt to obtain a genetic engineering somatostatin subunit 
vaccine through expression of somatostatin gene in E. coli, they 
therefore switched their attention to the use of live vectors, 
the vaccinia viruses. They first fused ss gene with HBsAg gene, 
then used the ss antigen-carrying HBsAg gene to construct a 
recombinant vaccinia virus. When the recombinant vaccinia virus 
is used to directly immunize animals, the ss antigen expressed 
in animal bodies induces immune response to neutralize the ss 
antigen, and animal growth is therefore promoted. The vaccine is 
believed to be the first genetic engineering product worldwide 
for animal (livestock) growth promotion. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20481 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    20 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   New Method Developed To Prepare Medium-Pure Factor VIII </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    New Method Developed To Prepare Medium-Pure Factor VIII </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P60149C Beijing JIAN KANG BAO in Chinese 20 Jan 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94P60149C </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JIAN KANG BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Renfeng [2621 0088 0023] and Wang Huiping </F>
[3769 1979 1627]] 
  [Summary] The Vice Director, Han Jianjun [7281 1696 6511], 
of the Hangzhou City Central Blood Station in Zhejiang Province 
has developed a new technique to prepare medium-pure Factor VIII 
and to inactivate the viruses in blood. Because Factor VIII 
protein maintains its solid state at 4C and the solid and 
liquid phases are in a balance state at 4C, Han was able to 
skillfully separate the solid and liquid phases of 
freshly-frozen plasma at 4C temperature. Using this 
technique, he separated Factor VIII protein from the solid phase 
by removing the undesirable proteins that dissolved in liquid 
phase at 4C. The technique has greatly enhanced the 
utilization rate of human plasma. After being separated from 
plasma, the purified Factor VIII was preserved in sucrose and 
glycine solution and viruses were inactivated for 10 hours at 
60C. Using the new technique, the preservation rate of 
Factor VIII's biological activity and in vivo recovery rate, 
which reached 73.09 percent and 97 percent respectively, were 
all much higher than using other conventional methods. According 
to data released by Chinese Blood Transfusion Association, 
China's annual output of medium-pure Factor VIII is about two 
million IU (International Unit), which can only treat 14.1 
percent of China's 60,000 hemophilia A patients. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20482 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    11 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Snake Venom Research </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Snake Venom Research </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P60149D Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE [SCIENCE IN CHINA-SERIES B] 
in Chinese Vol 23 No 12, Dec 93 pp 1259-1266 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60149D </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE [SCIENCE IN CHINA-SERIES B] 
in Chinese Vol 23 No 12, Dec 93 pp 1259-1266 </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ji Yonghua [0679 3057 5478], Lu Lifang [7120 </F>
7787 5364], Xu Ke [1776 4430], Shanghai Institute of Physiology, 
Chinese Academy of Sciences; Hiroyuki Hatori, Suzumu Terakawa, 
Okazaki National Institute of Physiology, Okazaki, Japan] 
  [Abstract] Researchers recently purified and sequenced 
three toxin components (AgTx-1, AgTx-2 and AgTx-3) from 
Agkistrodon blomhoffii brevicaudus (also called Agkistrodon 
halys Pallas) venom. All of them were toxoproteins being 
composed of 122 amino acid residues. The three toxoproteins' 
LD[.sub]50[/] to mice were 0.075, 0.51 and 6.6 mg/kg 
respectively. Toxicological analysis conducted on chicken neck 
muscle indicated that AgTx-1 and AgTx-2 were presynaptic 
neurotoxins which only blocked transmission between 
neurosynapsis, and both AgTx-1 and AgTx-2 had the same 
N-terminal 32-peptide sequence. The AgTx-3 was identified as a 
newly discovered cytotoxin that paralyzed the muscle cells only. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20483 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    23 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Second Military University Putting Human Interferon Into </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Second Military University Putting Human Interferon Into </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Large-Scale   Production 

<F P=102> 94P60149F Beijing JIAN KANG BAO in Chinese 23 Jan 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94P60149F </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JIAN KANG BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Tongbin [2621 0681 2430]] </F>
  [Summary] Supported by the Shanghai Science and Technology 
Commission and the CAS Shanghai Institute of Biochemistry, the 
Institute of Medical Biotechnology and Molecular Genetics of the 
Second Military Medical University invested five million yuan to 
establish a production plant for mass-producing gamma-interferon 
in September, 1990. The institute also established purification 
facilities that have 46 percent recovery rate and have 
capability of fermenting 10 liters of genetically-engineered 
bacteria. The purity of gamma-interferon produced by the plant 
reaches WHO standard. The transformation of its 
genetically-engineered bacteria into a clinically-useful drug by 
the institute has led China to a new approach to industrialize 
its biotechnology products. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20484 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    11 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Molecular Cloning and Nucleotide Sequence of the Gene </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Molecular Cloning and Nucleotide Sequence of the Gene </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Encoding   CS3 Fimbriae Antigen of Enterotoxigenic 
Escherichia coli 

<F P=102> 40091008A Beijing ZHONGHUA WEISHENGWUXUE HE MIANYIXUE ZAZHI 
[CHINESE JOURNAL OF MICROBIOLOGY AND IMMUNOLOGY] in Chinese Vol </F>

13 No 6, Dec 93 pp 345-350 
<F P=103> 40091008A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGHUA WEISHENGWUXUE HE MIANYIXUE ZAZHI 
[CHINESE JOURNAL OF MICROBIOLOGY AND IMMUNOLOGY] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Dong Zizheng [5516 5261 </F>
2973], Zhang Zhaoshan [1728 0340 1472], et al. of the Institute 
of Biotechnology, Academy of Military Medical Sciences, Beijing] 
  [Text] The gene encoding CS3 fimbriae antigen of 
Enterotoxigenic Escherichia coli has been amplified 
and cloned by means of polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and DNA 
recombinant technology. Nucleotide sequencing revealed that the 
length of the cloned fragment was 604 base pairs (bp) and the 
fragment contained a single open reading frame. It also revealed 
that the gene had its own promoter because it had typical 
ribosome-binding site (rbs), -10 and -35 promoter sequences. The 
amino acid sequence of CS3 deduced from the nucleotide sequence 
was composed of 168 amino acids. The first 15 amino acids were 
considered to be the possible signal peptide of the CS3 protein. 
Such protein was very hydrophobic because 46.5 percent amino 
acids of it were hydrophobic. Like CFA/I, CS1 and K88ab 
fimbriae, CS3 protein did not contain Cys residues. These 
results suggest that CS3 subunits are held together mainly by 
hydrophobic interaction. In situ hybridization test demonstrated 
that there were no homologous sequences between the gene of CS3 
and the genes of CFA/I, CS4 and CS6. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20485 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    11 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Study on Envelope Gene of Three Dengue-2 Viruses Isolated in </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Study on Envelope Gene of Three Dengue-2 Viruses Isolated in </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
China 

<F P=102>   40091008B Beijing ZHONGHUA WEISHENGWUXUE HE MIANYIXUE ZAZHI 
[CHINESE JOURNAL OF MICROBIOLOGY AND IMMUNOLOGY] in Chinese Vol </F>

13 No 6, Dec 93 pp 362-366 
<F P=103> 40091008B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGHUA WEISHENGWUXUE HE MIANYIXUE ZAZHI 
[CHINESE JOURNAL OF MICROBIOLOGY AND IMMUNOLOGY] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Yang Peiying [2799 0160 </F>
5391], Si Bingyin [0674 3521 6892], et al. of the Institute of 
Microbiology and Epidemiology, Academy of Military Medical 
Sciences, Beijing] 
  [Text] The nucleotide sequences of envelope genes from 
three dengue-2 virus strains were determined by 
dideoxynucleotide chain determination method using synthetic 
oligonucleotide primer. These sequences were compared with other 
published dengue-2 envelope sequences. 
  The result showed that the homology of nucleotide sequences 
between D2-04, D2-05, and D2-43 were 95.76-95.96 percent. The 
similarities of amino acid sequences were 92.12-94.3 percent. 
The nucleotide changes between each other of those strains were 
not obvious. However, when D2-04, D2-05, D2-43 were compared 
with NGC in transition and transversion respectively, the 
transitions were more than the transversions. The transversion 
of D2-05 was more than D2-04 and D2-43. 
  The changes of codons in the third position were mostly 
observed in D2-04, D2-05, and D2-43, but we found that the 
changes in the first and second position of D2-05 were more than 
D2-04 and D2-43. It may be a factor affecting the changes of 
biological properties. 
  When D2-04, D2-05, and D2-43 strains were compared with JAM, 
NGC, M3 and PR159(S1) strains, it showed that these three 
strains were most similar with JAM strain, most dissimilar with 
PR159(S1) strain at nucleotide level. The similarities of amino 
acid sequences corresponded to homology of nucleotide sequences 
between each other of D2-04, D2-05, and D2-43 strains. The 
results indicated that D2-04, D2-05, and D2-43 were more closely 
related to JAM strain than NGC and M3 strain and less related to 
PR159(S1) from Puerto Rico. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20486 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    11 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Synthetic gp41 Peptides ELISA for Detecting Antibodies to </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Synthetic gp41 Peptides ELISA for Detecting Antibodies to </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
HIV-1 

<F P=102>   40091008C Beijing ZHONGHUA WEISHENGWUXUE HE MIANYIXUE ZAZHI 
[CHINESE JOURNAL OF MICROBIOLOGY AND IMMUNOLOGY] in Chinese Vol </F>

13 No 6, Dec 93 pp 407-410 
<F P=103> 40091008C </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGHUA WEISHENGWUXUE HE MIANYIXUE ZAZHI 
[CHINESE JOURNAL OF MICROBIOLOGY AND IMMUNOLOGY] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Guo Lili [6753 5461 5461], </F>
Zhang Ran [1728 3544], et al. of the Institute of Microbiology 
and Epidemiology, Academy of Military Medical Sciences, Beijing] 
  [Text] Four overlapping peptides from amino acid 578-607 of 
gp41 of HIV-1 have been synthesized by peptide synthesizer and 
manual method according to Fmoc-solid phase peptide synthesis 
procedure. The bioactivities of the synthetic peptides were 
examined in terms of indirect ELISA. The peptide 3 (30 amino 
acid) ELISA assay has sensitivity of 100 percent and specificity 
of 100 percent with 55 anti-HIV-1 antibody-positive sera and 
sera samples from 150 healthy blood donors. Either peptide 3 or 
HIV antigen inhibition assay also demonstrated that the peptide 
ELISA was specific. 
  The results showed that the peptide 3 could be used as a 
highly sensitive and specific reagent for diagnosis of HIV-1 
infection. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20487 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    11 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Isolation of Thermophilic Protease Production Strain and </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Isolation of Thermophilic Protease Production Strain and </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Studies   on the Properties of the Protease 

<F P=102> 40091008D Shanghai FUDAN XUEBAO [JOURNAL OF FUDAN UNIVERSITY 
-- NATURAL SCIENCE] in Chinese Vol 32 No 4, Dec 93 pp 387-393 </F>

<F P=103> 40091008D </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai FUDAN XUEBAO [JOURNAL OF FUDAN UNIVERSITY 
-- NATURAL SCIENCE] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of articleby Jiang Xingjuan [3068 5887 </F>
1227], Yang Qingyun [2799 1987 0061], et al. of the Institute of 
Genetics] 
  [Text] A thermophilic Streptomyces producing extracellular 
proteinase in high level was isolated from soil. The protease 
has an optimum reaction temperature of 70C and was stable 
at 60C. It retains 84 percent activity even after treatment 
of 80C for 10 min. Ca[.sup]2+[/] enhanced the heat 
stability of the enzyme obviously. The optimum pH for casein 
hydrolysis was 8.5. The enzyme was stable over the pH range from 
5 to 9. The enzyme was inactivated after treatment with PMSF 
[phenylmethylsulfuryl], but not inactivated by EDTA 
[ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid] and _a_-_a_' Bipyridin. the 
cation such as Cu[.sup]2+[/], Zn[.sup]2+[/], 
Fe[.sup]2+[/] and Co[.sup]2+[/] inhibited the enzyme 
activity while Ca[.sup]2+[/] tends to stimulate activity. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20488 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    11 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Studies on the transformation in Thermus by </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Studies on the transformation in Thermus by </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Chromosome   DNA 

<F P=102> 40091008F Shanghai FUDAN XUEBAO [JOURNAL OF FUDAN UNIVERSITY 
-- NATURAL SCIENCE] in Chinese Vol 32 No 4, Dec 93 pp 460-464 </F>

<F P=103> 40091008F </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai FUDAN XUEBAO [JOURNAL OF FUDAN UNIVERSITY 
-- NATURAL SCIENCE] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Yang Shuqing [2799 2885 </F>
7230], Mao Yumin [3029 5940 3046], et al. of the Institute of 
Genetics] 
  [Text] Thermus sp. FD3009 was transformed by 
Thermus sp. FDB8 chromosome DNA. Three transformants 
were obtained using the selecting medium of mitomycin C. These 
transformants show intermediate characteristics between the 
FD3009 and FDB8 with respect to their cell shape, clone colour, 
mitomycin C resistance and thermostable DNA polymerase activity. 
These indicate that the transformants are resulted from 
transforming FD3009 by FDB8 chromosome DNA. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20489 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    11 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Biotechnology </F>
<H3> <TI>   Long Range Physical Map of YAC DNA </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Long Range Physical Map of YAC DNA </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   40091008E Shanghai FUDAN XUEBAO [JOURNAL OF FUDAN UNIVERSITY 
-- NATURAL SCIENCE] in Chinese Vol 32 No 4, Dec 93 pp 394-398 </F>

<F P=103> 40091008E </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai FUDAN XUEBAO [JOURNAL OF FUDAN UNIVERSITY 
-- NATURAL SCIENCE] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [English abstract of article by Chai Jianhua [2693 1696 </F>
5478], Gu Yanghong [7357 2799 3163], et al. of the Institute of 
Genetics] 
  [Text] Different fragments of plasmid pBR322 DNA were used 
as the left and right arms probes of YAC (Yeast Artificial 
Chromosome). The rare cutting restriction enzyme and pulsed 
field electrophoresis were used for long range physical mapping 
of YACs. A YAC containing 2bA3 DNA locus with the length of 800 
kb was analysed with four different restriction enzyme to obtain 
the long range physical map. 
  Key words: YAC, pulsed field electrophoresis, 2bA3, long 
range physical map. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20490 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    11 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Computers </F>
<H3> <TI>   Architecture of Fully Connected Scalable Parallel </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Architecture of Fully Connected Scalable Parallel </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Accelerator 

<F P=102>   94P60178A Beijing JISUANJI XUEBAO [CHINESE JOURNAL OF 
COMPUTERS] in Chinese Vol 17 No 3, Mar 94 pp 204-211 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60178A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JISUANJI XUEBAO [CHINESE JOURNAL OF 
COMPUTERS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Dong Yingfei [5516 6601 7378], Wang Dingxing </F>
[3769 7844 5281], et al. of the Dept. of Computer Science and 
Technology, Qinghua University, Beijing 100084: ``Architectural 
Design of a Fully Connected Scalable Parallel Accelerator,'' 
supported by grant from State 863 High-Tech Program; MS received 
11 May 93] 
  [Abstract] Current artificial intelligence (AI) computer 
systems research platforms fall into two categories: (1) 
special-purpose systems (Japan's Fifth-Generation Computers, 
Britain's ALICE computer(s), the ESPRIT program's Flagship 
computer(s), and the U.S.'s Explorer computer(s)) supporting 
symbolic computations and expanding AI applied research and (2) 
general-purpose parallel computer systems or 
computing-engine-type parallel accelerators (the U.S.'s 
hypercube systems and Britain's ZAPP system) designed both for 
high-speed numerical computations in parallel C and parallel 
Fortran programs and for supporting symbolic computations 
through a variety of AI-language compiling systems. As an 
example of the latter category, the authors introduce their 
fully connected scalable parallel accelerator, a 
computing-engine-type scalable multiComputer (smC) system, and 
discuss its architecture. The system's processing elements (PEs) 
are the INMOS Company's IMS T9000 Transputer, a high-performance 
32-bit CMOS RISC microprocessor system with built-in Virtual 
Channel Processor (VCP) flow control. The T9000's 
interconnection network consists of IMS C104 programmable 
32-input/32-output packet-routing switches incorporating 
wormhole routing. All of the smC's PEs are fully connected 
logically. This parallel accelerator supports multiusers and 
multitasking efficiently and is easily scalable. 
  The basic (32-PE) smC system has a peak operating speed of 5 
GOPS (billion operations per second) and 1 GFLOPS (billion 
floating-point operations per second) (32-bit). Each PE consists 
of a T9000 Transputer with 8 MB or 16 MB local memory. The 
T9000's VCP segments the information into packets, with a format 
shown in Figure 1, not reproduced. Figure 2, not reproduced, 
shows the interconnection network for a single accelerator board 
(one-fourth of the basic four-board smC system), consisting of 
eight T9000 PEs and three C104 packet-routing switches. Figure 
3, reproduced below, shows the interconnection network of the 
entire basic parallel accelerator. Figure 4, reproduced below, 
is a schematic of a 16-PE parallel accelerator (half of the 
basic smC system) showing connections with the system host(s), 
Sun SPARC10 workstation(s). Figures 5-7, not reproduced, show a 
schematic of the interconnection network for a 16-PE system, the 
same for a 64-PE system, and a schematic of the interface 
circuitry, respectively. There are no tables. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-CST-006-10A>      Figure 3. Interconnection Network of Entire Basic (32-PE) </FIG>


<FIG ID=JPRS-CST-006-10B>      Figure 4. Schematic of 16-PE Parallel Accelerator (Half of </FIG>

References 
  1. Technical Appraisal Report for Parallel Graph Reduction 
Intelligent Workstation [in Chinese], Computer Dept., Qinghua 
University, April 1992 [see JPRS-CST-92-012, 18 Jun 92 p 53]. 
  2. The T9000 TRANSPUTER Products Overview Manual, INMOS Doc. 
# 72 TRN 228, Order Code: DBTRANSPST/1, 1991. 
  3. Dally, W. J., Seitz, C. L., ``The Torus Routing Chip,'' 
JOURNAL OF DISTRIBUTED COMPUTING, 1986, 1 (3): 187-196. 
  4. Felperin, S. A., Gravano, L., et al., ``Routing 
Techniques 
for Massively Parallel Communications,'' PROC. OF THE IEEE, 
1991, 79 (4): 488-503. 
  5. Dally, W. J., et al., ``The J-Machine: a Fine-Grain 
Concurrent Computer,'' in: Proc. of the IFIP Congress, 1989, 
1147-1153. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20491 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    31 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Lasers, Sensors, Optics </F>
<H3> <TI>   Additional Details on Domestically Made STN-LCDs </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Additional Details on Domestically Made STN-LCDs </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P60144A Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] in Chinese 31 Jan 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60144A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Cui Yachao [1508 0068 6389]: ``Supertwist </F>
[Nematic] Liquid Crystal Displays Developed: Breaks Foreign 
Technology Blockade''] 
  [Editorial Report] Additional details on the CAS Changchun 
Institute of Physics' development of supertwist-nematic liquid 
crystal displays (STN-LCDs) not already supplied in an earlier 
report [see JPRS-CST-94-001, 24 Jan 94 p 31] are as follows: 
with this achievement, Chinese technologists have broken the 
blockade on STN-LCD product development software technology 
directly imposed by foreign nations on China. The domestically 
made 4-inch, 64-inch STN-LCDs come in yellow, blue, and B&amp;W 
modes. In addition to the STN-LCD modules themselves, the CAS 
institute researchers independently developed the appropriate 
software technology, certified by a CAS-organized technical 
expert committee at the end of 1993. This software includes 
computer simulation and design routines and device fabrication 
programs. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20492 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Lasers, Sensors, Optics </F>
<H3> <TI>   Additional Details on Saturated Oscillation at Beijing FEL </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Additional Details on Saturated Oscillation at Beijing FEL </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P60131B Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE BAO [CHINESE SCIENCE NEWS] 
in Chinese 10 Jan 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60131B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE BAO [CHINESE SCIENCE NEWS] 
in Chinese 10 Jan 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Shi [2621 1102]: ``Beijing Free Electron </F>
Laser Facility Achieves Saturated Oscillation; Maintains Leading 
Position in Asian Region''] 
  [Editorial Report] Additional details on the 28 December 
1993 realization of saturated oscillation at the Beijing Free 
Electron Laser (BFEL) facility not already reported in an early 
summary [see JPRS-CST-94-002, 25 Feb 94 p 26] are as follows: 
After their successful realization of Asia's first infrared FEL 
oscillation on 26 May last year, the BFEL scientists succeeded 
in raising the charge density of the electron beam in the 
undulator interaction zone and improving the uniformity of the 
electron-beam quality factor within the [4-microsecond-wide] 
macropulse. This in turn permitted them to raise system gain 
from the original 6 percent to 17 percent, at which point they 
achieved saturated oscillation. Other parameters of the December 
experiment include a saturated-oscillation maximum output energy 
of 3 mJ, a saturated-oscillation pulse plateau width of 2 s, 
and an intra-cavity oscillation average power of 190 kW. The 
successful achievement of saturated oscillation indicates that 
the BFEL facility and its key equipment -- the microwave 
electron gun, high-power wide pulse modulator, NdFeB 
permanent-magnet undulator, and five-dimensional high-accuracy 
remote-controlled optical cavity resonator -- have attained a 
world-class performance level. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20493 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    27 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Lasers, Sensors, Optics </F>
<H3> <TI>   Domestic Research on Multi-E-Beam Cerenkov FEL Oscillator </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Domestic Research on Multi-E-Beam Cerenkov FEL Oscillator </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Leads   World 

<F P=102> 94P60131C Beijing KEJI RIBAO [SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY DAILY] 
in Chinese 27 Jan 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60131C </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing KEJI RIBAO [SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY DAILY] 
in Chinese 27 Jan 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Fan Jian [5400 1696]: ``Domestic </F>
Multi-Electron-Beam Cerenkov Oscillator Experimental Research Is 
at World State-of-the-Art''] 
  [Summary] The ``8-mm multi-electron-beam Cerenkov free 
electron laser (FEL) oscillator experimental research'' project 
jointly undertaken by scientists at Beijing University's 
Technical Physics Department and at the Chinese Academy of 
Engineering Physics' Institute of Applied Electronics has 
realized an internationally unique achievement. Under the 
direction of CAS Academician Prof. Chen Jiaer [7115 0163 3167], 
physicists in the joint research group used a small accelerator 
providing 374-kV, 1.036-kA electron beams to generate a laser 
output power of 9.1 MW (at a wavelength of 8.3 mm) with an 
efficiency of 2.3 percent, an order of magnitude [i.e., 10 
times] higher than realized with similar foreign apparatuses. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20494 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Lasers, Sensors, Optics </F>
<H3> <TI>   Nation's First CCD Camera Production Line Passes Acceptance </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Nation's First CCD Camera Production Line Passes Acceptance </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Check 

<F P=102>   94P60131A Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] in Chinese 10 Jan 94 p 4 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60131A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Hu Xiangjun [5170 3276 0689]: ``Nation's First </F>
CCD Camera Production Line Passes Acceptance Check''] 
  [Summary] The nation's first large-scale imported CCD 
[charge-coupled device] camera production line recently passed 
expert acceptance check at the Huanan Optoelectronic Instruments 
Plant in Hunan Province. This CCD camera production line is a 
joint venture between the Huanan plant, a subsidiary of the 
Armaments Industry Corporation, and Hong Kong's Xianda [7359 
6671] Science &amp; Technology Ltd. Annual single-shift 
production 
capacity for this late-80s-level all-automatic SMT (surface 
mount technology) production line is 50,000. Since the line's 
initial operation on 28 March 1992, almost 6,000 B&amp;W and 
color 
CCD cameras have been manufactured and sold at home and abroad; 
newly added value has totaled almost 10 million yuan and the 
2,400-odd exported CCD cameras have earned US$430,000 in foreign 
exchange. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20495 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    1 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Lasers, Sensors, Optics </F>
<H3> <TI>   New Device for Large-Screen High-Definition Images in Air </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    New Device for Large-Screen High-Definition Images in Air </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Force   Command Training Systems 

<F P=102> 94P60144B Beijing KEJI RIBAO [SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY DAILY] 
in Chinese 1 Feb 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60144B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing KEJI RIBAO [SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY DAILY] 
in Chinese 1 Feb 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhao Jiafeng [6392 1367 7685]: ``High-Resolution </F>
Graphical Signal Drive Adaptor Developed''] 
  [Summary] A ``4-channel high-resolution graphical signal 
drive adaptor'' for Air Force tactical command simulation 
training systems was recently developed by the Air Force Command 
Institute. The experts have noted that this adaptor permits 
high-definition, large-screen projection imagery that represents 
a step forward for Air Force tactical command training systems 
modernization. Specifically, this adaptor permits the 
``Changkong-1'' and ``Changkong-2'' tactical command training 
systems' microcomputer display of aerial battlefield imagery to 
be projected onto a large screen with high definition. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20496 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    11 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Lasers, Sensors, Optics </F>
<H3> <TI>   New Advance in CPM Lasers -- 18 Femtoseconds </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    New Advance in CPM Lasers -- 18 Femtoseconds </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94FE0224B Beijing KEXUE TONGBAO [CHINESE SCIENCE BULLETIN] 
in Chinese Vol 38 No 19, 1-15 Oct 93 pp 1737-1740 </F>

<F P=103> 94FE0224B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing KEXUE TONGBAO [CHINESE SCIENCE BULLETIN] 
in Chinese Vol 38 No 19, 1-15 Oct 93 pp 1737-1740 </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Lin Weizhu [2651 0143 2701], Zhu Derui [2612 </F>
1795 3843], Zeng Wensheng [2582 2429 3932], and Pi Feipeng [4122 
7378 7720] of the Department of Physics, Zhongshan University, 
Li Weiliang [2621 0251 5328], Qiu Zhiren [8002 1807 0088], and 
Huang Xuguang [7806 2485 0342] of the Institute of Laser 
Spectroscopy: ``New Advance in CPM Lasers -- 18 Femtoseconds,'' 
supported by NSFC; MS received 9 Jun 93] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  1. Introduction </H5>
  Since the 1980's, femtosecond (fs) lasers have been made 
primarily from CPM (colliding pulse mode-locked) dye lasers. In 
recent years, although the use of a Ti-doped sapphire laser to 
produce fs pulses appears to be very promising and is 
progressing very rapidly, the CPM laser still remains an 
important tool in applied research on femtosecond science 
because the associated technology and equipment are more mature, 
devices are easier to obtain, more robust and stable. Earlier, 
the shortest light pulse produced by a CPM laser was 27 
fs.[.sup]1[/] Lately, a shorter pulse has been 
reported.[.sup]2[/] In this work, an 18-fs pulse is directly 
produced by a modified CPM laser. As far as the authors know, 
this is the shortest pulse ever produced by this type of laser. 
The auto-correlation curve of the pulse intensity shows that the 
pulse is an optical soliton. When the 27-fs pulse is compressed 
to 21 fs and 18 fs, the pulse reflecting higher orders of the 
soliton disappear. The pulse becomes close to a 
fundamental-soliton hyperbolic secant (Sech[.sup]2[/]) 
intensity profile. This is a new phenomenon not observed before, 
and indicates that the selection and tuning of SPM (spontaneous 
phase modulation) and GVD (group velocity dispersion) are 
critical to pulse compression. We believe that this is also an 
advantage of the CPM laser in generating fs pulses. It is 
difficult for other types of laser to match it. 
<H5>  2. Experimental Principle and Setup </H5>
  The CPM laser has advanced considerably since 
1981.[.sup]3[/] The greatest improvement has been to install 
a four-prism group-velocity compensator.[.sup]4[/] This 
enables the laser to compress chirped pulses, in addition to its 
gain saturation effect and absorption saturation effect (the 
colliding pulses enhance the absorption saturation effect). It 
is analogous to the compression of the chirped pulses in an 
optical fiber by the negative group velocity of the material 
into a soliton pulse. Therefore, a CPM laser is also known as a 
quasi-soliton laser. These two pulse-compression mechanisms 
enable a CPM laser to produce shorter pulses, but also add to 
its complexity and variability. After taking the two 
pulse-compression mechanisms into account, the width of the 
Sech[.sup]2[/] pulse as a function of various parameters can 
be solved from the self-consistent equation of the optical field 
inside the cavity:[.sup]5[/] 
  _t_[.sup]2[/] = 1/g[.sub]0[/] (a[.sub]1[/] - 
a[.sub]2[/]x - b[.sub]1[/]y) (1) 
  where g[.sub]0[/] is the net gain at the center frequency 
_o_[.sub]0[/]. The first term in the parenthesis, 
a[.sub]1[/], is the gain dispersion term and it reflects the 
effect of the bandwidth of the pulse _D__n_. The larger 
_D__n_ 
is, the smaller a[.sub]1[/] becomes and the easier a short 
pulse can be obtained. In the third term, b[.sub]1[/] 
represents the gain change caused by fast saturation of the 
absorber, and y represents the pulse energy. In the second term, 
a[.sub]2[/] is the GVD and x is the chirp parameter. This 
term reflects the SPM and GVD compression effects. In a CPM 
laser, two nonlinear optical processes can produce SPM and also 
lead to chirping. One is a negative chirp caused by a 
reflectance change from a slow absorption saturation effect and 
the other is a positive chirp caused by the fast Kerr effect of 
the solvent in the absorber. Under normal conditions, the chirps 
generated by these two processes cancel each other because of 
opposite signs. The resultant net chirp is insignificant. 
Although pulse compression is possible by GVD tuning, the effect 
is not significant. The pulse width is primarily determined by 
the bandwidth of the gain. The narrowest width is 30-40 fs. We 
found that a higher pulse intensity inside the cavity not only 
enhances the gain and absorption saturation effects but also 
makes it easier to obtain a shorter pulse.[.sup]6[/] More 
importantly, the leading factor is to make the positive chirp 
produced by the fast Kerr effect of the absorber solvent far 
greater than the negative chirp produced due to dye saturation. 
It was calculated that when the peak pulse power is greater than 
0.2 x 10[.sup]6[/] W, the pulse has a larger positive chirp. 
It is easier to obtain a shorter pulse by way of negative GVD 
compression. At the same time, a larger positive SPM broadens 
the frequency spectrum of the pulse to lift the restriction 
imposed by the gain bandwidth. On the basis of this unique 
property of the CPM laser, we made some improvements in areas 
such as resonant cavity design, dye concentration and pumping 
condition that result in a larger frequency bandwidth and a 
larger positive SPM. Thus, a suitable negative GVD compensation 
can be introduced by tuning the prism GVD compensator to obtain 
a narrow fs pulse. It is estimated that with a large positive 
chirp and an ideal GVD compensation, it is possible to compress 
a pulse from its normal width of 30-40 fs by a half. 
  The CPM dye laser is a system comprised of six mirrors and 
four prisms. Compared to a classic CPM system, its unique 
feature is the use of an anti-symmetric folded cavity as a 
sub-cavity for its gain medium and absorber. This design not 
only provides better aberration compensation but also permits 
near-normal incidence and reflection at all mirror surfaces, 
i.e., a quasi-linear cavity.[.sup]7[/] This design improves 
the mode of the light beam to produce a TEM[.sub]00[/] 
output. The frequency band of the continuous light (without the 
absorber) is also significantly broadened and the tunable range 
is 580-620 nm. In the meantime, the system employs a 
shorter-focus pumping lens to lower the CW operating threshold, 
in turn raising the pulse energy inside the cavity. Furthermore, 
a thicker absorption coating is used to produce a larger 
positive chirp. All these measures make it easier to produce a 
shorter pulse. 
  The width of the femtosecond pulse from the CPM laser is 
measured by a computer-controlled precision non-co-linear 
auto-correlator.[.sup]8[/] The frequency doubler KDP is 0.30 
mm thick and the accuracy of the instrument is less than 1 fs 
(single-pass). Human error is eliminated by using an IBM-PC to 
measure, calculate and plot pulse width. The power spectrum of 
the fs pulse is automatically recorded using a scanning 
monochromator. 
<H5>  3. Experimental Results and Discussion </H5>
  Figure 1 shows the intensity auto-correlation curves of a 
series of short fs pulses from the CPM laser. The figure also 
shows the corresponding FWHM (full height half maximum) values 
(assuming a Sech[.sup]2[/] profile). The shortest pulse is 18 
fs. These short fs pulses were obtained under the same set of 
conditions, such as absorber dye DODCI concentration [congruent] 2 x 
10[.sup]-4[/] mol/L and pumping power [congruent] 6 W (full line), by 
carefully adjusting the position of the saturated absorber 
relative to the sub-cavity (approximately 100 m from the 
focal point) and the negative GVD compensation amount of the GVD 
prism to achieve a suitable balance between SPM and GVD. A 
shorter pulse corresponds to a less negative GVD compensation 
value. Figure 2 shows that when the pulse is compressed to less 
than 30 fs, higher-order soliton behavior becomes more apparent. 
There is a small base on each wing. When the pulse is compressed 
to below 20 fs, the bases disappear and the pulse agrees with 
the Sech[.sup]2[/] profile. Variations in pulse width and 
pulse base reflect the chirped pulse compression process. If the 
compression effect is greater than any pulse broadening effect 
due to other factors, the pulse behaves like a higher-order 
soliton. The upper part of the pulse is more compressed than the 
lower part, such as that shown in the intensity auto-correlation 
curve for the 27-fs pulse. This corresponds to the situation of 
a third-order soliton.[.sup]9[/] The energy at the base may 
be compressed to the center of the pulse or to somewhere far 
away, causing both sides close to the center to collapse to form 
a negative base. The pulse shape agrees with the 
Sech[.sup]2[/] profile. From the 21-fs and 18-fs intensity 
auto-correlation curves shown in Figure 1, this situation has 
been predicated by existing femtosecond pulse transmission 
theory. It will be discussed in detail in a separate paper. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-CST-006-14A>      Figure 1. Intensity Auto-Correlation Curves for fs Pulses </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-CST-006-15A>      Figure 2. Power Spectra of the 27-fs Pulse (a) and 18-fs </FIG>


  The power spectra of fs pulses from the CPM laser show that 
when the pulse is narrowed, the band is broadened and the center 
shifted toward the red. Furthermore, it exhibits a soliton pulse 
pattern. Figure 2(a) shows the power spectrum corresponding to 
the 27-fs pulse. It has a peak at 630 nm. It also has a wide 
band within a half-width of 620-635 nm and forms a spectrum 
seat. This is similar to the behavior of a soliton pulse 
observed by Mollenauer in his optical fiber 
experiment.[.sup]10[/] When the pulse is compressed to 21 fs 
and 18 fs, the base disappears, the pulse becomes more symmetric 
and the frequency distribution is also broadened. Figure 2(b) 
shows the frequency distribution of the 21-fs-wide pulse. Its 
FWHM is 17.8 nm. Its time-bandwidth product, i.e., 
_D_t_D__n_, 
is [congruent] 0.292, which is slightly less than that of an ideal 
Sech[.sup]2[/] curve of 0.315. However, it is far greater 
than that of an exponential decay (i.e., _D_t_D__n_ [congruent] 
0.11). 
This indicates that the pulse is close to a Sech[.sup]2[/] 
curve, rather than an exponential decay. The intensity 
auto-correlation curves for the 21- and 18-fs pulses shown in 
Figure 1 are in excellent agreement with the theoretical 
Sech[.sup]2[/] curves (dotted lines). 
  In conclusion, the shortest pulse obtained to date from the 
CPM laser is 18 fs. Furthermore, its soliton behavior has been 
observed. This further demonstrates the superiority of the CPM 
laser as a distributive quasi-soliton laser and its capability 
to generate shorter pulses. We believe that even shorter pulses 
can be produced by modifying the dye composition, increasing its 
frequency bandwidth and improving its stability. 
References 
  1. Valdmanis, J. A., et al., OPT. LETT., Vol 10 No 3, 1985, 
pp 131-133. 
  2. Chen, G., et al., SPIE, Vol 1032, 1988, p 432. 
  3. Valdmanis, J. A., et al., IEEE JQE, Vol QE-22 No 1, 1986, 
pp 112-118. 
  4. Fork, R. L., et al., OPT. LETT., Vol 9 No 5, 1984, pp 
150-152. 
  5. Martinez, O. E., et al., J. OPT. SOC. AM., B, Vol 2 No 5, 
1985, pp 753-760. 
  6. Haus, H. A., et al., IEEE JQE, Vol QE-22 No 2, 1986, pp 
325-331. 
  7. Lin Weizhu et al., ZHONGGUO ZIGUANG [CHINESE JOURNAL OF 
LASERS], Vol 18 No 7, 1991, pp 523-526 [abstracted in 
JPRS-CST-91-021, 22 Oct 91 pp 19-20]. 
  8. Lin Weizhu et al., YINGYONG JIGUANG [APPLIED LASER 
TECHNOLOGY], Vol 10 No 3, 1990, pp 114-117. 
  9. Wise, F. W., et al., OPT. LETT., Vol 13 No 2, 1988, pp 
129-131. 
  10. Mollenauer, L. F., et al., PHYS. REV. LETT., Vol 45 No 
13, 1980, pp 1095-1098. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20497 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    28 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Microelectronics </F>


<TEXT>
ese 28 Ja 
<H3> <TI>   12 New ASICs, General-Purpose ICs Pass Design Finalization </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    12 New ASICs, General-Purpose ICs Pass Design Finalization </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94P60129A Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] in Chinese 28 Jan 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60129A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Kunkun [2621 2492 2492]: ``12 Varieties of </F>
Integrated Circuits Pass Ministry-Level Appraisal''] 
  [Summary] Twelve new application-specific integrated 
circuits (ASICs) and general-purpose ICs developed by the 
Beijing IC Design Center passed the design/production 
finalization organized by the Ministry of Electronics Industry 
in Beijing on 17 January. Of the 12 new ICs, seven had been 
designated as Eighth FYP Key State S&amp;T Projects and five were 
developed based on domestic market demand. 
  The seven Key State Project ICs are: the BI/AT89C51 
high-performance 8-bit monolithic microcontroller, the BIJ1101CP 
inductosyn interface circuit, the BID0101CP/BID0102CP 
tuning-frequency digital display ASIC, the BIJ9121 phonetics 
teaching-machine ASIC, the BIC0001GP programmable counter and 
statistical controller ASIC, the BISS0001 infrared-sensor signal 
processor ASIC, and the BIJ81C55 I/O port expander for an 81C55 
RAM. Among these ICs, the BI/AT89C51 is the world's first 
8-bit monolithic computer with an all-FLASH 4K memory; this chip 
has numerous applications in control systems, intelligent 
instruments and meters, and special electrical equipment, and is 
fully compatible with the domestically popular MCS-51 product 
series. 
  The five new IC products developed out of domestic demand 
are: the BIJ7211AM 4-bit 7-segment LCD driver, the BID9148CP 
audible [signal] remote-controlled sender, the 
BID9149CP/BID9150CP audible remote-controlled receivers, and the 
LSP-9205 laser locator ASIC. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20498 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    28 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Microelectronics </F>


<TEXT>
ese 28 Ja 
<H3> <TI>   American Chip Maker Scouts Out the Market </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    American Chip Maker Scouts Out the Market </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   40100047A Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) in English 
28 Mar 94 p 8 </F>

<F P=103> 40100047A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhao Jinming] </F>
  [Text] Advanced Micro Devices Inc. (AMD), America's 
fifth-largest maker of integrated circuits, has worked out a 
comprehensive plant to open up the market and contribute 
investment in China. 
  As a first step, AMD is organizing a series of seminars in 
the country to foster its relationship with Chinese customers 
and build up recognition, said Jerry Lynch, AMD's vice-president 
of sales and marketing for the Asia-Pacific region. 
  Seminars held in Beijing, Shanghai and Guangzhou earlier 
this 
month focused on programmable logic devices. Next week, 
exchanges on telecommunications products will be held in 
Shanghai and Shenzhen. 
  To boost sales on the mainland, AMD has selected Nanco 
Electronics Supply Ltd. as its new distributor. The company set 
up its first China office in Beijing eight years ago and has 
since expanded its regional distribution network, with an office 
in Shanghai. It plans to open another office in Guangzhou this 
year. 
  Though AMD is late to enter the Chinese market, indirect 
sales of its products on the mainland are not small, said Lynch, 
adding that AMD regards China as a big potential market. 
  AMD is also interested in establishing joint ventures in the 
second half of this decade. 
  ``But, at present, we will try to learn what China needs in 
the field,'' Lynch said. 
  While selling products, AMD intends to train Chinese 
technicians to improve China-made electronic products, said 
Angie Ko, AMD's regional marketing manager. 
  Set up in 1969, AMD specializes in microprocessors -- 
computer chips -- and related computer and telecommunications 
equipment. The company has manufacturing plants in the US, 
Europe and East Asia. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20499 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    2 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Superconductivity </F>
<H3> <TI>   12 Achievements in HTS Technology, Electronic Testing </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    12 Achievements in HTS Technology, Electronic Testing </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Technology   Certified 

<F P=102> 94P60138B Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] in Chinese 2 Feb 94 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60138B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO DIANZI BAO [CHINA ELECTRONICS 
NEWS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Shu Guang [2562 0342]: ``Institute of Electronic </F>
Science Reports Advance Research Successes''] 
  [Summary] The Ministry of Electronics Industry's (MEI) 
Institute of Electronic Science recently [24 January] announced 
that it has certified 12 achievements -- six each in electronic 
measurement instrument technology and in high-temperature 
superconducting (HTS) technology. The five research achievements 
judged by the experts as meeting 1990s international standards 
were all realized by the University of Electronic Science &amp; 
Technology of China (UESTC). They are: a multichannel dynamic 
parametric real-time processing system, a HTS microwave 
resonator, a miniature HTS microstrip antenna and testing 
technology, a HTS filter, and HTS thin-film microwave 
surface-resistance high-accuracy measurement technology. The 
other seven achievements are: digital storage oscilloscope (DSO) 
technology developed by MEI's Institute 41, a 1.55-m 
high-stability laser light source, a 1.5-m optical 
time-domain reflectomer (OTDR), a HTS microstrip resonator 
developed by MEI's Institute 55, MEI Institute 13's technology 
for fabricating HTS thin-film-based microwave devices, [a 
microwave broadband low-noise mixer,] and the LA64100 logic 
analyzer developed by UESTC. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20500 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    12 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Superconductivity </F>
<H3> <TI>   Superconducting Josephson-Junction-Array 1V Voltage Standard </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Superconducting Josephson-Junction-Array 1V Voltage Standard </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Certified 

<F P=102>   94P60138A Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE BAO [CHINESE SCIENCE NEWS] 
in Chinese 12 Jan 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60138A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE BAO [CHINESE SCIENCE NEWS] 
in Chinese 12 Jan 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Lu Jingben [4151 2417 3962] and Guan Jiabin </F>
[7070 1367 2430]: ``Superconducting Josephson-Junction-Array 
1-Volt Voltage Standard Certified''] 
  [Summary] The ``superconducting Josephson-junction-array 
1-volt voltage standard'' jointly developed by the State Bureau 
of Technology Supervision, the China Metrology Research 
Institute, and the China Testing Technology Research Institute 
recently passed formal appraisal in Beijing. The new standard 
has a measurement uncertainty of a few parts per billion, 
meeting 1990s international levels for a quantum voltage 
standard. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20501 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    29 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Telecommunications R&amp;D </F>
<H3> <TI>   China, ROK Bind Connections </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    China, ROK Bind Connections </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   40100048A Beijing CHINA DAILY in English 29 Mar 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 40100048A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CHINA DAILY </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Xie Liangjun] </F>
  [Text] The first Sino-ROK joint venture in 
telecommunications was sealed yesterday in Beijing, during a 
week highlighted by Republic of Korea (ROK) President Kim Young 
Sam's official visit to China. 
  The Beijing Telecommunications Administration and the Kohap 
Group announced the formation of the Beijing Jing Koh Integrated 
Telecommunications Equipment Company Limited at a ceremony in 
Beijing. 
  The new- and high-tech joint venture project has an initial 
investment of $2.1 million, with each side having a half-stake. 
  It will introduce technology from the Integrated Network 
Corporation (INC) of the United States, called DDOV (Digital 
Data Over Voice), to produce UDVM (Universal Data Voice 
Multiplexing) equipment. 
  Company technicians said that by installing UDVM equipment 
on 
a public telephone line, phone users will have easy access to 
public or private digital data networks such as Chinapac and DDN. 
  The equipment is expected to have a big market in China, as 
the country's telephone system undergoes a spectacular 
expansion. China has also been working hard to expand and 
upgrade the national public packet-switching data network, known 
as Chinapac, to speed up information exchange. 
  After joining the Chinapac network, computers across the 
country can exchange information with other computers at home or 
abroad. 
  Three ROK ministers of telecommunications, commerce and 
industry, and science and technology also took part in yesterday 
afternoon's launching ceremony. Also attending were Vice 
Chairman of the National People's Congress (NPC) Tian Jiyun, 
Beijing Vice-Mayor Zhang Baifa and Telecommunications 
Vice-Minister Yang Xianzu. 
  Yang said that since China and ROK established diplomatic 
relations in August, 1992, postal and telecommunications 
co-operation has grown rapidly and has a promising future. 
  One example of close ties in this field between the two 
countries is the fact that Chinese Telecommunications Minister 
Wu Jichuan is Chairman of the Chinese Government reception 
committee for President Kim's visit this week. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20502 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94029" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    11 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Telecommunications R&amp;D </F>
<H3> <TI>   Implementation of Pre-ISDN in Shanghai </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Implementation of Pre-ISDN in Shanghai </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Overview </H4>

<F P=102> 94P60141A Beijing DIANXIN JISHU [TELECOMMUNICATIONS 
TECHNOLOGY] in Chinese No 1, Jan 94 p 45 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60141A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing DIANXIN JISHU [TELECOMMUNICATIONS 
TECHNOLOGY] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed, untitled news brief] </F>
  [Summary] The first domestic early-stage integrated 
services digital network (pre-ISDN), jointly developed by the 
Shanghai Municipal Telephone Bureau's Data Communications 
Services Company and by MPT's First Research Institute, was 
recently certified. This pre-ISDN is based on a digital 
renovation of Shanghai's existing municipal telephone network, 
consisting of S-1240 stored-program-controlled (SPC) switches 
and F-150 SPC switches, and provides subscribers with 2B + D 
[two 64 kbps basic user channels plus one 16 kbps signaling/data 
user channel] telephone/image/data transmission. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20503 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcst006___94030" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CST-94-006 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  China </ABS>
<DATE1>    11 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> Telecommunications R&amp;D </F>
<H3> <TI>   Implementation of Pre-ISDN in Shanghai </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Implementation of Pre-ISDN in Shanghai </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Detailed Information </H4>

<F P=102> 94P60141B Shanghai DIANXIN KUAIBAO [TELECOMMUNICATIONS 
INFORMATION] in Chinese No 1, Jan 94 pp 2-4 </F>

<F P=103> 94P60141B </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai DIANXIN KUAIBAO [TELECOMMUNICATIONS 
INFORMATION] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Du Jiazhen [2629 0857 3791]: ``Implementation of </F>
Early-Stage ISDN in Shanghai''; MS receipt data not given] 
  [Abstract] The S-1240 switches incorporate foreign 
technology but are made in Shanghai, while the F-150 switches 
are directly imported from Japan. Between its S-1240 switching 
offices, the existing Shanghai telephone network uses 
common-channel Signaling System Number 7 (SS7), while between 
two F-150 switching offices or between an F-150 office and an 
S-1240 office the existing network uses China's MFC [expansion 
not given] Signaling System Number 1. As part of the renovations 
for the pre-ISDN, the F-150 switches had to be converted to SS7, 
while the S-1240 switches' SS7 TUP [telephone user part] had to 
be upgraded with new ISDN-capable circuit boards. Moreover, the 
project was hampered by the difficulty of importing appropriate 
ISDN equipment and software. 
  The key to the entire project is the realization of digital 
user access: the analog subscriber line interface circuit 
(ASLIC) boards in the digital switches had to be replaced by 
digital subscriber line interface circuit (DSLIC) boards to 
permit terminal-to-terminal digital communications. In order to 
avoid replacing the software in the digital switches, the 
digital subscriber circuit signaling protocols had to maintain 
the same techniques as the analog subscriber circuit signaling 
protocols. 
  The basic configuration of this pre-ISDN is shown in Figure 
1 
below. Two types of DSLIC boards have been developed: one for 
S-1240 switches and one for F-150 switches. The ASLIC boards in 
the S-1240 switches have an application-specific integrated 
circuit (ASIC) called the dual processor terminal controller 
(DPTC) [see JPRS-CST-92-010, 22 May 92 pp 53-56], which is the 
interface with the terminal control element. This ASIC is 
retained on the S-1240 DSLIC boards. The U interface device 
(UID) uses 2B1Q encoding to reduce bit rate; when the 
transmitted information rate is 144 kbps (2B + D), the actual 
bit rate is 80 bauds. Each DSLIC board (S-1240 type and F-150 
type) has four UIDs, providing four 2B + D lines. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-CST-006-19A>      Figure 1. Configuration of Pre-ISDN </FIG>

  The digital cross-connect node configuration for this 
pre-ISDN is shown in Figure 2 below. Each node has 15 2W (2W = 
2B + D) lines multiplexed to form one 4W (4W = 30 B + D) [i.e., 
2 Mbps] line, which can be switched to any of seven DS1 circuit 
I/O pots (labeled 4W1-4W7 in the figure) going to other nodes. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-CST-006-19B>      Figure 2. Digital Cross-Connect Node Configuration </FIG>

  There are no tables or references. 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20504 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpest010__l94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-010-L </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International German Assessment Report on Materials Research </ABS>


<TEXT>
Program 
<DATE1>   11 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<H3> <TI>     German Assessment Report on Materials Research Program </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    German Assessment Report on Materials Research Program </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94WS0158A Bonn BMFT REPORT in German Mar 93 pp 1-222 -- FOR 
OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> 94WS0158A </F>
<F P=104>  Bonn BMFT REPORT </F>
<F P=105>  German </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by Dr. Michael Braun, Prof. Dr. Alexander Gerybadze, </F>
Arnold Raetz, Dr. Michael Witzel: "Study on Assessment of 
Materials Research Program"; Subtitle: "Report for Federal 
Research and Technology Minister" prepared by Arthur D. Little 
International, Inc., is an assessment of the BMFT-supported 
advanced materials research program in progress from 1985-1994.] 
  [Text] Structure and Organization of the Study 


    -  This study summarizes the results of our assessment of 
the BMFT's program for materials research and the 
recommendations derived therefrom for the BMFT's future support 
strategy in this sector. 
  -  The analysis is based on talks with nearly 160 experts, the 
examination of additional data, the assessment of secondary 
literature and Arthur D. Little's own know-how. 
  -  The study is broken down into five chapters: 
  --Chapter one summarizes the results and 
conclusions and contains references to the comprehensive 
description in the following chapters. 
  --Chapter two contains the analysis of the program 
that is currently in effect and its impact. 
  --Chapter three provides a comprehensive 
description of materials research and an international 
comparison of support for it. 
  --Chapter four examines the importance of 
materials research for maintaining the competitiveness of German 
industry. 
  --Chapter five develops guidelines for future 
support of materials research in Germany. 
%Each chapter is also preceded by a brief summary of the most 
important results. It also contains references to the in-depth 
information in the text of the chapter. 
%References to the literature that was used and to in-depth 
written materials as well as lists of tables, charts and 
abbreviations are included in the appendix. 

<H5>    1. Summary of the Results </H5>
<H5>  1.1 Objectives and Structure of the Study </H5>
  [Text] With a support budget of DM1.1 billion, the BMFT's 
materials 
research program focusing on the period 1985-1994 constitutes 
the focal point of materials research support on the federal 
level. Its fundamental objective is to safeguard the long-term 
competitiveness of German industry by developing the position of 
materials technology. Defined as other basic top goals of the 
program were: 


    -  Development of materials having new or improved useful 
features 
  -  Mobilization of the scientific and technical potential in 
academic and industrial research for materials engineering 
  -  Enhancement of user oriented basic research in the materials 
research sector and, albeit with reduced weight 
  -  Improved information and technology transfer benefiting small 
and medium-size enterprises [SME]. 

    The materials research program is structured on the basis of 
groups of materials with specific objectives established for 
them in dialog with industry and academic research, 
respectively. In terms of its functional purpose, the program is 
the connecting link between basic research in the academic 
sector and user-friendly research and development financed by 
industry.[.sup]1[/] The economy's self-responsibility for 
ensuring its own competitiveness remains unaffected by this. 
  In order to assess the success and impact of the current 
program and to develop guidelines for the future strategy of the 
BMFT in the materials research sector, the BMFT commissioned 
Arthur D. Little to evaluate the effectiveness and efficiency of 
the current program in this assessment study. On the basis of 
this knowledge and a comparison with an analysis of potential, 
wherein an international comparison of materials research and 
support for it are analyzed, as is the importance of materials 
and processing technologies for German industry, action-oriented 
recommendations are derived for a future support requirement, 
for topical foci, program organization and support principles 
for future support. 
  Also, in the context of an analysis of 
effectiveness, in chapter two, the effectiveness and 
efficiency of the support activities of the current program are 
examined. The effectiveness of the program depends on whether 
the objectives and programmatic foci of the program, the 
indicated target groups and the application and use of resources 
were measured and whether the goals that were set were also 
realized. The main issue in analyzing efficiency is whether the 
targeted results are realized with an optimum cost/benefit 
ratio. This constitutes the answer to the question of the 
effectiveness of the support instruments that are employed, the 
success factors of the principal instrument of combined 
research, the efficiency of the completed project and the 
effectiveness of the program management. 
  The analysis of potential analyzes the technical and market 
development potential of high-performance materials and their 
use (chapter three) as well as an international comparison of 
materials research and support for it (chapter four). These are 
important criteria for assessing the need for action in 
materials research from a higher viewpoint and of future 
potential that can be developed through appropriate BMFT 
activities. In particular, in terms of the higher goal of 
maintaining and enhancing the competitiveness of German 
industry, the future attractiveness of new high-performance 
materials for their manufacturers and consumers as well as the 
activities of other leading nations are important criteria for 
shaping the BMFT's strategy in this field. 
  Using the results of this analysis, chapter five develops 
guidelines for future support of materials research in 
Germany. Chapter 5.2 starts out by examining the need for 
future support for materials science as well as the basic 
requirements for a successful support policy, against the 
backdrop of the general conditions described in chapter 5.1. On 
the basis of this, chapter 5.3 derives topical foci for future 
materials research support, on which to develop the subsequent 
recommendations for operational implementation (chapter 5.4) and 
for supplementary strategies for other institutions (chapter 
5.5). 
  Briefly summarized below are the most important results and 
conclusions of this stage of the analysis. These are described 
in detail in the respective chapters. 
<H5>  1.2 Results and assessment of the current BMFT </H5>
materials research program 
  Chapter two contains the fundamental insights into the 
current program from the assessment of all available data and 
from more than 160 interviews with participants and other 
experts. Following a brief description of the methodology of the 
assessment in chapter 2.1, chapter 2.2 describes in detail 
objectives, instruments and the application of resources. 
Assessment of the program in chapter 2.3 and evaluation of 
project experiences in chapter 2.4 facilitate valuable 
conclusions on goal attainment, the effectiveness of the 
instruments used and conclusions for future actions. The results 
of this analysis can be summarized in the following points: 
  The assessment of all available data and from more than 160 
interviews with participants in the program and other experts 
yielded the following fundamental insights into the current 
program: 
  (1) From 1985 to the start of 1992, 557 independent projects 
(with a total of 1,111 individual applications) having a total 
volume of DM1,652 million were initiated under the BMFT's 
materials research program. The support outlay for those 
projects amounts to DM894 million (SYMBOL 64 \f "Symbol" 54 
percent), DM639 million of which (SYMBOL 64 \f "Symbol" 71 
percent) is allocated to industrial research and DM250 million 
(SYMBOL 64 \f "Symbol" 28 percent) to academic research. On an 
initial approximation, the support outlay is distributed evenly 
among the polymer, metal and ceramic groups of materials. The 
support instrument for combined research, having DM737 million 
in support outlay (SYMBOL 64 \f "Symbol" 83 percent) was 
intensively utilized. 
  (2) The general objectives of the program and those specific 
to materials were essentially properly chosen at the start of 
the program in 1985 and, in the course of the program, where 
clear needs were visible, they were adjusted to the changing 
directions of development. 
  (3)The materials research program has basically contributed 
to the development of effective R&amp;D structures and the 
start-up 
of pioneering development. It was possible to keep abreast of 
high-performance materials in the leading countries of the U.S. 
and Japan. 
  (4) With two exceptions[.sup]2[/], the specific goals set 
for the program were attained well enough. Important scientific 
and technical prerequisites for maintaining and developing the 
long-term competitiveness of Germany's industry were elaborated; 
use of such prerequisites and their conversion into directly 
quantifiable economic results, however, is still pending in many 
cases. 
  (5) The general conditions of the program, such as financial 
arrangement, timeframe for the program, project lifetimes, and 
oversight by the BMFT and project sponsor PLR [expansion not 
given], were favorably assessed and befit the particular 
(strategic) significance of the topic. 
  (6) Still, in the course of the assessment, definite 
openings 
for improvements surfaced, most prominent of which are: the 
strategic focus of a support design, its specific foci, and 
issues of organizational development and implementation. 
  By and large, therefore, the materials research program was 
in a position to meet the desired expectations, in terms of 
science and technology and even on an international comparison. 
As a result, the support principles of direct support and 
combined research, in particular, proved out. Recommendations of 
value for future programs appear to be: a more intense focusing 
of support funds on focal issues; prioritizing of vertical 
project structures and more intensive orientation of the system 
development project. To improve efficiency, the BMFT should 
establish the toolkits of modern portfolio management on 
strategic levels and of project management on project 
sponsor/project levels. 
<H5>  1.3 International Comparison of Materials Research and </H5>
Support For It 
  Chapter three compares materials research and support for it 
in Germany with other leading countries. Chapter 3.1 first 
compares the research foci of German industry with the 
activities of American and Japanese firms. Chapter 3.2 describes 
the support activities of Japan, the U.S. and the EC, while 
chapter 3.3 paints a detailed panorama of materials research in 
German universities and institutes. 
  The upshot is that, in all highly industrialized nations, 
the 
internationally acknowledged major significance of materials 
research as a key and trailblazing technology, leads to 
considerable R&amp;D efforts and corresponding support 
activities. 
The international comparative analysis of materials research and 
support for it, therefore, can be summarized in the following 
results: 
  (1) The most important impetus for materials engineering 
comes from the large, multinational companies in the troika of 
countries. Two-thirds of the companies with the strongest 
turnover worldwide view materials research as a focus of their 
R&amp;D investments. They leave a lasting imprint on the 
international development and use of new materials. 
  (2) Any "benchmarking" for assessing the developmental 
prospects of materials technology in Germany has to focus on the 
chief rivals in Japan and the U.S. In coming years, Japanese 
companies will definitely continue to increase their R&amp;D 
efforts. In this context, they emphasize actions to augment 
efficiency and strategies for national and international 
cooperation. Japanese firms accept as partners only companies 
and institutes that have a very strong technological position 
themselves. 
  (3) Materials research will operate on a continuing high 
level in American industry in coming years. It outstrips 
Germany's R&amp;D efforts by several orders of magnitude. 
Concurrently, an enduring reorientation is observable in the 
U.S., that is definitely focused on improving international 
competitiveness through new materials. Cost and use aspects, in 
particular, are underscored through heavy emphasis on materials 
processing and systematizing. 
  (4) In the two leading countries, the concept of a system, 
that is, the development of a strong national materials research 
in the context of dynamic user industries on the national level, 
receives heavy emphasis. In Germany, by comparison, the 
innovation process remains too heavily centered on the producer 
and is too heavily oriented toward basic research. So far, only 
in a few sectors, even on an international scale, are there 
successful systems allying materials manufacturers and 
growth-oriented, innovative consumers. 
  (5) In Germany, therefore, development is adversely 
impacted, 
above all, by the inadequate presence of dynamic user groups. 
Only dynamic consumers are able to generate the critical mass 
effect for materials development as well as contribute to the 
establishment of competitive structures in the development and 
production sectors. So far, in Germany, even dissemination to 
secondary applications with high growth and net product 
potential has continued to be neglected. Intensive net product 
systems applications, follow-on developments in low-cost sectors 
and the pre- and post-situational development of the processing 
and service stages still continues to receive too little 
attention. 
  (6) Support plays a front-and-center role in a functional 
national system of producers, consumers and research institutes. 
All industrial countries support materials research to a very 
great extent and, accordingly, they prioritize quite similar 
development sectors. It is crucial to pursue a targeted, 
national strategy of differentiation. Successful differentiation 
is primarily realized by aligning national programs as 
effectively as possible with R&amp;D strategies and innovative 
activities of the most important actors from industry and 
research. Japan's support strategy is a model in this respect. 
Even in the U.S. there is an increasingly greater effort, 
through national consensus building, to develop the existing 
strengths of materials engineering. 
  (7) Adversely impacting materials research support in 
western 
Europe with generally high R&amp;D expenditures is national 
fragmentation and parallel development of national innovative 
systems. In many cases existing strengths are still marked by 
"national islands of competence." Since the early seventies, any 
number of European programs and initiatives have been introduced 
to link them together. They continue to be of great 
significance, but they cannot take the place of the development 
of national programs that have to focus on shoring up national 
strengths vis-a-vis the main competitors from Japan and the U.S. 
  (8) The development of basic research has to be integrated 
more intensely than hitherto in this parallelogram of 
international competitive forces. In Europe, Germany enjoys a 
very good reputation for basic research and materials oriented 
training and professionalization. These have to stand out even 
more strongly, however, in a global context in terms of 
long-term industrial convertibility. More intensive "fitness for 
use" criteria have to be adduced as the quality standard for 
research and development. Effective transfer between basic 
research and industrial application occurs in too few sectors of 
German materials research. This requires efforts by all 
participants and new forms of cooperation as well as new forms 
of research support, organization and financing. 
<H5>  1.4 Importance of materials and processing </H5>
technologies for German industry 
  On the basis of a comparison of international important key 
technologies (chapter 4.1) and the present status and 
development trend in the sector of materials and processing 
technologies, chapter four demonstrates their significance for 
German industry. Chapter 4.3 summarizes the impact of competence 
in materials technologies on maintaining competitiveness. 
  This analysis clearly shows that the future prosperity of a 
country decisively depends on safeguarding and enhancing the 
competitiveness of its companies on the world markets. If 
companies as well as the government are to be able to safeguard 
this competitiveness in an arena marked by a high dynamic for 
change on the political, social, economic and technological 
levels, they have to adapt to such changes and actively help 
shape them. 
  A highly industrialized country like the FRG, with a weak 
raw 
materials basis, but with a good supply of fixed capital, an 
established basis of know-how, and a high level of education, 
should use its existing relative strengths in know-how 
intensive, future-oriented sectors of technology to concentrate 
on areas where such strengths can be most effectively used. But, 
as chapter four describes in detail, the leading industrial 
nations have the same marginal conditions as the FRG and 
therefore consider similar sectors of technology future-oriented 
and endeavor to develop them. So it is all the more necessary 
for the FRG to concentrate existing resources effectively and 
efficiently on technology sectors that Germany views as 
future-oriented and develop them as rapidly as possibly. 
  Because of their central importance for the future 
development of many sectors, materials and processing 
technologies are viewed internationally as particularly 
future-oriented technology sectors. It is imperative to 
safeguard and develop the position achieved in this 
broad-spectrum sector of technology to exploit the potential for 
differentiation in internationally important and attractive 
sectors and thereby permanently enhance the competitiveness of 
German industry. 
  This results in the following hypotheses: 
  (1) In all leading industrial countries, research and 
development in the field of high performance materials and the 
associated production and processing technologies enjoy very 
high significance since they 
  -- have high development and application potential 
  -- are, in many cases, the prerequisite for new or 
definitely 
improved technical designs, even allowing for ecological issues, 
and therefore 
  -- afford firms in practically all sectors of industry an 
opportunity to realize strategic competitive advantages. 
  (2) Technological developments in such important industrial 
sectors as automobile manufacturing, electronics/electrical 
engineering, energy engineering, machine and appliance building 
or chemistry are often based on high performance materials. 
Maintaining and developing the FRG's current, often favorable, 
competitive position in such industrial sectors and the 
associated export results (percentage of international exports: 
automobile manufacturing, 22 percent; electrical engineering, 18 
percent; energy engineering, 16 percent; electronics, nearly 10 
percent), can be safeguarded through the solid basis of know-how 
in this future-oriented technology sectors. 
  (3) In order to realize the potential of high performance 
materials, in the future, in the materials and processing 
technologies sector, above all, it will be necessary to overcome 
the gap still existing between materials development and further 
processing or the manufacture of components, so as to ensure the 
transfer of know-how from research and development to innovative 
products and systems. 
<H5>  1.5 Guidelines For Future Materials Research Support </H5>
in Germany 
  Building on the preliminary strategic remarks in chapter 
5.1, 
chapter 5.2 develops the most important principles for a future 
support design. Chapter 5.3 proposes topical foci for it and 
chapter 5.4, the necessary program organization and support 
principles for successful implementation. 
  These recommendations may be summarized as follows: 
  Because of their strategic significance, their 
broad-spectrum 
nature and their potential, high performance materials and the 
associated manufacturing and processing technologies are among 
the most important key technologies supported by government. 
Even for nearly all the FRG's industrial manufacturing sectors, 
they are important factors in maintaining and developing future 
competitiveness, whether as the basis for establishing new 
technical designs or for improving existing technologies and 
systems. 
  Countering the great potential of high performance 
materials, 
their great significance for the competitiveness of individual 
companies, as well as the entire economy, are the frequently 
long times for dissemination into the respective markets, 
uncertainties surrounding the realization of radical new 
technical designs and the associated corporate risks. For this 
reason, as well as consideration of intensive government support 
activities in all important industrial countries, it both makes 
sense and is necessary to have a further government support 
initiative in pre-competitive sectors. 
  As an industrial policy activity, future support of 
materials 
research in Germany should include the following fundamental 
strategic goals: 
  -- safeguarding Germany's technological competence as a 
critical factor for success in international competitiveness 
  -- acquiring leading technology positions in selective 
fields 
of application for high performance materials that are 
strategically important for German industry 
  -- accelerating the dissemination of high performance 
materials and the components and systems produced from them into 
the appropriate market segments as well as assisting German 
industry to maintain and develop its international 
competitiveness 
  -- taking long term ecological factors into consideration 
chapter (5.1). 
  Any future support initiative should tie in with the results 
that have been realized so far under the materials support 
program and with a view towards a more intensive strategic 
orientation with precisely defined strategic goals, as well as 
reorientation of the topical foci and organization of program 
development and implementation, it should also encompass: 
  (1) focusing the program on application foci matching the 
chosen technology strategy (chapter 5.2) 
  (2) reorienting topical foci on materials as integral 
components of systems solutions and taking net product stages 
into consideration (chapter 5.3) 
  (3) prioritizing proven support instruments, especially 
direct support of specific combined projects in contrast to 
non-specific or indirect support activities that have turned out 
to be less efficient (chapter 5.2) 
  (4) substantive systematic and/or institutionalized 
alignment 
with other support activities (chapter 5.4) 
  (5) Adapting program organization to new requirements by 
establishing program management and program administration under 
the purview of the BMFT (chapter 5.3) 
  (6) establishing modern methods of R&amp;D control and 
project 
management for program management and administration (chapter 
5.3). 
<H5>  2. Assessment of the BMFT's Materials Research Program </H5>
  On the federal level, the BMFT's materials research program 
constitutes the programmatic focus for supporting materials 
sciences. The basic goal of the program is to strengthen the 
position of German industry in key technological sectors. The 
result should be a decisive contribution towards ensuring the 
long-term competitiveness of various industrial sectors. For the 
period from 1985 to 1992, the basic results of the assessment 
that was made, that is, analysis and assessment of the materials 
research program, are: 
  (1) From 1985 to the start of 1992, 557 independent projects 
(with a total of 1,111 individual applications) having a total 
volume of DM1,652 million were initiated under the BMFT's 
materials research program. The support outlay for those 
projects amounts to DM894 million (SYMBOL 64 \f "Symbol" 54 
percent), DM639 million of which (SYMBOL 64 \f "Symbol" 71 
percent) is allocated to industrial research and DM250 million 
(SYMBOL 64 \f "Symbol" 28 percent) to academic research. On an 
initial approximation, the support outlay is distributed evenly 
among the polymer, metal and ceramic groups of materials. The 
support instrument for combined research, having DM737 million 
in support outlay (SYMBOL 64 \f "Symbol" 83 percent) was 
intensively utilized (chapter 2.2.3). 
  (2) The general objectives of the program and those specific 
to materials were essentially properly chosen at the start of 
the program in 1985 and, in the course of the program, where 
clear needs were visible, they were adapted to the changing 
directions of development (chapter 2.2.1). 
  (3)The materials research program has basically contributed 
to the development of effective R&amp;D structures and the 
start-up 
of pioneering development. It was possible to keep abreast of 
high-performance materials in the leading countries of the U.S. 
and Japan (chapter 2.3). 
  (4) With some exceptions, the specific goals set for the 
program were attained well enough. Important scientific and 
technical prerequisites for maintaining and developing the 
long-term competitiveness of Germany's industry were elaborated; 
use of such prerequisites and their conversion into directly 
quantifiable economic results, however, is still pending in many 
cases (chapter 2.3). 
  (5) The general conditions of the program, such as financial 
arrangement, timeframe for the program, project lifetimes, and 
oversight by the BMFT and project sponsor PLR [expansion not 
given], were favorably assessed and befit the particular 
(strategic) significance of the topic (chapter 2.3). 
  (6) Still, in the course of the assessment, definite 
openings 
for improvements surfaced, most prominent of which are: the 
strategic focus of a support design, its specific foci, and 
issues of organizational development and implementation (chapter 
2.3; 2.4). 
  By and large, therefore, the materials research program was 
in a position to meet the desired expectations, in terms of 
science and technology and even on an international comparison. 
As a result, the support principles of direct support and 
combined research, in particular, proved out. Recommendations of 
value for future programs appear to be: a more intense focusing 
of support funds on focal issues; prioritizing of vertical 
project structures and more intensive orientation of the system 
development project (chapter 2.3). To improve efficiency, the 
BMFT should establish the toolkits of modern portfolio 
management on strategic levels and of project management on 
project sponsor/project levels (chapter 2.4). 
<H5>  2.1 Methodology of the assessment </H5>
  To assess the effectiveness of the BMFT's materials research 
program, the issues of effectiveness and efficiency have to be 
addressed, that is, it must be clarified whether the proper 
goals were selected and the proper projects pursued and whether 
program and projects were implemented in the most cost-effective 
and efficient manner possible. 
  To be sure, in addressing such issues, the problem of 
R&amp;D 
output quantification surfaces. The problem is not so much on 
the project level, where ideal world/real world comparisons can 
be grasped well enough on the basis of published materials like 
project applications and progress reports. It is rather on the 
project groups level and the program level that it exists. The 
impact of the results realized under the program on the 
competitiveness of German industry and individual industrial 
sectors, is not open to direct quantification because of the 
long dissemination times. So far there is no proven and 
acknowledged method for this. 
  For this reason, in addition to direct methods on the 
project 
level: 
  -- output analysis of individual projects through ideal 
world/real world comparisons 
  -- case studies. 
  Recourse has to be had to a number of indirect methods: 
  -- patent analyses 
  -- analyses of the trade balances for technologically 
intensive merchandise 
  -- analysis of scientific indicators (e.g., analyses of 
quotability, bibliometric analyses) 
  -- document analysis 
  -- analysis of specialized literature 
  -- assessment of secondary literature and material 
  -- written and oral survey 
  -- interviews with experts. 
  In this connection, the interviews with experts, 
supplemented 
by a written questionnaire, constitute a principal focus. Arthur 
D. Little conducted nearly 160 technical discussions and 
interviews with experts from the materials and processing 
technologies sector around the world for this study. Nearly 100 
of them were in Germany, 40 in Japan, and 20 in the U.S. In 
selecting interviewees care was taken to include representatives 
from academic and industrial research, participants and 
non-participants in the materials research program and 
representatives from all stages of the net product chain. 
  The personal interviews were supplemented by a questionnaire 
distributed to more than 100 materials experts from academic and 
industrial research. The return rate totaled 80 percent. And 
they were statistically evaluated. The questionnaire mostly 
contained questions pertaining to materials research and the 
industrial arena. 
  Lastly, an experts seminar was held for each of the 
ceramics, 
polymers and metals groups of materials. The discussion during 
them centered principally on development trends and strategies 
specific to materials. 
  The assessment of the international comparison of materials 
research and support mostly involved: 
  -- analyses of selected materials research projects in the 
FRG, EC, and Japan 
  -- assessment of the BMFT's APC [expansion not given] Davor 
database 
  -- assessment of studies and projects analyses for other 
comparable BMFT programs. 
<H5>  2.2 Description of the materials research program </H5>
<H5>  2.2.1 Objectives </H5>
  The design and contents of the materials research program 
are 
derived from the former federal administration's broad research 
and technology policy guidelines prevailing in the early 
eighties. Those guidelines were aimed at ensuring a broadly 
focused basic research while simultaneously supporting 
cutting-edge technology, improving the general conditions for 
research and development within industry and focused support for 
research in selective key and broad-spectrum sectors of 
technological development for safeguarding the long-term 
competitiveness of German industry. Materials engineering was 
recognized as such a technology having a broad-spectrum aspect. 
As a result, with the materials research program, targeted 
support activities were provided for its further development. 
  With the program came the pursuit of broad objectives as 
well 
as specific partial goals under the individual groups of 
materials. The broad goals of the program can be summarized as 
follows: 


    -  improvement of German industry's competitiveness 
  -  development of new materials with new and/or improved useful 
features 
  -  mobilization of the scientific and technical potential 
in academic and industrial research for materials engineering 
  -  enhancement of user oriented basic research in the materials 
research sector and, albeit with reduced weight 
  -  improved information and technology transfer benefiting small 
and medium-size enterprises [SME]. 

    The underlying assumption is that it is the proper 
responsibility of an industrial concern to safeguard 
competitiveness. The federal government's technology policy 
activities therefore are in line with the subsidiary principle, 
that is, official support for research is applied where private 
sector research and development need assistance for broad 
economic or social considerations. Thus, for example, the 
enhancement and mobilization of highly qualified research groups 
in the various institutions for basic and applied research is an 
appropriate resource. 
  In this context, preference should be given to basic 
research 
projects with an applied orientation having clearly defined and 
limited foci, that can also be transformed into products and 
applications over the medium-to-long term. Furthermore, the 
establishment of combined projects for the transfer of know-how, 
especially benefiting SMEs, should be guaranteed. 
  Under the materials research program, materials having 
especially high potential for innovation whose further 
development is supported as a focal point, are clustered into 
groups of materials. Within the individual groups of materials, 
specific partial goals for each are pursued, as summarized 
below. Concurrently, a brief outline is provided for the 
respective groups of materials, their fundamental properties and 
basic areas of application. 
<H5>  Objectives For Ceramic Materials </H5>
  Ceramic materials display a number of features that make 
them 
attractive for many uses. Among other things, they are marked by 
high temperature resistance, low specific weight, and good 
resistance to corrosion and wear and tear. Because of these 
properties or an optimum combination of them, high-performance 
ceramic components are used in many applications in engine 
manufacturing, energy engineering, machine and equipment 
building and the chemical and metallurgical industries. 
Functional ceramics, for example, reputed for their insulating 
properties and especially good heat conductivity, are a 
permanent component of many electrical engineering and 
electronic products. 
  Enhanced dissemination of structural ceramic materials to 
relevant, potential fields of application, however, was 
confronted with a number of drawbacks inherent to ceramics, at 
the outset of the program. These included, for instance, the 
brittleness of ceramic components, the associated low resistance 
to changes in temperature, and sensitivity to blows and shocks. 
The considerable hardness of ceramic materials plus the absence 
of joining and bonding technologies also made it difficult to 
process components. Lastly, insufficiently developed methods of 
characterizing materials impeded the development of 
non-destructive processes for materials testing and quality 
assurance. 
  The following program goals specific to ceramics were 
derived 
from the considerable potential for ceramic components and the 
indicated impediments to broader industrial use. 


    -  development of technically reliable ceramics and 
components having high potential forindustrial applications 
  -  improvement of the disadvantageous features of ceramics 
  -  development and improvement of technologies for powder 
production, compression, molding and strengthening 
  -  elucidation of the fatigue and failure mechanisms of 
high-performance ceramics 
  -  further development of the processing steps to prepare for 
the 
serial production of large volume and complex, molded 
components. 

    Over the course of the program, moreover, the exploitation 
of 
the development potential of functional ceramics was explicitly 
incorporated into the objective for the ceramic group of 
materials. 
<H5>  Objectives For Polymer Materials </H5>
  Because of their various, specifically adaptable properties, 
it is impossible to imagine most areas of engineering and 
everyday life without polymer materials. Increasingly, the 
consistent further development of polymer chemistry will tackle 
new and more promising formulations for both structural polymers 
and for functional polymers. The outstanding features of polymer 
materials in this context are their low specific weight, their 
toughness and high strength when reinforced. These are 
supplemented by excellent electrical properties, good resistance 
to chemicals and easy ductility. 
  Especially attractive are the different variations of such 
features based on chemical and structural alternatives. The 
alternative applications resulting from the profile of the 
features are as diversified as is polymer chemistry itself and 
include specialized and high performance materials, above all, 
in the road vehicle manufacturing and electrical engineering and 
electronic industries. 
  At the outset of the program, the prime objectives in 
developing the exceptional potential of polymer materials for 
innovation, were: 


    -  development of polymer materials having extreme 
stability under load 
  -  development and improvement of systems of polymer alloys 
  -  development and improvement of methods for modifying and 
characterizing polymer surfaces 
  -  development of polymers with special electrical, magnetic and 
optical properties 
  -  development of polymers as input-output devices 

<H5>    Objectives For Metallic Materials </H5>
  There are two foci for the support of metallic materials 
under the materials research program: powder metallurgy and 
high-temperature and special purpose metallic materials. 
  Powder metallurgy, a process for producing semi-finished 
products and components from pulverized metals, agglomerations 
of metals and alloys, affords a number of advantages compared 
with molten metallurgy. Metals that can be produced only with 
difficulty using traditional molten metallurgy can be produced 
more easily and with defined texture and/or defined porosity and 
permeability using the powder metallurgy process. With this 
process, complex molded semi-finished products or components 
approximate their final contours and are therefore more 
economical to produce. 
  These advantages result in a potential for using components 
manufactured using powder metallurgy in various important 
industrial sectors. For example, friction bearings and preformed 
parts of iron, bronze, or aluminum alloy materials are used in 
the automobile industry and in the manufacture of equipment and 
machinery. Preformed parts of highly heat resistant nickel and 
cobalt alloys are critical components for the manufacture of 
turbines; the aircraft industry uses weight-saving trans-alloy 
sintered products. 
  A number of drawbacks, however, have to be surmounted to 
further develop the existing potential in other industrial 
sectors as well. These led to the formulation of the following 
development goals for powder metallurgy in the materials 
research program: 


    -  development of a process for producing metal powders 
with controllable distribution of particle sizes 
  -  development of a process for producing metal powders having 
reproducible high chemical purity 
  -  development of a powder processing procedure to adapt to 
locally defined component features 
  -  development of a powder processing procedure to manufacture 
large, complex molded components and semi-finished 
products. 

    High-temperature and special purpose metallic materials 
display special properties like solidity, firmness and 
resistance to corrosion even at high temperatures. These 
materials are key components in many sectors of industry but 
especially and always, wherever increased efficiency and, 
ultimately, therefore, energy savings are pursued. Naturally, it 
is primarily the manufacture of equipment, turbines, and 
generating plants that is interested in this materials and that 
uses them in the form of austenitic steels and super-alloys that 
can be used at temperatures up to nearly 1,200 degrees C. 
Light-weight metallic materials like aluminum or titanium alloys 
are also used in the manufacture of drive gears and aircraft. 
  To develop the existing potential in the indicated 
industries 
as well as in new areas of application, the materials research 
program formulated the following development goals for 
high-temperature and special-purpose metallic materials: 


    -  development of new (inter-) metallic phases for 
applications at temperatures ranging between 900-1,500 degrees C. 
  -  improvement of known systems of metallic materials, primarily 
by shifting the useful temperatures for such materials to higher 
temperature ranges. 

<H5>    Objectives For Composite Materials </H5>
  Unlike the materials described up to this point, composite 
materials are fashioned from more than a single material. Their 
distinguishing features are a highly specific rigidity and 
strength, that can be aligned either isotropically or in any one 
of a number of pre-established directions. Targeted combining of 
individual composite components enable fiber, surface or 
particle composites to be produced, whose characteristic feature 
is clearly superior to the properties of the individual 
components. 
  Reinforced materials, above all, fiber-reinforced 
synthetics, 
are presently used in a numerous variety of fields of 
application. The aerospace industry, for instance, uses 
carbon-fiber reinforced synthetics for primary structural 
components and special applications. In the automobile industry, 
(short) fiberglass reinforced bodywork components are used. And 
in machine and equipment building, fiberglass and carbon-fiber 
reinforced rollers, bins and pressure reservoirs are being 
manufactured. The sporting goods industry makes use of composite 
materials for the wide variety of sports equipment. 
  So far, broad scale use of composite materials has lagged 
behind the various technical possibilities. Here too, a large 
number of obstacles have to be overcome through development 
activity, in order to be able to continue to develop the 
potential of this group of materials. Foremost among the 
development goals under the materials research program for 
composite materials are the following: 


    -  development of cost-effective production processes for 
the basic materials 
  -  development of cost-effective processing procedures for 
producing semi-finished products and components from composite 
materials 
  -  development of reliable detection of defects and quality 
assurance for semi-finished products and components 
  -  improvement of the interface threshold for individual 
composite 
materials 

    Initially, topics from the field of tribology were 
addressed--ultimately as derivatives of former support 
initiatives--but they disappeared in the first year of the 
materials research program. 
<H5>  2.2.2 Support instruments </H5>
  The supreme principle of the BMFT's technology policy is the 
subsidiary principle whereby the economy is fundamentally 
responsible on its own for determining the nature and the scope 
of its research and development activities. Therefore, the 
responsibilities of government research and technology policy 
are focused on safeguarding broad, basic research of 
qualitatively high value, cultivating precautionary research and 
supporting technological options of a strategic nature. 
  It is up to industry to carry out R&amp;D with an applied 
orientation. But, where necessary, this must be accompanied by 
supportive official activities. In this context, it is 
particularly appropriate for the subsidiary principle to 
function as a multi-level toolkit. The activities carried out by 
the BMFT to support R&amp;D in the economy can be classified as 
indirect, indirect-specific and direct forms of support. 
<H5>  Indirect Support </H5>
  Indirect support activities are aimed at generally enhancing 
the R&amp;D potential of the company. They are oriented towards 
potential and as such, they do not impact the tenor of private 
R&amp;D activity. Indirect support activities include personnel 
cost 
subsidies for R&amp;D and administrative regulations like 
investment 
incentives and special deductions. Cooperation between academia 
and business, supportive activities like industrial community 
research, commissioned R&amp;D, technology transfer and research 
cooperation are also components of indirect support. Lastly, 
also included among indirect activities is the program to 
support corporate foundations with a technological orientation. 
<H5>  Indirect-Specific Support </H5>
  On the other hand, the indirect-specific form of support is 
much more appropriate for broadly effective support of specified 
R&amp;D fields. Using accelerated application and implementation 
processes, that mostly benefit SMEs, the use of specified 
technologies is promoted and in this way the economy's 
innovativeness is increased. In this way, for example, the 
accelerated application of important key technologies to new 
products and processes can be supported and a higher rate of 
dissemination can be achieved more rapidly. The BMFT performs 
indirect-specific activities, for example, to support new 
production techniques (CIM, robotics), micro-systems engineering 
and bioprocess engineering. 
<H5>  Direct support </H5>
  Finally, long-term available technology and the 
innovativeness of the German economy are directly impacted under 
the guise of direct project support. This is done through 
targeted support for project planning that encompasses both the 
basic research of academic institutes and R&amp;D having an 
applied 
orientation with substantial participation by industry. This 
type of support entails the strongest form of intervening 
structurally in the innovation process. 
  The objects of the BMFT's direct project support are 
long-term programs in the field of ocean and space research, 
various aspects of precautionary research, and above all, too, 
important technologies that are critical for ensuring the 
long-term competitiveness of German industry. Besides research 
on renewable energy sources, data processing and microsystems 
engineering, it also includes materials research that has 
rightfully been given greater attention in recent years, not 
only by the BMFT. 
  The BMFT's materials research program is also cast in the 
form of direct project support. In this connection, one of the 
focal points of the program is recourse to the combined research 
instrument, that is, the joint participation by a number of 
firms and research institutes in a single project (in contrast 
to the awarding of isolated individual projects). The objective 
of this procedure is efficient use of scarce research 
capabilities by combining resources and intensification of 
technology transfer from academia to industry. This instrument 
should also improve the possibility of SMEs to participate in 
the program. The distinguishing feature of combined projects is 
that, to accomplish a project goal that is acknowledged to be 
important, industrial firms and academic research facilities 
undertake joint, coordinated R&amp;D efforts in an optimum 
combination for the project, with one of the combined partners 
assuming overall charge of the entire project. As a rule, the 
BMFT shares 50 percent of the total cost of the combined 
project. The industrial partners contribute the remaining 50 
percent for themselves and the participating institutes and 
thereby assume co-responsibility for their expenditures. As the 
project increasingly approaches the point of application, the 
industrial partner's share of support can be scaled back to 30 
percent. When the project is of a highly basic nature, the BMFT 
assumes up to 100 percent of the institute's costs. 
<H5>  2.2.3 Survey of the distribution of R&amp;D allocations under </H5>
the materials research program 
  As of February 1992, 577 independent projects with a total 
budget of DM1,652 million, had been initiated under the 
materials research program. Such independent projects comprise 
both individual and combined projects. A further breakdown of 
combined projects into individual projects by the partners in 
the combination yields a total number of 1,111 individual 
projects. The support outlay for those projects amounts to DM894 
million, equivalent to an average support rate of 54 percent. At 
the conclusion of the first half of the program, that is, by 31 
December 1989, projects having a support volume of DM264 
million, equivalent to an average support rate of 56 percent, 
had already been implemented. In the second half of the program, 
since 1 January 1990, there still remain projects entailing a 
support outlay of DM631 million, equivalent to an average 
support rate of 53 percent. Therefore, for the duration of the 
entire length of the program, the average support rate amounts 
to about 50 percent and thus meets program standards for project 
financing. 
  Of the 577 independent projects, 343, or approximately 60 
percent, are combined projects, each with its own project 
application by the partners in the combination. DM1,372 million, 
or, 83 percent of the total budget and DM737 million of the 
total support, that is, 82 percent, are allocated to those 343 
combined projects. 
  This distribution reflects the focused application of the 
instrument for combined research under the materials research 
program wherein a large number of those carrying out (combined) 
projects have simultaneously continued to include subcontractors 
on their projects. For all independent projects the average 
project budget amounts to nearly DM2.9 million and DM4 million 
for combined projects. Average support for all independent 
projects totals nearly DM1.55 million and nearly DM2.150 million 
for combined projects. 
  The survey of the distribution of projects by major 
categories (see table 2.1) clearly shows that more than half of 
all projects are provided with a budget of less than DM2 
million. Contrasting with this, there are a few large projects 
having a project volume of DM10 million or more (five percent of 
all projects), and these effectively tie up a not inconsiderable 
share of the program budget. 




    ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 2.1: Survey of budget allocation by major project categories           | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Project bud-|Number of p-|Total budget|Support bud-|Share of to-|Share of su-| 
|get         |rojects     |            |get         |tal budget  |pport budget| 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|(Millions o-|            |(Millions o-|(Millions o-|(%)         |(%)         | 
|f DM)       |            |f DM)       |f DM)       |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|2           |343         |223         |153         |13.5        |17.1        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|2-4         |97          |290         |165         |17.6        |18.5        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|4-6         |61          |304         |155         |18.4        |17.4        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|6-8         |30          |211         |108         |12.8        |12.0        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|8-10        |7           |153         |78          |9.3         |8.7         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|10          |29          |471         |235         |28.5        |26.3        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Total       |577         |1,652       |894         |100.1       |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Source: APC-Davor-Database                                                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



    The analysis of resources applied specifically to materials 
under the program's system (see table 2.2), shows that ceramics 
is the most seriously supported sector with total support of 
DM213.9 million, followed by polymers with DM189.4, both of 
these having more than a 20 percent share of the total for 
support. Next come the composite materials, the high-temperature 
and specialty metals [MHS] and the powder metallurgy sector. 
Projects in the corrosion and tribology sector that were 
essentially carried out in the first half of the program are 
allocated DM53.4 million (six percent of total support). 



  ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 2.2: Survey of budget allocation by groups of materials                | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|materials g-|Total budget|Support bud-|Share of to-|Share of su-|Average sup-| 
|roup        |            |get         |tal budget  |pport budget|port rate   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|            |(Millions o-|(Millions o-|(%)         |(%)         |(%)         | 
|            |f DM)       |f DM)       |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ceramics    |412.1       |213.9       |24.9        |23.9        |51.9        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|New polymers|374.8       |189.4       |23.7        |21.2        |50.6        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Composite m-|327.3       |169.8       |19.8        |19.0        |51.9        | 
|aterials    |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|MHS         |280.1       |163.1       |17.0        |18.2        |58.2        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Powder meta-|183.4       |104.7       |11.1        |11.7        |57.1        | 
|llurgy      |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Corrosion + |74.6        |53.4        |4.5         |6.0         |71.6        | 
|tribology   |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Total       |1,652.3     |894.3       |100.0       |100.0       |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Source: APC-DAVOR-Database: STESYS                                           | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



    If the previously indicated support funding is added to the 
three core materials sectors of ceramics, polymers and metals, 
the result is a nearly even distribution of funding for each of 
the three materials sectors of nearly DM250-300 in support 
funding when allocated to composite materials and 
corrosion/tribology in those three sectors. 
  A comparable result is provided by analysis of the 
distribution of funding for specific materials, differentiated 
on the basis of the recipients of the financing (see table 2.3). 



  ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 2.3a: Survey of budget allocation for specific materials on the basis  | 
|of groups of recipients of the financing - industry's share                  | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Budget allo-|Total budget|Support bud-|Share of to-|Share of su-|Average sup-| 
|cation for  |            |get         |tal budget  |pport budget|port rate   | 
|specific ma-|            |            |            |            |            | 
|terials     |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Industry's  |(Millions o-|(Millions o-|(%)         |(%)         |(%)         | 
|share       |f DM)       |f DM)       |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Materials group                                                              | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ceramics    |328.7       |155.8       |24.2        |24.4        |47.4        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|New polymers|341.6       |156.9       |25.1        |24.6        |45.9        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Composite m-|292.0       |137.0       |21.5        |21.4        |56.9        | 
|aterials    |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|MHS         |207.6       |97.5        |15.3        |15.3        |47.6        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Powder meta-|148.8       |71.1        |10.9        |11.1        |47.8        | 
|llurgy      |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Corrosion + |41.2        |20.5        |3.0         |3.2         |49.8        | 
|tribology   |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Total       |1,359.9     |638.8       |100.0       |100.0       |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Source: APC-DAVOR-Database: STESYS                                           | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 






    ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 2.3b: Survey of budget allocation for specific materials on the basis  | 
|of groups of recipients of the financing - institutes' share                 | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Budget allo-|Total budget|Support bud-|Share of to-|Share of su-|Average sup-| 
|cation for  |            |get         |tal budget  |pport budget|port rate   | 
|specific ma-|            |            |            |            |            | 
|terials     |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Institutes' |(Millions o-|(Millions o-|(%)         |(%)         |(%)         | 
|share       |f DM)       |f DM)       |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Materials group                                                              | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ceramics    |82.4        |57.7        |29.0        |23.2        |70.0        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|New polymers|32.2        |31.5        |11.3        |12.6        |97.8        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Composite m-|34.8        |32.3        |12.2        |13.0        |92.8        | 
|aterials    |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|MHS         |71.0        |64.8        |24.9        |26.0        |91.3        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Powder meta-|30.9        |30.0        |10.9        |12.0        |97.1        | 
|llurgy      |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Corrosion + |33.3        |32.9        |11.7        |13.2        |98.8        | 
|tribology   |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Total       |284.6       |249.2       |100.0       |100.0       |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Source: APC-DAVOR-Database: STESYS                                           | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



    In contrast to table 2.2, in industry it is not ceramics but 
the polymers sector that constitutes the group with the largest 
program budget. Otherwise, even here, ceramics, polymers, 
composites and metals make up the categories of materials that 
are generally supported most heavily. In the field of academic 
research, high-temperature and specialty metals, with DM64.8 
million, were the most heavily supported, followed by ceramics, 
composites, new polymers and powder metallurgy. 
  In keeping with the directives laid down for project 
financing of combined projects under the materials research 
program, the average support rate in the industrial sector 
totals 47 percent, while it is close to 88 percent for academic 
research (see table 2.4). 



  ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 2.4: Survey of budget distribution among applicant groups              | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Applicant   |Total budget|Support bud-|Share of to-|Share of su-|Average sup-| 
|            |            |get         |tal budget  |pport budget|port rate   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|            |(Millions o-|(Millions o-|(%)         |(%)         |(%)         | 
|            |f DM)       |f DM)       |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Industry    |1,360.0     |638.8       |82.3        |71.4        |47.0        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Universities|144.3       |134.8       |8.7         |15.1        |93.4        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Non-univers-|140.3       |114.8       |8.5         |12.8        |81.8        | 
|ity research|            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Other       |7.6         |6.0         |0.5         |0.7         |78.9        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Total       |1,652.2     |894.4       |100.0       |100.0       |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Source: APC-DAVOR-Database: BEREI                                            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



    The latter value in this connection is still substantially 
influenced by the relative low rate for support of the ceramics 
sector, which, in turn, results from the inclusion of a single, 
large project financed, for the most part, by industry. 
Altogether, industry's share in the total funding at DM638.8 
million comes to nearly 72 percent of the support budget. By 
comparison, at about DM249.6 million, approximately 27 percent 
of the total support amount is allocated to university and 
non-university institutes. Other recipients got less than one 
percent. If the funds totaling DM638.8 million going into 
industrial research are recategorized, the result is that the 
lion's share of it went to benefit the research and development 
of large firms (see table 2.5). This coincides with additional 
results obtained under this study, in which German industry 
generally not only provides the lion's share of all national 
R&amp;D 
financing, but the largest firms, at the same time, are also 
providing the decisive impetus for further future development of 
materials research. Large industry, therefore, is the 
predominant sponsor of technological development in the field of 
new materials. 
  Large firms and their subsidiaries invested a total of 
nearly 
DM1,197 million under the materials research program, equivalent 
to 73 percent of industry's total share in the program budget. 
Those projects were supported with DM554 million, equivalent to 
63 percent of total support volume and 88 percent of total 
support for industry. By way of contrast, SMEs shared Much less 
extensively in the materials research program. At approximately 
DM119 million, they were allocated only about seven percent of 
the total budget of DM1,652 million. Support for those projects 
totaled DM57 million, equal to 11.4 percent of the support for 
industry and nine percent of total support. 



  ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 2.5: Survey of budget distribution among industrial recipients of fina-| 
|ncing                                                                        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Applicant   |Total budget|Support bud-|Share of to-|Share of su-|Average sup-| 
|            |            |get         |tal budget  |pport budget|port rate   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|            |(Millions o-|(Millions o-|(%)         |(%)         |(%)         | 
|            |f DM)       |f DM)       |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Large firms |1,080.1     |500.7       |79.3        |78.2        |46.4        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Subsidiarie-|116.7       |53.3        |8.6         |8.3         |45.7        | 
|s[.sup]3     |            |            |            |            |            | 
|[/]      |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|SME         |118.8       |57.1        |8.7         |8.9         |48.1        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Working Ass-|23.4        |17.9        |1.7         |2.8         |76.5        | 
|ociation of |            |            |            |            |            | 
|Industrial  |            |            |            |            |            | 
|Research As-|            |            |            |            |            | 
|sociations [|            |            |            |            |            | 
|AIF] instit-|            |            |            |            |            | 
|utes        |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Other       |22.6        |11.3        |1.7         |1.8         |50          | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Total       |1,361.6     |640.3       |100.0       |100.0       |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Source: APC-DAVOR-Database: BEREI                                            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



    This result is in start contrast to program goals whereby 
SME 
are among the main target groups for improved information and 
technology transfer. This was also correspondingly criticized in 
the poll conducted among selected participants under this study 
on the course of the program (see section 2.3 on this). Further 
assessment, therefore, has to discover what led to this low 
participation by SME, how it is to be assessed, and, above all, 
how to react in designing a catch-up program, considering the 
dominant role of the large firms in materials research. 
  Lastly, the survey of the distribution of support funding 
among different industrial sectors paints a particularly 
informative picture. According to it, the chemical industry is 
especially deeply involved in the materials research program, 
followed by the metals producing, electrical engineering and 
machine building sectors. The lion's share of support, DM239 
million, is allocated just to the chemical industry. Table 2.6 
below shows the distribution of the amounts of support among 
various industrial sectors. 
  More than 50 percent of support for industrial research 
under 
the materials research program went to benefit the chemical and 
metals producing industries. In this context the leading 
contenders under the program are the sectors producing raw 
materials and other materials. In contrast, processing 
industries and various industrial end users, for instance, above 
all, machine building and road vehicle manufacturing, were 
under-proportionately supported. Because of the importance of 
the user and synergistic aspects, however, such a structured 
distribution of support funding for the specific requirements of 
materials development is only partially fair since it does not 
fully support dissemination into broad areas of application. 
  Distribution by specific sector reveals a clear imbalance 
along the net product chain, that is, from materials development 
up to the component and/or system. This entails implications for 
the formulation of guidelines for future BMFT materials research 
support in terms of enhanced consideration of the materials' 
consumers and their greater incorporation into integrated 
projects with materials developers and processors. 



  ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 2.6: Survey of budget distribution among different industrial sectors  | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Industrial  |Total budget|Support bud-|Share of to-|Share of su-|Average sup-| 
|sector      |            |get         |tal budget  |pport budget|port rate   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|            |(Millions o-|(Millions o-|(%)         |(%)         |(%)         | 
|            |f DM)       |f DM)       |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Chemical in-|520.2       |238.7       |38.3        |37.4        |45.9        | 
|dustry      |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Metals prod-|193.8       |92.2        |14.3        |14.4        |47.6        | 
|uction      |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Electrical  |185.3       |88.2        |13.6        |13.8        |47.6        | 
|engineering |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Machine bui-|127.8       |58.8        |9.4         |9.2         |46.0        | 
|lding       |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Road vehicl-|118.9       |54.3        |8.7         |8.5         |45.7        | 
|es manufact-|            |            |            |            |            | 
|ure         |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Non-metalli-|196.3       |50.5        |7.8         |7.9         |47.5        | 
|c minerals  |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Synthetics/-|17.0        |9.6         |1.3         |1.5         |56.5        | 
|rubber      |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Other       |90.7        |46.4        |6.7         |7.3         |51.2        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Total       |1,360.0     |638.7       |100.1       |100.0       |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Source: APC-DAVOR-Database: STESYS                                           | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 




<H5>      2.3 Assessment of the materials research program </H5>
  In the highly industrialized countries, research and 
development in the natural and engineering sciences is assuming 
ever increasing importance and now more than ever is a major 
determining influence for competitiveness. The new and improved 
products and processes resulting from research and development 
yield competitive advantages and thereby ultimately held ensure 
economic prosperity. 
  Over the past 20 years in Germany, corporate outlay for 
R&amp;D 
rose from DM10.4 billion to DM55.2 billion, equal to an annual 
8.6 percent rate of increase or nearly four percent when 
allowing for inflation. Currently, firms in Germany are 
providing nearly three-fourths of all national R&amp;D financing. 
Meanwhile, however, development activities have become so cost 
intensive in many sectors that even large firms are unable on 
their own to pursue such financing any longer and are having to 
enter into alliances with other firms around the world or resort 
to official support for research. 
  Materials research is the type of sector that requires 
R&amp;D 
alliances and official support. In many instances the results of 
materials research are the key to establishing new technologies 
and are therefore of strategic importance. Simultaneously, 
however, materials research is cost intensive and full of risk, 
above all, since as a rule, the time for disseminating new 
materials into applications is more than 15 years and 
consequently the period for a return on R&amp;D capital 
investments 
is often immensely long. 
  As the next chapter describes in detail, new developments in 
the materials sciences sector are trailblazing or key 
technologies and are exceptionally significant for competitive 
differentiation. They exert a significant impact on corporate 
and national competitiveness and for this reason are intensively 
pursued and officially supported in most industrial countries. 
  The unambiguous outcome of our many interviews at home and 
abroad is that the BMFT's materials research program is by and 
large deemed a successful program. The fundamental strengths of 
materials sciences were combined for the program and in the 
course of the program R&amp;D structures were set up in academic 
and 
industrial research, international recognition of which is 
uncontested and the positive effects of which are still not 
fully foreseeable at the present time. With some exceptions, the 
target groups that were aimed at were realized and the 
"materials-research [MATFO] generation" that has worked on 
projects at the various institutes and in numerous firms and 
that was sensitized and educated to the importance of materials 
research, will surely make its impact fully felt only in 
following years and will continue to make an important 
contribution towards overcoming the perceptible (linguistic) 
barriers between natural scientists and engineers in the past. 
There is no doubt that the materials research program has 
contributed quite substantially to enabling the FRG to keep up 
with the U.S. and Japan, countries that are leaders in 
technology. 



<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-13A>          Chart 2.1: Assessment of the importance of the materials research program's objectives </FIG>

  As indicated by chart 2.1, the materials experts from 
industry and academia who were queried were unanimous in their 
view that, in terms of an assessment of the program's goals, the 
latter were significant and important. This assessment applies 
both to the broad goals and to the objectives for specific 
materials under the various focal topics, each of which was 
deemed important or very important by nearly 75 percent of all 
those queried. 
  One of the broad objectives of the materials research 
program 
is the development of new materials with new or improved useful 
features. Over the course of the program, basic research with an 
applied orientation especially has been supported. As a result, 
a considerable number of new materials or materials having 
improved features and production processes have been developed 
and occasionally tested in different applications. Some 
selective examples under the respective group of materials are 
listed in tables 2.7-2.11. 
<H5>  [Boxed item] Table 2.7: Selective examples of project </H5>
results in the ceramics sector 


    -  Development and/or optimization of clean room 
techniques, plasma coating, flame coating, thermal CVD, slip 
casting, pressure filtration, electrophoretic molding 
  -  Development or continuing development of sol-gel processes, 
reactive spraying, flame hydrolysis and hydrothermal processes 
  -  Testing serial production of large-size simple geometry 
components for heat engineering 
  -  Clarification of corrosion and oxidation reactions at high 
temperatures 
  -  Clarification of the operation of sintered additives with 
definite increases in strength resulting there from 
  -  Ceramic coatings on an industrial scale for engine exhausts 
  -  Development of efficient engine ceramics (valves and seat 
rings, heel plates, etc.) to the point of readiness for testing 
  -  Development of active ingredients for ceramic/metal bondings 
at 
high temperatures 
  -  Development of ultrasonic methods of surface and near surface 
examination 
  -  Detection of volume defects using microfocus x-ray 
engineering 
  -  Economic production of SIMIT materials 
  -  Development of a luminescent ceramic x-ray reservoir 
  -  Development of pressure filtration and electrophoresis as 
molding processes for ion-conducting ceramics 

<H5>    [Boxed item]Table 2.8: Selective examples of project results </H5>
in the powder metallurgy sector 


    -  Optimization of ultrasonic atomization and liquefied 
gas compression 
  -  Ready to apply injection molding of steel powders 
  -  Development of a process for production of powder from 
refractory metals 
  -  Development of a high strength and highly corrosion resistant 
Al alloy, the latter to the point of readiness for use (Airbus) 
  -  Development of two alloys for turbine and engine components 
to 
the point of readiness for use 
  -  Increasing the maximum useful temperature for Ti alloys to 
600 
degrees C through dispersion reinforcement 
  -  Development of new austenitic ODS alloys 
  -  Development of a ferritic alloy resistant to corrosion up to 
1,350 degrees C to the point of readiness for use 
  -  Definite increase in the lifetimes of (steel) roller bearings 
and contact tubing (ODS alloys) through powder metallurgy 
production 
  -  Development of metal injection molding for fast working 
steels 
  -  Development of a new cermet material for cutting tools 
  -  Al structurally reinforced with fibers having increased 
tensile 
strength and elasticity through multi-strand pressing of 
mechanically alloyed Al and Cu 
  -  Examination of molding alternatives for ductile moldable 
nano-crystalline ceramics 

    As an indicator of the scientific and technical results that 
have been realized, it is possible to note the fact that, during 
the course of the materials research program, up to 1991, more 
than 340 patents, 1,800 publications and 2,500 lectures are 
mentioned in the program's yearbooks. This is also evident in 
the patent evaluations for specific materials. German firms that 
have participated intensively in the materials research program, 
in the 1990 assessment, in contrast to 1985, are among the 
companies most active in patents worldwide in various sectors. 
Still, the starting point has to be that a quite considerably 
higher number of scientific publications, directly or indirectly 
linked to the program, were published. 
<H5>  [Boxed item] Table 2.9: Selective examples of project </H5>
results in the high-temperature and specialty metal sector 


    -  Development of inter-metallic phases with useful 
temperatures in excess of 1,200 degrees C 
  -  Development of powder and molten metallurgical production 
processes for inter-metallic phases 
  -  Development of light metal alloys with Li contents of five to 
six percent 
  -  Development of low-pressure lost wax and sand casting for 
light 
metal alloys as well as superplastic deformation, diffusion, 
laser beam and electron beam welding 
  -  Development of a database for light metal alloys 
  -  Development of an uncoated superalloy usable up to 1,100 
degrees C 
  -  Production of a single crystal turbine bucket 
  -  Increase in the high-temperature resistance of weldable 
steels 
to 650 degrees C albeit with insufficient corrosion resistance 
  -  Development of refractory nitrides, borides and carbon 
nitrides 
that can be applied to substrates through vacuum plasma spraying 
  -  Development of diffusion protective layers for superalloys 
  -  Development of machine part coatings that led to very much 
longer lifetimes 
  -  Development of a photochemical process for non-destructive 
testing of layers 
  -  Development of the DESLI process leading to temperature and 
corrosion resistant steels 
  -  Development of a new process for custom welding and 
continuous 
casting 
  -  Development of highly valuable and cost-effective electrode 
coatings for electrolytic processes 
  -  Development of new permanent magnet materials and 
shape-memory-alloys 

<H5>    [Boxed item] Table 2.10: Selective examples of project </H5>
results in the polymers sector 


    -  Development of new aromatic polycarbonates having glass 
transition temperatures up to 190 degrees C and thermoplastic 
processability 
  -  Development of especially impact-resistant duromers through 
the 
insertion of liquid crystal segments 
  -  Development of liquid crystal polymers suitable for modern 
processing methods 
  -  Expansion of the useful temperature range for standard 
thermoplastics via graft polymerization 
  -  Enhanced economizing of a process stage through controlled 
application of temperature 
  -  Development of computer models for molecular interactions and 
interface phenomena and experimental verification - production 
of strictly alternating co-polymers using catalysts 
  -  Development of property-determining superlattices through the 
incorporation of functional groups in defined sequences 
  -  Synthesis of an organic charge-transfer-complex with metallic 
conductivity 
  -  Synthesis of stable polymers with excellent conductive 
properties 
  -  Reduction of attenuation in polymer beam waveguides to below 
100 dB/km 
  -  Optimization of production and characterization and 
determination of the applied possibilities in the laboratory of 
ultrathin layers 
  -  Development of a new system with the highest, nonlinear 
coefficients in the world 
  -  Production of easily processable conductive polymers albeit 
with a molecular weight that is still too low 
  -  Development of high resolution (up to 0.2 m) photoresists 
  -  Development of a new system from liquid crystal polymer and a 
dye for storing holographic images and possibly even for 
polarizing holography 
  -  Basic research on data storage systems 

<H5>    [Boxed item] Table 2.11: Selective examples of project </H5>
results in the composites sector 


    -  Production of C fibers from mesophase resin with high 
tensile strength and Young's modulus 
  -  Production of AL[.sup]2[/]O[.sup]3[/] filament yarns and 
fibers 
  -  Studies on the impact of surface treatment on C fibers 
  -  Drastic increase in a C fiber/thermoplast compound through 
appropriate fiber layers 
  -  Development of new matrix systems having increased 
temperature 
and oxidation resistance, resistance to cracking and ductile 
yield 
  -  Increased heat resistance of Al and Mg alloys through fiber 
reinforcement 
  -  Optimization of commercial fiber purification processes 
  -  Development of production processes (autoforge process, die 
casting) and optimization of processing procedures (sawing, 
drilling, etc.) 
  -  Fashioning an international lead in the production of fiber 
molded solids 
  -  Development of fiber reinforced dichroit and SiC with high 
defect tolerance 
  -  Drastic improvement in properties through coatings, leading 
to 
an average fiber/matrix interaction 
  -  Production of highly pure powder and improvement of product 
uniformity through cleanroom engineering 
  -  Optimization of various powder production processes 
  -  Development of variable distance texturing having high impact 
resistance and low tendency towards delamination 

    By and large, therefore, over the course of the program a 
sizable number of concrete results have been realized. Those 
results have to be given an absolutely favorable assessment, at 
least as regards the scientific and technical targets. Results 
for the commercial and economic goals call for a more nuanced 
and somewhat critical assessment. The assessment of our written 
questionnaire also reflects this nuanced evaluation of the goal 
attainment (see chart 2.2). 
  While the support goals for combined research, support for 
basic research with an applied orientation and development of 
new materials were relatively well realized, the originally 
pursued goals of 


    -  improving the competitiveness of German industry and 
  -  promoting the transfer of information and technology to 
benefit 
SMEs 

    were not adequately realized in the view of those queried. 
In 
assessing the results in terms of the various categories of 
materials it turns out that the original objectives for ceramics 
and composite materials were not entirely satisfactorily met. 
Although considerable progress was made in the manufacture of 
components, there was still no increased dissemination into 
potential areas of application, primarily because of the absence 
of receptive industrial structures. The results for the powder 
metallurgy and high-temperature and specialty metallic materials 
categories of materials were evaluated more favorably. A 
possible explanation for this might be that support funding 
produces the most leverage in those categories of materials 
where the technology position of German firms is already strong 
anyway. The evaluations and assessments of specific materials 
reflect Germany's competitive position in high-performance 
ceramics and composite materials, which, on an international 
scale, can only be categorized as hanging in there. In contrast, 
the position of German firms in high-performance polymers 
remains strong and so is solidified through official research 
support. 
  A less weighted goal, the greater inclusion of SMEs in the 
materials research program could not be realized. This result is 
also documented in the low allocation of funding. In any event, 
it is highly questionable whether SMEs could yet at all "afford" 
the type of materials research that was primarily to be 
supported by the program. As a rule, SMEs rely on a considerably 
faster return on funding than larger firms and therefore are 
less effectively able to engage in the risky projects with a 
long-term focus typical of materials research. In our view, this 
type of configuration leads to the questioning of such an 
objective, even if, so far, it has been of slight importance. 
  In the opinion of a large part of the experts who were 
polled, the actual broad goal of the materials research program, 
improvement of German industry's competitiveness likewise was 
not adequately realized. In this context, however, attention 
needs to be given to two aspects. The seven year time period 
since the start of the program is not a sufficient length of 
time to be able to assess the extent to which the basic 
operation or results of basic research with an applied 
orientation impact on the competitiveness of companies or 
sectors. The dissemination time for new materials into broad 
areas of application in most instances amounts to 15 years or 
more, so that new developments and products presently are still 
not able to exert a decisive impact on the competitive position. 
That is precisely where strategic research topics and topics in 
the sector of trailblazing and embryonic technologies differ 
from research and development that goes along with products or 
is on the point of being applied. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-17A>        Chart 2.2: Assessment of the materials research program's goal attainment </FIG>

  The many good technical and scientific results of the 
materials research program constitute the basis for ensuring 
strategic competitiveness provided their implementation and 
market dissemination are supported and accelerated in the 
future. The competitive position of user sectors will only be 
sustainably improved on the basis of those results if they are 
able to apply the previously developed basis for materials and 
technologies. 
  Moreover, it must be noted that competitiveness should be 
viewed only relative to the principal competitors. There is no 
question but that Japan and the U.S. are pursuing and officially 
supporting materials research just as intensively as is being 
done in Germany. Over the past years Japan has improved its 
competitive position among the leading industrial nations 
through concentrated and targeted research support. There is no 
question also but that the U.S. is investing extremely higher 
private and even official funding in materials research than the 
FRG and is thereby developing its competitive advantage over the 
longer haul. In this intensive competition the BMFT's materials 
research program is even now playing a critical role in 
maintaining the competitiveness of German industry. However, it 
must be remarked that optimization of the mechanisms for project 
selection and support would have further enhanced the 
forcefulness of the program. Conspicuously absent from project 
selection and support are: 


    -  a clear product and system linkage, enabling 
determination of whether a project is developing new 
technologies or significantly improving existing technologies 
  -  suitable assessment mechanisms in the form of portfolio 
management whereby, specifically in the case of limited 
resources, the most innovative projects can be filtered out and 
made accessible to targeted support 
  -  consistent and earliest possible inclusion of customer 
sectors 
in the innovation process and 
  -  Overlapping of different support programs in which materials 
research plays a part. 

    Based on our research, sufficient support funding has been 
provided under the materials research program, not counting SME 
support that could be only insufficiently included in the 
program. As indicated in chart 2.3, direct project support 
precipitated out combined research with particular emphasis as a 
pre-eminently suitable apparatus. Combined research has been 
supported intensively in the current program and it was often 
the pre-requisite for approval of project applications. More 
than 80 percent of support funding was spent on combined 
projects. 
  Not least, considering experiences in Japan and the U.S. 
(see 
chapter three), it is reasonable to continue the important role 
of combined research even in any future materials research 
support design. In this context, it strikes us as advisable to 
continue differentiating the existing apparatus as much as 
possible to match demand. The following sorts of combined 
support should be considered therein: 


    -  horizontal combinations of a single net product stage, 
wherein firms address basic topics, remote from competition, 
that might be too risky and costly for individual companies 
  -  vertical combinations of successive net product stages, 
wherein 
firms address topics with an applied orientation focused on user 
requirements profiles 
  -  combinations involving academic and industrial research, that 
overlap both of the other combined systems and in which know-how 
is transferred and next-generation researchers are sensitized 
early on to the interests of industry. 

    It must be emphasized, however, that the combined research 
instrument was not the right one for all types of projects, and 
that not all combined projects led to the desired results. 
  In terms of the assessment of the kinds of support applied 
under the materials research program, the results of which are 
summarized in chart 2.4, a rather diversified picture emerges. 
Thus, in the majority estimation of the survey group, support 
for basic research with an applied orientation and applied 
research was well satisfied. On the other hand, support for 
product and processing development was considered less well met. 
However, this was not an explicit component of the program's 
target list and also in connection with considerations of a 
political order and allowing for EC legislation cannot be 
realized without further qualification. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-19A>        Chart 2.3: Assessment of the importance of support principles relevant to materials research </FIG>

  The assessment of the initiation and support of cooperative 
activities and exchange of data particularly in regard to market 
and technology trends turns out to be average to good. In this 
context, it turns out that there is a basic openness among those 
surveyed vis-a-vis more strongly coordinated official activities 
than thus far and this should be taken into account in the 
context of future materials research support. 
  The organization of the program in terms of total support 
amounts, program duration and durations of specific projects is 
positively assessed (see chart 2.5). In the opinion of the 
experts, however, the program, in its current form, displays 
weaknesses because of its not completely satisfactory 
flexibility. Once again, at this juncture, it must be noted that 
the distribution of funding among the individual foci of the 
program and the design of the project selection process should 
be more heavily oriented toward the goal of an improved 
competitive position for German industry in order to achieve 
greater effectiveness. 
  Oversight of the participant by the BMFT and the project 
sponsor, PLR Juelich, in connection with implementation of the 
materials research program is assessed as satisfactory to good. 
Support counseling and total project management were carried out 
very efficiently by those in charge. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-20A>        Chart 2.4: Assessment of the importance of types of support relevant to materials research </FIG>

  On the other hand, from a strategic perspective, program 
management continued to be inadequate. In the current program 
this responsibility did not come under the purview of the PLR, 
but in the future it should really be included among the 
responsibilities of a project sponsor. 
  In terms of the design for future support activities, the 
analysis indicates that rapid, targeted and, as a result, 
efficient handling of a project can only be realized if an 
operative project management is installed. This is evident 
especially from the experiences arising from the in-depth 
analysis of individual projects (see section 2.3). This applies 
above all to organizationally complex combined projects. The 
experiences acquired during the current program make it 
reasonable, among other things, to lay down the following basic 
principles for project management: 


    -  clear project definition and unambiguous formulation of 
primary and secondary goals for entire and partial projects 
  -  clear organization of project development including an 
unambiguous prioritizing of duties and responsibilities 
  -  Establishment of project cycle organization defining the 
course 
of the project and reporting both internally and to the project 
sponsor 
  -  Establishment of efficient project control 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-21A>        Chart 2.5: Assessment of program organization and implementation in the materials research </FIG>

  Inefficiencies always occur in the project cycle whenever 
there is no control system to guarantee a planned approach in 
the realization of the objectives. Such inefficiencies place not 
only the realization of project goals at risk but also the 
realization of broad program goals. 
  Actually, the materials research program was largely able to 
meet the originally desired expectations from a scientific and 
technical point of view. The total spectrum of materials 
sciences in industrial and academic research was able to derive 
a great impetus from the program. In a technical and scientific 
context, a number of unquestionably significant results were 
realized. 
  Considering the all-encompassing nature of the materials 
research program's objectives, however, it was not possible for 
all goals to be realized. The commercial effects of those 
technical successes have yet to become fully manifest. The goal 
of strengthening the competitive position of German industry has 
so far been able to be realized only inadequately. Even the 
desired support for SMEs could not be realized for the reasons 
already described. As a result, the system for goals should be 
reviewed with an eye on future support. 
  It also became apparent several times in the course of the 
analysis that the efficiency of the entire program depends quite 
decidedly on the establishment of consistent management both 
operationally on the project level and strategically on the 
program level. 
<H5>  2.4 Experiences from the current program's projects </H5>
  In previous sections an analysis was made of the materials 
research program, allocation and application of funding as well 
as an assessment of the program's results. The analyses were 
performed in an aggregated form on the level of the entire 
program and for individual subgroups (categories of materials, 
types of financing recipients, etc.). Foremost in section 2.2 
was the assessment of the program's effectiveness in terms of 
the realization of the professed goals of the program. Only 
secondarily, however, was the question of the program's 
efficiency and its most important elements raised. 
  The foremost question when reviewing efficiency is whether 
the results that were achieved were able to be realized with an 
optimum cost/benefit ratio. Such efficiency analysis can only be 
meaningfully carried out if processes, cycles and crucial 
structures are analyzed on as greatly disaggregated a level as 
possible. In that connection, the proper unit of analysis turns 
out to be the individual project. Proceeding from the analysis 
of individual projects, conclusions must be made about the 
program's efficiency and its most important elements. 
  Assessment of program efficiency especially requires 
reference to the special characteristics of materials 
development and the regularity of the industrial dissemination 
process. The total complex of materials research is impregnated 
with special properties that any relevant research support has 
to explicitly allow for. Materials technology entails a 
technology having a pronounced broad-spectrum character, that 
impacts on very many industrial sectors but that encounters 
quite specific user requirements in each individual application. 
The R&amp;D process in materials research, therefore, requires an 
expressly applied thrust even in the earliest basic activities. 
Successful materials development, in particular, is 
distinguished by the fact that all relevant net product stages 
are considered from the outset when the R&amp;D process is being 
given its focus. 
  Since more than 550 projects were supported under the 
program 
over a period of more than a decade, we were obliged from the 
outset to forgo performing a systemic and representative 
analysis of all projects. In lieu of this the approach was to, 


    -  carry out a restricted number of representative case 
studies wherein decision-making cycles, substantive 
responsibilities and coordinating mechanisms were reviewed, as 
well as 
  -  undertake an assessment of the interviews with experts with a 
view towards assessing efficiency on the project and program 
levels. 
  Included especially in the case studies were projects 
03M2012 "ceramic materials for high-performance components for 
the manufacture of engines and turbines," 03M4008 "ultrathin 
polymer layers," 03M4036 "liquid crystal polymers for optical 
data technology," 03M0013 "new ODS superalloys" and 30M102131 
"carmat 2000." 
  The data thus assembled were supplemented by extensive 
analyses and project experiences enabling a more precise 
interpretation and assessment of the existing indicators. In 
this context, the following data, in particular, were addressed: 


    -  assessments of comparable materials research projects 
outside of the country (Japan, EC) 
  -  detailed knowledge of the management of R&amp;D projects in 
the 
context of our consultant activity, especially for large 
firms[.sup]4[/] 
  -  detailed knowledge of the management of combined 
technological 
projects and strategic alliances[.sup]5[/] as well as an 
  -  assessment of studies and project analyses on other 
comparable 
BMFT support programs. 

    There is no questioning the appropriateness of direct 
project 
support for the realization of desired program goals. Any 
efficient R&amp;D support in the materials research sector 
requires 
an apparatus that uses a targeted approach on the project level. 
By way of contrast, the focused support of combined projects 
under the BMFT's materials support program requires a somewhat 
diversified treatment. The basic appropriateness of this 
instrument for the realization of program goals is laudable. By 
incorporating the various partners from basic materials research 
through component production up to and including industrial 
application, access to support is open to all participants and 
in this way account is taken of the specific demands of 
materials research. 
  As the analysis of program implementation demonstrates, 
criteria for the organization and financing of projects were 
administratively implemented by the project sponsor in such a 
way that, for the most part, separate authorizations were 
awarded to the participating partners. The result was functional 
leeway given to them that considerably complicated integrated 
project management and simultaneously, in the case of the 
separate awarding of projects, making it impossible for any 
single industrial partner to shoulder the role of overall 
supervision with the necessary consistency. Therefore, in the 
case of the basic appropriateness of the combined research 
instrument, functional tightening of the implementation in the 
form of consistent project management needs to be pondered. 
  On the whole, our analysis of selective materials research 
projects and the assessment of the indicated supplemental data 
leads to the conclusion that there are generalizable success 
factors, whose realization or non-realization quite decidedly 
impact the efficiency of the projects. The most important 
success factors for materials research projects deserving 
emphasis are: 
  1. The project goals have to as precisely definable as 
possible and provide a clear guiding theme for project 
definition and structuring of responsibilities; the starting 
point should be a specific requirement, if possible, a clearly 
drawn requirements profile. 
  2. In establishing goals and project definition, an 
intelligent search and selection procedure must be employed, 
that is as open as possible, but is goal oriented and that 
includes all important know-how platforms. 
  3. Since goals and responsibilities may change over time, 
there has to be a flexible process for fine tuning the project 
whereby changed goals and requirements can be "brought under 
control" as quickly and trouble-free as possible and be 
coordinated among the participants. 
  4. There have to be clearly defined responsibilities and 
clusters of activities for each of which there are clearly 
defined accountabilities; among the participants there should be 
activities sectors that are as complementary as possible and as 
little competition as possible. 
  5. The number of participants should be restricted as 
closely 
as possible to those partners who are capable of making a 
noteworthy contribution to the success of the total project 
through definite competence, technological strengths and 
management experiences. 
  6. Cooperation should be regulated by a legal framework 
appropriate for the project that spells out, in particular, 
responsibilities, patent rights and liabilities. 
  7. Because of the complicated division of responsibility and 
the constantly changing interests and data of the participants, 
there needs to be a highly intensive exchange of data and 
viewpoints on the formal and also on the informal level. 
  8. In order to be able to appropriately address the 
complicated responsibilities of coordination and harmonization, 
there needs to be a central supervision of the project by a 
coordinator or overall administrator at the hub of the data flow 
and decision-making process. 
  9. The project should be buttressed by as efficient an 
apparatus as possible for project management and control. 

    Such success factors need to be weighted differently for the 
different groups of projects. In this context, the determining 
parameters are: 


    -  scope of the project and project cost 
  -  organization complexity of the project 
  -  the nature of the research and 
  -  the complexity of the research task. 

    Considering these parameters, under the current materials 
research program there is a broad spectrum of project 
manifestations, especially in terms of the combined structure 
and the resulting organizational complexity. In the final 
analysis, the extreme values of this analysis are, on the one 
side, simply structured projects having few subcontractors or 
combined partners and issues and having a basic nature with a 
pronounced applied orientation, and, on the other side, 
organizationally complex combined projects often involving more 
than five separate recipients of funding and their 
subcontractors, wherein, many-faceted, fundamental topics are 
addressed over periods exceeding five years. 
  By all appearances, the apparatus of direct project support 
works trouble-free for simply structured projects, especially if 
the recipients of the financing take on the responsibility for 
R&amp;D management and control themselves. There is no doubting 
the 
successfulness of direct project support even in the case of 
projects entailing high organizational complexity and wherein 
the participating recipients of funding are clustered on the 
principle of self-organization and see to the appropriate form 
of project administration themselves. 
  The apparatus for R&amp;D support, however, and the manner 
in 
which combined research has been practiced up until now do not 
always prove not be optimum if the point is to apply the above 
mentioned success factors to complex projects with many 
independent combined partners. Thus far, the BMFT and the 
project sponsorship have actively influenced the realization of 
the success factors in only a very limited way. 
  In this regard, it is beyond the scope of an assessment of 
the federal government's materials research program 
retrospectively to review project and program efficiency on the 
basis of success factors and assessment criteria that were not 
initially formulated in this fashion and that were originally 
excluded when the program was designed. The indicated success 
factors, however, do facilitate a forward-looking analysis and 
thus constitute an important basis for an ex-ante assessment of 
future support activities. To the extent that in the future 
materials research projects will increasingly display the 
features of more complex and organizationally demanding projects 
as previously described, in the crafting of future programs it 
will be essential explicitly to allow for the indicated success 
factors. Therefore, they will be addressed again in chapter five 
among the recommendations for a future support strategy. 
Footnotes 
  1. Paralleling the materials research program that 
represents 
the cross-section function for materials, so to speak, there are 
other projects receiving support under other programs on the 
federal level, whose tenor is relevant to materials research. 
Such, for instance, are operational materials in the 
micro-electronic and microsystems engineering sectors, in 
high-temperature superconduction as well as those falling under 
the support focus for surface and thin-film engineering. There 
is also considerable, substantive interaction with EC programs 
in the field of materials engineering and with others in the 
various federal states for specific materials research programs. 
  2. It is still not possible clearly to ascertain an 
improvement in German industry's competitiveness, because of the 
long time for the dissemination of materials developments (up to 
15 years) and structural impediments to dissemination; a more 
intense integration of SME was not unequivocally realized. 
  3. Subsidiaries of large firms 
  4. Subsidiaries of large firms 
  5. For the management of combined technological projects 
there is a focal point for research at the St. Gallen 
university's institute for technology management, headed by 
Prof. A. Gerybadze 
<H5>  3.International Comparison of Materials Research and Support </H5>
For It 
  In all highly industrialized nations, the internationally 
acknowledged major significance of materials research as a key 
and trailblazing technology, leads to considerable R&amp;D 
efforts 
and corresponding support activities. The international 
comparative analysis of materials research and support for it, 
therefore, can be summarized in the following results: 
  (1) The most important impetus for materials engineering 
comes from the large, multinational companies in the troika of 
countries. Two-thirds of the companies with the strongest 
turnover worldwide view materials research as a focus of their 
R&amp;D investments. They leave a lasting imprint on the 
international development and use of new materials (chapter 3.1). 
  (2) Any "benchmarking" for assessing the developmental 
prospects of materials technology in Germany has to focus on the 
chief rivals in Japan and the U.S. In coming years, Japanese 
companies will definitely continue to increase their R&amp;D 
efforts. In this context, they emphasize actions to augment 
efficiency and strategies for national and international 
cooperation. Japanese firms accept as partners only companies 
and institutes that have a very strong technological position 
themselves (chapter 3.1.2). 
  (3) Materials research will operate on a continuing high 
level in American industry in coming years. It outstrips 
Germany's R&amp;D efforts by several orders of magnitude. 
Concurrently, an enduring reorientation is observable in the 
U.S., that is definitely focused on improving international 
competitiveness through new materials. Cost and use aspects, in 
particular, are underscored through heavy emphasis on materials 
processing and systematizing (chapter 3.1.2). 
  (4) In the two leading countries, the concept of a system, 
that is, the development of a strong national materials research 
in the context of dynamic user industries on the national level, 
receives heavy emphasis. In Germany, by comparison, the 
innovation process remains too heavily centered on the producer 
and is too heavily oriented toward basic research. So far, only 
in a few sectors, even on an international scale, are there 
successful systems allying materials manufacturers and 
growth-oriented, innovative consumers (chapter 3.1.3). 
  (5) In Germany, therefore, development is adversely 
impacted, 
above all, by the inadequate presence of dynamic user groups. 
Only dynamic consumers are able to generate the critical mass 
effect for materials development as well as contribute to the 
establishment of competitive structures in the development and 
production sectors. So far, in Germany, even dissemination to 
secondary applications with high growth and net product 
potential has continued to be neglected. Intensive net product 
systems applications, follow-on developments in low-cost sectors 
and the pre- and post-situational development of the processing 
and service stages still continue to receive too little 
attention. 
  (6) Support plays a front-and-center role in a functional 
national system of producers, consumers and research institutes. 
All industrial countries support materials research to a very 
great extent and, accordingly, they prioritize quite similar 
development sectors (chapter 3.2). It is crucial to pursue a 
targeted, national strategy of differentiation. Successful 
differentiation is primarily realized by aligning national 
programs as effectively as possible with R&amp;D strategies and 
innovative activities of the most important actors from industry 
and research. Japan's support strategy is a model in this 
respect (chapter 3.2.1). Even in the U.S. there is an 
increasingly greater effort, through national consensus 
building, to develop the existing strengths of materials 
engineering (chapter 3.2.2). 
  (7) Adversely impacting materials research support in 
western 
Europe with generally high R&amp;D expenditures is national 
fragmentation and parallel development of national innovative 
systems. In many cases existing strengths are still marked by 
"national islands of competence." Since the early seventies, any 
number of European programs and initiatives have been introduced 
to link them together (chapter 3.2.3). They continue to be of 
great significance, but they cannot take the place of the 
development of national programs that have to focus on shoring 
up national strengths vis-a-vis the main competitors from Japan 
and the U.S. 
  (8) The development of basic research has to be integrated 
more intensely than hitherto in this parallelogram of 
international competitive forces. In Europe, Germany enjoys a 
very good reputation for basic research and materials oriented 
training and professionalization. These have to stand out even 
more strongly, however, in a global context in terms of 
long-term industrial convertibility (chapter 3.3). More 
intensive "fitness for use" criteria have to be adduced as the 
quality standard for research and development. Effective 
transfer between basic research and industrial application 
occurs in too few sectors of German materials research. This 
requires efforts by all participants and new forms of 
cooperation as well as new forms of research support, 
organization and financing (see especially chapter 5 on this). 
<H5>  3.1 Industrial foci of materials research: Japan, U.S. and </H5>
Germany compared 
  Analysis of industrial materials research in Japan, the U.S. 
and Germany demonstrates that companies with the greatest 
turnover attach high to very high importance to materials 
research. The summary (see table 3.1) makes it clear that 33 of 
the 50 companies with the most turnover around the world see a 
focal point in materials research. Those companies lay out 
considerable funding for such R&amp;D sectors, above all, 
Japanese 
companies, among whom, in many cases, there is a discernible 
tendency to expand their activities. 
  Comparing the R&amp;D fields of the most important 
companies in 
the three indicated countries, one detects an extensive 
prioritizing of similar topical areas that frequently even 
coincide with official support concepts. The most important 
R&amp;D 
fields that emerge are: 
  - materials-oriented topics, for example, ceramics, polymers 
and metals and metal alloys sectors 
  - topics with an applied and systems linkage, for example, 
optoelectronic systems, electronic components and biocompatible 
products. 
  Naturally, the individual, specific R&amp;D plans and 
projects of 
the analyzed firms are focused, respectively, on strategic 
corporate goals and elude comparative analysis on higher levels 
of aggregation. On the whole, however, our research turned up a 
clear tendency to create cooperative research activities and 
combinations for the purpose of economizing on resources and 
increasing efficiency. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-26A>        Table 3.1: The 50 companies with the highest turnover worldwide and the importance of materials </FIG>

  Such combinations extend, respectively, to partners of 
identical or prior or later net product stages. Increasingly, 
cooperative activities entail an international focus and may 
include renowned R&amp;D institutes from the academic research 
sector. For systems development itself, more and more 
inter-disciplinary approaches are being pursued within the firms. 
  All indications are that the transfer of the results 
realized 
in cooperative R&amp;D activities always succeed relatively 
trouble-free if a distinct pull effect comes from 
application-oriented partners of the combination. In this 
connection it turns out that it is precisely the most important 
applied sectors in Germany, for example, the automobile industry 
or machine building, that are hardly dynamic in the use of 
high-performance materials. In any fresh support design for 
materials research this state of affairs should be counteracted. 
<H5>  3.1.1 Materials research activities of Japanese firms </H5>
  Large Japanese firms, whose focal activities are in the 
electronics/data engineering, vehicle manufacturing and chemical 
sectors, attach high to very high importance to high-performance 
materials and their processing technologies (see table 3.2). 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-27A>        Table 3.2: The 25 Japanese companies with the highest turnover and the importance of </FIG>

  Those firms' R&amp;D outlays for high-performance materials 
are 
considerable, as may be expected, and they are significantly 
higher than official allocations for R&amp;D in that sector. 
  Our analysis shows that Japanese firms will increase their 
outlays for R&amp;D, including materials research, beyond the 
level 
attained thus far. Some companies in the materials sector have 
set themselves the goal of investing up to 10 percent of their 
turnover proceeds in R&amp;D. Also observable are corporate 
activities targeting increased R&amp;D efficiency. These 
essentially 
include: 
  - intensification of joint projects involving industrial 
firms and research institutes 
  - intensification of project activity among industrial firms 
from different sectors 
  - Support for Japanese industrial researchers residing 
abroad 
at leading research institutes around the world that apply 
advanced methods and technologies. 
  Paralleling this expansion of R&amp;D allocations and the 
pursuit 
of new forms of R&amp;D management is an extremely intensive 
search 
for new and promising areas for success to be eyed for strategic 
product and market developments. 
  In a poll of leading Japanese chemical firms, the following 
sectors were mentioned as the most important fields for R&amp;D 
targets. According to that survey, the large chemical firms 
prioritize R&amp;D fields from various sectors of materials 
research. For the surveyed firms, of special importance as 
fields for materials research are the sectors, in particular, of 
electronic materials including optoelectronics (26 percent), 
high-performance materials (18 percent), the development of new 
composite materials (three percent) and polymers having 
exceptional properties (two percent). 
  Within the indicated R&amp;D fields, activities were 
concentrated 
on the following groups of materials: 


    -  Development of high-performance ceramics 
  The focus for development of high-performance ceramics is on 
materials like Al[.sup]2[/]O[.sup]3[/], SiO[.sup]2[/], 
BaTiO[.sup]3[/] and ferrites, for oxide ceramics, and for 
non-oxide ceramics, on compounds like SiC, WC, 
SI[.sup]3[/]N[.sup]4[/], AIN, BN. 
%High-performance polymers (specialty polymers) 
  According to the survey these are taken to mean all polymers 
that are resistant to temperatures exceeding 260 degrees C and 
simultaneously are of high strength. Of special interest in this 
connection are the LCP's, PI, PPS, PES, PEEK, and PAR. Under 
development are thermoplasts resistant to temperatures exceeding 
300 degrees C, such as, for instance, special modification of 
PEEK, PAEK, and PKS. 
%Composites 
  Japanese industry's R&amp;D activities in the composites 
sector 
are concentrated on composite materials having a polymer matrix. 
In the past, the R&amp;D focus here was on the development of 
high 
performance reinforcing materials (glass fibers, carbon fibers, 
other). In the future, polymers, that is, thermoplasts and 
duroplasts and their compounding with fibers will also be at the 
center of Japan's R&amp;D activities. Composites having a 
metallic 
or ceramic matrix are of little interest there. 



<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-29A>          Chart 3.1: Selective research activities by Japanese firms in the high-performance materials </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-30A>          Chart 3.2: Selective research activities by Japanese firms in the electronic materials </FIG>

  Chart 3.1 displays, as examples, some selective R&amp;D 
activities by Japanese chemical firms with their focuses in 
various materials sectors. 
  The focus of Japan's industrial research in the field of 
electronic materials is in the fields of: 


    -  Semiconductor materials 
  R&amp;D activities here are concentrated on GaAs, GaP and 
InP 
materials. The target of the research activities is the use of 
such materials in electronics. 
%Printed circuit board [PCB] materials 
%Recording and storage materials 
  In these sectors the foci are on materials for magnetic 
tapes, magnetic and optical disks, especially optical disks that 
can be over-written 
%Materials for optoelectronics 
  The development focus here is on optical and 
energy-exchanging materials 


      Chart 3.2 presents a survey of the focuses of five selective 
Japanese firms in the electronic materials sector. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-31A>        Chart 3.3: Selective cooperative activities by Japanese firms in the materials technologies </FIG>

  In materials research, the surveyed companies in the 
chemical 
and electronic sectors implement both in-house R&amp;D 
strategies as 
well as R&amp;D combinations on the national level that 
supplement 
those and that encompass academic research plus the various 
stages of the net product chain. Supplementing those, 
cooperative R&amp;D activities were sought with foreign firms in 
certain fields. Chart 3.3 presents an analysis of selective 
international cooperative activities by Japanese firms in 
high-performance materials and processing technologies in terms 
of international joint ventures and technology imports and 
exports. 
  The analysis of selective cooperative activities in 
materials 
research, just like the findings from our interviews, reinforces 
the impression that Japanese companies, especially in the 
chemical and electronic sectors, welcome as partners only 
companies and institutes that have a good or very good 
technology position or that contribute specific know-how. This 
cooperative strategy is particularly evident in polymers and 
electronic materials. 
<H5>  3.1.2 Materials research activities of American firms </H5>
  For practically all sectors of the American economy, 
materials research holds high and often even strategic 
significance. Hence numerous firms in materials manufacturing as 
well as in materials using industries conduct R&amp;D activities 
in 
the materials technologies sector. The focus of R&amp;D efforts 
that 
are aimed especially at the development and application of high 
performance materials, devolves upon chemical firms and some 
large companies in the aerospace, electronics and automobile 
industry sectors. Table 3.3 displays an assessment of the 
importance of materials research for American firms. Except for 
petroleum industry firms, materials research commands high to 
very high priority for the largest American companies. 
  In upcoming years, materials research activities in American 
industry will be marked by the following developments: 


    -  R&amp;D planning in the materials research sector in the 
future is likely to have a stronger interdisciplinary focus. It 
is especially likely that closer cooperation between scientists 
and engineers will be sought. 
  -  Materials research efficiency is likely to be augmented 
through 
a more intensive cooperation among firms and institutes. 
  -  In addition to the synthesizing of materials, processing of 
materials and designing of systems will also be focal points of 
future materials research projects. 
  -  Targeted American products are likely to be improved through 
materials research in order to be more competitive on world 
markets. 

    This change in the focus and nature of the implementation of 
R&amp;D planning is deliberately aimed at significantly 
strengthening the competitive position of U.S. companies 
vis-a-vis Japanese suppliers. Mastery of new materials 
technologies, a stronger product and applied orientation and 
management of combined projects that encompasses firms and 
sectors are viewed as the decisive starting point for realizing 
concrete results to increase competitiveness. 
  Within materials and processing technologies, U.S. firms are 
focusing on the following fields of materials research: 


    -  High-performance ceramics 
  -  High-performance polymers 
  -  High-performance composites 
  -  High-performance metals and alloys 
  -  Biocompatible materials 
  -  Electronic materials 
  -  Magnetic materials 
  -  Non-linear optical materials 
  -  Superconducting materials 
  -  Coating technology 
  -  Nano-crystal materials 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-33A>        Table 3.3: The 25 U.S. companies with the highest turnover and the importance of materials research </FIG>

  The analysis of research activities, using as an example 
some leading firms, demonstrates that they basically engage in R&amp;D 
activities in the fields of high-performance polymers, 
high-performance composites and high-performance ceramics. In 
the chemical industry at least, on the other hand, materials 
developments in the high-performance metals and alloys, 
electronic and magnetic materials are realized only selectively 
and often constitute the domains of highly specialized firms or 
are performed by the applied sectors. 
  The analysis of a few selective cooperative activities shows 
that, comparably to Japan, the surveyed companies welcomed only 
partners with demonstrated technology competence. Here too the 
resulting impression is that the firms primarily incorporate 
"low-tech" for cooperative activities and endeavor to obtain 
access to high technology they have not yet mastered via the 
respective alliances. 
<H5>  3.1.3 Materials research activities in German industry </H5>
  In Germany the most important platforms for materials 
research are the large firms from the chemical, vehicle 
manufacture, electrical engineering as well as steel and 
equipment manufacturing sectors that are active internationally 
(see table 3.4 on this). 
  Because of the diverse characteristics in the nature and 
implementation of materials research in the individual sectors, 
the materials research activities of German industry should be 
described on three levels. First come the materials research 
foci in the materials producing industries, meaning, in 
particular, the large firms in the chemical and metal producing 
industries. Next are the materials research foci in the 
materials using industries. Thirdly, the characteristics of the 
development and use of high-performance materials in SMEs from 
various sectors of the processing industry are examined. 
  It is basically the materials research activities in 
industry 
in the former federal states that constitute the focus of the 
following description. In the new federal states at present, 
materials research activities are fundamentally impacted by the 
comprehensive restructuring activities in industry. These have 
led to a complete overhaul of industrial research activities. 
Currently, the industrial research activities of the new federal 
states in the field of materials research appear highly 
fragmented. On the whole, however, the level has to be assessed 
as being far below materials research in West Germany. This is 
certainly attributable also to the equipment that is available. 
Only a few isolated materials research activities are presently 
up to the level of the former federal states. 
<H5>  3.1.3.1 Foci of materials research in sectors that </H5>
manufacture materials 
  German industry's materials research activities encompass 
all 
sectors. While the foci for the chemical or metals producing 
industries are concentrated on the first level of the net 
product chain, that is, basic materials and semi-finished 
products, the materials research activities in industries using 
the materials, for example, automobile industry, electrical 
engineering/electronics and machine building, are focused on the 
subsequent levels of the net product chain, namely, the 
production of components and systems. 
  This diversified focus of materials research activities has 
also impacted the allocation of financing by the BMFT's 
materials research program. In the MATFO program, basically 
focused on the development of new materials, the materials 
producing industries, logically, are the most heavily involved. 
Up to half of the program's time, for example, the chemical 
industry initiated projects having a volume of DM520 million or 
30 percent of the total budget, followed by metals production 
with DM194 million (=14 percent). In contrast to this, the 
participation by each of the applied sectors was distinctly 
lower, although in this context it needs to be noted that firms 
in this sector also take part in other support programs having 
topics of relevance to materials. 
  In the nineties, the research and development activities of 
chemical industry firms in the materials research sector will 
basically be determined by the following developments: 


    -  more intense focusing of materials research activities 
on the innovation requirements of growth-oriented, international 
markets 
  -  R&amp;D projects in the materials sector will be 
increasingly more 
intensively focused on opening up new markets having high net 
product 
  -  Materials research activities will be directed increasingly 
at 
advanced processing in addition to the synthesizing of materials 
  -  R&amp;D projects in the materials research sector will also 
be 
increasingly given an international and interdisciplinary 
organization 
  -  In the future, materials research in the field of functional 
materials will be more closely coupled with systems R&amp;D. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-35A>        Table 3.4: The 25 German companies with the highest turnover and the importance of materials </FIG>

  R&amp;D activities in the German chemical firm's high-performance 
materials sector primarily focus on the continuous development 
of core competencies and on the development of parent companies. 
Concurrently with this, the large chemical firms, however, are 
also pursuing fresh types of projects outside the sectors of 
their traditional businesses and competencies. These may be 
characterized as diversification projects or even as strategic 
R&amp;D fields. For chemical firms these especially include 
research 
activities in the high-performance ceramics sector, electronic 
materials, high-performance metals and alloys and polymer 
composites. 
  The following fields of research in structural materials and 
in functional materials are of special interest for Germany's 
chemical industry firms: For structural materials, R&amp;D is 
being 
carried out in the sectors of sterically and configuratively 
uniform polymers, high-temperature resistant polymers, 
hard-chain (liquid crystal) polymers, memory effect polymers, 
high-performance ceramic, memory effect ceramics and composites 
as well as in the sector of nano-crystal materials. 
  In the functional materials sector, R&amp;D activities are 
fundamentally concentrated in the following areas: materials 
with special electrical or magnetic properties (for instance, 
electrically conductive polymers, high-temperature 
superconductors), materials with special optical properties (for 
instance, beam wave guides, materials for photonics and 
optoelectronics), materials with special thermal properties (for 
instance, materials having high heat resistance), materials with 
special separation properties (for instance, gas-separation 
membranes, high-performance membranes for micro-, ultra- and 
nano-filtration), materials with biological properties (for 
instance, biocompatible materials, biosensors) plus high-order, 
functional, ultrathin layers (for instance, for the development 
of a "molecular electronics"). 
  In upcoming years, the R&amp;D efforts of firms in the metal 
producing industry will be greatly impacted by the following 
developments: 


    -  In the future, R&amp;D planning should be more heavily 
focused on products that enable the realization of high net 
product. 
  -  R&amp;D activities should greatly contribute towards the 
opening 
and development of new fields of business. 
  -  In the future, R&amp;D planning in the metal producing 
industry 
will be concentrated even more heavily on advanced processing 
technologies. 
  -  In the future, R&amp;D projects will be implemented on an 
international and interdisciplinary basis. 

    Within materials research, the R&amp;D activities of this 
sector 
will be concentrated, for example, on the following selective 
fields of research: 
  - Materials related topics 


    -  High-performance metals and alloys (research on the 
structure and bonding properties of metallic materials, metallic 
high-temperature materials, light metals and light-metal alloys, 
composites having a metallic matrix, superalloys and 
optimization of specialty steel properties) 
  -  High-performance ceramics 
  -  High-performance composites 

    - Production-oriented topics 


    -  Production of ultra-pure metal materials and alloys 
  -  Development of production processes approximating the final 
contours 
  -  Development of new coating and alloy techniques 
  -  Rapid rigidifying techniques 
  -  Powder metallurgical processes 
  -  Bonding techniques 
  -  Foundry technology 

    The R&amp;D foci of this industry that have been identified 
are 
clearly concentrated on the continuous improvement of existing 
core competencies and parent companies. Firms in this sector 
seek their materials research foci for the most part in the 
high-performance metals and alloys sector. It is worth noting, 
however, that many firms in the metal producing industry are 
active in the high-performance ceramics and high-performance 
composites sectors. The question arises, however, whether this 
involves a detectable R&amp;D project aimed at securing potential 
licensing rights for the company itself in the replacement 
materials sector or whether it actually represents an active 
pursuit of diversified businesses. 
<H5>  3.1.3.2 Foci of materials research in sectors that use </H5>
materials 
  Sectors that use materials may be divided into dynamic and 
less dynamic based on the usage of high-performance materials. 
Characteristic of dynamic sectors that represent the sources of 
impetus for materials research are that, as a rule, they are 
sectors with above-average growth potential in which, at the 
same time, the benefit from the use of high-performance 
materials is so great that, at least in an initial phase, very 
high prices may be paid for them and intensive R&amp;D activities 
can be financed. 
  Additionally, net product in those sectors is comparatively 
large and secondary effects benefiting high-performance 
materials also branch out into other sectors. 
  The combination of the characteristics of dynamic sectors is 
an exception. For good reason, therefore, the application of 
high-performance materials in early stages is concentrated in 
just a few applied sectors wherein a number of those 
characteristics are encountered simultaneously, for example, 
partial sectors of aerospace manufacturing, electronics, 
information engineering, medical engineering, etc. 
  Analysis of the pattern for the dissemination and 
application 
of high-performance materials in the leading industrial 
countries demonstrates that it has to be the responsibility of 
innovative firms in the applied sector to discover this type of 
potential in promising materials applications and together with 
user firms to search out the conditions for success in such 
markets. The innovation strategies of companies in Japan and in 
the U.S. are decidedly typified by this kind of approach. 
  Considering this type of innovation strategy, that primarily 
rests on the impetus of dynamic applied sectors, the sectors 
portfolio of German industry, so far at least, is 
disadvantageous and inadequately balanced. Important sources of 
impetus displaying simultaneously several of the features of 
dynamic sectors are missing on the national level or are only 
insufficiently developed. 
  In terms of the preceding definition there are few dynamic 
sector users of high-performance materials on the national 
level. Materials research activities in industries using 
materials in Germany essentially fall into the following sectors: 


    -  electrical engineering and electronics industry (in 
which dynamic segments of Germany's electronics are only poorly 
represented) 
  -  machine building and 
  -  the automobile industry. 

    On the applications side those sectors heavily impact the 
image of materials research in Germany although they only 
inadequately encompass the indicted features of dynamic sectors. 
Typically in this context, for the most part, we are not dealing 
with sectors with above-average growth. The net product share of 
high-performance materials is comparatively slight there and 
nearly all of those applied sectors in Germany are price 
sensitive which adversely impacts the receptivity for 
highly-developed new materials. Therefore in the FRG the 
situation is typified by the fact that the right "draft horse" 
is missing, that the primary dissemination of high-performance 
on the national level could be more greatly expedited and branch 
out in turn into other sectors from the enduring secondary 
effects. The non-existence of such a "draft horse" in turn has 
repercussions on the long-term competitive position in the less 
dynamic sectors. 
  Typical of R&amp;D activities in the nineties in all sectors 
using materials -- in dynamic and less dynamic sectors alike -- 
will be the following developments: 


    -  Many market segments are impacted by rising costs for 
R&amp;D precisely for materials oriented developments. 
  -  R&amp;D projects will increasingly have to take on an 
international 
and interdisciplinary shape and organization. 
  -  Because of shorter cycles on the product and system levels, 
R&amp;D 
projects will have to be carried out effectively and efficiently. 
  -  R&amp;D projects will have to be implemented with closer 
market 
adherence. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-37A>        Chart 3.4: Selective materials technologies having great importance for developments in </FIG>

  While these developments are equally important for R&amp;D 
responsibilities and R&amp;D management in all applied sectors, 
the 
requirements specific to the sectors and the respectively 
relevant R&amp;D foci for each sector and each market segment 
have 
to be individually formulated. Chart 3.4 synoptically lists the 
most important development objectives for the individual 
sectors. If these sectors are to meet the resulting requirements 
in the future, materials technologies in the automobile, machine 
building and electrical engineering/electronics sectors will 
have to assume a key role. 
  The all-encompassing strategic and operational significance 
of materials and advanced processing technologies is recognized 
in many firms, but so far they have not been extensively 
integrated into the organization of the firm. Daimler-Benz and 
Siemens, for instance, are the few exceptions where the 
materials technology sector is represented at the highest level 
of the corporation and is also correspondingly supported. 
  A greater problem in upcoming years appears to be ensuring 
broader dissemination of high-performance materials into applied 
materials sectors that are not primarily influenced by a few 
large, internationally active firms. In numerous specialized 
branches of machine building, of the precision 
mechanical-optical industry, in the metal producing and 
processing sector and in automobile industry supplier activity, 
high-performance materials have to find intensified application 
in coming years to be able to meet future requirements of the 
specific sectors. In those sectors, however, the requisite 
economic and organizational bases for a broad dissemination are 
still only inadequately realized. 
<H5>  3.1.3.3 Materials research activities in [SME] </H5>
  The difficulties mentioned in the previous section for more 
intensive dissemination of high-performance materials into the 
applied materials sectors apply not only to large firms. In the 
SME group, however, that does indeed play a precursor role in 
the innovation process in other fields, the interest in the 
field of high-performance materials so far is rather restrained, 
with a few exceptions. 
  SMEs here are to be taken to mean all companies that have 
fewer than 1,000 employees and/or less than DM200 million in 
annual turnover. In the processing industries in the FRG that 
are especially important from an R&amp;D perspective, there are 
about 33,500 such companies, based on statistics[.sup]6[/]. 
Nearly 25,000 of those companies engage in R&amp;D, 20,000 of 
them 
on a regular basis and 5,000 irregularly. On average each SME 
invests DM615,000 in R&amp;D. There is no way to telling, 
however, 
how much of this amount is invested in materials research or in 
fields of research with a materials orientation. 
  What is typical of SME R&amp;D activities, however, is that 
they 
address R&amp;D topics that are very proximate to the market and 
that have to guarantee an adequate return on the amounts 
invested in R&amp;D within one to two years. SMEs have less 
interest 
in strategic research projects that are further removed from the 
market since such projects would be a financial strain for them. 
  If the objectives of SMEs are analyzed, two groups of SME 
companies can essentially be distinguished, each of which have 
different foci in the materials research and materials 
application sectors. In this context, the distinction is between 
SMEs as suppliers and SMEs as niche suppliers. 


    -  The first group, SME as suppliers for large companies, 
constitutes an important element of the medium-sized economy. 
Because of their close supplier ties to large firms they are, on 
the one side, frequently directly involved in the development of 
innovative products and therefore also in the materials research 
activities of the large firms. On the other side, because of the 
international competition, large companies depend on the 
medium-sized supplier industry that is close to the customer and 
can act with flexibility, to come up with preliminary innovative 
activities that they initiate, however, only through their own 
R&amp;D activities and are able to bring to serial readiness in 
cooperation with the large firms. 
  -  The second group, SME as niche suppliers, represent another 
form of medium-sized companies, that are predestined, because of 
their customer proximity and flexibility, to stringently sort 
out newly developed technologies and thereby get them 
disseminated into different applied sectors and specialty 
markets. Typically, such medium-sized firms are consistently 
active in market niches that hold no interest for large firms, 
when considering their international volumes. For specialized 
SME, however, they afford interesting market volumes and 
attractive yields. 

    It follows from these remarks that materials research will 
grow in importance during the nineties both for SMEs active as 
suppliers and for companies active as niche suppliers. Up until 
now this potential has still been tapped much too little and 
motivated too little even by the current MATFO program. Future 
support designs even on the federal level should have an 
appropriate toolkit in readiness to intensify the role of SMEs 
as suppliers for heavy industry even in high-tech areas and more 
closely incorporate them in the process of disseminating 
high-performance materials. 
<H5>  3.2 International comparison of materials research support </H5>
  All industrial countries that were included in the analysis 
are very intensively pursuing high-performance materials and 
their processing technologies and providing considerable support 
to materials research in their countries. The reason for this is 
the fact that high-performance materials and their technologies 
are considered critical for the future competitiveness of 
industry and therefore they will have sizable impact on the 
future economic strengths of the respective economies. 
  There is a limited repertoire of support instruments 
available for official support of promising fields of 
technology. All countries employ them in some form or other. To 
what extent any support instrument is used, of course, depends 
directly on the support principles and strategies that the 
respective countries are pursuing. 
  Basically, the following support policy instruments may be 
used by the government for officially supporting and assisting 
R&amp;D: 
  1. regulatory measures to improve the general conditions 
(legislation, authorization and standardization, capital market 
regulations, patent legislation, etc.) 
  2. support of infrastructure services (support of 
information 
and documentation facilities, patent assessment centers, 
technology transfer centers, etc.) 
  3. direct project-related support (project support via 
allocations and applications) 
  4. direct institutional support (support of joint and 
contract research via institutions set up for that purpose) 
  5. indirect support (e.g., tax exemption or advantages). 
  All of the above-mentioned five instruments are employed by 
the respective governments in the materials research sector. In 
this connection, improvement of general conditions is a support 
policy instrument that facilitates and encourages the innovation 
process. Although that instrument has a rather decisive effect 
on the innovation process, it is often not in a specific, 
controllable manner. 
  The remaining four types of support policy instruments are 
used in all the respective countries in the sector of materials 
research. There are no significant differences among the 
individual countries regarding the choice of instruments. Nor is 
it possible to derive from them any different results for 
national development strategies. 
  Even the amount of materials research support in the 
individual countries is not the unqualified decisive factor that 
determines the impact on and clarifies national development 
strategy. On the whole, to be sure, the U.S. supports materials 
research to a considerably greater extent than the countries of 
western Europe or Japan. In the U.S. a much larger share of it 
is allocated to military developments having perceptible effects 
on the civilian technology sector. In any event, however, 
private R&amp;D investments prevail in the case of materials 
developments aimed at civilian markets and official support 
programs only exercise a partial added effect. When comparing 
materials research programs internationally, therefore, it is 
not so much the national programs' support volume that is 
decisive, it is, much rather, the way in which official support 
activities coincide with the R&amp;D investments and innovation 
activities of private actors. Comparatively small national 
support programs are occasionally able therewith to produce 
quite extensive leverage. 
  Even a comparison of the research topics supported in the 
individual countries discloses no significant differences and 
they cannot be adduced to explain the different developments in 
the individual countries. During the eighties, all countries, 
more or less, supported the same fields of technology considered 
attractive. Information trips, expert staffs, publications and 
recourse to international consultants sped the dissemination of 
know-how about promising fields and categories of materials. 
Meanwhile, more or less comparable foci for the selection of 
certain categories of materials and R&amp;D topics were 
established 
in all major industrial countries. Against this backdrop, a 
decisive approach to national differentiation is generated only 
through a careful analysis of the way in which the specific 
R&amp;D 
topics in individual countries are incorporated into effective 
national development strategies and how they succeed in 
developing functional, stable networks among research 
facilities, universities, producers and consumers. In this 
context, the variously delineated infrastructure in each country 
particularly impacts national R&amp;D strategies. 
  Therefore, a detailed analysis of the different 
organizational parameters for research and technology policy is 
crucial to understanding the support strategies in the 
individual countries. The amount of the support and the 
selection of research topics is not so decisive, rather it is 
the "approach" to designing and implementing the research and 
its incorporation into strategies and activities of the most 
important participating groups on the national level. To 
understand this "approach" it is important accurately to analyze 
the process cycles and decision-making structures that impact 
materials research support and the efficiency of individual 
projects in the individual countries. 
  Important organizational parameters that typify precisely 
the 
"approach" to research and technology policy in the various 
countries are especially: 
  1. What industries or participating groups are the key 
initiators and active platforms for projects and national 
programs? 
  2. How are goals determined and projects defined and 
coordinated among government, research and industry participants? 
  3. Is there a coherent national industrial policy based on a 
consensus into which the various materials research support 
activities are incorporated? 
  4. To what extent is an integrative policy for coordinating 
different support policy instruments being pursued? 
  5. Does the support policy have an applied orientation and 
is 
it coupled with important national industrial sectors or does it 
rather have a basic orientation? 
  6. Is there targeted focusing on a few priority development 
sectors and projects and which of them are the most important? 
  7. How targeted is the impact of government on management 
and 
decision-making for individual projects and programs? How are 
effective and efficient project and program management 
implemented? 
  On the basis of the indicated questions it is possible to 
distinguish specific basic national patterns. Put simply, 
Japan's industrial R&amp;D policy can be described as an extreme 
type. It can be described by the following features and is 
typified by: 
  1. impetuses from large firms and from the government, 
especially in the information engineering and chemical sectors 
that effectively cooperate on specific projects with government 
offices and competitors 
  2. an interactive process for coordinating information and 
an 
efficient mechanism for goal determination and project definition 
  3. the existence of a coherent national industrial policy 
  4. pursuit of a highly integrative policy 
  5. a predominantly application oriented technology policy 
  6. targeted focusing on strongly growing markets in the 
information engineering sector and in the transportation sector 
  7. comparatively strong influence by government authorities 
on projects and programs. 
  At the other end of the spectrum in past years has been 
Great 
Britain whose research and technology policy has been marked by 
the following features: 
  1. frequently only isolated impetuses from a few large firms 
and researcher groups adhering to no uniform national outlook 
  2. a correspondingly less coherent process for goal 
determination and project definition 
  3. deliberate rejection of a national industrial policy 
  4. implementation of R&amp;D support programs alongside a 
comparatively high number at ministries 
  5. a research and technology policy with a highly basic 
orientation 
  6. the fact that, even though focusing occurred, it was only 
slightly influenced by government decision makers. 
  The other countries that were analyzed fall somewhere 
between 
the Japanese and the British patterns. France and Sweden tend 
more towards the pattern of an active, targeted support and 
industrial policy, while the U.S. and Germany presently are 
trending instead towards a decentralized, less targeted and 
basically oriented pattern of support and industrial policy. 
  Although there are significant differences in the 
organizational features and basic patterns of national support 
strategies, there seems to be a stronger thrust in the direction 
of a more active, targeted and application-oriented support 
policy during the nineties. Budgetary constraints in all 
countries, the increasing cost of new technologies and the 
systems nature of import new technologies increasingly emphasize 
the need for pursuing a more intensely integrative, active and 
targeted technology policy. 
  This assessment applies particularly to future materials 
research and technology support. Some countries appear to be 
especially well prepared for this challenge while others are 
having a hard time reacting to the fresh challenges of 
technology policy. 
<H5>  3.2.1 Materials research support in Japan </H5>
  New technologies and their targeted development and support 
play quite a central part in the modernization and restructuring 
of Japan's economy. Development of the nation's R&amp;D system is 
occurring with a dynamism and commitment unlike in any other 
industrialized country. Targeted support of new technologies by 
the Japanese government plays quite a central role, but it is 
occasionally overestimated abroad and its implementation is 
portrayed distortedly. Official support programs have to be 
constantly viewed in terms of their interaction with R&amp;D 
strategies of Japanese firms, the lead actors in the process of 
change. Official R&amp;D support activities are particularly 
effective when they are entirely targeted and coordinated with 
the R&amp;D strategies of the most important companies, providing 
advantages for them and jointly deriving advantages from them. 
But even in Japan some programs have been colossal flops. These 
most frequently occur when official institutions with their 
limited resources (finances, data) try to "push through" 
technologies and projects contrary to the interests of the chief 
protagonists. 
  National R&amp;D outlays (official and private outlays) in 
1990 
reached a level of Yen13,078 billion (converted, nearly DM163 
billion)[.sup]7[/]. The lion's share of that was privately 
financed R&amp;D; a comparatively smaller amount, declining over 
time, is official R&amp;D allocations. In some fields of 
technology, 
however, rather considerable leverage was realized with that 
comparatively reduced amount. That leverage can be safeguarded 
only by: 


    -  making very targeted use of the limited resources 
  -  more heavily emphasizing market and applied orientation than 
support for basic research 
  -  investing a much higher share of gross social product [GSP] 
than in other industrial countries for non-military R&amp;D 
  -  official and private strategies that are inter-coordinated 
considerably more intensively than in other countries and 
  -  the government's administration having polished and proven 
instruments for project management at its disposal. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-41A>        Chart 3.5: R&amp;D allocations of selective Japanese ministries </FIG>

  Official outlays for R&amp;D in 1990 were about Yen1,921 
billion 
(nearly DM24 billion) and will probably rise to Yen2,300 (nearly 
DM29 billion) in 1992 (see chart 3.5)[.sup]8[/]. The lion's 
share of those outlays, or, 49 percent, went to the national 
education ministry (Monbusho; DM11.2 billion in 1991) followed 
by the Science and Technology Agency (STA; DM6.5 billion = 27 
percent) and the Ministry of International Trade and Industry 
(MITI; DM3.2 billion = 13 percent). 
  Those three institutions are also the principal support 
platforms for materials research in Japan with the following 
"division of labor" resulting there from: 


    -  Monbusho finances and coordinates research and training 
in Japanese universities. 
  -  STA supports general basic research programs as well as basic 
research with an applied orientation and is the financier and 
sponsor of important national research institutes. 
  -  MITI finances and coordinates decisive programs for basic 
research having an applied orientation and research having an 
applied orientation for select broad-spectrum technologies. 
  Chart 3.6 illustrates the collaboration of those three 
institutions. It must be emphasized that none of those three 
institutions explicitly engages in a materials research program, 
as, for instance, is the case for the BMFT's MATFO program. 
Materials research activities are spread over a large number of 
projects. But these are not lumped together under the generic 
term of "materials research." Instead, they are directed at the 
quite specific missions and platform programs of each agency or 
each ministry. Among other things, this leads to the positive 
result that projects are aimed at broad national goals or quite 
specific missions and this facilitates participants' 
identification with program goals. It keeps individual interest 
groups from too lopsidedly sticking with certain scientific or 
technical topics. Technology is always viewed as a means to an 
end and in Japan goals are mostly defined in an economic and 
commercial sense. 
  In Japan, materials research that is supported in various 
initiatives, enjoys top political priority as a "means to an 
end." Materials science and technology are viewed as the key to 
technological innovations in numerous branches of industry and 
in important sectors of public life. For the twenty-first 
century, broad national objectives (energy, environment, 
resources, health, etc.) make it essential to master the new 
materials technologies that even now have to be developed and 
supported in the laboratories. 
  As early as 1987, an official R&amp;D project was created 
for 
materials science and technology, based on the recommendations 
of the Council for Science and Technology, under the leadership 
of the prime minister. Such long-term planning and vision will 
constitute an important basis for the harmonization and 
coordination of the most critical materials research projects in 
the nineties. 
  Crucial to the coordination of the diverse materials 
research 
projects that are spread over a number of ministries and 
agencies, is a multi-layered and data-intensive process of 
creating national objectives and visions. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-42A>        Chart 3.6: Schematic depiction of the structural organization for materials research support in </FIG>

  Chart 3.7 illustrates this process. On the left side, broad 
national objectives are formulated and coordinated while also 
taking into consideration the inclusion of individual ministries 
and administrative units on the project level (see right side). 
What is decisive there, however, is that no planning is involved 
that "fixes in concrete" guidelines that once established may 
later become impracticable and end up losing credibility any 
longer with the participants. Instead, a rolling project is 
involved with the process of goal determination and review 
foremost. Forums, councils and project coordinators are convened 
on a number of levels where the principal know-how platforms and 
decision makers introduce and distill strategic knowledge and 
mutually coordinate project ideas. In this sense, the decision 
making process in Japan is not basically different from the 
cycle in the respective programs in the U.S. and in Europe 
(e.g., for COST or EUREKA). What is typically Japanese, however, 
is the consistency with which the process is pursued. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-43A>        Chart 3.7: Basic ministerial activities for the realization of strategic goals in Japan's </FIG>

  This process of coordination involving broad national 
objectives and the goals of the participants in the projects is 
most consistently implemented by MITI and the administrative 
units under its purview (AIST, NEDO). Materials research 
projects are implemented under three major "missions" or 
programs: 


    -  the "Expansion of New Frontiers for Industry and 
Technology" program 
  -  the "Promotion of Technology Development for Energy Security" 
program and 
  -  the "Promotion of International Cooperation" program. 

    MITI annually invests close to Yen100 billion (nearly DM1.25 
billion, see table 3.5) under those three programs. Matching 
these investments by MITI are sizable supplemental R&amp;D 
allocations by Japanese businesses that invest several orders of 
magnitude more on the part of the private sector in projects 
than Japan's ministry of industry itself. It still needs to be 
emphasized that only a limited, albeit not inconsiderable part, 
goes for materials research in the stricter sense of the term. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-44A>        Table 3.5: Most important MITI programs having greater importance for materials </FIG>

  Table 3.6 contains an itemized list of the most important 
materials research projects under those MITI programs. The 
current projects under the JISEDAI program include: 


    -  High-Performance Ceramics 
  -  High-Performance Materials for Severe Environments 
  -  Photoactive Materials 
  -  Non-Linear Photonic Materials 
  -  Silicon-Based Polymers. 
  At present, under the so-called Large-Scale-Projects and 
under the Moonlight-Projects, the following specific materials 
research projects are being pursued: 


    -  Advanced Material Processing and Machining System 
  -  Advanced Chemical Processing Technology 
  -  Superconducting Technology for Electric Power Apparatus 
  -  Ceramic Gas Turbine Project. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-45A>        Table 3.6: Specific MITI materials research projects </FIG>

  In 1991, with a budget of Yen523 billion (nearly DM6.5 
billion), the Science and Technology Agency [STA], is supporting 
national research centers and programs of a basic research 
nature. Materials research is one of seven select focal sectors 
of the STA and enjoys a correspondingly high priority. The STA 
has created a Council for Aeronautics, Electronics and Advanced 
Technologies that has formulated the following focal fields in 
the materials research sector: research on materials in an 
extreme environment, creation of basically new materials using 
new materials design principles, research in the sector of 
mensuration and quality assurance for new materials, optical 
materials and "smart" materials. The STA is financing and 
coordinating such activities at the National Research Institute 
of Metals [NRIM] and at the National Institute for Research in 
Inorganic Materials [NIRIM]. The following activities enjoy 
prominence at the NRIM: 


    -  new materials using rare metals 
  -  inter-metallic composites having improved resistance in 
heat/water 
  -  new methods of materials design on the basis of new theories 
of 
atomic and molecular structures 
  -  superconducting materials 
  -  "smart" materials. 
  At the NIRIM the following materials research projects are 
being intensively addressed: 


    -  inorganic materials with multiple attributes 
  -  new materials with electrical, magnetic and optical 
properties 
  -  synthetic diamonds, oxidized glassware (especially for use as 
electronic and optical materials) 
  -  ultra-high pressure/temperature materials. 
  Since 1981, the STA has had a Special Coordination Fund for 
Promoting Science and Technology. In 1991, the total budget came 
to Yen10.5 billion (DM131 million). Part of that budget goes for 
materials research projects that are summarized in table 3.7. 
The STA is financing a new program aimed at supporting basic 
research internationally on a cutting-edge level. Under that 
program, Exploratory Research for Advanced Technology [ERATO], 
altogether 17 research topics are being addressed currently at 
newly established research centers. The following of its 
projects can be included in the materials research sector: 


    -  the KIMURA metamelt project 
  -  the KUNITAKE molecular architecture project 
  -  the INABA biophoton project 
  -  the YOSHIDA nano-mechanism project 
  -  the KURODA solid surface project 
  -  the MASUMOTO amorphous and intercalation compounds project 
  -  the OGATA fine polymer project 
  -  the NISHIZAWA perfect crystal project, and 
  -  the YOSHIMURA Electron Materials project. 
  In 1988, STA also launched the Multicore Research Project on 
Superconductivity, with the participation of scientists from the 
NRIM, RIKEN, the national space agency [NASDA], the Japan Atomic 
Energy Research Institute [JAERI], the foundation for Materials 
Science and Technology [MST] and the Research Development 
Corporation of Japan [JRDC]. Foremost in this context are 
activities on the theoretical basis, on the characterization of 
superconducting materials, on process engineering, and on 
technology transfer. 
  Japan's ministry of education [MONBUSHO], with a Yen940 
billion (nearly DM25 billion in 1991) budget, finances 
university research and training. The lion's share of that 
funding goes to maintain the nation's infrastructure. But 
MONBUSHO also engages in rather targeted activities that can be 
directly attributable to the improvement of Japan's materials 
research. These activities included, among others: 


    -  refocusing of the activities of the institute for 
materials research at Tohoku university 
  -  re-establishment of a center for ceramics research at the 
Tokyo 
Institute of Technology 
  -  support for materials researchers under the Scientific 
Research 
Grants. 
  To support select research projects in priority sectors, 
MONBUSHO is spending a total of Yen55.8 billion (DM698 million 
in 1990) to finance the Grants in Aid for Scientific Research. A 
not inconsiderable amount even if this funding goes for 
materials research projects. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-47A>        Table 3.7: Materials research projects under the STA's "Special Coordination Fund for </FIG>

<H5>  3.2.2 Materials research support in the U.S. </H5>
  In 1991 the Council of Competitiveness determined upon five 
groups of key technologies that will heavily impact the future 
competitiveness of America's industry and national security. One 
of those groups includes key technologies in the materials and 
processing technologies sector. On the basis of that study, the 
U.S. administration allocated high priority to materials 
research in the U.S. The U.S. administration launched the 
"Advanced Materials and Processing Program [AMPP]" program 
initiative to give a more targeted focus to materials research 
activities that had been established and implemented in 
uncoordinated fashion in the past inside the individual 
departments and agencies. For the first time this program 
endeavors centrally to coordinate the materials research 
activities and priorities spread out over a number of 
departments and agencies in the U.S. But nothing has changed as 
a result of the AMPP in the basic approach in U.S. materials 
research. It continues to be able to be characterized by the 
following points: 


    -  The U.S. administration determines broad, future 
national goals (e.g., increase in living standards, national 
security, safeguarding of industrial output and economic growth, 
etc.). 
  -  Departments and agencies are assigned missions to realize 
those 
national goals. 
  -  Departments' and agencies' materials research issues are 
oriented exclusively towards their assigned missions. 
  -  For the most part, the materials research topics are 
implemented in the laboratories of the departments and agencies. 
But there is also an awarding out of projects to universities 
and industry. 
  -  Industry may not apply for financing from government sources 
to 
carry out materials research projects reflecting their own 
concepts. 
  -  In the U.S., official materials research support is 
characterized by a consistent top-down process terminating in 
the departments. Bottom-up processes, originating with U.S. 
industry, are not possible. 
  This centralized coordination concept of the AMPP endeavors 
to increase the effectiveness of U.S. materials research while 
simultaneously reducing duplication in developments. In the U.S. 
even the organizational structure and cycle for materials 
research support has changed because of the centralized 
coordination. Chart 3.8 presents the present organizational 
structure including the decision-making groups in the materials 
research sector. 
  The initiative for designing a new "Advanced Materials and 
Processing Program" originated with the U.S. administration that 
is advised on materials research issues by the National Critical 
Material Council [NCMC], the President's Council of Advisors on 
Science and Technology [PCAST] and the Federal Coordinating 
Council for Science and Technology [FCCSET]. Also included on 
issues of research support are the Office of Management and 
Budget [OMB] and the Office of Science and Technology Policy 
[OSTP]. As a result, the following responsibilities attach to 
the individual advisory groups: 


    -  NCMC: the NCMC concerns itself with all sorts of 
materials issues. Official support for materials research 
constitutes a special focus 
  -  PCAST: the PCAST serves as a platform for an ongoing 
clarification of R&amp;D concepts from the private sector and 
academia 
  -  FCCSET: the prime responsibility of the FCCSET is R&amp;D 
coordination in the U.S. It includes all federal authorities 
conducting, supporting or representing R&amp;D 
  -  OMB: the OMB is responsible for all budget issues in the 
materials research support sector 
  -  OSTP: the OSTP's most important responsibility is to assemble 
the R&amp;D activities of the different federal authorities into 
supra-jurisdictional programs. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-49A>        Chart 3.8: Schematic depiction of the structural organization for materials research support in </FIG>

  Under the overall leadership of the OSTP, the advisory 
groups 
indicated above elaborated a basic supra-jurisdictional concept 
for future materials research in the U.S. For a detailed 
organization, the departments (DOC, DOD, DOE, DOI, DOT, DOA and 
HHS) and the agencies (NSF, NASA and EPA) were tasked with 
preparing project proposals for materials research and to submit 
them to an Inter-Agency-Committee for evaluation. On the basis 
of previously established assessment and selection criteria, the 
Inter-Agency-Committee selected some of the proposed projects 
that were technically critical and met the objectives for future 
materials research. The resulting program proposal [AMPP] was 
submitted to Congress for approval. 
  Congress, in turn, is advised on issues of research support 
by the Office for Technology Assessment [OTA] and essentially by 
three independent institutions, that is, the National Academy of 
Science [NAS], the National Academy of Engineering [NAE], the 
Institute of Medicine [IOM] and other groups. Both the members 
of the House of Representatives and of the Senate, under the 
Congress, basically endorse official support for R&amp;D in the 
field of materials technologies. Hence, their concurrence is 
mostly assured. Debates in Congress usually involve the regional 
allocation of the R&amp;D funding to be approved for the country, 
with the representatives pleading for their constituencies. 
After Congress' approval of the program, the program is 
coordinated by the OSTP, FCCSET and Inter-Agency-Committee and 
funding made available to the individual departments and 
agencies for implementing their projects focused on the 
department's mission. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-50A>        Chart 3.9: Planned R&amp;D outlays of individual U.S. departments and agencies under the AMPP </FIG>

  The following goals in the field of materials and processing 
technologies are supposed to be ensured by the AMPP: 


    -  The U.S. is to develop its scientific and technological 
leadership in the materials and processing technologies sector 
vis-a-vis other leading industrial countries. 
  -  Gaps should be closed between development of high-performance 
materials and their cross-over into an application. 
  -  Departments' and agencies' goal attainment is to be 
supported. 
  The U.S. administration is planning to make $1.659 billion 
available in 1992 to realize those goals for materials research. 
For 1993, $1.821 billion is projected, representing a 10 percent 
increase over the previous year's budget. Excluded from that 
total are U.S. classified projects and some mission-oriented 
activities like the Superconducting Supercollider-Program and 
the U.S. space glider program. 
  Funding planned for 1993 should be allocated among the 
individual departments and agencies as in chart 3.9. 
Significantly, in this context, the DOE will gain in importance 
at the expense of the DOD. The remaining departments and 
agencies matter less for U.S. materials research. Described in 
detail below are the activities of the five most important 
departments and agencies in the U.S. in the materials research 
sector. Hence, a closer look will be taken, in particular, of 
(1) the Department of Energy [DOE], (2) the Department of 
Defense [DOD], (3) the National Science Foundation [NSF], (4) 
the National Aeronautics and Space Administration [NASA] and (5) 
the Department of Commerce [DOC]. 
<H5>  1. The Department of Energy [DOE] </H5>
  The Department of Energy is engaged in the materials 
research 
sector focusing on materials issues connected with energy 
technology (nuclear and non-nuclear energy sources). The DOE's 
R&amp;D projects includes the following subjects: 


    -  basic research (e.g., elementary particle research) and 
the construction of accelerators (Superconducting Supercollider) 
  -  application-oriented basic research (e.g., synthesis and 
processing of materials for photovoltaic applications) 
  -  Subjects from the R&amp;D applied orientation sector (e.g., 
large-scale developments in the energy technologies sector). 
  The DOE's R&amp;D projects are assigned to the U.S.'s 
national 
laboratories, universities or directly to industry and conducted 
in those locations. Cooperation among official, academic, and 
industrial researchers is desired and encouraged. 
<H5>  2. The Department of Defense [DOD] </H5>
  The Department of Defense is engaged in the materials 
research sector not only with the use of materials in the 
military sector but also with civilian materials applications 
that extend the technological envelope and contribute to the 
technological superiority of the U.S. 
  In this way, the U.S. is the only industrialized nation that 
finances out of its defense budget R&amp;D projects that has a 
broad 
impact in the civilian technology sector. 
  Research projects range from free basic research through 
basic research having an applied orientation and applied 
research all the way up to specific development projects aimed 
at realizing prototypes or concrete production techniques. 
  R&amp;D that is on the point of application is normally 
conducted 
in the form of consortium research with the backing of the DOD. 
For this purpose a consortium of producers, users, and research 
institutes is formed with the goal of developing or improving a 
prototype and relevant production technologies (e.g., 
semi-conductor components). 
  DOD's R&amp;D projects in the materials research sector 
are, for 
the most part, conducted in the large national research 
laboratories, at universities or they are farmed out to 
industrial firms. An attempt is made to encourage cooperation 
among official, academic, and industrial researchers. 
<H5>  3. The National Science Foundation </H5>
  The NSF is an independent federal facility that is supposed 
to support research and training in the natural and social 
sciences, in mathematics and engineering. The training of 
materials scientists and engineers is especially supported in 
the materials research sector. The NSF's foci are exclusively of 
a basic orientation and are concentrated in the following fields: 


    -  solid-state physics 
  -  solid-state chemistry 
  -  low-temperature physics 
  -  theory of condensed matter 
  -  metallurgy 
  -  polymers 
  -  ceramics 
  -  electronic materials 
  -  support for supplies of the relevant equipment 
  The NSF supports inter-disciplinary oriented projects at 
universities, private research facilities, or industrial 
laboratories. 
<H5>  4. The National Aeronautics and Space Administration [NASA] </H5>
  NASA is engaged in the materials research sector with 
materials subjects and applications in air- and spacecraft. 
Materials research is supposed to contribute its share to 
enabling the U.S.'s overall supremacy in space to be maintained 
and developed. 
  NASA's R&amp;D projects are carried out in its own 16 
R&amp;D centers 
and technical facilities or farmed out to universities and 
industrial laboratories. 
  The larger NASA research centers with their own materials 
research foci, for example, are: 


    -  the Goddard Space Flight Center in Maryland 
  -  the Jet Propulsion Laboratory in Pasadena, California 
  -  the Lyndon B. Johnson Space Center in Houston, Texas 
  -  the John F. Kennedy Space Center in Florida 
  -  the Langley Research Center in Virginia. 
  It is worth noting that NASA is the only American federal 
authority that cooperates very heavily with research institutes 
or with industrial firms in the implementation of its R&amp;D 
activities. NASA uses 25 percent of its budget on its own R&amp;D 
activities and 75 percent of its budget is farmed out to outside 
contractors. 
<H5>  5. The Department of Commerce [DOC] </H5>
  The DOC has concentrated its materials research activities 
at 
the National Institute of Standards and Technology [NIST]. 
NIST's prime responsibilities are to assist industry in: 


    -  the development of technologies 
  -  the improvement of product quality 
  -  the modernization of production techniques 
  -  and the speedy commercialization of inventions. 
  The focus of the R&amp;D projects supported by NIST consist 
of 
risky technologies in a precompetitive stage. In this way new 
products and production methods are supposed to be realized 
leading to an expectation of high productivity and market 
potential. 
  Considering the allocation of AMPP financial resources by 
categories of materials (chart 3.10), it turns out that all 
categories of materials--except for magnetic materials--are 
steadily supported very intensively. Particularly prominent is 
the intensive support for biocompatible materials. 
  If the individual groups of materials are sorted into 
function and structural materials, it becomes evident that under 
the AMPP functional materials get more attention than structural 
materials. In 1992 functional materials will probably be 
supported with $634.6 million, but structural materials, on the 
other hand, with $608.9 million. Also, some projects included 
here among structural materials really belong under functional 
materials. The program's structure, however, precludes detailed 
analysis of the support for functional materials. 
  The AMPP comprises five program foci for which funding is 
allocated: 
  1. synthesis and advanced processing of materials - 41 
percent 
  2. characteristics of materials - 29 percent 
  3. theory, modeling and simulation - 14 percent 
  4. training and professionalization - 1 percent 
  5. other - 15 percent 
  With percentages of 41 and 29 percent, synthesis and 
advanced 
processing of materials and characteristics of materials, by 
far, have the greatest importance among those program foci. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-52A>        Chart 3.10: R&amp;D outlays for specific materials under the AMPP program </FIG>

<H5>  3.2.3 Materials research support in European research </H5>
programs 
<H5>  3.2.3.1 Survey </H5>
  In the seventies and eighties the economy in west European 
countries underwent a sizable structural change that went hand 
in hand with increasingly heavier emphasis on the potential of 
research and technology. In fact, it has become increasingly 
essential to achieve a high degree of excellence on the European 
level in order to safeguard the status of technological 
development and international competitiveness vis-a-vis the U.S. 
and Japan. When the EC treaty was reformed in 1987, this 
assessment led to the formulation and creation of an independent 
Community research and technology policy. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-53A>        Table 3.8: Foci of EC research support in the third framework program </FIG>

  While the EC's original medium-term framework program for 
1984-1987, prior to the reform of the EC treaty, was still 
heavily influenced by "traditional" political fields and mostly 
featured research on steel, energy and agriculture, the second 
framework program for 1987-1991 underwent more of an orientation 
towards high-tech sectors like information and communications 
technologies, bio-sciences and materials research. 
  Altogether, under the second EC , ECU5.4 billion were 
allocated between 1987 and 1991. Of that amount, ECU3.1 billion 
alone went for information technologies and for industrial 
modernization. Within the industrial modernization focus nearly 
ECU265 million went for support for materials technologies. 
  In connection with the current third for 1990-1994, there 
has 
been an even more intensive orientation towards three foci of 
Europe's research and technology policy: 1. basic technologies, 
2. use of natural resources and 3. use of non-physical resources 
(see the survey in table 3.8). Under support for basic 
technologies, ECU888 million is allocated for the industrial and 
materials technologies sector. Altogether, between 1990 and 
1994, an amount of ECU309 million in funding will be allocated 
for materials research, narrowly defined[.sup]9[/]. 
  With the Maastricht Treaty for the creation of the European 
economic and currency union, basic impetuses have been generated 
since late 1991 for the continued development of Europe's 
research and technology policy. 
  In the fourth beginning in 1994, the relationship between 
national and European policy will be fundamentally reworked. New 
responsibilities will accrue to the EC Commission in the sector 
of industrial and research policy and a considerable expansion 
of support activities on the EC level can be expected. 
  Besides the EC's research and technology policy programs in 
which non-EC countries participate with the EC based on 
bilateral agreements, other programs and initiatives are being 
conducted on the European level in which non-EC members also 
could participate. In this connection, the COST and EUREKA 
initiatives deserve special mention since they display important 
foci in the materials research sector. Sections 3.2.3.3 and 
3.2.3.4 describe those initiatives and the materials engineering 
projects engendered by them. 
<H5>  3.2.3.2 The BRITE/EURAM program </H5>
  In 1985 and 1986, the BRITE and EURAM programs were 
introduced as separate programs for different target groups, 
respectively. Both programs emphasized support for materials 
research, albeit with respectively different focuses and 
emphases. EURAM gave greater emphasis to materials research 
while BRITE gave greater prominence to process development 
(production, CAD/CAM, Design). 
  In 1989/1990, the two programs underwent a radical 
evaluation 
and correspondingly adapted and reoriented. To be sure, the 
assessment of the original EURAM program favorably determined 
that in many cases it resulted in the initiation of cooperative 
activities among partners from many countries, to super-sectoral 
cooperation, to an enhancement of cooperative activities between 
producers and consumers and to the development of so-called 
thematic excellence networks,[.sup]10[/], facilitating a 
permanently enhanced division of labor and competitiveness in 
Europe. The following points, however, were signaled out for 
criticism: 


    -  there was no clear strategy on the EC level furnishing 
sufficiently clear medium- and long-term project concepts 
  -  there were no clear priorities for project selection 
  -  the result was a disadvantageous focusing on universities and 
research institute 
  -  a disadvantageous distribution of participants among the 
various countries of Europe had to be noted 
  -  the "High-Tech Materials" program too lopsidedly supported 
traditional materials at the expense of improvement 
  -  and the rather considerable problems in the administrative 
implementation of the projects surfaced. 
  The assessment also especially pointed out success factors 
for projects. Those include: 


    -  the clear determination of project goals and the 
availability of the necessary funding to realize those goals 
(finances, technical equipment, etc.) 
  -  the proven expertise of 
each of the participating partners and the complementarity of 
qualifications 
  -  the quality of the administrative and informational support 
by 
the EC Commission ("Monitoring and guidance") and efficient 
management of the combined project by the project leader 
  -  the participation of at least one end user from industry as 
an 
active member of the project team 
  The recommendations from the assessment and the analysis of 
the success factors for projects went into the shaping of the 
BRITE/EURAM II program under the EC's third . Both programs were 
combined under a uniform objective and uniform program 
supervision and administration. Compared with the original 
BRITE/EURAM programs, funding was considerably beefed up for the 
September 1991 to December 1994 time period. All told, ECU309 
million are available for that period for materials research, 
including exploration and recycling. The survey in table 3.9 
indicates the supported sectors. As a result, the BRITE/EURAM II 
program is very comprehensive in terms of categories of 
materials that are supported and net product stages. For 
example, even developments in follow-on activities (production, 
process engineering, design, quality assurance) are supported. 
  The BRITE/EURAM II program is touted in technical interviews 
with representatives from industry, research and management as a 
program that is portrayed as being of above-average efficiency 
compared to other EC and supra-national programs. Mentioned as 
the reason for this is the restriction to a few project partners 
chosen for their competence, targeted project selection, 
responsible program management and the fact that lessons from 
precursor programs were in a number of stages. 
  BRITE/EURAM emphasizes the variously committed participation 
of the EC partner countries. This is influenced by the economic 
strength of the country, by existing competence in the materials 
engineering sector, by the experience from participation in 
earlier BRITE/EURAM programs and by the support strategies for 
materials research in the participating countries. Relative to 
return on funding, Great Britain and France especially were 
heavily represented in BRITE/EURAM up to 1991. By way of 
contrast, partners from the FRG participated to a lesser extent 
in the BRITE/EURAM program up to and through 1991. With the 
enhancement of the activities of the German contact center for 
the BRITE/EURAM program, however, German applicants were able to 
catch up with applicants from France and Great Britain at the 
first call for BRITE/EURAM II in 1992. 
  The initially low participation by German participants in 
the 
BRITE/EURAM program was determined, among other things, by the 
availability of alternative support funding. In the 
decision-making calculation of potential applicants, the 
national MATFO program was considered to be more attractive 
compared to the EC program since it was characterized by clearer 
guidelines and colored by lower coordinating costs. The 
similarity of objectives and support instruments between MATFO 
and BRITE/EURAM, and the fact that BRITE/EURAM, even after 1994 
will probably achieve a high status, makes it necessary to more 
closely examine the issue of coordination between national and 
European support policy. Even more effective coordination, 
however, should be viewed against the background of national and 
European materials research programs that are concurrent and 
complementary to one another (see chapter 5 on this). 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-56A>        Table 3.9: Support sectors under the BRITE/EURAM II program </FIG>

<H5>  3.2.3.3 The COST initiative </H5>
  The COST initiative (abbreviation for Cooperation europeenne 
dans le domaine de la recherche scientifique et technique) 
constitutes one of the earliest activities for coordinating 
scientific and technical projects on the European level. At the 
end of the sixties the initiative for this cooperation 
originated with the then six members of the European Economic 
Community [EEC], but it was subsequently deliberately not 
limited only to EC member states and even now is still an 
initiative outside of the EC . 
  In November 1971, The research ministers of 19 European 
countries [.sup]11[/], at a conference in Brussels, decided 
to conduct jointly coordinated research support in seven select 
fields: 1. computerization, 2. telecommunications, 3. 
transportation, 4. oceanography, 5. metallurgy and materials 
science, 6. environmental protection and 7. meteorology. From 
the outset, joint research in the materials engineering sector 
(see table 3.10) was given relatively high importance, not only 
because it was selected as one of the seven foci, but also 
because it is evident that materials developments frequently 
play a key role even in the other indicated six fields. 
  Financial support for R&amp;D projects remains with the 
national 
governments. There is no supra-national support budget. The 
initiative proceeds "from the bottom up," that is, from 
researchers on the national level. These may join up with 
researchers from other countries participating in COST. If a 
project is initiated by participants from at least four European 
countries, this can then become the basis for a COST action. 
COST projects and actions are coordinated on the European level 
by a number of oversight and steering groups (committee of 
higher officials, COST actions management committee, combined 
projects coordinators). To facilitate coordination and 
information exchange, projects with a similar objective and 
thematic are combined into "concerted actions" and technical 
subgroups. 
  Altogether, under the COST initiative, more than 800 
projects 
were implemented in eight action sectors entailing a budget of 
ECU156 million. At the start of 1991, 82 of those projects were 
still being worked on. 
  The COST initiative is highly supplemental both to national 
support programs and to EC programs. The COST initiative was and 
is administratively and financially supported by the EC 
Commission. This is based on a resolution of the EC Council of 
Ministers and was confirmed by the vice-chairs of the EC 
Commission at the meeting of the research ministers from COST 
member countries in Vienna on 21 November 1991 for COST's 
twentieth anniversary. On the level of specialization, COST 
concerted actions are comparable to BRITE/EURAM individual 
combined projects. Reciprocal information on current and planned 
materials programs and actions has occurred at regular intervals 
since 1988. 
  Nothwithstanding the close coordination between COST 
programs/actions and EC programs, there is no denying some 
replacement that is especially intensified in so far as the EC 
gains in importance relative to the COST initiative. The 
following three phases can be distinguished in the relationship 
between EC programs and COST initiatives. In the phase preceding 
the first EC , between 1971 and 1983, COST still constituted an 
important "platform" for joint European R&amp;D activities; 
between 
1984 and 1992, important topics began competing with individual 
R&amp;D support programs on the EC level. In that phase, firms 
and 
institutes in European Free Trade Association [EFTA] countries 
(CH, S, SF), with no access to EC projects, constituted major 
platforms in the context of COST actions. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-58A>        Table 3.10: Materials research projects under the COST initiative </FIG>

  Then when phase three began on 1 January 1993, countries 
associated with the EEC Treaty got easier access to EC R&amp;D 
support programs. It is therefore questionable how the COST 
initiative will hold up against the European support programs. 
COST initiative competitive advantages, therefore, will have to 
looked for on three levels: 


    -  through rapid, flexible development of new fields of 
research on the part of COST initiators 
  -  through the development of new target groups (e.g., in 
central 
and east Europe) and 
  -  through the mobilization of stable researcher networks set up 
under earlier COST actions. 
<H5>  3.2.3.4 The EUREKA initiative </H5>
  The EUREKA initiative was introduced in 1985 at a conference 
of research ministers from 17 European countries. EUREKA is an 
international framework for S&amp;T cooperation. A market and 
applied orientation is more pronounced compared with other 
support programs and initiatives (e.g., COST). The explicit goal 
is the development of products, processes and services having 
high market potential. For the most part this spotlights highly 
complicated projects that absolutely call for super-sectoral and 
supra-national cooperation (e.g., HDTV, traffic guidance 
engineering, etc.). 
  Since then, 19 signatory states have acceded to the EUREKA 
initiative[.sup]12[/]. In 1992, these introduced a total of 
539 projects with a financial volume of DM21.4 billion. German 
partners participated in 174 of those projects with a financial 
volume totaling DM13.3 billion. German participants had a 
financial volume of DM3.8 billion. The BMFT supported DM933 
million of that. 
  As in the case of COST, project initiation and financing is 
done on the "bottom-up principle," i.e., financing is done in 
the country where the individual contributions originate. The 
initiative mostly originates with individual firms. They look 
for partners from other countries and may apply to their 
national governments for support resources. There is no central 
EUREKA program budget. In clear contradistinction to COST, there 
is only minimal transnational project coordination. 
  The EUREKA "model" offers a pragmatic approach to project 
mobilization, an open framework and a flexible organizational 
structure for initiatives from firms and research institutes. It 
constitutes a new sort of contract model resembling 
"franchising," wherein a number of partners join together under 
a common "brand name." This flexible and open structure made it 
possible to mobilize relatively quickly a large number of 
projects with correspondingly high financial volumes. 
  Even in the materials engineering sector numerous new 
projects were launched. In 1992 there were 53 international 
projects having a financing volume of nearly DM640 million in 
the materials research sector. In 1992, FRG firms and research 
institutes participated in 23 of those projects. Table 3.11 
presents a survey of those EUREKA materials research projects 
that entailed German participation. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-59A>        Table 3.11: Materials research projects entailing German participation under the EUREKA </FIG>

  Of all the cooperative R&amp;D support programs and 
initiatives, 
EUREKA is the one with the least amount of centralization and 
coordination. The underlying principle of self-organization 
facilitates a speedy launching of many new project teams. But 
the question does arise whether that organizational model is 
correspondingly suited for carrying out complex and risky large 
projects all the way to their successful conclusion. The danger 
is that many new activities are "introduced," but because of 
only inadequate central coordination they again disintegrate or 
wither away. 
  The larger and more complicated the development projects 
are, 
the more important does the responsibility of a central 
management become. In individual instances this can be assumed 
by private actors; in other cases, however, it may be 
advantageous to have an official or supra-national authority 
take over the responsibilities for coordination and management 
of the system[.sup]13[/]. 
<H5>  3.2.4 Support for materials research in selected European </H5>
states 
<H5>  3.2.4.1 Great Britain </H5>
  In the fifties and sixties, Great Britain occupied a 
position 
of leadership in the materials engineering sector. During the 
seventies and eighties, however, it had to accept "setbacks" in 
important sectors in comparison with the U.S., Japan, and 
Germany. This was not the least reason why, in the mid-eighties, 
a commission was set up, that formulated national priorities in 
the materials engineering sector and decisively influenced the 
support programs in recent years. 
  Official outlays for R&amp;D in Great Britain total #5.5 
billion 
(DM13.2 billion)[.sup]14[/] (fiscal year 1988-1989). #2 
billion (DM4.8 billion) of that was for the defense ministry 
[MoD], #2.5 billion (DM6 billion) for the so-called Science Base 
and nearly #1 billion (nearly DM2.4 billion) for the financing 
of civilian R&amp;D by different ministries. The lion's share of 
the 
outlays for civilian R&amp;D resides with the Department of Trade 
and Industry (DTI/total #314 million). The DTI finances and 
coordinates the most important materials research programs in 
Great Britain. Besides the DTI, the Science and Engineering 
Research Council [SERC], the defense ministry [MoD], the energy 
ministry [MoE], the transportation ministry [MoT] and the health 
ministry [MoH] participate in the implementation of projects of 
relevance to materials research. 
  Optimistically estimated, Great Britain's official outlays 
for materials research are on the order of #70-80 million 
(DM168-192 million) per year. These are apportioned in a ration 
of 3:3:2 among the DTI, MoD and SERC and/or Department of 
Education and Science [DES]. Based on DTI data, the outlays 
going for R&amp;D on new products, in the narrow sense of the 
term, 
are definitely fewer. On an annual basis, the programs of 
section MTD 2 (Materials and Manufacturing Processes) get #10 
million (DM24 million). There are also materials research 
related R&amp;D projects in the electronics as well as the 
aerospace 
sectors. Altogether, the DTI budget for new materials is more on 
the order of #20 million (DM48 million) per year. 
  Under the DTI budget, the following programs are 
implemented, 
each of which is responsible for a large share of the R&amp;D 
projects in the new materials sector: 


    -  LINK 
  -  General Industrial Collaborative Programme [GICP] 
  -  Advanced Technology Programme [ATP] 
  -  Measurement Technology Support [MTS] 
  LINK aims at cooperative projects involving private firms, 
research institutions and universities in the sector of 
precompetitive research holding considerable relevance for 
industrial application. Altogether, for the current fiscal year 
(1991-1992) it is estimated at 75 projects, 280 participants and 
a budget of #50 million (DM120 million). Only a part of that, 
however, is for materials research projects as such. In the LINK 
program, universities are 100 percent supported, industrial 
outfits, a maximum 50 percent. Average support volumes amount to 
#0.3-0.5 million (DM0.7-1.2 million) and the typical duration of 
a LINK project is four to five years. 
  The GICP is aimed at support of industrial research 
organizations. In 1992-1992, 50 projects are financed under this 
program with a budget of #25 million (DM60 million). 
  The ATP targets cooperation between among firms in the 
precompetitive R&amp;D sector in key fields of technology. All 
told, 
in 1991-1992, 60 projects involving 250 participants and a 
budget of #50 million (DM120 million) are supported. 
  Lastly, MTS is a support program targeting measurement and 
technical testing methods for new materials. 
  DTI is Britain's coordination center for EUREKA projects. 
These aim at industry-led combined projects for the improvement 
of the competitive position of European firms (see section 
3.2.3.4 also on this topic). In 1991-1992, Great Britain was 
participating in 35 EUREKA projects entailing a support volume 
of #60 million (DM144 million). The British attribute especially 
great importance to participation in EUREKA materials research 
projects. 
  In addition to support from the DTI, materials research is 
supported at universities and research facilities by the DES and 
SERC. The establishment of Interdisciplinary Research Centers 
[IRC] aroused special attention in recent years. The goal they 
pursued was to develop centers of expertise in many new fields 
of promising research, that as a rule are set up in the vicinity 
of a renowned university and are supposed to cooperate closely 
with industrial firms. 
  Actually, a number of IRCs were developed in the new 
materials sector (see table 3.12): high-temperature 
super-conductivity in Cambridge and Birmingham, high-performance 
materials in Birmingham, polymer research in Leeds, biomaterials 
at Queen Mary College, etc. 
  Initial experiences with the development of the IRCs appear 
to be mixed. Some centers (e.g., polymer research in Leeds) have 
already acquired sufficient impetus and a high reputation early 
on. Others still have not fulfilled the expectations pinned on 
them. For example, the center for Advanced Engineering Design in 
Glasgow has been re-closed. Critical factors in the success of 
IRCs are: careful selection of management forces, clear and 
early coordination of goals among management, SERC and industry 
and the quickest possible development of a high reputation 
through sensational benchmark projects. 
  Also deserving emphasis as the third leg of materials 
research in Great Britain is the not inconsiderable allocations 
of the MoD, militarily oriented research institutions (e.g., 
RAE) and the largest armaments firms. The impetus for innovation 
in the development of new materials for civilian applications, 
however, that they engender is considered to be comparatively 
slight. 



  ----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 3.12: Interdisciplinary Research Councils [IRCs] in the new material-| 
|s sector                                                                   | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Field of research |Location          |Year established  |Budget in million-| 
|                  |                  |                  |s of pounds       | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|High-temperature  |Cambridge         |1987              |5.29              | 
|superconductivity |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Surface sciences  |Liverpool         |1987              |7.76              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Semiconductors    |Imperial College  |1989              |8.80              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Laser technologies|Southampton       |1989              |11.13             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|High-performance  |Birmingham        |1989              |10.63             | 
|materials         |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Polymer research  |Leeds             |1989              |10.66             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Biomaterials      |Queen Mary College|1991              |5.20              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|IRCs' "Material"  |                  |                  |59.47             | 
|budget            |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|IRCs' total budget|                  |                  |106.00            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  In Great Britain (unlike in the U.S., for instance), really 
cutting-edge military developments are pursued mostly only in 
the electronics, signals processing and radar engineering 
sectors, fewer, however, in new materials. Large military 
supplier firms occasionally emphasize that they do in fact use 
new materials but they do not develop those themselves but 
purchase them instead. 
  On the whole, Britain's materials research is characterized 
by a large number of initiatives and support agencies. This 
occasionally hampers coordination of the different programs. 
Advantageous in this regard is the activity of the Materials 
Advisory Committee. The latter consists of R&amp;D directors from 
industrial outfits. It meets four times a year and advises on 
strategic issues and the selection of important materials 
research projects. The secretariat for this committee is located 
at the DTI, and a high-ranking industry representative chairs 
it. Since materials research activities are scattered over 
different programs and support agencies, the Materials Advisory 
Committee plays an important advisory and information exchange 
role in considering broad national interests. 
  Despite this extra responsibility of the Materials Advisory 
Committee and the fact that all strands of industry-oriented 
national and European projects converge on the DTI, Britain's 
support policy for new materials is shot through with a high 
degree of decentralization and occasional fragmentation. Many 
competing programs on the national and European levels are 
overseen by relatively few officials with only unclearly defined 
objectives and priorities. A single DTI employee is responsible 
for nearly 100-150 projects. Project management remains nearly 
exclusively with the participating firms and research 
facilities. The support institutions can scarcely play any 
coordinating role on individual projects. 
  The driving forces for national materials research support 
are situated instead on a decentralized level (with individual 
industrial outfits and research groups). National support policy 
is a desideratum of spontaneous "bottom-up processes." The 
upshot is that this makes it possible for lopsided interests to 
intrude with unproportional strength. Certain industrial firms 
with well-developed channels of information to official agencies 
and individual groups from universities and research 
institutions are thus better poised than others. 
  In the sector of applied materials research, some groups 
from 
well-organized branches (e.g., aerospace, automobile 
manufacturing) enjoy distinctly better influence over the 
direction of national programs than others. Accordingly, in the 
basic research sector topics are occasionally formulated that 
arouse the eagerness of researchers but do not necessarily 
address actually existing national research expertise or do not 
find the right fertile industrial soil for their later 
commercial implementation. 
  The result is a "Mismatch" between the research portfolio 
and 
the portfolio of national industries and business fields in 
which critical firms actually have long-term, sustainable 
competitive advantages. Meanwhile, a number of authors have 
noted this inadequate correspondence between research priorities 
and sectors of the national economy. 
<H5>  3.2.4.2 France </H5>
  France is pursuing a type of research and industrial policy 
that resembles Japan's approach in many respects albeit 
significant differences to it are also evident. The most 
important players are the large firms and central government 
administrations that use a tightly interlaced network of 
personnel and capital to coordinate and implement activities 
that are national in their scope. In clear contradistinction to 
Japan, however, is France's industrial policy that is 
characterized by top-down planning, the influence of the 
government as shareholder and inadequate competition among large 
firms. 
  This industrial and political structure benefits 
technological development in France wherever there are large 
technological systems to implement, requiring sophisticated 
coordination among many participants and marked by a high degree 
of official regulation. Accordingly, France's policy displays 
great effectiveness in the implementation of large national 
systems in the telecommunications, transportation, space, energy 
and military sectors. 
  On the other hand, France's technological development is 
often riddled with conspicuous flaws precisely in those sectors 
in which large systems and government regulation have no 
importance for the innovation process. In sectors like machine 
building, the capital goods industry and in many markedly 
medium-sized supplier branches, that is, in which the 
significance of self dynamism, spontaneous entrepreneurship and 
bottom-up processes prevail, there are often pronounced 
shortcomings in France. 
  During the eighties, France strongly promoted important 
materials research developments in the context of a support 
policy directed at large structures. Prestigious national 
developments in the military, space travel, nuclear energy and 
civil aviation sectors led to the targeted development and 
adaptation of strategic new materials. Subsequently, extensive 
effects for impetus and dissemination were expected from them. 
The ideal type of dissemination pattern that was originally 
pursued envisioned specific new materials (e.g., composite 
materials) being tested first in the space sector, then being 
incorporated in fighter aircraft construction and in civilian 
aircraft and then transferred to the entire transportation chain 
(high-speed trains, automobiles). In order to be appropriately 
equipped for that dissemination process, there was constant 
development of capacities in the research and materials 
production sector. 
  Over the past decade in France a number of research projects 
and support programs were initiated in the materials research 
sector. The most important ministries in this context are: 


    -  the Ministere de la Recherche et de la Technologie [MRT] 
  -  the Ministere de l'Industrie 
  -  the Ministere de la Defense 
  -  the Ministere de l'Energie 
  The MRT is responsible not only for basic research but 
especially for the national research center [CNRS]. The MRT 
primarily implements the major support programs supporting key 
national sectors (space, aviation, telecommunications and 
energy) where materials research is of critical importance. In 
addition, MRT supports R&amp;D of relevance to industry under the 
"Sauts technologiques" (technological leaps) focus and supports 
innovation and technology transfer. 
  In the development of materials research in France, the 
Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique [CNRS] enjoys a 
rather crucial role. It has close to 300 laboratories throughout 
France that are directly or indirectly engaged in material 
research issues. The CNRS allocates a total budget of nearly 
FF800 million[.sup]15[/] (DM240 million) for materials 
research. PIRMAT (Programme interdisciplinaire de recherche sur 
les materiaux) is the most important program in the materials 
research sector overseen by the CNRS. 
  The defense ministry (Ministere de la Defense) finances 
materials engineering developments in the aerospace industry 
sector. Nearly FF350 million (DM105 million) are allocated 
annually to materials developments focusing on the composite 
materials, high-performance metals, and high-performance 
ceramics sectors. 
  The Ministere de l"Energie oversees its own materials 
research program that is directed, among other things, at the 
development of high-performance ceramics for the nuclear 
industry. 
  In addition to such "mission oriented" materials research 
programs focused on basic research, aerospace, defense and 
energy, in recent years intensified dissemination-oriented 
activities were launched. Those include, among others, the CRITT 
and ANVAR programs, both financed by the MRT. Under the CRITT 
program a total of 130 regional innovation and technology 
transfer centers were developed. Twenty-nine of those centers 
explicitly are engaged in materials engineering developments. 
Their foci are in the polymers sector (eight centers) and the 
composite materials sector (seven centers) as well as the 
ceramics and metallic materials sectors (three centers each). 
  Under the ANVAR program, industrial R&amp;D projects are 50 
percent supported by the MRT. In 1989, under that program, 
projects were officially supported with a support volume of 
nearly FF1,300 million (DM390 million). A not insignificant 
portion (estimated at 10 percent) of that went for materials 
research projects. 
  Despite efforts to help important "prestige developments" 
involving new materials find greater dissemination and use in a 
host of industrial products, so far no real commercial 
breakthroughs are detectable. A very recently conducted study by 
the BETA institute, analyzing the dissemination process for new 
materials in transportation, concluded that the original "Grande 
vision" of the above-depicted dissemination pattern could not be 
realized as of now. The success factors and challenges in the 
manufacture of rail cars and automobiles are so radically 
different from those in space travel and the manufacture of 
aircraft that no sustainable transfer effect has surfaced thus 
far. 
  As a result, in an early stage, France focused its national 
research capacities on a tight cluster of primary applications 
for new materials, but it did not provide with sufficient 
consistency the conditions for success for the commercially more 
interesting waves of secondary applications in strongly growing 
mass markets. 
<H5>  3.2.4.3 The Federal Republic of Germany </H5>
  The FRG's research and technology policy is essentially 
oriented along the following guidelines and general goals: 


    -  acknowledging freedom of research, particularly basic 
research, the need for self-initiative and improvement of basic 
conditions 
  -  consistent orientation along the subsidiary principle, i.e., 
restraining government vis-a-vis R&amp;D in the private sector 
  -  basic recognition of scientific and technical progress as an 
expansion of human opportunities for action 
  -  development of long-term prospects and options for research 
and 
for conceivable technical uses 
  -  enhancement of the joint responsibility of the federation and 
the states for research 
  -  continued development of international cooperation in 
research 
  In recent years, building on the indicated research and 
technology policy guidelines, the following research and support 
policy foci were generated: 
  1. intensified support for basic research 
  2. development of precautionary research (especially, 
ecology, health, climate research) 
  3. subsidiarily focused support of market-oriented 
technologies having a basic orientation and counterbalancing the 
private sector 
  4. improvement of basic conditions for innovations in SMEs 
  5. Actions to improve the research structure and for 
de-bureaucratization 
  6. Enhancement of research fields having long-term prospects 
  7. development and intensification of international 
cooperation 
  8. research and responsible debate on the consequences of 
technology and on science's accountability. 
  In the past, focusing research support on the 
above-indicated 
points, led to the realization of outstanding research results 
in the FRG, compared with the rest of the world, and some of 
those results also spread out into traditional industrial 
sectors. On the other hand, shortcomings surfaced especially in 
R&amp;D on new technologies and associated fields. In that 
setting, 
research support and the realization of research results as well 
as the transfer of results did not manifest the desired effect. 
  In the FRG, materials research support is circumscribed on 
one side by materials research support on the EC level and on 
the other side by materials research support on the FRG states' 
level. The following description of materials research support, 
therefore, must include the following sectors with the last two 
points constituting the focus: 


    -  materials research support on the EC level 
  -  materials research support on the federal level 
  -  materials research support on the FRG states' level 
  Materials research support on the C level has first-rate 
representation in the BRITE/EURAM, COST and EUREKA programs (see 
chapter 3.2.3). Firms and academic research in the FRG are among 
the most active participants, besides the French and the 
English, in the indicated EC programs. Based on future 
availability of resources, materials research on the EC level 
will assume very great importance in the future. 
  Materials research support on the federal level is basically 
concentrated in the BMFT. Besides the BMFT, the federal ministry 
for economy [BMWI] and the federal ministry of defense [BMVg], 
especially, are also active in the materials research sector. 
The BMFT is responsible in the materials research sector for 
both basic research and basic research with an applied 
orientation. The nucleus of the BMFT's materials research 
support is the materials research program that was launched in 
1985 with a 10-year duration. A support total of DM1.1 billion 
was made available for it. The underlying concept of the MATFO 
program is based on the government -- under a predefined 
framework -- making industry and academic research an offer to 
enable the realization of risky, critical research themes in the 
materials sector. The official subsidy for such cooperation is 
50 percent of the project costs. 
  Because of the broad-spectrum nature of materials sciences 
and materials development, support for them is not carried out 
only in the materials research program. Other BMFT support 
initiatives also support issues of relevance to materials, with 
the following activities being the most conspicuous: 


    -  microelectronics 
  -  physical and chemical technologies 
  -  production engineering; quality assurance 
  -  aviation research and engineering; hypersonic technology 
  -  basic technologies for information engineering 
  -  advanced lines of reactors; power plant technologies 
  -  solar energy; broad-spectrum issues of renewable energies 
  -  hydrogen technologies; energy storage device 
  -  ground transportation and traffic systems. 
  Materials research support on the FRG state level is not 
regulated uniformly. Some states, e.g., Bavaria, North 
Rhine-Westphalia and Baden-Wuerttemberg have recognized the 
importance of materials research and have made the transition to 
initiating their own materials research programs that are 
structured similarly to the materials research programs on the 
federal level. 
  In the state of Bavaria, a materials research program was 
launched bearing the designation "New Materials Research 
Program," that is supposed to enhance materials research in 
Bavarian companies. The program has been available to Bavarian 
companies since 1 August 1991. The goal of the program is 
support of R&amp;D projects in the field of new materials and 
their 
conversion into new products. The program primarily supports 
companies with up to 1,000 employees and a maximum of DM200 
million in turnover. 
  Financing of the program is done via funding from the state 
budget with the average amount being redetermined each year. 
Project funding results in an official subsidy of 50 percent for 
the respective project costs, with projects supposed to arise 
from the following materials sectors: 
  1. metals 
  2. polymers 
  3. ceramics/glass 
  4. composite systems 
  5. supra-materials problems. 
  The choice of projects in that context is primarily oriented 
along the following criteria: 


    -  Projects are supposed to display sizable technical and 
economic risk. 
  -  Projects are supposed to feature a high innovation content. 
  -  Projects are supposed to be mostly implemented in the 
Bavarian 
Free State. 
  -  Any subsidized project has to have the participation of at 
least one medium-sized enterprise and one university and/or one 
research institute having an applied orientation. 
  In the state of North Rhine-Westphalia there is a materials 
support program that arose from the steel program in the years 
1980-1990. The goal of the North Rhine-Westphalian materials 
program is R&amp;D support for metallic materials and allied 
composite materials, but especially steel, intermetallic stages 
and superalloys. But processing technologies such as production 
and advanced processing technologies and processing techniques 
(laser and coating techniques) and bonding techniques are also 
supported. An annual budget of nearly DM25 million is planned. 
Currently, implementation of the program for five years is on 
application with the EC. 
  In the state of Baden-Wuerttemberg there is presently no 
specific program for the support of high-performance materials. 
A support program is planned, however, bearing the designation 
of "Opportunities through New Materials." 
  Besides specific materials support programs, in nearly every 
state of the FRG there is an innovation support program in which 
materials research projects are worked on and subsidized to a 
significant extent. 
<H5>  3.3 Materials research at FRG universities and institutes </H5>
  The FRG enjoys a remarkably high level of technical 
development and a long historical tradition of materials 
research. In the past 15 years it was possible to ensure a 
respectable position for German basic research even on an 
international comparison, through new research projects, through 
the development of institutes and through close cooperation 
between research and industry in the area of new 
high-performance materials. 
  The BMFT's materials research program, concurrently with the 
objective of safeguarding German industry's competitiveness and 
the development of industrial research also pursued on a 
priority basis goals that focused especially on German 
universities and institutes: 


    -  mobilization of scientific and technical potential for 
materials research 
  -  development of new materials 
  -  enhancement of basic research with an applied orientation 
  -  improvement of information and technology transfer to benefit 
SMEs 
  Between 1985-1991 a total of nearly DM250 million went 
directly to universities and free research institutes having no 
university linkage, from the support funding of the materials 
research program. Indirectly, in the form of combined projects, 
additional funding was funneled back to universities and 
institutes by industrial partners. To be sure, support funding 
constitutes only a comparatively small amount of the budget for 
all participating institutes and research facilities. Still, the 
MATFO program could generate a sustainable impetus for 
individual institutes with a high percentage of supported 
projects and for selective research topics in the 
high-performance materials sector. 
  Because of the federal training and research policy of the 
FRG, assessment of any federal program also has to be made 
against the backdrop of the activities of the individual states 
that are relevant to materials research and the development of 
state programs. In the development of institutes and research 
facilities in the materials research sector, in fact, there have 
been occasional coordination problems between federal and state 
levels in recent years. 
  This issue will have to be dealt with separately in an 
assessment of the research structure and in the elaboration of 
future strategies for materials research support. 
  German reunification confronts materials research with both 
a 
possible enrichment and, initially, a challenge to the capacity 
for integrating the German research scene. The research 
potential in the field of materials research in the new federal 
states is considerable, albeit there is still a need for 
organization and administrative incorporation into the newly 
emerging field. At the outset, the situation was marked by the 
difficulties of restructuring, and those will probably lead to 
considerable processes of adaptation for a number of years. 
  National expertise in the materials research and engineering 
sector has to be also constantly assessed in terms of the close 
connection between research and training. On the whole, as an 
analysis of basic research, training and professionalization 
systems indicates, the FRG enjoys an internationally sustainable 
to strong position in the metallic materials and polymers 
sector. There is a long tradition here of development of 
competent research institutes and highly developed training and 
close cooperation among universities, research institutes and 
industrial outfits. Existing strengths are parlayed and 
successive improvements realized. 
  This close-meshed network involving research, industry, and 
the educational system still does not function in a 
comparatively effective manner for some new categories of 
materials (in some high-performance ceramics and composite 
materials sectors). Not least because of the research policy, in 
fact, in recent years, individual "islands of competence" were 
developed here. But there has still not been the required 
success in effecting the broadly effective linkage between 
research, training on several levels and the industrial 
activities of application and production firms. 
Materials-oriented support strategies of upcoming years will 
have to more intensively target the development of those types 
of comprehensive networks of expertise and cooperation. 
<H5>  3.3.1 Materials research at selected universities (former </H5>
federal states) 
  German universities display great diversity in the field of 
materials research. Research and training in the materials 
engineering sector play a major role in many universities. 
Appropriate research, entailing respectively different costs, is 
performed at practically every technically oriented university 
or university having departments/areas of specialization in the 
technical and natural sciences. Still, unequivocal foci for the 
research endeavors and pattern of specialization can be 
identified, above all, in the context of individual categories 
of materials. University institutes in which materials research 
is performed to an extent that is of super-region importance, 
are limited to just a few. Various institutes are renowned for 
their relevant expertise and research capabilities in their 
respective research foci, for example, the technical 
universities [TU] and universities of Aachen, Berlin, Clausthal, 
Hamburg-Harburg, and Karlsruhe as well as Bayreuth, Bochum, and 
Erlangen-Nuremberg. Also, know-how relevant to materials was 
concentrated in the various traditional natural science sectors 
at some universities. 
<H5>  Break-down of activities by category of materials </H5>
  Depending on their research foci in the materials research 
sector, the indicated universities may be associated with 
individual categories of materials as follows: in the ceramics 
sector, in the former states of the FRG, there currently are two 
major foci, one at the Institute for Non-Ferrous Materials at 
the Berlin TU, the other under the Karlsruhe/Stuttgart/Freiburg 
ceramics group financed by Baden-Wuerttemberg state. That group 
integrates the Max-Planck institute for Metals Research (see 
section 3.3.3) and the DLR in Stuttgart. With this kind of 
combination of resources, high-level research is performed, 
promoting expert cooperation, and, in a single materials group, 
it is possible for topics to be extensively addressed. Besides 
those foci, a number of German universities enjoy expertise in 
the sector of research and instruction in the field of ceramics 
materials. 
  Research foci in the field of metallic materials are located 
at the RWTH at Aachen, Clausthal TU and Hamburg-Harburg TU as 
well as the universities of Bochum and Stuttgart. Among those, 
it is the RWTH at Aachen that deserves special emphasis with its 
several institutes (foundry institute, laboratory for machine 
tools and operational instruction, institute for welding 
production processes). Mainly because of the intensive 
cooperation with a large number of corporate foundations in the 
context of the university, a relatively sizable linkage with 
industry in Aachen deserves mention. 
  German university polymer research centers are located at 
the 
universities in Bayreuth, Erlangen-Nuremberg, Freiburg, Mainz, 
and Stuttgart as well as at the Berlin TU and the RWTH at Aachen 
where processing technologies for plastics constitute the active 
foci. The university of Erlangen-Nuremberg's chair for plastics 
engineering gets an important impetus for its research activity 
from the close cooperation with the southern German plastics 
center in Wuerzburg which, in turn, is noted for its conspicuous 
orientation towards the interests of the plastics processing 
industry. 
  Composite materials are the least represented category in 
German university research of the categories of materials 
supported under the foci of the materials research program. 
Relevant research projects are being pursued at the Berlin TU, 
the Karlsruhe TU, and the Hamburg-Harburg TU as well as the 
university of Erlangen-Nuremberg. At the university of 
Kaiserslautern, composite materials activities were 
re-established. At those universities, however, composite 
materials are just one research focus among others, respectively. 
<H5>  The MATFO program's role in the universities </H5>
  An analysis of the project funding approved for the various 
institutes under the materials research program is instructive 
about the position of individual universities in Germany's 
materials research scenario. Under the BMFT's materials research 
program, projects entailing a total of DM135 million (cutoff 
date: 31 December 1991) were supported at German universities. 
Our analysis demonstrates that the allocation of funding was 
also highly clustered resembling the concentration of materials 
research activities at certain German universities (see table 
3.13). Heavy participation in the MATFO program by itself cannot 
be assessed as evidence here for the competence of individual 
universities, but it is to be viewed as an important indicator 
of existing capabilities. 
  By far the front runner among the recipient universities is 
the RWTH at Aachen with a support volume of DM33.56 million. 
This is equal to approximately a 25 percent share of total 
university support under the materials research program and 3.7 
percent of the program's total support amount. Next come the 
Berlin TU with DM13.65 million (1.5 percent), Stuttgart 
university with DM12.94 million (1.4 percent), Karlsruhe TU with 
DM10.48 million (1.2 percent), Mainz university with DM7.5 
million (0.8 percent), Hamburg-Harburg with DM5.3 million (0.6 
percent), Dortmund university with DM4.9 million (0.5 percent), 
Clausthal TU with DM4.7 million (0.5 percent), Hannover 
university with DM4.3 million (0.4 percent), Ruhr university at 
Bochum with DM4.2 million (0.4 percent), and Darmstadt technical 
university [TH] with DM3.1 million (0.3 percent). Over the 
entire duration of the program, all other universities end up 
with, at most, less than DM2 million. 
  Under the BMFT's materials research program, projects 
totaling nearly DM135 million were supported. In this context, 
an average support rate of 93 percent was realized. By far the 
lion's share of all university support under the program went to 
institutes in the former states of the FRG. As of the cutoff 
date, universities in the new states of the FRG received a 
promise of support funding totaling DM7.3 million, equivalent to 
a 5.4 percent share of total university support (see also 
section 3.3.5). 
  The leverage produced by the BMFT's materials research 
program on materials research and its continued development at 
German university institutes has to be assessed diversely. In 
the respective budgets, very different significance is assigned 
to support by the BMFT. Major differences first exist for the 
annual budget of the respective institutes. The range here 
extends from DM1 million (Chair for Materials Sciences of the 
Karlsruhe TU) up to DM14 million (Institute for Machine Tools 
and Production Engineering of the Berlin TU) and thus makes such 
a comparison of the respective research performances problematic 
from the outset. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-66A>        Table 3.13: Allocation of support funding among various universities </FIG>

  As a general rule, basic financing by the appropriate states 
comes to between 10-30 percent of the respective budgets. In 
individual instances, because of special state financing, up to 
50 percent is realized (Karlsruhe TU Institute for Technical 
Ceramics, Freiburg University Institute for Macromolecular 
Chemistry). The percentage of BMFT support in total third party 
funding also varies considerably from 10 percent (Freiburg 
University Institute for Macromolecular Chemistry) up to nearly 
50 percent (Hamburg-Harburg TU Chair for Materials Science). 
Therefore, the BMFT's materials research program holds different 
significance for the activity of the respective institutes. In 
any event, however, at some institutes the BMFT's financing 
constitutes the largest budget entry (60 percent of the annual 
budget at the Karlsruhe TU Chair for Materials Science) and 
therefore contributes significantly to the ability of those 
institutes to operate. Still, on the whole it may be estimated 
that the BMFT's materials research program support funding at 
the various institutes of German universities enables an 
additional 100-150 employees to be employed. 
  Support for basic research in the materials sciences sector, 
therefore, has gotten a significant impetus from the BMFT's 
program. To a considerable extent, in fact, it was possible for 
the program's objectives for the universities to be realized. 
There was a mobilization of additional scientific and technical 
potential and an assemblage of those forces that considerably 
advanced, above all, development in selective categories of 
materials such as ceramics and polymers. In all the program's 
foci it was possible for a large number of new materials to be 
produced and characterized in many of the projects supported by 
the BMFT. Basic research with an applied orientation, in 
particular, underwent a significant enhancement from the 
exemplary realization of research groups through inclusion of 
various academic institutes. 
  In terms of organizational structure, however, the 
development of materials research is only in the early stages. 
In the future a more intensive applied linkage needs to be 
realized by including industrial firms and academic research 
institutes in joint projects. 
<H5>  3.3.2 Materials research at the Max-Planck institutes </H5>
  The Max-Planck Society [MPG] maintains its own research 
institutes in various fields of the sciences and the humanities. 
Their activities are predominantly concentrated on basic 
research. The Max-Planck Institutes [MPI] are especially engaged 
in new tasking that is not yet ready for university research or, 
because of its structural requirements (equipment, size of 
institute), is hardly appropriate for it. Therefore the MPG 
deliberately refuses to be active in all scientific disciplines. 
It is more concerned to focus its activities on especially 
promising fields of research. 
  The MPG is mostly financed from public funding, half of it 
coming from the federal government and half from the states. In 
fiscal year 1990, the MPG's budget amounted to DM1.382 billion. 
Revenues are allocated among the following sources of financing: 
the percentage for financing totaled nearly 84 percent of all 
revenues, with 1.25 percent special financing by the states and 
14.75 percent direct project support, equal to DM181 million. 
Non-public grants in 1990 totaled DM23.7 million[.sup]16[/]. 
  The MPG's present 62 institutes and independent research 
groups diverge considerably in terms of their size, structure 
and tasking. They are strewn throughout the FRG. Following 
German unification, meanwhile, even in the new states of the 
FRG, 15 working groups and one institute (MPI for 
microstructural engineering in Halle; see section 3.3.5) were 
set up. There is no independent sector focusing on materials 
research or materials sciences. Standing in its way is the 
expressly basic nature of the research engaged in by the MPG. In 
its diversity, materials research entailing research issues, 
however, is dealt with more extensively under the basic 
disciplines, especially physics and chemistry, which, in turn, 
claim nearly 40 percent of total outlays and have an equally 
large percentage of total scientific personnel employed (status 
in 1990)[.sup]17[/]. 
  The MPG's institutes received a total DM51.34 million of the 
BMFT's materials research program's support funding. Those funds 
went exclusively to five institutes: the MPI for metals research 
in Stuttgart, the MPI for polymers research in Mainz, the MPI 
for solid state research in Stuttgart, the MPI for biophysical 
chemistry in Goettingen and the MPI for research on iron GmbH in 
Duesseldorf (see table 3.14). Hence, the support of the MPI in 
the materials research sector is clearly concentrated on two 
categories of materials: on the high-temperature and specialty 
materials [MHS] branch and the new polymers branch, with 38 
percent and 27 percent of total MPG funding allocated to 
support. Next, in the allocation lineup, come ceramics with 21 
percent and powder metallurgy with 12 percent. The corrosion + 
tribology branch and composite materials, in contrast, each with 
only one percent, are not supported so well. 



  ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 3.14: Distribution of MATFO projects among MPG institutes              | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Institute                |Number of projects       |Support total (thousands | 
|                         |                         |of DM)                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|MPI for metals research  |26                       |20,842                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|MPI for research on iron |16                       |16,638                   | 
|GmbH                     |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|MPI for polymers research|5                        |10,749                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|MPI for biophysical chem-|2                        |3,053                    | 
|istry                    |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|MPI for solid-state phys-|2                        |58                       | 
|ics                      |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


<H5>  3.3.3 Materials research at the Fraunhofer institutes </H5>
  The Fraunhofer Society's [FhG] 38 institutes conduct R&amp;D 
activities having an applied orientation for the private sector 
and for government agencies. In this context they realize 
contract research and technology transfer activities in 
important fields of technology. The FhG institutes have a total 
of nearly 6,000 employees, about one third of them scientists 
and engineers. As a result, the FhG is the largest organization 
sponsoring applied R&amp;D institutes in the FRG. 
  In the overall activity of the FhG, the principal platform 
has remained unchanged for years. It is the contract research 
activity sector, accounting for 90 percent of total research 
activity. Growth in that sector is attributable, above all, to 
new activities in the layer and surface engineering and medical 
engineering sectors. Total research activity of DM585 million 
(1990) consisted of federal and state contracts worth DM211 
million and others from industry and associations worth DM166 
million. The FhG also implemented combined projects jointly with 
industry that were supported federally and on the state level 
for a total of DM83 million. In 1990, total industrial contract 
research activity amounted to nearly DM250 million[.sup]18[/]. 
  Approximately 25-30 percent of financing the contract 
research activity sector is done with basic financing from which 
investment expenses also have to be paid. Close to 30 percent of 
proceeds also come from private sector contracts. Amounting to 
nearly 35 percent, federal and state project financing helps the 
Fraunhofer institutes in the preparation of the transfer of new 
technologies and in the implementation of systems solutions that 
were realized through institutionally supported precursor 
research. Other proceeds comprise, above all, funding from EC 
Commission support programs. The trend here has been downward 
for some years since, as a rule, a 50 percent support rate has 
been established for EC projects and the Fraunhofer institutes 
[FhI] are only able, to a limited extent, to make good the 
difference for the complete project budget out of the limited 
resources of their own basic financing. 
  Materials research at the Fraunhofer Society's institutes is 
mostly carried out in the specialized sector of 
micro-electronics and in the specialized sector of components 
and materials, each of which unites a number of Fraunhofer 
institutes into a single combine. The following institutes and 
facilities are participants in the "Fraunhofer micro-electronics 
combine": FhI for applied solid-state physics in Freiburg; FhI 
for integrated circuits in Erlangen; FhI for micro-structural 
engineering in Berlin; FhI for solid-state technology in Munich; 
FhI for micro-electronic circuits and systems in Duisburg; FhI 
for physical measurement engineering in Freiburg; FhI for 
production engineering and automation in Stuttgart. 
  In the specialized sector of micro-electronics, the FhG is 
especially involved with the advanced development of production 
engineering for silicon and gallium-arsenide based integrated 
circuits and in the development of user-specific integrated 
circuits [ASIC] and microsystems. Research foci include various 
semiconductor technologies (lithographic process, 
ion-implantation process, process technologies, masking), 
development of components and circuitry (GaAs/GaAlAs components 
and circuits, electro-optical components, liquid crystal display 
elements, light valves) and the layout and production of 
semiconductor equipment (X-ray lithography, metallization, 
silicon-layering, dry-etching). The annual outlay for all 
institutes participating in the specialized sector totals nearly 
DM105 million. The technologically related activities are 
principally of interest to a few large and some medium-size 
manufacturers. On the other hand, ASIC developments and the 
tools required for them serve extensively to support all 
branches of industry in the use of micro-electronics. 
  The FhG's materials research activities focus, however, is 
unmistakably in the sector of materials and components. With an 
annual cost of nearly DM85 million, that sector ranks third 
among Fraunhofer specialized sectors and comprises the following 
institutes and facilities: FhI for materials mechanics in 
Freiburg; FhI for applied materials research in Bremen; FhI for 
non-destructive testing process in Saarbruecken; FhI for 
operational resistance in Darmstadt; FhI for short-term dynamics 
in Freiburg; Fraunhofer research groups for hydroacoustics in 
Ottobrunn; FhI for silicate research in Wuerzburg; FhI for 
lamination and surface engineering in Braunschweig; Fraunhofer 
working group for wood research in Braunschweig; FhI for 
production technology in Aachen. 
  The research activities of the specialized sector of 
materials and components in which those institutes cooperate, 
aim for an optimum, constructive orientation for materials, good 
useful features, the development of economical production and 
processing procedures and, increasingly, consideration of 
ecological aspects. The fundamental prerequisite for realizing 
such objectives is the characterization of materials and 
component properties, chiefly employing operational resistance, 
fracture mechanics, and non-destructive testing processes for 
that purpose. 
  The most significant research foci for materials research of 
the FhG's specialized sector of materials and components involve 
materials development (materials for severe stress, 
high-temperature and composite materials, non-ferrous, inorganic 
materials and inorganic-organic polymers, new functional and 
structural materials plus coatings, sensors and catalysts, 
production of nano-crystal and amorphous powder, development of 
new metallic and polymer-like laminated materials), materials 
characterization (functional, mechanical-technological 
properties, correlation with microscopic properties, definition 
of structure, advanced and fresh development of testing 
processes) and operational resistance of materials (component 
optimization, computation and simulation, lifetime and defect 
analyses). 
  The FhG has especially focused its activity on the 
production 
and use of highly promising ceramic materials. The production 
and preparation of high-performance ceramics call for 
cooperation that transcends specialization. 
  For this reason a number of institutes have joined together 
in the Fraunhofer combine for high-performance ceramics and in 
this way created a special expertise that ranges from 
development of new production processes to quality assurance 
through special testing process at all stages of the net product 
chain (participating institutes: FhI for materials mechanics in 
Freiburg, FhI for applied materials research in Bremen, FhI for 
non-destructive testing processes in Saarbruecken, FhI for 
operational resistance in Darmstadt, FhI for silicate research 
in Wuerzburg, FhI for production technology in Aachen, the FhI 
being developed in Dresden for ceramics technology and sintered 
materials will further expand that expertise in the future). 
Steadily increasing importance is attributed to the cooperation 
of the various FhI and the transfer of internal know-how. In 
this connection even the linkage with the specialized sector of 
production technologies is especially increasing. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-69A>        Table 3.15: Distribution of MATFO projects among the Fraunhofer Society's </FIG>

  The Fraunhofer institutes' special expertise in the field of 
highly promising ceramics is also reflected in the participation 
in the BMFT's materials research program (see table 3.15). 
Altogether, under that program, the Fraunhofer society is 
supported with DM29.6 million allocated among 10 different 
institutes. More than half, that is, 53 percent of that support 
goes to the ceramics sector. Following by a wide margin are the 
metallic high-temperature and specialty materials [MHS] branch 
with 19 percent and the composite materials branch with 18 
percent. Other sectors received hardly any support (powder 
metallurgy with six percent and corrosion + tribology with four 
percent) or no support (new polymers). 
  Based on their exceptional importance for the processing 
industry, metallic materials splay the major role in the 
contract research of the participating Fraunhofer institutes. A 
significant share of the activities continues to involve the use 
of new materials, above all, metallic specialty materials, 
ceramics and composite materials. Moreover, important 
developments target the production of new laminated systems with 
customized properties. 
<H5>  Large research facilities' [GFE] activities in the materials </H5>
research sector 
  The 16 large research facilities (three of them in the new 
states of the FRG) are a critical component of the FG's R&amp;D 
capacity. They presently employ 16,000 employees (not counting 
project centers, trainees and guest scientists) and get 90 
percent of their basic financing from the federal level and 10 
percent from one or more states where they are located. 
  The establishment in the fifties and sixties of large 
research facilities having a focus occurred mainly in the 
context of the organization and development of nuclear research 
and engineering, aerospace research, data processing and then 
bio-medical research. Currently, the large research facilities 
are making contributions in the sectors of long-term government 
programs (e.g., ocean research, polar research, space research), 
precautionary research (environmental, climate, health and 
safety research and evaluation of the engineering consequences), 
basic research in the natural sciences as well as development of 
market-oriented technologies (e.g., materials research, 
bio-technological research, energy research and engineering and 
underwater engineering). 
  Presented below is a survey of the share of materials 
research in the research activities of the large research 
facilities. Large research facilities not mentioned are making 
only an inconsiderable contribution, if any at all, to materials 
research. The statistics were basically derived from the program 
budget. 
  Also to be taken into consideration in any qualitative 
treatment of the materials research potential of large research 
facilities are activities in other topical foci such as 
solid-state physics, microsystems engineering or hypersonic 
technologies, although they have only a limited connection with 
the goals of the materials research program. 
  In 1992, the contribution of the large research facilities 
to 
materials research is nearly DM114 million (incl. project 
funding). Based on a rough estimate, those include activities 
thematically related to the "materials research" program 
amounting to approximately DM70 million. In 1992, only about 
DM1.1 million in BMFT support was applied and for the period 
1985-1992 it totaled nearly DM15 million. After incentive 
financing from the BMFT of respectively DM4-5 million in past 
years, the GKSS, KFA and even the DLR, are involved partially in 
overall charge of combined projects, that are predominantly 
financed from basic financing. 
  The restructuring and fresh orientations of materials 
related 
research in the KFA and KfK that was launched in 1992 make it 
possible to detect a more intensive orientation towards 
industrial needs and a concentration on a few concrete applied 
sectors. 
  Described below are the active foci of the large research 
foci with their respective links to the current materials 
research program: 
<H5>  Juelich research center GmbH [KFA] </H5>
  A relatively broad spectrum of directions of research is 
pursued at the Juelich research center, extending from the basis 
for information engineering via basic nuclear research, fusion 
research, energy engineering and health and environmental 
research to biotechnology. 
  In the materials technology sector, the KFA conducts 
research 
activities, most of which is basically financed albeit a smaller 
portion is also project financed. Under the BMFT's basic 
financing, in 1992 the KFA allocated DM52 million for materials 
research (including 30 percent of solid-state research, see 
below). That amounts to 11.7 percent of the total KFA budget 
basically financed by the BMFT. 
  At both of the institutes, the Institute for Applied 
Materials Research [IAW] and the Institute for Reactor Materials 
[IRW], materials research activities are conducted on a focused 
basis. Both institutes are actively engaged, albeit without 
financing from project support funding and sometimes taking 
overall charge of MATFO combined projects. Beginning in 1993, 
both institutes will have a fresh orientation based on the 
proposal of the structural committee. They are projected to be 
merged into a single institute with a 50 percent reduction in 
personnel strength and concentration on foci 1) materials for 
fuel cells (SOFC), 2) materials for GuD power plants and 3) 
materials behavior in plasma-wall interactions. The first two 
indicated foci are clearly linked to the MATFO program and will 
enable the KFA in the future to attract third-party funds even 
more strongly even from the BMFT for its research. 
  Besides the above-mentioned foci, the KFA, for the first 
time 
since 1992 has been posting 30 percent of its solid-state 
research under the generic label of "materials research." In 
terms of a materials-oriented solid-state research focusing on 
the production and optimization of interesting new materials and 
layered structures, that appears to be justified. 
<H5>  Karlsruhe nuclear research center GmbH [KfK] </H5>
  Materials research is assuming comparably great significance 
at the KfK. In 1991, DM42.7 million of federal basic financing 
was allocated to that research sector. That is nine percent of 
the KfK's total BMFT-financed budget. Since 1992, however, KfK 
has been posting no funding any longer directly under the rubric 
of "materials research," although materials research projects 
are still conducted under other foci (e.g., microsystems 
engineering, production engineering). 
  At KfK the objective of nuclear research development 
originally pursued when the research center was founded, is 
still distinctly detectable. Research activities foci consist of 
various nuclear engineering issues such as nuclear safety 
research, reprocessing and final-storage problems, and fusion 
technology. Also extensively covered is basic research in the 
field of nuclear and particle physics. Solid-state and materials 
research claims an increasing share of the total budget, 
although it remains predominantly oriented towards nuclear 
engineering. 
  Concurrently, over the past decade the KfK has also engaged 
in research projects on new high-performance materials and plays 
an important role in Baden-Wuerttemberg state's materials 
research program institutional combine. 
  Based on the recommendations of a prospects committee and 
after a restructuring of the institute for materials research 
(only three instead of four partial institutes any longer), in 
1991 the fundamental elements of the active focus for materials 
research were redefined under the general terms of microsystems 
engineering (the major share), nuclear energy research and 
nuclear fusion. Of foremost interest under the concept of 
materials and interfaces are microsystems engineering activities 
having a basic-orientation. Under the nuclear fusion project for 
energy research, developments and studies of structural 
materials for fusion equipment (refractory metals, ceramics) are 
carried out. Also worth mentioning are the more recent 
activities on fullerenes and magnetostriction and piezo-electric 
thin layers. 
  In general, the materials research activities at the KfK 
have 
a relatively basic orientation and focus. At present there are 
no projects being carried out under the BMFT's materials 
research program. 
<H5>  Geesthacht GKSS research center GmbH </H5>
  The foci of this institution are in the environmental and 
climate research sector. In addition, over recent years, 
materials research has also been assuming increasing value for 
GKSS' activity. In 1992, federal basic financing for the GKSS in 
the materials research sector totaled DM30.5 million. That 
equals a 28 percent share of the total BMFT contribution for the 
GKSS' materials research. On the other hand, the formerly 
prevailing focus on research in the sector of reactor safety is 
trending downwards. By contrast, materials research is receiving 
special importance in the environmental technologies sector. 
  Even in the future, materials research will take on high 
status for GKSS. Despite a topping out of the budget figures, 
therefore, the institute for materials research is not impacted 
by personnel cuts. The materials research is concentrated on 
(refractory) metallic materials with prominence given to 
intermetallic compounds (titanium aluminide) and materials for 
maritime engineering. 
  On the basis of incentive financing in several projects of 
the materials research program, the GKSS is intensively engaged, 
occasionally being in overall charge, in a number of combined 
projects with basic financing resources. 
  The long-term strategy of GKSS 2000 projects a concentration 
on the foci of "materials research," "environmental and climate 
research" and "environmentally friendly separation and process 
engineering" with a reduction in engineering sciences. 
<H5>  German Aerospace Research Institution e.V. [DLR] </H5>
  The DLR was originally set up for the organization and 
development of aerospace research. Since then it has become 
active also in the field of communications engineering and in 
the sector of environmental and climate research. One of the 
DLR's 21 institutes, the DLR institute for materials research in 
Cologne-Porz, is occupied exclusively with researching aerospace 
materials. Considering its focus on the specific requirement of 
aerospace engineering, the institute for materials research sees 
little importance in transferring materials engineering know-how 
to other sectors or other transportation platforms like rail and 
automobile. The institute employs 90 employees, including 45 
scientists. The institute's primary function is as a link 
between basic research represented above all at the universities 
and the Max-Planck Society institutes and the product and 
processing development pursued mainly by industry. Hence 
activity is focused on (basic) research topics having an applied 
orientation. 
  The DLR's materials research activities, therefore, are 
concentrated and focused on aerospace and energy engineering. 
Especially important in the aviation sector are aluminum, 
aluminum-lithium alloys, and fiber reinforced synthetic 
materials. In primary components in the future carbon fiber 
reinforced synthetic materials, above all, will be increasingly 
used. So-called high-temperature resistant superalloys will be 
mostly used for the manufacture of drive trains. Materials 
development for space is oriented towards the requirement of 
greater heat-resistance. Fiber-reinforced ceramic surface 
coating and carbon-fiber reinforced composites have enabled 
advances in this field. In all the indicated sectors DLR is 
engaged in promising research activities. 
  Supplementing the activity of the materials research 
institute, the DLR also comprises the institute for construction 
and construction research in Stuttgart and the institute for 
structural mechanics in Braunschweig dedicated to research 
activities on new materials. The DLR was a participant in a 
number of MATFO program combined projects with financing from 
project support funds. 
<H5>  Society for Heavy Ion Research GmbH [GSI], Darmstadt </H5>
  The GSI's activities in heavy ion research for materials 
research have a basic orientation and focus. In terms of focus, 
the bases are supposed to be created for an understanding of the 
ion beam mix, material structuring and nuclear-trace filter 
engineering. Reflecting the thrust of the research, the 
materials research activities at the GSI have exclusively basic 
financing. In 1992, BMFT basic financing for materials research 
totaled DM4.4 million (= 4.1 percent of the institute's BMFT 
financed budget). No projects were conducted by the GSI under 
the MATFO program. 
<H5>  Hahn-Meitner Institute Berlin GmbH [HMI] </H5>
  The HMI's tasking is research into the properties of 
condensed matter, focusing on structural research and 
photochemical energy conversion. Research is also conducted in 
the specialized fields of nuclear physics and information 
engineering. Materials research activities are carried out in 
the two specialized fields of structural research and 
solid-state physics. In the specialized field of solid-state 
physics, the materials research activities are related to 
discrete flaws in semiconductors and electronic structures, with 
some overlap with KFA solid-state research themes noticeable. In 
1992, DM20.8 million were allocated at the HMI out of the BMFT's 
basic financing for materials research (20.6 percent of the 
BMFT's basic financing for the HMI's budget). No projects were 
implemented under the MATFO program. 
  The above-described basic research institutions occupy an 
important position in Germany's research scenario and they 
constitute an important component of the nation's total R&amp;D 
capacity. On the basis of the basic research tasking originally 
assigned to them since they were founded, they have increasingly 
done preliminary work in new fields of research and developed 
expertise in some fields such as environmental and climate 
technology as well as production engineering, information 
engineering, and non-nuclear energy technologies. 
  It was precisely in the materials research sector that 
capital, personnel and financial foci were developed at the GFE. 
To the extent that the GFEs' objectives and strategies and those 
of the future MATFO program can be successfully coordinated 
better with one another and combined into a coherent overall 
strategy for materials engineering, a more powerful research and 
innovation combine can be developed. This opens up 
opportunities for increasing the effectiveness and efficiency of 
Germany's materials research. 
  Exploitation of those opportunities, however, requires 
consistent implementation of restructuring efforts in the GFE 
and their effective integration in combined projects. Above all, 
we welcome the current efforts of the GFE to focus more 
intensively their future materials research capacities on the 
needs of industrial users and to try out new forms of financing 
and research organization. 
  For the GFE in Germany to give a decisive impetus to 
materials research calls for even more intensive incorporation 
into the context of industrial research activities and into an 
efficient working association involving research, training, and 
industrial use. If greater sensitization to the requirements of 
materials users and if the restructuring of the institutes that 
has already been initiated are successfully and consistently 
realized, the GFEs' materials research activities will be able 
to exert a long-lasting, strong impact in the future on the 
development of materials engineering in Germany. 
<H5>  3.3.5 Survey of the status and growth of materials research </H5>
in the new federal states 
  In the area of the new federal states over the past decade 
it 
has been possible in the materials research sector to establish 
at various institutes some research foci even enjoying worldwide 
renown. In the former GDR, some materials research fields 
(ceramics, composite materials, non-destructive testing process) 
acquired a key role in the nation's research planning. In the 
wake of reunification, therefore, Germany's research scenario 
underwent an enrichment of its potential. Even the analyses of 
science council lead to a generally favorable assessment, albeit 
greatly diversified on the basis of centers and 
institutes[.sup]19[/]. As in the former states of the FRG, 
the materials research capacities and expertise in the states 
are concentrated in a few centers that are, above all, however, 
influenced by the central research planning of the former GDR. 
The important ones in this context are: 


    -  Sachsen state (Dresden, Chemnitz, Freiberg and Zwickau) 
  -  Sachsen-Anhalt (Halle and Magdeburg) 
  -  the former institutes of the Academy of Sciences [AdW] in 
Berlin 
  -  and Thueringen (Jena and Ilmenau). 
  In this context, Dresden is the most important for materials 
research in the new states. In past years numerous materials 
research activities were concentrated there, (ZfW, Dresden TU, 
Prof. Ardenne Research Institute, Rossendorf nuclear research 
center, etc.), and they will continue to be pursued even after 
their extensive restructuring in 1991/1992. At Dresden TU and in 
the immediate purview of the TU, the following institutes, among 
others, are under development: 


    -  the institute for macromolecular and textiles chemistry 
  -  the institute for polymers research e.V. 
  -  the institute for materials sciences 
  -  the institute for solid-state mechanics 
  -  the institute for textiles and clothing engineering 
  After the restructuring of the ZfW, of the Prof. Ardenne 
research institute and the Rossendorf nuclear research center, 
numerous new institutes arose involving various platforms (FhG, 
MPG, Blue List, etc.) that have demonstrated expertise in 
specific fields of materials research. 
  The Bergakademie in Freiberg also appears to hold promise 
for 
future German materials research. Special emphasis is given 
there to innovative production and processing technologies plus 
modeling of processes and materials structures. Meanwhile, the 
Bergakademie is undergoing restructuring, with development of 
materials research receiving considerable emphasis. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-73A>        Table 3.16: Distribution of MATFO projects among universities and institutes in the new states of </FIG>

  In Sachsen-Anhalt state, the materials engineering focus is 
at Halle, Magdeburg and Merseburg. In early 1992 at Halle, the 
Max-Planck institute for microstructural engineering commenced 
its activity. Its employees were all from the former GDR's 
Academy of Science's institute for solid-state physics and 
electron mircoscopy that had been dissolved. The newly founded 
institute's fields of active are basic research in the sector of 
smallest-dimension solid-state physics, that is, the structure 
and properties of small particles and thin layers, crystal flaws 
and interface engineering, solar energy, and materials research. 
  Some of the universities and institutes participated in the 
current MATFO program after unification. Table 3.16 presents a 
survey of the allocation of project funding. By the cutoff date 
of 31 December 1991, universities in the new states had received 
a support funding commitment totaling DM7.3 million, equivalent 
to a 5.4 percent share of total university support. Those funds 
are allocated especially among the universities of Dresden, 
Jena, and the Freiberg Bergakademie. Moreover, under the MATFO 
program the former institutes of the Academy of Sciences 
received a total of DM7 million for funding of 30 projects. 
  In light of the current institutional and political 
processes 
of change that are occurring, it is premature to undertake a 
definitive description and assessment of the situation for some 
of the centers. But even a preliminary uptake allows some 
conclusions to be drawn. 
  In the wake of reunification, Germany's materials science 
was 
enriched by a number of well-trained materials scientists. In 
the early stages the situation is impacted by the difficulties 
of restructuring that will probably lead to considerable 
processes of adaptation for a number of years. The growth in 
research capacity, however, is essentially appropriate for 
imparting added impetuses to materials research in Germany. 
  Two essentials are needed basically to implement that 
potential. First, the relevant institutes in the new states have 
to be brought up to a West German standard as speedily as 
possible in terms of its equipment. Second, there must, above 
all, be an integration of those institutes into the existing 
materials research scenario. To do that, the existing East 
German research institutes, building on established past foci, 
need to continue pursuing those foci and systematically expand 
their expertise towards a complementary national division of 
labor. 
<H5>  3.3.6 Survey of materials training in the FRG </H5>
  Considering the increasing strategic significance of 
materials technology, it is essential to continue consistently 
to develop university training in the materials and materials 
sciences sector to be able over the long term to have available 
a sufficiently large pool of qualified next-generation 
engineers. In many instances the professional status of the 
materials scientists is still not projected very transparently, 
especially since there is still no sufficiently clear image of 
the training situation and later field of professionalization. 
Increasingly even interested firms are asking for orientation 
assistance. In this context, the remarkable fact is that the 
relatively recent specialty of "materials science" encompasses a 
very heterogeneous and interdisciplinary field of activity that, 
unlike traditional engineering sciences, cannot fit in well with 
the stock qualifiers. Elaboration of a training strategy in the 
materials science and allied disciplines is also a leading 
contender for development of a national R&amp;D strategy in the 
materials research sector. To do so, in turn, requires first of 
all an assessment of the current status of training at the 
universities. 
  In the FRG, materials related training is carried out in 41 
specialized sectors at a total of 32 scientific universities 
(not counting specialized universities). Jointly, they offer an 
extremely broad spectrum of courses, programs of study or 
enrichment programs[.sup]20[/]. Training, in this context, is 
effected only partially via a course of studies for materials 
sciences or engineering or materials sciences or engineering. 
Quite frequently it is a part of some other course of studies 
like machine building, production engineering, or 
specializations in the natural sciences (see table 3.17). 
  The least coursework is organized in its own materials 
science sector of specialization/department. At some 
universities, materials related instruction is offered by 
various departments. To realize any assistance with orientation, 
such a plethora of training offers needs to be structured on the 
basis of a variety of distinguishing criteria. 
  One of those criteria may first be the question whether the 
materials training is done in its own independent course of 
studies or is included in an outside course of studies, for 
example, physics, chemistry, machine building, electrical 
engineering. On this basis, at least 14 of the 41 areas of 
specialization involved in materials training conduct an 
independent course of studies in materials. The 
over-proportionately high number of universities among them in 
the new states is remarkable: there are six such centers. In 
terms of their formal structure and degree designations, 
however, those courses of study are not directly comparable with 
one another. 
  A further distinction can be made on the level of the 
courses 
and enrichment coursework. Mostly, in subject areas offering an 
autonomous course of studies in materials was a detailed 
breakdown of the coursework undertaken. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-75A>        Table 3.17: Survey of training in the materials sciences sector at German </FIG>



<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-76A>        Table 3.17 (continued): Survey of training in the materials sciences sector at German </FIG>

  With seven different courses each, the RWTH Aachen, Berlin 
TU 
and the university of Erlangen-Nuremberg have the most extensive 
training menu. Among the east German universities, the Freiberg 
Bergakademie and Dresden TU deserve notice with seven and five 
courses, respectively. At other universities where materials 
engineering is included in other coursework, a number of 
materials engineering enrichment programs are occasionally 
offered. Meriting special importance in this connection are the 
Munich TU machine building curriculum with six enrichment 
programs and the Clausthal TU metallurgy and materials sciences 
curriculum with 10 different enrichment alternatives. 
  So far, regulation of the degree designations has proved 
less 
transparent. Other subject areas generally confer a degree 
reflecting the designation of the respective course. Many 
universities, all the same, conduct materials related enrichment 
coursework as a supplement to the degree title (Bayreuth 
University, Bochum Ruhr-University, Hamburg-Harburg TU). 
Universities in the new states frequently confer their degree in 
accordance with the curriculum (Chemnitz, Freiberg, Ilmenau). 
Despite training that emphasizes materials, many universities do 
not award any degree with a materials related designation (e.g., 
Karlsruhe University, Munich TU). 
  An assessment of the subjects in basic and principal courses 
can yield insight into the nature of materials training at 
German universities. The basic course curriculum, with relative 
uniformity, includes approximately 15 subjects at all 
universities with materials related training. Accordingly, major 
emphasis is universally placed on imparting mathematical 
knowledge. Distinct differences, however, are evident in the 
rest of the courses. Depending on the focus of the coursework, 
the respective core subjects occupy the broadest scope, that is, 
thermodynamics for machine building, physical chemistry for 
chemical engineering, electrical engineering for electrical and 
information technologies and computerization, etc. With 15 or 
more semester credit hours, materials related subjects receive 
considerable emphasis even in the basic course at a few 
universities (Berlin TU, Chemnitz, Dresden, Freiberg, Magdeburg, 
Merseburg, Stuttgart). 
  Besides university training, the training and advanced 
training on the skilled worker and college levels also are 
decisive for assessing the personnel situation and its 
development in the materials engineering sector. A study 
commissioned by the OECD (1992) arrives at a favorable 
assessment in this respect on the situation in the FRG. In the 
metallic materials and polymers sectors, in fact, Germany enjoys 
an extremely diversified training and professionalization system 
that facilitates continuing advanced development and use at all 
stages of the net product chain. By contrast, the 
professionalization situation in the ceramics and composites 
materials sectors seems to be less diversified and full of gaps 
in some areas. According to the OECD study the development 
status of the training and professionalization system on the 
university, but, above all, on the non-university level, is a 
quite crucial determining factor for promising national 
innovation strategies in the materials engineering sector. 
Footnotes 
  6. Companies with 20-1,000 employees 
  7. See OECD (1992a), Main Science and Technology Indicators, 
Paris 1/1992, p. 16. The conversion rate for 1990 was based on a 
parity of Yen100 = DM1.25 
  8. AIST 1992 data. Currency parity established for 1992: 
DM1.25 for Yen100 
  9. This funding includes ECU229 million for "materials" and 
ECU80 million for "Raw Materials and Recycling." There are also 
other additional projects relevant to materials research 
contained in the remaining foci of the "Industrial and Materials 
Technologies" sector. 
  10. Such "thematic excellency networks" signify the 
assemblage of a number of projects into thematic groups (e.g., 
ceramics or magnetic materials) and the creation of suppliers of 
specialized services in Europe. 
  11. In 1991, the COST signatory states included Austria [A], 
Belgium [B], Switzerland [CH], Germany [D], Denmark [DK], Spain 
[E], France [F], Great Britain [GB], Greece [GR], Italy [I], 
Ireland [IRL], Luxembourg [L], Netherlands [N], Portugal [P], 
Sweden [S], Finland [SF], Turkey [TR] and Yugoslavia [YU]. 
Recently, the COST initiative was also opened up for the 
participation of central and east European reform states. 
  12. They are, for the most part, identical with COST 
participant states 
  13. Only an extremely detailed project analysis is able at 
this point to help investigate the respective advantages of 
organizational models. Under the EUREKA initiative, the 
EUROLASER project, for example, is put forward as a success. Its 
system management is in the hands of private companies. In the 
HDTV sector, the EUREKA model so far is unable to lead to a 
breakthrough. One of the attempted explanations is the 
inadequate coordination that cannot get corrected by the market 
process alone in view of the diverse initiatives from rival 
market participants. 
  14. The following conversion rate was taken as the basis: #1 
= DM2.40 
  15. Conversion rate: FF100 SYMBOL 64 \f "Symbol" DM30 
  16. Those reflected allocations from the Volkswagen plant 
foundation and the founders' association for German science, 
plus other earmarked allocations from the Thyssen foundation, 
the Krupp foundation and various companies. 
  17. See MPG's 1991 yearbook, Munich, 1991 
  18. See FhG 1990 yearbook, Munich, 1991 
  19. See SCIENCE COUNCIL (1991 a and b), position on 
institutes of the chemistry and physics research sector; 
Duesseldorf, July 1991 
  20. See materials training in Germany in: DGM aktuell, put 
out by the German Society for Materials Science e.V., May 1992, 
pp. 8-16 
<H5>  4. Importance of Materials and Processing Technologies for </H5>
German Industry 
  At present there is no doubt that a decisive factor in 
ensuring a country's future prosperity is the safeguarding and 
enhancing of the competitiveness of companies on the world 
markets. If companies as well as the government are to be able 
to safeguard this competitiveness in an arena marked by a high 
dynamic for change on the political, social, economic, and 
technological levels, they have to adapt to such changes and 
actively help shape them. 
  A highly industrialized country like the FRG, with a weak 
raw 
materials basis, but with a good supply of fixed capital, an 
established basis of know-how, and a high level of education, 
should use its existing relative strengths in know-how 
intensive, future-oriented sectors of technology to concentrate 
on areas where such strengths can be most effectively used. But, 
as chapter four describes in detail, the leading industrial 
nations have the same marginal conditions as the FRG and 
therefore consider similar sectors of technology future-oriented 
and endeavor to develop them. So it is all the more necessary 
for the FRG to concentrate existing resources effectively and 
efficiently on technology sectors that Germany views as 
future-oriented and develop them as rapidly as possibly (chapter 
4.1). 
  Because of their central importance for the future 
development of many sectors, materials, and processing 
technologies are viewed internationally as particularly 
future-oriented technology sectors. It is imperative to 
safeguard and develop the position achieved in this 
broad-spectrum sector of technology to exploit the potential for 
differentiation in internationally important and attractive 
sectors and thereby permanently enhance the competitiveness of 
German industry (chapter 4.3). 
  (1) In all leading industrial countries, research and 
development in the field of high performance materials and the 
associated production and processing technologies enjoy very 
high significance since they 
  - have high development and application potential 
  - are, in many cases, the prerequisite for new or definitely 
improved technical designs, even allowing for ecological issues, 
and therefore 
  - afford firms in practically all sectors of industry an 
opportunity to realize strategic competitive advantages (chapter 
4.3). 
  (2) Technological developments in such important industrial 
sectors as automobile manufacturing, electronics/electrical 
engineering, energy engineering, machine and appliance building, 
or chemistry are often based on high performance materials. 
Maintaining and developing the FRG's current, often favorable, 
competitive position in such industrial sectors and the 
associated export results (percentage of international exports: 
automobile manufacturing, 22 percent; electrical engineering, 18 
percent; energy engineering, 16 percent; electronics, nearly 10 
percent), can be safeguarded through the solid basis of know-how 
in this future-oriented technology sectors (chapter 4.3). 
  (3) In order to realize the potential of high performance 
materials, in the future, in the materials and processing 
technologies sector, above all, it will be necessary to overcome 
the gap still existing between materials development and further 
processing or the manufacture of components, so as to ensure the 
transfer of know-how from research and development to innovative 
products and systems (chapter 4.2). 
<H5>  4.1 International comparison of key technologies </H5>
  Analyzing the fields of technology that the world's leading 
industrial countries consider to be future-oriented, one detects 
a broad agreement on and prioritization of the following sectors: 


    -  materials and processing technologies 
  -  electronics 
  -  information and communication technologies 
  -  biotechnology 
  -  energy production technologies. 
  The troika of countries (EC, U.S., and Japan) especially 
intensely pursues those technological fields, wherein the 
individual countries have created individual focuses in order to 
push the development of selective technologies in those sectors. 
  Basically, a distinction must be drawn among various types 
of 
technology that are positioned along the technologies timeline 
curve. Mastery of key and cutting-edge technologies, that is, of 
technologies in a relatively early stage of development, in 
contrast to basic technologies, affords a quite considerable 
diversification of potential vis-a-vis competitors and is 
therefore of rather particular importance for safeguarding and 
developing firms' future competitive position (see chart 4.1). 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-79A>        Chart 4.1: Types of technologies and their positioning in the technological life </FIG>

  The rapidly growing demand and the anticipated market 
potential of products that directly or indirectly depend on the 
indicated technologies compel firms to obtain access to key and 
cutting-edge technologies in those technological fields. This is 
a development that is supported for macro-economic 
considerations by official support programs in leading 
industrial nations. concurrent with this market-pull optic, the 
know-how and results from academic basic research and industrial 
research act as a technology-push leading to a high rate of 
innovation and dynamism in those fields of technology. 
International technological competition is thereby further 
intensified. Strong positions in the indicated fields of 
technology have clearly positive impacts on companies, sectors, 
and ultimately even nations. 
  To safeguard and even to develop advantageous competitive 
and 
technological positions, the leading industrial nations, above 
all, the U.S., Japan, and Germany, in industry and on the part 
of government, expend quite sizable funding on R&amp;D (see 
charts 
4.2 and 4.3). It is not possible precisely to attribute the 
described R&amp;D expenditure to the six indicated technological 
fields, especially the industrial outlays. The underlying 
assumption, however, must be that a rather sizable amount goes, 
directly or indirectly, into the indicated fields of technology. 
  Based on chart 4.2, the U.S. is the world leader by a wide 
margin in terms of absolute R&amp;D outlays. In 1990, the U.S. 
invested $151 billion in R&amp;D, followed by Japan with $67 
billion 
and the FRG with $32 billion. In past years (1985-1990), rates 
of increase in absolute outlays for R&amp;D were the highest in 
Japan. France, the FRG, U.S., and Great Britain follow at a 
distinct distance. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-80A>        Chart 4.2: Comparative illustration of absolute outlays for R </FIG>

  If, on the other hand, the relative R&amp;D outlays of the 
individual countries are considered relative to gross domestic 
product [GDP] (see chart 4.3), it then turns out that in 1990, 
Japan, the U.S., and FRG invested between 2.8 percent and 3.1 
percent of their GDP in R&amp;D. Remarkably, Japan's relative 
R&amp;D 
outlays have risen significantly, that is, from 2.77 percent 
(1985) to 3.07 percent (1990) relative to GDP whereas those of 
the U.S. and FRG fell or rose only slightly. 
  Because of numerous problems of delimitation, it is possible 
to make only a rough estimate of how much of that is invested in 
the respective countries in R&amp;D on materials and processing 
technologies. The underlying assumption has to be that the U.S. 
is officially investing the most financial resources in the 
world in R&amp;D on materials and processing technologies. In 
recent 
years, Japan and the FRG have launched nearly comparable 
official resources into the field of materials and processing 
technologies. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-81A>        Chart 4.3: Comparative illustration of relative R </FIG>

  In the future, both the U.S. and Japan plan to increase 
financial resources for R&amp;D on materials and processing 
technologies. The FRG, on the other hand, is in a 
decision-making stage regarding R&amp;D investments in materials 
and 
processing technologies. 
  Remarkably, the troika of countries gives priority to nearly 
the same sectors in materials and processing technologies, with 
the following the most prominent: 


    -  high-performance metals and alloys 
  -  high-performance ceramics 
  -  high-performance polymers 
  -  high performance composite materials 
  -  magnetic materials 
  -  superconducting materials 
  -  electronic materials 
  -  optical materials 
  -  biocompatible materials. 
  Within those groups, the leading industrial states are 
oriented towards the following issues: 


    -  development of new materials 
  -  further development of existing materials 
  -  improvement of production and processing technologies 
  -  systems innovations 
  New thematic fields like computer design and computer 
simulation and materials recycling so far have only sporadically 
been included in materials research. 
<H5>  4.2 Status and development trends in materials and process </H5>
technologies area 
  Generally speaking, materials are solid substances having 
technically useful features. The materials that are used as the 
basic materials for technical products must be selected on a 
targeted basis in keeping with the specific requirements profile 
of the respective application and be optimized in terms of 
materials and energy consumption, reliability, quality, 
durability, environmental demands and recycling possibilities. 
Hence, components and systems should be realized that meet the 
steadily increasing requirements in the various areas of 
application. 
  It is becoming increasingly obvious, in fact, for 
high-performance materials that the separation of materials 
development and advanced processing and component production 
does not make sense and that it is more appropriate to link 
systems or components design and construction with materials 
development and their production and advanced processing 
methods. For example, in powder metallurgy or in the ceramics 
sector, new production processes endeavor to influence the 
microstructure and micro-configuration in order thereby to 
inject specific property profiles. Newly developed processing 
technologies endeavor advantageously to transfer to the 
component the property profiles thus obtained from the basic 
materials. This is realized, for example, by assembling a number 
of processing steps into a single processing step within 
processing technology or by means of an integrated process 
management that combines production and processing steps. 
Directly associated with this also are automation designs and 
quality assurance systems that decisively impact the 
reproducibility, reliability and economy of components 
production. 
<H5>  4.2.1 Defining Germany's technological position in selected </H5>
materials and process technologies 
  Under a portfolio analysis, the FRG's relative technological 
position, in an international comparison of important and 
attractive materials and processing technologies, was defined 
semi-qualitatively with the greatly fragmented materials sectors 
aggregated into the following core sectors: 


    -  high-performance ceramics 
  -  structural ceramics 
  -  functional ceramics 
  -  high-performance polymers 
  -  structural polymers 
  -  functional polymers 
  -  high-performance metals 
  -  structural metals 
  -  functional metals 
  -  high-performance composites 
  -  high-performance glassware 
  The portfolio depicted in chart 4.4 describes, on the one 
hand, the attractiveness of the indicated selective 
high-performance materials and processing technologies using the 
criteria of potential for advanced development, probability of 
dissemination and realizable synergistic effects. On the other 
hand, the FRG's relative technological position is defined on 
the basis of criteria for the degree of technological mastery 
along the net product chain, resource strengths and R&amp;D 
efficiency. The size of the circle drawn for each group of 
materials reflects the respective international market volumes 
at semi-finished and component stages. 
  The following picture emerges for the high-performance 
technologies being studied, based on the portfolio analysis that 
was conducted: all the analyzed technologies have relatively 
high technological attractiveness. This stems from a sizable 
potential for advanced development, a high probability of 
dissemination and above-average synergistic effects on other 
technologies that all assessed groups of materials display. 
  Contrastingly, Germany's relative technological position in 
those groups of high-performance materials turns out to be quite 
diversified. In an international comparison involving 
high-performance polymers, the FRG occupies a strong 
technological position, since German firms and research 
institutes have embarked on a large number of new directions in 
this sector and have realized internationally recognized 
research results. This surely is based first on a strength that 
has developed historically and secondly, the materials research 
program has also made a significant contribution to it. 
  On the other hand, in the field of high-performance 
composite 
materials and high-performance functional ceramics, the FRG 
presently occupies only a feeble to average relative 
technological position. The risk here is that catching up with 
the technology leaders, the U.S. and Japan, may be a wasted 
effort in the future. On the whole, in the other materials 
sectors under consideration the positions are favorable to 
average. There is a mastery of important processes and there 
does exist a basic know-how and keeping up with the leading 
nations of the U.S. and Japan in materials engineering could be 
sustained. In some sectors leadership positions could even be 
realized, this too, moreover, surely creditable to the materials 
research program. 
  Generally, however, it must be remarked that the singular 
strengths have not been developed broadly enough and the R&amp;D 
results in the individual net product stages have not been 
consistently linked one to the other. It must also be pointed 
out that Japan and the U.S., precisely our most important 
competitors, have intensified their technological position in 
the fields of high-performance materials over past years. On the 
whole, the U.S. and Japan are still considered the leaders in 
the field of high-performance materials -- also a result of 
considerable official support. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-83A>        Chart 4.4: Determining the relative technological position of the FRG in high-performance </FIG>

<H5>  4.2.2 Status and development trends in selective materials </H5>
and processing technologies 
<H5>  4.2.2.1 General survey </H5>
  In the course of history, especially, however, in the 
twentieth century, a large number of examples can be cited that 
can elucidate the importance that materials hold for advanced 
technical and social development. It is evident that 
technological quantum leaps result in many instances from the 
development or new or definitely improved materials. 
  Although clearly outlined areas of application have emerged 
for each of the three major groups of materials, there are 
numerous possibilities, where the various materials are in 
competition with one another and ultimately, the ideal 
world-real world relationship among application-specific 
requirements and materials-specific properties determines the 
respective choice. 
  As illustrated in chart 4.5, three main groups of materials 
are distinguished at present: 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-84A>        Chart 4.5: Schematic survey of the most important groups of materials </FIG>

  The division of materials into three main groups is 
ultimately linked to the atomic structure and the predominant 
bonding forces from which, in principle, the basic properties of 
such materials are derived. 
  As already explained at the outset of the chapter, materials 
development, particularly in past decades, has undergone 
astounding development. This development, arising from specific 
new requirements from the various sectors of industry and 
through sizable R&amp;D efforts to develop new and even better 
materials, has ultimately even established a group of materials 
that is characterized by a particular performance spectrum. It 
is often difficult to distinguish these materials from 
traditional or established materials and their important 
modifications as well. This also explains the plethora of 
terminology for such materials that range in the 
English-language literature from "new materials" via 
"engineering materials, "customized materials" to "Advanced 
Materials," to document only a small segment of the host of 
designations noted on this point. 
  Ultimately, all those terms have one thing in common: they 
describe materials whose properties profile is characterized as 
new or having special performance. For example, there are 
superalloys that are mechanically resistant even at high 
temperatures or resistant to chemical influences, ceramics have 
been distinctly improved in terms of their strength and have 
thereby become considerably more interesting as structural 
materials, or, as a result of high-temperature superconductivity 
for ceramic materials, it will be possible in the future to 
develop entirely new fields of application. In the plastics 
sector, there now are available materials with considerably 
improved high-temperature resistance or electrical conductivity 
as a result of new or improved materials. Even in the composite 
materials sector there are developments that range far beyond 
the production of compounds via mechanical processes and that 
target the on-site production of compounds during synthesis. 
  Such especially effective materials should henceforth be 
designated as high-performance materials and accordingly be 
defined thus: 
  High-performance materials are synthetic materials whose 
properties profiles may generate new, promising structural and 
functional application possibilities and enable the realization 
of new technologies. 
  The term high-performance material appears at this point to 
make complete sense even if it refers to the improvement of 
materials and their establishment in selective areas of 
application. Still, it must be borne in mind that the goal is to 
broaden as rapidly as possible the application of 
high-performance materials that are developed in order to meet 
the future challenges from the various applied sectors. Only 
broad dissemination in various markets guarantees the 
high-performance material producer, processor and consumer an 
appropriate volume of turnover and a Return-on-Investment on the 
considerable development cost for such materials. To sum up: 
Today's leading-edge technology, with its uncertainties, has to 
strive to become a key technology with its significant potential 
for diversification, but ultimately, it has to strive to become 
a basic technology and thereby the basis of entire industrial 
sectors. A MITI support initiative, the JISEDAI program, that 
also supports materials technologies, clearly describes this 
unambiguous objective: Program for Future Basic Technologies. 
  Although many materials experts accept this definition, 
still 
there are definitional difficulties or even arbitrariness in 
distinguishing, for instance, between high-performance materials 
and improved traditional materials. This shows up, above all, in 
the realization of market volumes for such products. Chart 4.6 
presents us with total present and future turnover for 
high-performance materials in the respective groups of materials. 
  The international market for high-performance materials as 
basic materials (e.g., ceramic and metallic powder, granulated 
polymers, etc.) is projected at nearly DM8.0 billion for 1990. 
Basic polymer materials reflect DM3.0 billion of that amount, 
with DM2.0 for basic ceramic materials, DM1.8 billion for basic 
metallic materials and DM1.3 billion for basic materials for 
high-performance composite materials. By the year 2,000, market 
volume for high-performance materials as basic materials will 
more than double to nearly DM18.0 billion. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-86A>        Chart 4.6: Projected international market volume for high-performance materials as basic materials </FIG>

  The preceding chart already indicates the importance that 
the 
next stages of net product, that is, production of semi-finished 
products and components, have. Internationally, their 1990 
market value is projected at nearly DM65.0 billion. 
High-performance polymer semi-finished products and components 
with DM24.0 billion hold the greatest significance among them, 
leading high-performance ceramics with DM23.0 billion, 
high-performance metals with DM11.0 billion and high-performance 
composites with DM7.0 billion. High-performance materials 
semi-finished products' and components' market volume will more 
than double to nearly DM150 billion by the year 2,000. 
  The following annual average rates of growth can be 
projected 
in the future in the field of high-performance materials: 


    -  high-performance ceramics - 9 percent 
  -  high-performance metals and alloys - 11 percent 
  -  high-performance polymers - 9 percent 
  -  high-performance composite materials - 5 percent 
  In the final analysis, the rates of increase result from 
intensified dissemination of those materials into the specialty 
markets (e.g., aerospace) as well as into the mass markets 
(automobile manufacturing, electrical engineering, electronics, 
etc.). Essentially, however, those high-performance materials 
constitute the basis for developing or realizing new 
applications and technologies, e.g., optoelectronics, medical 
engineering. The preceding projection is unable to take into 
account the strategic importance of high-performance materials, 
i.e., their key role in the realization of new future 
technologies. For the future economic development, especially of 
industrial countries, independent access to such "key 
components" is of critical importance. 
  Remarkably, in the numerous technical discussions, 
interviews 
with experts and at seminars, no significant new R&amp;D topics 
were 
mentioned. Instead, the consistent -- occasionally incremental 
-- advanced processing of basically familiar R&amp;D topics is 
assigned major importance in materials research. 
<H5>  4.2.2.2 High-performance ceramics and glasses </H5>
<H5>  4.2.2.2.1 High-performance ceramics </H5>
  With the exception of single-atom carbon-based ceramics, 
ceramic materials are crystalline compounds of metals with 
non-metals or semi-metals. The raw materials for the production 
of ceramics are among the most common elements and compounds in 
the earth's crust, so that the supply of raw materials for the 
production of those products is guaranteed for the long term. 
Chart 4.7 provides a survey of the most important ceramic 
materials. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-87A>        Chart 4.7: Materials-oriented division of high-performance ceramic materials </FIG>

  High-performance ceramics are based essentially on oxide and 
non-oxide compounds, although in the field of silicate ceramics 
some new developments are of interest. Unlike traditional 
ceramics they are produced from high purity synthetic raw 
materials. 
  Such ceramic materials possess a number of properties that 
predestine them for high-performance applications and 
consequently, facilitate the development of new, promising areas 
of application: 


    -  high strength and resistance 
  -  high wear resistance 
  -  good resistance to corrosion 
  -  low specific weight 
  -  chemical resistance at high temperatures and 
  -  depending on the type of material, low to high electrical and 
thermal conductivity 
  In terms of applied aspects, high-performance ceramics can 
be 
divided into structural or design materials, featuring their 
mechanical, thermal and chemical materials properties in their 
applications and functional materials that find application on 
the basis of their electrical, magnetic, optical, and biological 
properties. 
<H5>  Structural ceramics </H5>


    -  Oxide ceramics 
  Oxide ceramic materials are polycrystalline materials of 
pure 
oxides or oxide compounds that display high purity and are 
normally free of glass phase. 
  Technically, the most import compound among the oxide 
ceramics is aluminum oxide (Al[.sup]2[/]O[.sup]3[/]). 
Through selection and optimization or modification of the 
respective manufacturing process, Al[.sup]2[/]O[.sup]3[/] 
powder can be produced having property profiles whereby an 
extraordinarily broad range of application can be developed. 
Thickly sintered material, exceptional for its high resistance, 
hardness, temperature and corrosion resistance, for example, can 
be used as fire-resistant material, for corrosion-resistant or 
highly critical mechanical parts in the manufacture of machinery 
or equipment. Additional possible applications range from 
insulation, cutting tools, abrasives up to structural components 
for medical implants. Other oxide compounds with a less complex 
property profile are more suited for specific functional sectors 
of application. 
%Non-oxide ceramics 
  Among non-oxide compounds, modifications of carbon -- 
graphite and diamond as well as carbides, nitrides, borides and 
silicides -- are of interest. Because of the high number of 
covalent atomic bonds such materials possess a high melting 
point, high Young's modulus index, high resistance and hardness 
and in many cases excellent electrical and heat conductivity and 
resistance to aggressive media. By far the greatest technical 
importance attaches to silicon nitride 
(Si[.sup]3[/]N[.sup]4[/]) and silicon carbide (SiC), above 
all, as components for chemical equipment, in materials 
processing, high-temperature engineering and the manufacture of 
engines. 
  A sizable problem in the use of high-performance ceramics 
components is disadvantageous properties typical of ceramics 
such as brittleness, frequently low thermal-shock resistance, 
defective reproducibility of materials' and components' 
benchmarks and expensive processing with its associated costs. 
Such disadvantageous properties still lead to low reliability 
and are an object of considerable R&amp;D efforts. 
  To increase fracture toughness and resistance major advances 
are targeted, for example, through optimizing the structure or 
through insertion of a second phase in basic ceramics materials 
that have a positive impact in the micro-sector on resistance to 
the development of fractures. In the case of 
Si[.sup]3[/]N[.sup]4[/], for example, one way is 
reinforced conversion through insertion of ZrO[.sup]2[/] 
particles. However, fracture toughness again declines as 
temperature increases. Another possibility is reinforcement 
using long fibers, even in combination with the reinforced 
conversion. In these ways it is possible to increase not only 
fracture toughness but also tensile strengths as much as 
fourfold compared with monolithic ceramics. But the production 
processes are complicated and that significantly contributes to 
the expensiveness of such materials. 
  In any event, quality assurance in the production of basic 
materials and components is of major importance for increasing 
reliability. The goal here is the reduction and avoidance of 
structural flaws. Critical in this setting, above all, is a dust 
and pollution free environment, the use of high purity and 
highly fine powder and new production technologies that 
facilitate targeted manipulation of the microstructure. 
<H5>  Functional ceramics </H5>
  Among functional ceramics, the oxide compounds are the most 
important. Because of their particular properties profiles -- a 
combination of typical ceramic structural properties with quite 
special physical properties -- they are suitable for a growing 
number of specific applications, e.g., in electronics, data 
storage and processing and in energy, measurement, and control 
engineering. 


    -  Ceramics with special electrical properties 
  The traditional electrical application of ceramics as 
insulators (e.g., Al[.sup]2[/]O[.sup]3[/]) is currently 
supplemented by a number of electrically conductive ceramics. By 
now there are available semiconductors (e.g., SnO[.sup]2[/]), 
ceramics having metal-like conductivity (SiC and 
TiO,[.sup]2[/]), ceramic ion conductors 
("_b_-Al[.sup]2[/]O[.sup]3[/]," ZrO[.sup]2[/]) and 
high-temperature superconducting materials based on Ba-Cu-O rare 
earths. 
  One of the most important developments, above all, for 
sensor 
engineering, is piezo-electric ceramics. These ferro-electrical 
ceramics alter their electrical properties based on a slight 
mechanical deformation and they deform under the application of 
an electrical field. But ion conductors like ZrO[.sup]2[/] 
are already employed in many cases as sensors, e.g., as lambda 
probes in controlled catalyst systems. In this case the change 
in the oxygen concentration in the exhaust effects a change in 
the electrical properties. 
%Ceramics having special electro-optical properties 
  Lead-lanthanum-zirconium-titanate [PLZT] ceramic at layer 
thicknesses in the cm sector is even transparent to light with 
optical properties depending on the direction of an applied 
electrical field. One use, for instance, for optical storage, is 
conceivable here. Even ceramics with non-linear optical 
properties, e.g., ZnSe and ZnS, are of interest and are being 
research in this context. 
%Ceramics with special biological properties 
  Al[.sup]2[/]O[.sup]3[/], ZrO[.sup]2[/], 
Si[.sup]3[/]N[.sup]4[/] and SiC are primarily used as 
structural components for implants. Apatite, calcium phosphate 
and apatite glass ceramics that are produced from molten glass 
through the formation of crystal grains, are used as 
biocompatible coating or non-critical mechanical implants. 
Ceramic implants are used because of their toleration by the 
body, high resistance to pressure, chemical resistance and wear 
resistance. 
  Biocompatibility is playing an increasing role in this 
connection. Inert ceramics are virtually entirely ignored by the 
immune system, bioactive ceramics chemically react and bond with 
their environment and reabsorbed ceramics are metabolically 
degradable. 
%Ceramics having high heat conductivity 
  Ceramics having high heat conductivity are used as substrate 
ceramics (platform material for chips). Aluminum nitride is a 
promising material in this context. It possesses as much as ten 
times more heat conductivity than aluminum oxide, which is being 
used now. 
<H5>  High-performance ceramics production processes </H5>
  Chart 4.8 summarizes the most important processing 
principles 
in the individual net product stages of high-performance 
ceramics: 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-89A>        Chart 4.8: Important net product stages and processing principles in the production of ceramic </FIG>

  As a rule, most high-performance ceramic source materials in 
the form of powder are synthesized. Since the properties of the 
final product are already decisively influenced by the basic 
materials, it is necessary reproducibly to produce powder 
according to specification. This linkage in many cases also 
determines the optimum powder process. 
  There is a generally increasing tendency to establish 
chemical production processes for ceramic powder and sometimes 
even ceramic components, for example: 


    -  the sol-gel process (production of powder from 
solution) whereby high-purity fine-grained powder can be 
produced via the processing steps (production of alcoholate, 
drying and milling, as required) 
  -  reaction spray process (production of powder from solution) 
whereby multi-component powders for oxide ceramics are 
generated, or 
  -  reaction sintering (solid-state gas-phase reaction) whereby, 
for instance, in the course of the sinter process chemical 
conversions can be induced, for example, reaction bound 
Si[.sup]3[/]N[.sup]4[/] [RBSN] or also 
  -  gas phase synthesis. 
  After the powder is processed by the appropriate 
pulverizing, 
washing or granulating steps and also the addition of sinter 
materials, the powder undergoes shaping, with traditional 
methods being used for modern materials. The selection of the 
shaping process is determined by the shape, size and ultimately 
the unit number of the component or semi-finished product to be 
produced. Dry pressing in steel matrices is best suited for 
geometrically simple parts with limited dimensions, while 
isostatic pressing in flexible forms yields sophisticated 
geometries. Hollow solids of any dimension are shaped by slip 
casting. Lastly, injection-molding technology makes it possible 
to produce components having sophisticated geometry in large 
numbers of units. 
  The compaction or sinter process associated with the shaping 
has to be adapted individually to each component. Stay-down 
time, temperature, and the ambient atmosphere are of utmost 
importance here. Simultaneous shaping and sintering are done 
using axial hot processing in graphite matrices or hot isostatic 
pressing [HIP] via all-round pressure using an inert gas. A 
special process is the above-mentioned reaction sintering in 
which the shaped solid only comes into contact with the reactive 
partner during the sinter process. 
  In many instances the extremely high requirements for 
ceramic 
materials in the various fields of application frequently 
require follow-on processing of the sintered work piece. Because 
of the high toughness and brittleness of the material this can 
be done only with diamond tools and it is extremely 
time-consuming and, as a result, cost intensive. 
<H5>  Fields of application for high-performance ceramics </H5>
  The applied alternatives for high-performance ceramics are 
primarily determined by their properties (see chart 4.9). On the 
basis of those, a distinction can be drawn between function 
ceramics on one side and structural ceramics on the other side. 
  In functional ceramics, functional material properties like 
electrical, optical, magnetic, and biological properties are 
uppermost. Functional properties are particularly pronounced in 
the case of oxide ceramics, but specialty non-oxide ceramics 
like ZnS, ZnSe and CuGaSe[.sup]2[/] are important here too. 
On the basis of those properties such materials are intensively 
used in all sectors of electronics, electrical engineering, 
communications and computer technology and medical engineering. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-91A>        Chart 4.9: Selective fields of application for high-performance ceramics </FIG>

  In the case of structural ceramics, on the other hand, 
structural properties are uppermost, for instance, 
mechanical-thermal properties, chemical-thermal properties and 
nuclear properties. Such properties are especially pronounced in 
the non-oxide ceramics SI[.sup]3[/]N[.sup]4[/] and SiC and 
in some oxide ceramics like Al[.sup]2[/]O[.sup]3[/], 
ZrO[.sup]2[/], UO[.sup]2[/] and ThO[.sup]2[/]. Based on 
the required property expression, structural ceramics can be 
used, for example, heavily in machine building, in the chemical 
industry, energy engineering and in automobile manufacturing. 
<H5>  Market growth </H5>
  In 1990 the international market for high-performance 
ceramic 
materials as basic materials is estimated at nearly DM2.0 
billion. By 1995, an increase in demand up to nearly DM3.1 
billion is forecast and by the year 2,000 that is likely to more 
than double to more than DM4.8 billion. If the next net product 
stages in the high-performance ceramics sector are taken into 
account, that is, ceramic semi-finished products/components, 
then international market volume is projected to be nearly DM23 
billion (1990). By the year 1995 that market volume is likely to 
rise to DM35 billion and by the year 2,000 to nearly DM55 
billion. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-92A>        Chart 4.10: Projected international market volumes for high-performance ceramics as </FIG>

  In 1990, Japan had the lion's share of the market at nearly 
58 percent of the international market volume totaling DM23 
billion for high-performance ceramics. Next came the U.S. at 30 
percent and Europe at 12 percent. The FRG has an approximately 
five percent share of the international market for 
high-performance ceramics. 
  Functional ceramics are the most important with nearly 80 
percent market share of total market volume. The remaining 
market shares are divided among structural ceramics (13 percent) 
and ceramic coatings (8 percent). By the year 2,000 there will 
be no basic change in the leading position of functional 
ceramics among high-performance ceramics, since especially 
dynamic branches of industry like the electrical and electronics 
industry will ensure the sales of functional ceramics. 
  The growth in demand for structural ceramics, in contrast, 
is 
projected to be smaller since dissemination in mass applications 
in the automobile industry is still not occurring without delays. 
  In this connection the conspicuously significant things are 
primarily the disadvantageous properties inherent in ceramics, 
e.g., brittleness as well as deficient quality and consistency 
of the components, excessive costs and lack of experience with 
reliability. In most instances of application, therefore, 
recourse is had to further developed metallic materials instead 
of high-performance ceramics. 
  Significant growth from DM1.8 billion (1990) to DM6.7 
billion 
in the year 2,000 is project for ceramic coatings. Ceramic 
coatings are expected to overtake structural ceramics in market 
volume in the year 2,000. A basic reason for this is likely to 
be the fact that, in the case of ceramic coatings, the 
advantages of high-performance ceramics can be exploited without 
the material drawbacks inherent in ceramics actually surfacing. 
<H5>  Development trends </H5>
  The following development tendencies appear to be 
particularly meaningful in the case of high-performance ceramics 
for the ability to target and further develop existing 
properties: 
  - materials-related 


    -  increasing fracture toughness 
  -  increasing tolerance for flaws 
  -  improving high-temperature resistance 
  -  piezo-electric ceramics 
  -  electro-optical ceramics 
  -  high-temperature superconductors 
  -  ion conducting ceramics 
  - processing-related 


    -  production and clean room conditions 
  -  chemical production processes (e.g., sol-gel process, 
gas-phase 
synthesis) 
  -  near-net-shape production process 
  -  optimizing existing production and processing processes to 
enhance quality, increase reliability and reduce costs 
  -  coating technologies. 
  Functional ceramics in particular offer very great 
development potential for future advanced development. This is 
based on the combination of typical ceramic properties with 
special electrical, optical, and biological properties. Should 
this development potential be realized, diverse applications and 
fields of application will open up. 
  Even structural ceramics offer major development potential. 
Advanced development in this connection will primarily have to 
concentrate on increased fracture toughness, reliability and 
cost reduction, whereby not only will it be possible to further 
develop niche sectors but a penetration into mass applications 
is also likely to be successful. 
  Even the advanced development of ceramic coatings affords 
opportunities which, if realized, could open up mass markets, 
e.g., automobile manufacturing, machine building, energy 
engineering. 
<H5>  4.2.2.2.2 High-performance glassware </H5>
<H5>  Survey </H5>
  In contrast to ceramic materials, glasses are materials that 
are in a state of frozen-in, undercooled melting, that is, a 
meta-stable state. Further discussion will focus on inorganic 
specialty glassware, essentially silicate glassware. 
  Because of their even more pronounced brittleness, compared 
with ceramics, glasses have no importance as structural 
materials except in the form of fiber reinforcement. 
  In compensation, high-performance glassware does display a 
broad spectrum of functional properties that make them 
interesting for numerous new, promising applications. 


    -  Glassware having special optical properties is used for 
communications fibers, for photo-masks in semi-conductor 
production as well as laser medium and laser lens. There could 
be interesting future applications for glassware having 
non-linear optical properties, e.g., in optical computers. 
  -  Glassware having special electrical properties is used, for 
example, for the encapsulation of semi-conductor components. Ion 
conducting glassware for pH-sensor or thin-film battery 
applications are in the research stage. 
  -  Glassware having special thermal properties has extremely low 
heat expansion and are therefore finding application in 
telescope mirrors and precision optics. Included among these too 
are glass ceramics and partially crystallized glassware. 
  -  Glassware having special biological properties is not only 
glass ceramics but also porous glassware, above all, as bone 
implants and replacement teeth. They are of particular interest 
as appropriate substrate material for biotechnology. 
<H5>  High-performance glass production process </H5>
  High-performance glassware is produced by melting 
high-purity 
natural or synthetic raw materials. The sol-gel process is 
important primarily for coating technology. Simple shaping in a 
state of low viscosity facilitates economical production. 
Follow-on processing is simpler for glass because of it basic 
reduced toughness compared to ceramics. 
<H5>  Market growth </H5>
  In 1990, the international market for specialty glass 
totaled 
nearly DM12 billion, distributed among the following product 
groups: 


    -  TV glass (CRT glass) - 43 percent 
  -  opticalglass - 7 percent 
  -  chemical/pharmaceutical industry glass - 21 percent 
  -  other fields of application (e.g., light-conducting fibers) - 
29 percent 
  In a narrower sense, however, only about 30 percent of 
specialty glass can be included among actual high-performance 
glassware. That is equivalent to a market volume of nearly DM4 
billion. Current market volume for such high-performance glass, 
totaling approximately DM4 billion, will increase to nearly 
DM7.5 billion by the year 2,000. This market growth, totaling 
nearly 6.5 percent per year, is assessed quite differently, 
however, depending on market segment. An annual average growth 
rate of 7-15 percent is projected for the product groups of 
optics/opto-electronics. For other applied sectors for 
high-performance glassware, annual rates of increase of 3-5 
percent are projected. 
  It is noteworthy that future development in the troika is 
very highly polarized. Whereas optical and optoelectrical 
applications are uppermost in Japan, in western Europe the 
focuses for high-performance glassware are on the chemical and 
pharmaceuticals as well as home appliances sectors. In this 
context, the U.S. occupies a middle position. 
  In the high-performance glass sector Japan has concentrated 
on servicing new future-oriented growth markets. Western Europe, 
in turn, is concentrating on supplying traditional industrial 
sectors. 
<H5>  Development trends </H5>
  The following development trends appear to be particularly 
promising in the future for high-performance glass: 


    -  glass with non-linear optical properties 
  -  ion conducting glass 
  -  light conducting glass 
  -  glass with extremely low heat expansion (precision optics) 
  -  porous glass (biotechnological substrate material) 
  The above indicated development trends could be the basis 
for 
an ability to participate more actively in new future-oriented 
growth fields like optoelectronics, for example. 
<H5>  4.2.2.3 High-performance polymers </H5>
<H5>  Survey </H5>
  On the basis of their physical properties polymers can be 
divided into duroplasts, thermoplasts and elastomers. Duroplasts 
harden as the result of an irreversible chemical interlinking 
reaction and are noted for their high strength and heat 
resistance, although they are hard to process. Thermoplasts 
liquefy when heated and harden when cooled. Since this reaction 
is reversible, thermoplastic polymers can be processed 
relatively well. Thermoplasts represent nearly 65 percent of 
total synthetics production. In elastomers the polymer chains 
are weakly interlinked using the "vulcanization" process. Those 
materials are noted for quite elastic ductility and simultaneous 
stability of shape. 
  Chart 4.11 provides a survey of the most important polymers 
in engineering. 
  While standard polymers are definitely mass products, 
technical polymers are primarily used as design and functional 
materials. High-performance polymers, in turn, display 
properties profiles that range far beyond standard polymers and 
technical polymers and open up new, promising structural and 
functional possibilities for application. 
  Depending on their type, they are noteworthy above all for 
their: 


    -  high thermal stability 
  -  stability of shape 
  -  low specific weight 
  -  chemical resistance 
  -  mechanical strength 
  -  specific electrical and optical properties. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-95A>        Chart 4.11: Materials-oriented division of high-performance polymer materials </FIG>

  In terms of applied aspects, high-performance polymers can 
be 
divided into: 


    -  structural polymers - wherein mechanical, thermal, 
chemical, and nuclear properties are foremost and 
  -  functional polymers - that find application, above all, 
because 
of their electrical, optical, magnetic and biological properties. 

<H5>    Structural polymers </H5>
  Steadily increasing in importance among structural polymers, 
above all, are the high-temperature resistant polymers that can 
be used in a temperature range in excess of 150 degrees C. 
Corresponding requirements result, among other things, from the 
miniaturization of components in the electronics industry where 
higher power density and the associated temperature level of 
technical parts are becoming a growing problem. Even in 
automobile and aircraft manufacturing there are increasing 
requirements for materials that blend low weight, exceptional 
mechanical properties and high, long-term useful temperatures. 
  - Polymer SPs (PEI, PAI, PI, Bismaleinimide) 
  Because of the imide group's and the aromatic molecule 
groups' stability, the polymer SPs have a characteristic 
properties profile: 


    -  high strength at a temperature range from -270 degrees 
to +300 degrees C 
  -  very good long-lasting temperature resistance 
  -  very good wear resistance 
  -  good dielectric properties 
  -  high radiation resistance 
  -  low gas evolution losses in high vacuum 
  -  good chemical resistance 
  -  high flame resistance 
  A wide range of polymer SP materials is currently 
commercially available. Besides pure polymer SPs, there are 
modifications with amide, ether or ester groups. The temperature 
resistance of imide materials that essential depends on the 
glass transition temperature, degree of interlinking and 
thermo-oxidative resistance, increases in the series PEI PAI PI. 
  Polyetherimide [PEI] is a thermoplast and the simplest to 
process of the imide materials. The ether groups among the imide 
groups provide this material with exceptional fluidity and 
correspondingly problem-free processability. 
  Polyamideimide [PAI] is included among the duroplasts. The 
amide groups produce a certain flexibility and ductility. The 
material is at the top of temperature-resistant 
injection-molding synthetics. Processing is correspondingly 
sensitive. 
  Duroplastic polymer SPs [PI] can only be processed with 
difficulty because of their physical properties. Advanced 
processing is also hard as a result of the insolubility and the 
duroplastic behavior of the chemically "ready" polymer SPs. For 
this reason, among others, soluble polymer SPs are produced 
through polycondensation and -addition and the resulting 
products, e.g., fibers, sheets and powder, are produced from the 
polymer solution. 
  Bismaleinimide [BMI], a duroplast, affords another approach 
to solving the processing problems. In its case, the functional 
monomers or low molecular prepolymers, whose basic building 
blocks are interlinked via imide functions, are polymerized and 
networked during the processing. Various modifications of the 
bismaleinimides through variations of comonomers lead to 
materials that are, for example, less brittle and tolerant of 
high temperatures. 
  - Polyetherketones (PEK, PEEK, PAEK) 
  The tight linear linkage of aromatic ring structures via 
oxygen bridges through oxidative coupling leads to highly 
liquescent, partially crystalline thermoplasts like 
polyetherketone[PEK], polyetheretherketone [PEEK] and 
polyaryletherketone [PAEK] having an exception properties 
profile: 


    -  high rigidity and strength across a very wide range of 
temperatures 
  -  permanent temperature resistance up to 260 degrees C 
  -  good electrical insulation capacity 
  -  exceptional resistance to hydrolysis 
  -  low flammability 
  -  very good resistance to high-energy radiation. 
  - Polysulphones (PSU, PES) 
  In the case of polysulphones the interlinking of aromatic 
ring structures via SO[.sup]2[/] bridges is realized through 
polycondensation. The result of this is hard, amorphous 
thermoplasts whose mechanical and thermal properties are 
comparable with those of polyetherketones and that also possess 
an entire line of special properties: 


    -  good electrical and dielectric properties (PES, above 
all) 
  -  high resistance to chemicals, IR, _b_, _g_ radiation 
  -  high permeability for microwaves 
  -  high flame resistance with low smoke development 
  -  clear, slightly yellowish transparency 
  This group of products is of interest, above all, for the 
kind of applications where transparency is also required from 
highly critical mechanical, electrical and thermal parts. 
  - Polyphenylenesulphide (PPS) 
  Polyphenylenesulphide is a partially crystalline, covalent 
thermoplast whose degree of crystallinity and hence the 
properties of the preform depend very much on the processing 
temperatures. 
  In this material the properties are characterized by the 
linking of aromatic ring structures via S bridges through 
polycondensation: 


    -  high strength, rigidity and hardness 
  -  permanently useful temperatures up to 240 degrees C 
  -  good scuff resistance 
  -  chemical resistance 
  -  high flame resistance 
  -  good insulating properties 
  This material finds application anywhere that very highly 
critical mechanical, electrical, thermal, and chemical preforms 
are required. 
  - Fluoropolymers 
  Fluoropolymers are noted for the following properties: 


    -  exceptionally high chemical resistance 
  -  very good electrical insulating and dielectric properties 
  -  non-combustibility 
  -  special resistance to atmospheric corrosion 
  -  very low coefficients of friction 
  -  anti-adhesive 
  -  usable over a wide temperature range (-200 to +300 degrees C) 
  Their applied possibilities, however, are limited because of 
their difficult processing and high production costs. 
  - Liquid crystal polymers [LCP] 
  These self-reinforcing polymers constitute a new category of 
material. They are characterized by a state of high molecular 
orderliness. In the solid state they are regular and highly 
ordered fibers of the same polymers interleaved in the LCP 
matrix. Their exceptional mechanical properties are comparable 
to those of composite materials, e.g., in the case of liquid 
crystal polyesters [LC-PET], strength, rigidity and resistance 
could be increased nearly 300-1000 percent compared with PET, 
albeit anisotropically. Moreover, they can be processed on 
traditional thermoplast processing machinery and no bonding 
problems between fiber and matrix surface. 
  However, LCP can only be synthesized with difficulty for 
higher yield and are correspondingly expensive. They are 
projected for promising applications in the electrical industry, 
optoelectronics and in the manufacture of vehicles and aircraft. 
  Another approach to the development of new polymer materials 
with new possibilities for application is the advanced 
development of appropriate polymers from the category of 
technical synthetics as well as the polymer blends where 
synergistic improvements in properties are attempted through the 
blending of appropriate polymers. In this case the boundaries 
between technical polymers and high-performance polymers 
inevitably become fluid. 
  - Polycarbonates with high heat resistance [Co-PC] 
  These new copolymers are amorphous thermoplastic synthetics 
that display similar properties as polycarbonate although they 
possess a thermoform resistance up to 239 degrees C. By 
appropriate blending of polycarbonates with traditional 
bisphenol A-Polycarbonate the entire application range of 
thermoform resistance between 150 degrees C and 239 degrees C 
can be covered. 
  - Blends 
  Blending technology enables combinations of properties 
wherein the advantages of the individual components are combined 
into new properties profiles that the respective basic 
components do not realize. For example, there are blends from 
Polycarbonate, polyester and elastomers for the manufacture of 
aircraft, blends from glass fiber reinforced polymer SP and 
specific elastomers, in which high rigidity is combined with 
impact resistance. 
  Polymer blends may be single phase (components able to blend 
with one another), multi-phase (components partially blendable) 
and "forcibly coupled" (components completely incapable of 
blending). In the latter instance, inter-penetrating networks 
are involved wherein two polymer networks fully independent one 
of the other are produced in such a way that they mutually 
inter-penetrate. 
<H5>  Functional polymers </H5>
  Increasingly gaining in importance are polymers with quite 
specific functional properties that up until the present were 
either uncommon or even unknown. For example, electrical 
conductivity instead of insulation, or even rapid chemical and 
physical change under the influence of light instead of 
inertness to radiation. 
  Such polymers include: 


    -  polymers with special electrical properties 
  -  Electrically conductive polymers, e.g., polypyrrol, 
polyaniline or polyacetylene, that acquire their conductivity 
only after doping (i.e., conversion with powerful oxidation or 
reduction agents), are already used in the form of flexible 
sheets for the production of new, rechargeable batteries. The 
most recent conductive polymers can also be heated occasionally 
to 300 degrees C without decomposing. 
  -  Piezo-electric polymers are based on fluoropolymers (PVF, 
PVDF) and because of their elasticity they have distinct 
advantages compared with conventional crystals and ceramics and 
are of interest for the communications mass market (e.g., 
microphones, telephone earpieces). 
  -  Polymers with special optical properties 
  -  polymer beam waveguides based on polymethylmethacrylate 
[PMMA], polystyrol [PS] or polycarbonate [PC] already constitute 
a cost-effective alternative to glass fibers for close range 
optoelectronic data processing. 
  -  Polymers for optical data storage for some time now have 
been used as photopolymers in the form of light or electron beam 
sensitive masking material in microchip production. The 
development, above all, of special liquid crystal polymers (side 
chain LCP) is very promising here. 
  -  Polymers as optical sensors change their optical 
properties under the influence of gases and vapors and are used 
in sensor systems for solvents. 
  -  Polymers having special biological properties 

    Besides platform materials for fixing of enzymes 
(biocatalysts) and biosensor system components, 
non-thrombogenous polymers, above all, for direct contact with 
the blood and polymers based on fluoropolymers as substitute 
blood are also of interest. 
  In concluding, ultra-thin polymer films also deserve mention 
at this point. They are still in the basic research stage, but 
their applications, e.g., as high resolution photoresists in the 
production of micro-electronics or in optical computers already 
appear feasible and highly promising. Because of their diverse 
physical properties they also hold promise for biosensors and 
medical engineering. 
<H5>  High-performance polymers production process </H5>
  The properties of high-performance polymer components stem 
from the optimized combination of a process of synthesis and 
advanced processing. Chart 4.12 illustrates the most important 
processing principles in the individual net product stages of 
high-performance polymers. 
  High-temperature resistant thermoplasts, above all, raise 
the 
issue of economical processability. These materials are highly 
viscous in the processing sector and as a result are free 
flowing to only a limited extent. Interdisciplinary cooperation 
between materials development and production engineering is 
gaining more and more importance here to solve this key problem 
in the processing of high-performance polymers. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-98A>        Chart 4.12: Important net product stages and processing principles in the production of </FIG>

  The fundamental challenges in the processing of synthetics 
are primarily the reduction of production costs for the products 
that are produced and improved product quality. In this context, 
the boundaries between the discrete net product stages become 
increasingly blurred. So-called direct processing integrates 
several processing steps. The reaction extruder can be mentioned 
here, whereby polymer reaction, synthetics processing (e.g., 
inclusion of flame retardant additives) and shaping (extrusion) 
are combined into a single processing step. 
  In the case of the optical beam waveguide, the optical 
properties could be improved through integrated process 
management. Direct processing is closely linked to automation 
designs, on-line quality controls and systems of quality 
assurance. 
  In the shaping process, innovative processing variations in 
injection molding, above all, deserve notice: core melting 
engineering, dual-component injection molding, internal gas 
pressure process and inter-spray engineering. 
<H5>  Fields of application for high-performance polymers </H5>
  The possible applications of high-performance polymers are 
as 
diverse as the combinations of properties that are often already 
united in a single one of those materials. Hence, only a survey 
of applications and useful fields for the most important 
materials will be given here. A systematic approach can be based 
on a division of applied aspects, depending on whether a 
mechanical, thermal, chemical or nuclear properties profile is 
foremost or whether the application is determined by electrical, 
optical or biological properties. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-010L-99A>        Chart 4.13: Selective fields of application for high-performance polymersarket growth </FIG>

<H5>   Market growth </H5>
  For 1990, the international market for high-performance 
polymer materials as basic materials is projected to be nearly 
DM3.0 billion. By the year 1995, that market volume is likely to 
increase to nearly DM4.5 billion and by the year 2,000 another 
increase is forecast, up to nearly DM7.0 billion. 
  If the next net product stages of high-performance polymers 
are analyzed, that is, semi-finished products/components, then 
international market volume for 1990 is projected to be nearly 
DM24.0 billion. Internationally, that market volume is likely to 
rise by the year 1995 to DM37.0 billion and by the year 2,000 to 
nearly DM56.0 billion (see chart 4.14). 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-100A>        Chart 4.14: Projected international market volume for high-performance polymers as </FIG>

  The DM24.0 billion market volume for high-performance 
polymers is distributed among the leading industrial nations as 
follows: the U.S., at 37 percent, holds the lion's share of the 
market, followed by Europe with 34 percent and Japan with 22 
percent of international market share. On the international 
market for high-performance polymers, the FRG holds an 
approximately 15 percent share. 
  A listing of high-performance polymer consumption by 
branches 
demonstrates, on a first estimate, a clear focus in two 
branches. Nearly 70 percent of high-performance polymers are 
used in Europe in electrical engineering/electronics and in 
vehicle manufacturing. Other branches, e.g., machine building, 
telecommunications, medicine and aerospace are of significantly 
less significance. 
<H5>  Development trends </H5>
  Acquiring increasing importance are polymers having quite 
specific functional properties. Foremost here are polymers 
having special electrical and optical properties. In this 
context, liquid crystal polymers (side chain-LCP) are of 
particular interest as well as ultra-thin polymer films and 
non-C based polymers. 
  An additional line of development is polymers having 
customized combinations of properties. They are realized by the 
production of blends, the synthesis of ordered copolymers or 
block copolymers or a combination of such lines. A particularly 
interesting development in the field of blends is 
interpenetrating networks [IPN]. 
  Rather considerable significance attaches to the reduction 
of 
production costs and improved product quality. The development 
trend here is the integration of several processing steps that 
is closely linked to automation designs, on-line quality 
controls and systems of quality assurance. 
  In the realization of such development potential, diverse 
new 
applications open up, above all, on the mass market for 
electrical engineering/electronics. Even polymers having 
customized combinations of properties afford a sizable potential 
for development targeted, above all, on mass applications in 
vehicle construction as well as on new possible applications in 
electrical engineering/electronics. 
<H5>  4.2.2.4 High-performance metallic materials and </H5>
semi-conductors 
<H5>  4.2.2.4.1 High-performance metals and alloys </H5>
<H5>  Survey </H5>
  Metals are characterized by a large number of electrons in 
motion. This results in many of the properties specific to 
metals, e.g., high electrical conductivity, good reflectivity 
and high heat conductivity. Metals crystallize in highly 
symmetrical grids of high density. The manner and fashion in 
which the grids are joined one to the other (mostly 
three-dimensionally body centered or three-dimensionally plane 
centered) influence many of the mechanical properties. In this 
connection, it is precisely the flaws in the regular arrangement 
of the grid levels that decisively determine such properties as 
ductility and brittleness or even high-temperature behaviors. 
Currently, the targeted influencing, above all, of this 
microstructure through new alloys and new production and 
processing methods is leading to the development of new, 
high-grade metallic materials. 
  Chart 4.15 provides a survey of the most import metallic 
materials in engineering 
  Depending on production quantities and turnover, steel tops 
all structural and functional materials around the world. The 
useful temperature range for modern steels ranges from -270 
degrees C in freezing techniques (austenitic steels) up to a 
maximum of +1,200 degrees C (ferritic superalloys) in the 
combustion chambers of jet engines. Steel technology has 
advanced so far by now that further development predominantly 
concentrates on improving properties that play a crucial role in 
component behaviors in the respective applied sectors. Such 
further developments are occurring primarily in the fields of 
weldable steels, superplastic moldable steels and dual-phase 
steels, whereby the latter possess high strength and 
simultaneously good moldability. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-101A>        Chart 4.15: Materials-oriented division of high-performance metallic materials </FIG>

  On the other hand, fresh developments, above all, among 
non-ferrous metals, fit in with high-performance metals and 
alloys that open up new, promising applied alternatives on the 
basis of their properties profiles. 
<H5>  Metallic structural materials </H5>
  Development goals for structural materials among 
high-performance metals and alloys, among whose application 
mechanical, thermal and chemical properties are foremost, are, 
above all, weight reduction, definite increase in strength and 
rigidity and even higher useful temperatures with improved 
resistance to oxidation and corrosion. 
  Equivalent requirements are engendered, for instance, by the 
development of increasingly more effective and fuel-efficient 
engines and gas turbines in the automobile industry and 
aerospace and even energy output. 
  - Aluminum alloys 
  The light metal, aluminum [Al], possesses a number of 
properties that justify its special significance in many fields 
of engineering: 


    -  high availability 
  -  low density 
  -  high specific-weight strength 
  -  good chemical resistance 
  -  good ability to be reshaped 
  -  castability 
  Its lack of heat resistance and surface qualities (when used 
up to 300 degrees C) is a drawback and for this reason it can be 
used practically only when alloyed. 
  The combination of the lightest of all metals, lithium [Li], 
with aluminum leads to a group of materials that is of major 
interest, above all, for weight reduction considerations. 
Aluminum-lithium alloys having 2.5 percent lithium have a weight 
savings of nine percent and only a 20 percent higher specific 
rigidity compared with conventional Al alloys. The maximum 
percentage of Li currently totals eight percent in the 
laboratory. Using modern production technologies, for example, 
rapid congealing or mechanical alloying, it is possible to 
increase the percentage of lithium perhaps even higher. 
  Li's high reactivity is a problem for the production of 
Al-Li 
alloys. Working with them calls for an inert atmosphere (helium) 
and heedfulness of safety considerations (danger of explosion, 
toxic vapors). 
  - Magnesium alloys 
  Because of magnesium's low density compared with aluminum, 
magnesium alloys too are interesting as lightweight design 
materials. Traditional magnesium alloys, however, are 
characterized by low strength, low ductility and high 
susceptibility to corrosion. But as of now, using powder 
metallurgical processing and the addition of yttrium and 
neodymium enhance magnesium alloys to the point where they 
approximate the strength and ductility grades of high-strength 
aluminum alloys. 
  Magnesium-lithium alloys are undergoing research, above all, 
in the field of combinations of light-metal alloys with 
compound-forming gases like oxygen, nitrogen and hydrogen. 
Three-dimensional body centered magnesium-lithium basic alloys 
with an Li content of 31-50 percent display very low density. 
But their use in light construction is extremely limited because 
of high susceptibility to corrosion and rapid loss of matrix 
strength above room temperature. 
  - Titanium alloys 
  In the series of light metals, Mg-Al-Ti, Titanium [Ti] 
displays the greatest density and the highest strength. Titanium 
alloys are characterized by 


    -  high specific-weight strength 
  -  high oscillatory resistance 
  -  high fracture toughness 
  -  high creep resistance 
  -  good corrosion resistance 
  Development goals here are high-temperature resistant, creep 
resistant titanium alloys that can replace the very difficult 
superalloys in many applications. Maximum useful temperatures 
are situated at approximately 70 percent of its allotropic 
conversion temperature (nearly 650 degrees C). 
  - Superalloys 
  Superalloys (mostly Ni- or Co-based) are based on two phases 
whose grid parameters diverge only slightly from one another and 
this leads to consistent, elastic grid tension. There is only a 
slight interface tension between the phases. Displacement 
motions in the material are rendered difficult. The result is 
such exceptional properties as: 


    -  good thermal resistance 
  -  useful temperatures up to 1,200 degrees C 
  -  high strength 
  -  very good corrosion resistance 
  Through the production of single-crystal 
(non-intercrystalline) structures, the creep resistance of a 
component can be increased even further and intercrystalline 
stabilizing elements like Hf, Zr and B can be dispensed with. A 
possibly drastic reduction of carbon also causes an increase in 
melting temperature and as a result, higher useful temperatures. 
The single crystal structural development of Ni-based alloys has 
already been introduced into the production of turbine buckets 
in aircraft. 
  Superalloys based on wolfram, molybdenum and tantalum, whose 
melting points are more then 2,500 degrees C, are still in the 
development stage. Problems here arise, above all, from the 
inadequate corrosion resistance of such metals. 
  - Intermetallic compounds 
  Intermetallic compounds are virtually stochiometrically 
combined alloys that, on the basis of the nature of their 
bonding, fall between metals and ceramics. In recent years, they 
have attracted growing interest in the quest for new 
high-temperature materials with better high-temperature 
resistance than the most advanced Ni-based superalloys. Foremost 
among them are primarily nickel aluminide Ni[.sup]3[/]Al and 
titanium aluminide Ti[.sup]3[/]Al. Using appropriate 
additions of alloys and thermomechanical processing, the 
inherent brittleness of most intermetallic compounds could be 
definitely reduced at low temperatures (below about 680 degrees 
C). The specific strengths of both aluminides at all 
temperatures remain higher than those of Ni-based superalloys. A 
remaining problem is their unsatisfactory resistance to 
oxidation and corrosion above 800 degrees C. 
  Other prominent intermetallic compounds that display not 
only 
good high-temperature resistance but also good resistance to 
oxidation at a planned useful temperature range are: _b_-TiAl 
and NiAl, intermetallic compounds of the Ti-Al-Si and Ni-Cr-Al 
systems with surprisingly high melting points, NbAl[.sup]3[/] 
and TiAl[.sup]3[/], whose brittleness at low temperatures, 
however, is still pronounced. 
  - Oxide-dispersion solidified alloys [ODS alloys] 
  Dispersion solidification is an additional approach to 
increasing the useful temperatures of metallic materials besides 
the avoidance of granular interfaces or optimizing of the 
intercrystalline cycle (e.g., single-crystal alloys and 
appropriately congealed alloys). In dispersion-solidified alloys 
the displacement motion is also interfered with by thermally 
stable, finely distributed ceramic particles. 
  ODS-Ni-based alloys have now realized absolute useful 
temperatures of up to 90 percent of the melting point. For 
aluminum alloys they are now at approximately 50 percent of the 
melting point and therefore still afford considerable 
development potential. Even the dispersion solidification of 
intermetallic phases is the subject of intensive development 
activity since new properties profiles and, consequently, new 
fields of application for those materials are now emerging. 
  In conclusion, two other special materials deserve mention. 
Because of their rather special structural properties they have 
drawn increasing interest. 
  - Memory metals 
  Memory metals are memory-shaped alloys based on Cu-Zn or 
Ni-Ti and most recently even on Fe-Ni. They possess two stable 
states that, depending on the temperature, adapt themselves 
through a reversible martensite-austenite structural 
transformation. This effect is exploited, for example, in 
release elements in space, for pipe connections or highly 
reliable plug-and-socket connections in electronics. 
  - Foam metals 
  In the quest for especially light metallic materials in 
recent years foam metals were developed on the model of foamed 
plastics. In this process, for example, pores are introduced 
through the admixture of a gas separation propellant into a 
rapidly cooling molten aluminum. Closed-pore structures can be 
used for their mechanical properties. Open-pore foam metals are 
available for applications where highly specific surfaces are 
required (filters, catalysts). 
<H5>  Functional metallic materials </H5>
  Among high-performance metals and alloys, it is above all 
the 
exceptional electrical and magnetic properties of the functional 
materials that are foremost among the applied aspects. 
  - Superconducting metallic materials 
  At very low temperatures below 20 K, various metal alloys 
are 
superconductive, that is, their electrical resistance drops to 
zero. The very high current densities of superconducting metal 
alloys facilitate the manufacture of extremely powerful 
electromagnets. Superconducting materials are also used for 
rectifiers and transformers. Meanwhile, a large number of 
different materials are available, including NbTi with very high 
ductility or Nb[.sup]3[/]Sn. Besides new alloys, development 
goals are also, above all, new production techniques. For 
example, production is done in the case of Nb[.sup]3[/]Ge by 
means of chemical vapour deposition [CVD] from a metal chloride 
blend onto a band. Nb[.sup]3[/]Ga and Nb[.sup]3[/]Al are 
melted from the metals by means of a laser beam on a band 
surface. 
  New superconducting materials are metal oxides and ceramics, 
for instance, based on Ba-Cu-O rare earths whose superconducting 
properties are already being used under 100 K and that therefore 
have to be cooled only with liquid nitrogen (instead of with 
liquid helium). Besides the high cost of production, it is, 
above all, the brittleness of such materials, for example, in 
terms of producing wire for magnetic coils, that is a problem 
for application. 
  - Permanent-magnet materials 
  The development of permanent magnets is characterized by 
endeavors to augment maximum energy density by increasing 
residual magnetism or the coercive field strength. Rare earth 
permanent-magnet materials are of primary significance here. 
Co-Sm-based permanent materials having a nearly sevenfold higher 
energy density compared to traditional hard ferrite materials 
are already in commercial use. 
  New Fe-Nd-B-based developments are even manifesting a 
ninefold higher energy density and are superior to all other 
permanent-magnet materials in the magnetic level. 
  - Low-retentivity materials: amorphous and nano-crystalline 
metals 
  Low-retentivity materials are characterized by reduced 
coercive field strengths. Not only are traditional Ni-Co-Fe 
alloys, but, above all, amorphous metals interesting for use, 
e.g., in transformers, magnetic heads and flexible magnetic 
shieldings. They are produced by extremely rapid cooling of the 
molten material (up to nearly one million degrees per second) 
with the amorphous liquid structure "frozen in" as it were and 
the result being metallic glass. Their properties depend, above 
all, on the composition of the alloy and can be influenced by 
targeted heat processing. They possess considerable hardness and 
wear resistance, high tensile strength and great elasticity. 
Whereas, in the case of conventional amorphous alloys (e.g., Fe, 
Co or Ni and Si or B) the amorphous state is stable up to 
approximately 400 degrees C, the latest AL-based metallic 
glasses are indicating stability up to 520 degrees C. 
  - Nano-crystalline metals 
  Nano-crustalline metals are polycrystalline materials that 
are created from crystallites having a diameter of less than 10 
nm. They result from the appropriate selection of alloy 
composition and heat processing through crystallization of 
originally amorphous metals or through powder metallurgy with 
very fine-grained powders. A sizable percentage of the volume of 
the material in this inter-amorphous and crystalline state 
consists of granular boundaries. Initial research results 
indicate very interesting physical properties, particularly in 
low-retentivity behavior. 
<H5>  Production process for high-performance metallic materials </H5>
  The modern production and processing method has crucial 
significance for the targeted influencing of the microstructure 
and micro-configuration. Conventional alloys are able to be 
produced in this way that previously were impossible and that 
distinctly improve the properties of such alloys. For the first 
time ever, many new alloys could be realized by means of the new 
production processes. The most important of these are described 
below. 
  - Powder metallurgy 
  Powder metallurgy, as a modern production process, has 
acquired considerable significance in recent years. It is 
characterized by the production of powdered alloys and 
subsequent compaction of the powder into semi-finished products 
and components. 
  Chart 4.16 is a compilation of the most important processing 
principles in the individual net product stages of 
high-performance metallic materials. 
  pick 

<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-105A>      Chart 4.16: Important net product stages and processing principles in powder </FIG>

  In addition to good structural homogeneity and chemical 
homogeneity, the advantages of powder metallurgy are, above all, 
the ability to produce fine-grained structures, near-net-shape 
component production, the possibility of producing special 
structures (e.g., having ceramic particles for dispersion 
solidification) and the alloying of non-blendable metals. 
  A major problem in the powder metallurgical production of 
materials is the increased risk of structural flaws (e.g., 
ceramic inclusions due to contaminated powder, pores due to 
inadequate sinter density, etc.). Development is targeting new 
technologies for the production of even cleaner powder and a 
better understanding of the cyclical processes in powder 
compaction. 
  - Directional solidification 
  Directional solidification is one of the most important new 
production processes. In it, alloys are produced in such a way 
through appropriate crystallization of the cast material in the 
casting mold that all the granular boundaries run parallel to 
the external single-axis charge, e.g., in a radial direction for 
rotating turbine buckets. Using a similar process, components 
wholly free of granular boundaries (e.g., single-crystal bucket) 
can be produced. Directional solidification also enables the 
production of eutectic superalloys (e.g., Ni-Al-Mo) wherein an 
alloy component forms long fibers in the matrix of the other 
components that are aligned in the direction of the 
solidification. 
  - Rapid solidification 
  Through rapid chilling of the molten alloy meta-stable 
alloys 
can be produced, whose properties occasionally differ 
considerably from those of the corresponding equilibrium phases. 
To cool the melted material rapidly enough, cooling rates of 
approximately 100 to 10[.sup]6[/] K/second are required. This 
is realized through application onto good heat-conducting 
contact surfaces: e.g., a copper wheel or a flow of gas or a jet 
of water for the production of powders for atomization. The 
dimension of products produced in this way, however, is limited 
because of the high cooling rates. Powder particles on order are 
smaller than about 60 nm and the metallic glass produced using a 
copper wheel (melt spinning) can be produced only in the form of 
strips or sheets with thicknesses of less than 100 nm. 
Amorphization using thin-film solid-state reactions [SSR] 
constitutes one approach to solving this problem. It is a 
process that is still in the research stage. Research has 
demonstrated that with appropriate alloy elements and selection 
of reactive conditions, metastable equilibriums, that is, 
amorphous phases can be regulated, also through a pure 
controlled-diffusion solid-state reaction. So far, this has 
essentially been successful with alternating vapor deposition 
thin films (respective thicknesses of several nm). This process 
is interesting, above all, for the production of compact 
amorphous materials that are no longer restricted in their 
dimensions. 
  - Mechanical alloying [MA] 
  Mechanical alloying is used primarily to produce powders 
having fine dispersion solidified oxide particles [ODS powders]. 
However, this process finds application even in the production 
of amorphous powders and non-blendable alloys. In that case, 
small particles of the metals to be alloyed are put in a ball 
mill rotating at high speed. The steady process of bonding and 
breakup of he metal particles by the steel balls results in a 
very fine, homogenous powder that can be further processed in an 
appropriate powder metallurgical manner. 
<H5>  Areas of application for high-performance metallic materials </H5>
  Applications for high-performance metallic materials 
reflect, 
through their diversity, the increasingly predominant position 
that metals and alloys are assuming among the materials. 
  The reason for this is primarily the extraordinarily high 
capability for recycling, not to mention the many years of 
experience and established production, processing and repair 
processes. Chart 4.17 provides a survey of the most important 
areas of application. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-107A>        Chart 4.17: Selective properties and areas of application for high-performance metallic </FIG>

<H5>  Market growth </H5>
  For 1990, the international market for high-performance 
metallic materials as basic materials is projected to be nearly 
DM1.8 billion. By the year 1995, this market volume is likely to 
increase to nearly DM3.0 billion and by the year 2,000 to nearly 
DM4.0 billion. 
  At the next net product stage, namely, semi-finished 
products 
and components, an international market volume totaling DM11.0 
billion was projected for 1990. By the year 1995, that market 
volume is forecast to increase to DM19.0 billion and in the year 
2,000 to nearly DM30.0 billion (see chart 4.18). 
  In the next decade, an annual average growth rate of nearly 
10 percent is projected for high-performance metals and alloys. 
Deep differences surface when the anticipated annual growth 
rates for the individual high-performance metals are analyzed. 
For example, an annual three percent growth is projected 
internationally for titanium and titanium alloys. For 
aluminum-lithium alloys, on the other hand, an annual average 
growth far in excess of 10 percent is projected. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-108A>        Chart 4.18: Estimated international market volume of high-performance metallic </FIG>

<H5>  Development trends </H5>
  Foremost for high-performance metallic materials is first 
the 
increase in the useful temperatures of alloys already being used 
up to their natural limits (melting point, allotropic conversion 
points) and the improvement, above all, of fatigue properties. 
Also taking on increasing importance is making available new 
sorts of high-performance metallic materials like 
high-temperature intermetallic compounds and alloys having a 
nano-crystalline structure whose physical properties differ 
significantly from crystalline and amorphous materials and make 
completely new applications appear possible. 
  At present, new production and processing technologies are 
playing an essential role in targeted structural influencing. 
Directional solidification allows production of materials having 
granular boundaries that run parallel or materials without 
granular boundaries. Rapid solidification facilitates the 
production of fine alloy powder for powder metallurgy as well as 
production of meta-stable alloys. 
  In powder metallurgy there are developments that target the 
integration of a number of processing steps: in the Osprey 
process, powder production and compaction are combined into a 
single operational step primarily solving the problem of powder 
contamination. 
<H5>  4.2.2.4.2 Semiconductors </H5>
<H5>  Survey </H5>
  Unlike metals, semiconductors are materials whose electrical 
conductivity vanishes at lower temperatures and at technically 
interesting temperatures (approximately 25 degrees C) falls 
between metals and insulators. 
  The covalent bonding of semiconductors can react in an 
especially sensitive way to various stimuli (thermal, electrical 
or optical) and that is what essentially underlies their major 
physical and technical significance. Whereas the intrinsic 
conductivity of semiconductors is mostly undesirable, the 
extrinsic conductivity induced by the targeted insertion of 
impurities (doping) make them extremely significant for most 
applications. 
  Because of their complex structures and the associated 
positional dependency of the properties for semiconductor 
components, the reproducibility of structures and properties has 
to be guaranteed down to submicro-regions. 
  Semiconductor components are far superior, primarily in 
speed 
and conductivity, to vacuum tubes. From a materials-oriented 
optic, semiconductors may be divided into elemental and compound 
semiconductors. However, nano-structured semiconductors and 
non-conductive metals, in which the chemical properties of the 
material that is used is not foremost, are increasingly an 
object of research. 
  - Elemental semiconductors 
  In semiconductor engineering and microelectronics, silicon 
continues to hold sway. With its high chemical and structural 
resistance and refined methods of isolating and seeding large 
single crystals, it embodies nearly optimum properties. 
  Fresh developments in the field of silicon technology are 
based primarily on four materials: polysilicon, silicide, 
silicon on sapphire [SOS] and silicon on insulator [SOI] 
materials. 
  Polysilicon consists of a large number of tiny 
crystallites and differs in its intrinsic properties from single 
crystal silicon. It is an insulating platform and filler 
material, constitutes the startup substance for monocrystalline, 
semiconducting films and with a boost from doping can be varied 
in its conductivity from nearly intrinsic conductivity to good 
conductivity. 
  Metal silicides are compounds between silicon and 
metal. They possess not only high hardness but also, in most 
cases, high-temperature stability and are generally used 
wherever polysilicon resistances are unacceptably great because 
of increasing levels of integration. 
  SOS materials consist of a vapor deposition silicon 
film on a monocrystalline Al[.sup]2[/]O[.sup]3[/] platform 
(sapphire), that display polycrystalline and now increasingly 
monocrystalline structures. The result is an ability to realize 
higher package densities, signal speeds and switching operations. 
  SOI materials are advanced developments of SOS 
materials. Sapphire as well as monocrystalline silicon are used 
as the platform materials of the approximately 100 nm thick 
silicon films. However, this necessitates the production of an 
amorphous insulating film from SiO[.sup]2[/] or 
Si[.sup]3[/]N[.sup]4[/]. 
  - Compound semiconductors 
  Unlike elemental semiconductors, compound semiconductors are 
composed of the molecules of a compound. The most important 
class of compound semiconductors consists of compounds of the 
elements of groups III and V of the periodic table: 
  III: aluminum [Al], boron [B], gallium [Ga], indium [In] 
  V: antimony [Sb], arsenic [As], phosphorus [P] 
  One important and thoroughly studied representative of these 
semiconductors is gallium arsenide [GaAs]. Because of the 
sizable platform mobility compared with Si, the results are 
higher switch speeds and lower energy requirements. The 
production and acquisition of acoustic signals are also possible 
as well as conversion and advanced processing of electrical and 
optical signals. This guarantees GaAs and compound 
semiconductors a prominent position in the field of 
optoelectronics. 
  Offsetting these advantages, however, among other things, 
are 
significantly difficult production and the quandary that 
occasionally, mature Si technologies are not applicable to GaAs 
and the development of new processing technologies is required. 
  In addition to binary compound semiconductors there are also 
ternary and quaternary ones, that is, containing three or four 
elements. The special importance of these compounds resides in 
the possibility of being able to regulate the band interval and 
lattice constants of a material over broad ranges independently 
of one another. The most important representative of III-V 
ternary compound semiconductors is aluminum-gallium-arsenide. 
For quaternary, it is indium-gallium-arsenide-phosphide. From 
class II-VI semiconductors, some photoconductors, namely, zinc 
sulphide and cadmium sulphide, are primarily of interest. The 
sole representative of IV-VI compound semiconductors is silicon 
carbide in monocrystalline form and possessing high temperature 
resistance. 
  One of the most important and most interesting innovations 
in 
semiconductor technologies is the production of heterostructural 
crystals and heterostructural superlattices. This entails, for 
example, appropriately combining two (binary) II-V compounds 
with one another alternately in nano-thin films. The result is 
artificial structures in which platform mobility is drastically 
enhanced ("hot electrons"). In such artificial structures the 
possibilities for variation are extremely broad. And for the 
most part, there still exist unexplored possibilities for the 
development of new materials having new sorts of electrical and 
optical properties that cannot be realized on the basis of the 
source materials and ordinary crystals. 
  - Nano-structured semiconductors 
  In nano-structured semiconductors the chemical properties of 
the material being used are no longer uppermost but rather 
"smallest dimension effects," that is, essentially, quantum 
effects. Through appropriate structuring, control of platform 
mobility across a geometric parameter, that is, nanometer-range 
film thicknesses, is realized. 
  - Non-conducting metals [SIMIT effect] 
  The effect of non-conducting metals 
(Sized-Induced-Metal/Insulator-Transition) only becomes 
noticeable when the structure is reduced to nanometer 
dimensions. Beginning with a threshold value of approximately 
two m the conductivity of the metal grains drops off 
proportionately to the crystal volume. 
  In the nanometer range, the metal thereby turns into an 
insulator and a "non-conducting metal." Through the targeted 
insertion of non-conductive metallic particles into the ceramic 
platform material, totally new materials having customized 
electrical and magnetic properties can be produced, especially 
as absorbent materials in HF engineering. The new, simply 
structured and extremely small "Cut off wavelength-" transistor 
[COW] represents one early application. 
<H5>  4.2.2.5 High-performance composite materials </H5>
  Composite materials are typical representatives of new, 
customized materials. By combining various materials or groups 
of materials, it becomes possible to merge favorable properties 
into a single component that cannot be realized with any of the 
materials in isolation. Such properties include, among other 
things: 


    -  high strength 
  -  high rigidity 
  -  low specific weight 
  -  resistance to materials fatigue 
  -  favorable creep behavior 
  -  low thermal expansion at high thermal cycling 
  -  good chemical resistance and corrosion resistance (composites 
with polymer and ceramic matrices). 
  Chart 4.19 presents a materials-oriented division of 
composite materials. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-110A>        Chart 4.19: Materials-oriented division of high-performance composite materials </FIG>


  High-performance composite materials include materials 
having 
a polymer, ceramic, or metallic matrix. 
  Besides the nature of the matrix, the geometry of the 
reinforcing elements is a criterion for classification. 
Essentially, the latter are: 


    -  particles 
  -  short fibers, whiskers or platelets 
  -  long fibers. 
  Particle reinforcement is used primarily for metals. Short 
fibers (mm/cm range), whiskers (m range), crystals or 
platelets are employed mostly for production engineering motives 
although their reinforcement effect is limited. This also 
applies to molecular composites, e.g., self-reinforcing liquid 
crystal polymers [LCP] or precipitation hardened metals. Only 
perfectly parallel direction short fibers as of a specific 
length/diameter ratio approach the reinforcement properties of 
continuous long fibers. 
  For actual high-performance applications, therefore, 
long-fiber reinforced composite materials are mostly employed. 
  Combining two or more materials into a single composite 
levies some basic requirements on the components of the 
composite: e.g., chemical and mechanical tolerance, adequate 
bonding and interlacing among components, coordination of the 
components' fusion temperatures. 
  While tensile strength/impact resistance and fracture 
toughness of fiber composite materials primarily depend on the 
fibers, temperature resistance, cross-sectional strength and 
functional properties are mainly determined by the matrix. The 
choice of matrix impacts quite decisively the composite 
material's useful temperature range. 
  Fiber-reinforced polymers are currently the most extensively 
developed and disseminated composite materials, while metal and 
ceramic composite materials are still mostly in the research 
stage. 
<H5>  Composite materials having polymer matrices </H5>
  Duroplasts are currently used as the chief matrix material, 
polyester resins and phenol formaldehydes, but, above all, epoxy 
resins. They allow useful temperatures up to approximately 130 
degrees C. The use of polymer SPs and bismaleinimides has 
already been proven for some applications involving temperatures 
up to 250 degrees C. The development of liquid crystal 
duroplasts targets not only increased useful temperature but 
primarily increased fracture toughness. The disadvantage of 
duroplastic matrices resides in their relative brittleness and 
their protracted polymerization (curing). Also, once cured, 
additional shaping is no longer possible. 
  The new thermoplastic matrices (especially polysulphones, 
polyetherimides and polyetherketones), on the other hand, can be 
reshaped as semi-finished products in heated forms similar to 
sheet metal ("organic sheet"). Besides increased impact 
resistance, they also display a better heat/humidity ratio 
(heating on top/humidity absorption on bottom) that makes them 
interesting, above all, for aircraft construction and the 
vehicle industry. New high-performance thermoplasts that 
manifest permanently useful temperatures comparable to the 
duroplasts, however, are almost 10 times more expensive and 
complicate the production of composite materials primarily 
because of their high fusion viscosity. Currently, glass, 
aramide and carbon fibers are technically important as 
reinforcing materials for polymers. 
  Among glass-fiber reinforced plastics [GFK] only those 
having 
specialty glass fibers [HS glass] manifest reinforced property 
profiles that facilitate new, promising applications and for 
that reason they are the only ones included among 
high-performance composites. 
  Carbon-fiber reinforced plastics [CFK] have had major 
engineering significance for several years now, above all, in 
the aviation industry where they chiefly replace high-strength 
aluminum alloys. The CFK, because of the respective C-fiber 
properties, afford high strength and rigidity with low weight 
and also the possibility of adjusting heat expansion through 
variation in the phase orientation from positive to slightly 
negative, a property that allows for rather special applications 
(e.g., in the manufacture of radio telescopes). 
  A drawback to CFK having a duroplastic matrix in 
high-performance applications is their continued inadequate 
impact and crack resistance as well as the tendency to absorb 
humidity. Under dynamic stress the laminate structure 
experiences flaws that degrade its strength. 
  Aramide-fiber reinforced plastics [AFK] generally find 
application where strength combined with low weight is called 
for at a permanent useful temperature up to 150 degrees C. Among 
the plastic fibers, polyethylene- and polybenzineglyoxaline are 
receiving increasing importance. 
<H5>  Composites having metallic matrices </H5>
  Fiber reinforced metals are still mostly in the development 
stage. They are put to use where rigidity and impact resistance 
but, above all, good heat conductivity and high permanent useful 
temperatures are called for. Development activities are 
concentrated on: 


    -  light metal alloys (magnesium, aluminum, titanium) 
  -  high heat resistance alloys (nickel, cobalt) 
  -  refractory alloys (wolfram, molybdenum, niobium, tantalum) 
  -  materials with special physical properties (conductor 
materials 
like silver, copper; magnetic materials like iron, nickel, 
cobalt; semiconductors like germanium, silicon) 
  -  superalloys. 
  As a light construction material, fiber-reinforced aluminum 
is the most widespread of the fiber-reinforced metals. 
  Carbon, boron, boron nitride, beryllium and steel fibers 
plus 
silicon carbide and aluminum oxide whiskers are mainly used as 
reinforcing fibers. 
<H5>  Composites having ceramic matrices </H5>
  Foremost in the development of ceramic-fiber composites is, 
above all, improvement of fracture toughness and resistance to 
temperature changes. This is most of all a problem of fine 
tuning the fiber-matrix boundaries of the fiber composite. 
  Not only aluminum oxide but also, above all, silicon carbide 
and zirconium oxide have proved their worth as matrix materials. 
Also under development as matrix materials are carbon and glass 
and glass ceramics. SiC, carbon and 
Al[.sup]2[/]O[.sup]3[/] fibers are mostly used as 
reinforcing fibers. 
  A major problem with ceramic composites is the thermal 
stability of the available fibers that rapidly declines in 
oxidizing atmospheres above 1,200 degrees C. The single 
exception is carbon fiber. But even it requires a coating 
because of its susceptibility to oxidation. The higher thermal 
stability of most whiskers and platelets is, among other things, 
an important reason for their inclusion in ceramic matrices. 
  Carbon-reinforced carbon [C/C] currently displays the 
highest 
temperature resistance in non-oxidizing atmospheres (up to 
nearly 2,000 degrees C0 of all the technically available design 
materials). Intensive research efforts are underway for 
protection against oxidation. It also has a relatively low 
specific weight making this material interesting above all for 
high-temperature light construction. Other intrinsic fiber 
reinforced ceramics having a similar property profile, e.g., 
SiC/SiC, have already been established for applications in 
weapons engineering. 
<H5>  Production process for high-performance composite materials </H5>
  Chart 4.20 lists the most important processing principles 
under the individual net product stages of high-performance 
composite materials. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-112A>        Chart 4.20: Important net product stages and processing principles in the production of composite </FIG>


  - Plastic composites 
  Most large surface auto body parts presently are produced by 
absorbing or pressing the liquid resin into a closed mold filled 
with the fibers (resin transfer molding [RTM]). 
  Even in other processes like winding, pultruding, fiber 
injection, among others, liquid resins are used with the fiber 
strands undergoing a resin bath before being embedded. Since 
braiding and interlacing need adequate time and the handling of 
molten or dissolved resins is very complicated, prepregs 
(=pre-material) are generally produced at present with 
processing into preform or semi-finished product being based on 
those. Pressing is the most economical method for larger numbers 
of pieces with liquid resins or liquid prepregs (sheet molding 
compounds [SMC]) also being used. The latter are reliquefied 
under pressure and heat and facilitate the production of 
different wall thicknesses. The autoclave process enables 
production of high-grade parts with different wall thicknesses, 
any directions and sizes, consisting of laminates of precut, 
viscous prepreg textured surfaces that are annealed and cured in 
an oven cycle (e.g., the Airbus' rudder unit). 
  - Metallic composites 
  In fusion filtration the preform is produced in a mold 
hardened with reinforcing fibers by absorbing, casting or 
pressing the molten liquid matrix material. 
  Diffusion welding is possible via hot pressing, film coating 
or explosive welding. In this setting the matrix material is 
almost exclusively in the form of film. In hot isostatic 
pressing and extrusion, the matrix material is preferably 
introduced as powder. Like prepregs, tapes are produced as 
pre-material. In directional solidification of alloys, fiber and 
matrix solidify simultaneously from the molten material and the 
result is a structure having higher temperature resistance with 
none of the problems that otherwise can surface in the 
production of fiber composite from the interaction between fiber 
and matrix. 
  - Ceramic composites 
  The powder method is preferably employed for short fiber and 
whisker reinforcement. It comprises the processes of modern 
ceramics technology. A drawback is the shear stress that results 
and possible damage to the fibers from the sharp-edged powder 
particles of the matrix material when compacting under pressure 
(hot press, internal gas pressure, hot isostatic pressing) or 
without pressure (sintering). In the So-gel process, prepregs 
are produced by impregnating fiber casing plies in sol or 
solutions/dispersions in a wet winding process and subsequent 
drying. 
  In liquid phase siliconizing for the production of C/SiC 
composites a C/C composite with appropriate C-matrix structure 
is transformed with molten liquid silicon under inert gas at 
1,500-2,000 degrees C. 
  Chemical gas phase precipitation (chemical vapour 
infiltration [CVI]) is used for the production of SiC/SiC and 
C/C composite materials that currently display the top qualities 
in crack-spread behavior, crack resistance, heat resistance and 
thermo-shock behavior. In this context, the composite results 
from chemical gas phase impregnation in a porous fiber casing at 
a maximum 1,100 degrees C. The drawback in this process is the 
continued protracted processing time (up to six weeks for 
large-size components). 
  Basically, when fiber-reinforced composite materials are 
produced, the thermal and chemical stress of the reinforcement 
components constitutes a major problem. For that reason those 
production processes are gaining in importance where processing 
temperatures are declining and chemical corrosion can be avoided. 
  An additional problem resides in the fact that, first, 
because of anisotropy in production of a component costly and 
sophisticated computations are needed until the most favorable 
production and optimum structure of the laminate is discovered. 
Second, in producing parts, the planned arrangement of the 
fibers has to be realized with utmost precision by the 
production since even the slightest deviations have serious 
effects on the platform effectiveness of a film. For that 
reason, what matters most here is the development of computer 
simulations and design methods for designing with anisotropic 
materials and automated designs for high-precision production. 
<H5>  Applied fields for high-performance composite materials </H5>
  The possible applications for high-performance composite 
materials stem from the functional and structural properties of 
those materials with the latter being the determining factors as 
chart 4.21 demonstrates: 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-114A>        Chart 4.21: Properties and applied fields for high-performance composite materials </FIG>


  Virtually only the PMC, among the high-performance composite 
materials, find application, primarily in electronics/electrical 
engineering, on the basis of functional properties. Applications 
based essentially on structurally properties apply to MMC and 
CMC in high-temperature resistant components for aerospace and 
in military engineering. So far, only PMC have been able to 
establish themselves in civilian applications primarily on the 
basis of their comparatively low price levels. 
<H5>  Market growth </H5>
  In 1990, the international market for high-performance 
composite materials as basic materials totaled nearly DM1.3 
billion. By the year 1995, that market volume will increase to 
nearly DM1.6 billion and by the year 2,000 to nearly DM2.0 
billion. 
  In 1990 the market volume for high-performance composite 
semi-finished products and components was five times the size as 
that for the corresponding basic materials. Specifically, in 
1990, it totaled nearly DM7.0 billion. By the year 1995, this 
market volume will have increased to nearly DM8.9 billion and by 
the year 2,000 to nearly DM10.8 billion (see chart 4.22). 
Allowance must be made in this context for the fact that nearly 
90 percent of the market volume reflects high-performance 
composites having polymer matrices. Only about 10 percent of the 
total market, in 1990 equal to a turnover, internationally, of 
nearly DM600.0 million, reflects the other sorts of 
high-performance composite materials. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-115A>        Chart 4.22: Projected international volume of high-performance composites as basic </FIG>

  Starting from a low basis, average annual growth rates for 
high-performance composite materials having metallic or ceramic 
matrices are projected at 12 percent and for carbon matrix 
composites, at seven percent up to the year 2,000. Growth is 
being shored up by increasing demand from the aerospace sector. 
Annual growth rates are restricted to three percent for 
high-performance composites having a polymer matrix as long as 
the recycling problem is not satisfactorily resolved. 
  The division of the international market by regions shows 
the 
dominance of the U.S. that has a 55 percent market share. With 
22.5 percent each, Japan and Europe have equal shares in the 
international market for high-performance composite materials. 
In Europe, in turn, France is the leader with a 7.7 percent 
international market share. Next come England with 4.1 percent 
and Germany with 3.8 percent. 
  The DM6.4 billion international market for high-performance 
composites having an organic matrix was distributed essentially 
among the following three market segments: 


    -  Aerospace - ca. 50 percent 
  -  Sports and leisure - ca. 23 percent 
  -  Industrial applications - ca. 15 percent 
  The remaining applications are distributed among a 
multiplicity of industrial sectors. 
<H5>  Development trends </H5>
  Uppermost for high-performance composite materials is 
increasing the permanent useful temperatures, improving the 
temperature resistance of the fiber matrix boundary surfaces 
(for ceramic composites) and improving the mechanical properties 
but also, above all, multi-functional composites, new structural 
designs and hybrid composites. 
  For multi-functional composites not only are components to 
increase strength and rigidity inserted but also sensors and 
actuators that make it possible to detect and possibly even 
influence the status of the material. 
  The goal of new structural designs is, above all, the 
production of multi-directional, resilient composite materials. 
The three dimensional fiber structures required for this can 
possibly be realized using modern weaving techniques (textile 
pre-processing). 
  Fiber composites having different sorts of fibers are 
encompassed by the hybrid composites. But composites also 
structured from several layers of various materials, for 
instance, sandwich configurations (e.g., 
aramide-aluminum-laminate [ARALL]) are acquiring more and more 
significance. The composition of film materials having 
functional gradients changes continuously from front to rear and 
this displays correspondingly different properties. 
  For synthesis and advanced processing, time and cost 
effective synthesizing designs even for large volume components 
of complex geometry are the object of development. The 
development goal for high-performance composites having a 
polymer matrix is, above all, advanced development and 
automation of the processing technologies in terms of quality 
assurance and mass production and the associated cost reduction. 
<H5>  4.3 Competence in materials technologies -- an important </H5>
factor in maintaining competitiveness 
  The assessment of German industry's competitive position 
conducted under a portfolio analysis leads to the conclusion 
that strong positions are currently being maintained in 
attractive branches. One exception to this, however, is 
electronics where German industry, on an international 
comparison, occupies only a weak position. 
  Our analysis demonstrates that materials technologies, 
high-performance materials and the components and systems 
resulting therefrom have a considerable impact on the 
competitiveness of the most important industrial branches and 
consequently are able to make a significant contribution towards 
safeguarding their future competitive positions. On the basis of 
numerous examples it can be demonstrated that there also exists 
a sizable R&amp;D potential in materials and the systems 
developed 
from it where the exploitable potentials transcend branches. The 
complexity, interdisciplinary and long-term aspects of many of 
these topics justify concerted action under government guidance 
and support. 
<H5>  4.3.1 Position of Germany's industrial sectors in the </H5>
international competitive arena 
  Maintaining and developing competitiveness is at the core of 
economic and industrial policy considerations and strategies. 
Competitiveness is a prerequisite for a multitude of 
micro-economic parameters, from a company's profitability to 
guaranteed jobs and even macro-economic factors and ultimately 
all the way up to the prosperity of entire nations. 
  The definition of competitiveness and its impact on the 
status of companies, branches and nations have been elucidated 
by numerous authors in many models. The common, albeit greatly 
simplified, denominator of such variegated viewpoints continues 
to be: competitiveness in industrial sectors is expressed as the 
capability to offer products having specific performance 
advantages, either a product characteristic or just the price. 
This approach to dealing with competitiveness naturally applies 
especially on the company level. On that level it is describable 
and quantifiable by means of comparative analyses of firms' 
market, cost, and technology positions. 
  On a higher level, for instance, the branch level, 
competitiveness is describable in a more highly aggregate 
manner, for example, through the capability of that branch to 
play a leading or particularly active role in international 
competition. On such a level, criteria such as export share, 
growth in export share or perhaps the branch's trade balances 
have to be adduced to describe or specify the competitiveness. 
  An especially high level of aggregation in the present 
discussion is the national level or even the level of the troika 
in which arguments are traded over the capability of a country 
or a troika to impact international competition. To be sure, on 
this level export and trade balance considerations play a role, 
but it is also necessary to introduce regulatory and ultimately 
capital market conditions into the deliberations. 
  Analyzing, from an international optic, what industrial 
sectors will hold particular significance now and in the future 
and assessing their branch attractiveness on the basis of 
criteria such as production volume, market growth, profitability 
and barriers to market access, the outcome is branches such as 
  -electronic products 
  -chemical products 
  -plastic and rubber wares and 
  -pharmaceutical products 
  that are especially attractive. These are followed by 
industrial sectors like machine building products, road vehicles 
or electrical engineering products (see chart 4.23). Less 
attractive, using these assessment criteria, are branches like 
mining or iron and steel. To be sure, from a supply perspective 
they are important, but in terms of their earnings potential 
they are relatively unattractive, at least for highly 
industrialized states. It is precisely such branches that 
characteristically have to be artificially kept "alive" by means 
of subsidies in virtually all leading industrial nations. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-117A>        Chart 4.23: Determining Germany's competitive position in internationally important </FIG>

  The FRG's international competitiveness in the entire sector 
of industrial goods, when assessed from an export optic, 
continues to remain high and Germany occupies a leading position 
alongside Japan and the U.S., that is, precisely the nations 
with the highest R&amp;D activities. In 1989 OECD countries 
exported 
processed industrial merchandise valued at DM2,862 billion. The 
FRG (17.4 percent) followed by the U.S. (14.7 percent) and Japan 
(14.2 percent) held the lion's share of those exports. Other 
industrial countries like France, Great Britain, and Italy with 
export shares of 8.4 and 7.2 percent had considerably less 
importance. 
  R&amp;D-intensive wares yielded a picture resembling that 
of the 
processed industrial products. The former include advanced 
technologies[.sup]21[/] and high-value 
technologies[.sup]22[/]. In 1989 OECD countries exported 
R&amp;D-intensive goods valued at nearly DM1,262 billion. At 20.7 
percent, Japan had the lion's share of them followed by the FRG 
(19 percent) and the U.S. (17.8 percent). Other industrial 
countries, e.g., Great Britain, France, and Italy had 
considerably less importance. Their international trade share 
fell between 7.4 and 5.2 percent. 
  Even the supplementally conducted semi-quantitative, 
branch-specific determination of Germany's competitive position 
from a market, technology, cost and human resources point of 
view, in sectors like the chemical industry, plastic and rubber 
goods, machine building products, road vehicles and 
pharmaceutical products, produced a relatively strong position. 
The same consideration indicated not only average positions in 
the sector of non-ferrous metals and semi-finished products or 
in aerospace vehicles but also the weak position in electronics, 
a branch with high attractiveness, more than DM1,500 billion in 
turnover and a considerable broad-spectrum function, that is, 
impacts on the effectiveness of other sectors. Hence, in 
addition to this relatively positive current balance, the 
strategic position of various industrial sectors has to be 
considered that will have considerable impact on future analyses 
of the competitive position. In important key and leading-edge 
technologies with significant leverage on individual industrial 
sectors the FRG sometimes comes up short in an international 
comparison. For example, in most sectors of electronics and 
information and communications technology Japan is the leader, 
while the U.S. and Germany at best are able to fall back on 
strengths in specific sectors of such important technological 
fields. In Germany, the technologies for the production of 
semiconductor and electronic components are poorly developed and 
the effects are already being felt in the machinery and 
telecommunications industry. Biotechnology, certainly one of the 
twenty-first century's most important technologies, has not even 
been able at all so far to secure a foothold in Europe and in 
Germany whereas it has been developed in the U.S. and Japan. As 
already explained, in the case of equally important materials 
technologies it has been possible in Germany to maintain the 
distance with the leaders, Japan and the U.S. 
  The impact of a host of developments in the indicated fields 
of technology in the meantime is leading to productivity 
disadvantages for Germany vis-a-vis international competitors. 
Japanese firms, for instance, are currently producing typical 
products in the electronics sector or even road vehicles almost 
30 percent more cheaply than European firms with the major part 
of this cost advantage resulting not from labor costs but from 
advantages from computer-based and consistently optimized 
design, configuration and processing methods, that is, through 
the consistent application of electronics. 
  The obvious strategic gaps existing in the FRG's technology 
portfolio could, over the medium to long term, lead to a 
worsening of its international competitiveness. For this reason, 
strategies should be developed and implemented on the national 
level that will result in a balanced technology portfolio. That 
presupposes safeguarding the competitive position of strong 
branches and development of at least a strategic position in 
electronics. 
<H5>  4.3.2 Impact of high-performance materials on selective </H5>
industrial sectors 
  It immediately follows from the facts and their correlation 
presented in chapter 4.3.1 that the FRG's future prosperity 
requires the maintenance and development of competitiveness in 
specific industrial sectors. Ultimately this means, first, 
offering products with better performances at competitive 
prices. Secondly, it also means adapting to gradually or 
abruptly changing general conditions in general or to their 
expressions in typical branches and to master as best as 
possible the respective specific competitive bases of any 
industrial segment. 
  To be sure, (global) competitors in the upcoming decades 
will 
have to deal with altered general conditions. In the highly 
industrialized countries there is an increasing requirement for 
a more intelligent approach to energy either directly by 
government or indirectly through increasing consumer pressure. 
Also in the industrial countries a steadily growing awareness of 
the environment is developing. Concurrently with that there is 
increasing need, for example, for mobility and communication. 
These developments imply an entire cluster of effects on the 
various branches. 
  The competitive basis of any industrial sector is 
specifically expressed for each one. Our research in the 
preparation of the present study has shown, however, that 
certain basic factors have equally great importance for all 
segments, albeit with different emphasis: 
  - price/performance ratio of the product 
  - product or system quality 
  - innovation rate and adaptability 
  - environmental friendliness 
  - satisfying specific consumer wants 
  - producer image, references. 
  To be able to realize strategic competitive advantages in 
intensive international competition vis-a-vis competitors, firms 
will have to orient themselves on such basic factors and derive 
from them their specific critical success factors whereby 
competitive advantages can be elaborated in terms of the basic 
factors. 
  The future-oriented fields of technology described at the 
outset of chapter four will have quite a considerable impact on 
the basic factors determining competitiveness and the specific 
critical success factors resulting therefrom. Based on our 
research and its results this also applies in a special manner 
to materials technologies. 
  As chart 4.24 illustrates succinctly and qualitatively, 
materials technologies in most industrial sectors have 
significant or considerable importance as a basis for 
competitiveness. This may come about directly, e.g., via the 
innovation rate or their adaptability or indirectly through 
positive influencing of production or operational costs, 
environmental friendliness or producer images. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-119A>        Chart 4.24: Illustration of the importance of high-performance materials technologies for </FIG>


  Chart 4.24 makes it clear that both the producer (and/or 
reprocessing industry) of basic materials, chemical industry 
(polymers, ceramics, composites) and iron and steel 
(high-performance materials) as well as the consumer industries 
like machine building, manufacture of road vehicles, etc., and 
sectors like energy engineering and especially aerospace are 
specific participants in materials technologies. In each case, 
what is uppermost is the direct use of high-performance 
materials as structural components, occasionally substituting 
conventional materials or indirect use in systems that could not 
be realized without the existence and use of high-performance 
materials with their specific property profiles. Through the use 
of selective examples this will be more closely described below. 
  - Road vehicle manufacturing example 
  There is no mistaking the applied potential of 
high-performance materials as structurally and functionally 
oriented high-performance materials in the manufacture of road 
vehicles and the potential for differentiation resulting 
therefrom that Japanese rivals are increasingly developing. 
  The following selective technological fields have direct or 
indirect impact on the future differentiation of competitors in 
the road vehicle manufacturing sector: 


    -  quality assurance systems 
  -  interrelated and follow-on processing technologies 
  -  CAD/CAM/CIM systems 
  -  alternative vehicle designs 
  -  alternative drive train designs 
  -  smart vehicle infrastructure systems. 
  High-performance materials are required at the most varied 
points for the realization of the systems and technologies just 
indicated. To this effect, in turn, they basically may be used 
directly in road vehicles. In this case structural materials are 
uppermost, for example 


    -  aluminum alloys 
  -  magnesium alloys 
  -  engine ceramics 
  -  composite materials 
  or find indirect application in road vehicles, namely, 
through the employment of new systems that cannot be realized 
without the application of high-performance materials. For this 
purpose, functional materials are pre-eminently called for. 
Examples of this are: 


    -  materials for electronic controls 
  -  materials for high-grade sensors 
  -  materials for optoelectronic systems. 
  For high-performance materials to be directly utilized in 
the 
manufacture of road vehicles, high-performance materials will 
have to force traditional materials out of their long-standing 
fields of application. History indicates that this will occur 
only at a snail's pace. Often a traditional material is not 
replaced by a high-performance material because the features of 
traditional materials are significantly improved under pressure 
from competing materials. For cost, quality and recycling 
reasons or for lack of experience with new materials, 
high-performance materials are therefore not used or used only 
hesitantly. 
  On the basis of the very many expert interviews that were 
held, however, it may be anticipated that in the future, the 
following high-performance materials will intensively be used 
directly in the manufacture of road vehicles: 


    -  high-performance steels 
  -  light metals 
  -  high-strength aluminum alloys 
  -  magnesium alloys 
  -  non-reinforced high-performance structural polymers 
  -  high-performance ceramics 
  -  materials having improved sound absorbing, optical, 
insulating 
and vibration-damping features. 
  In the unanimous opinion of the experts, high-performance 
composite materials, particularly GFK, CFK, AFK and hybrid 
configurations, initially will experience no significant 
expansion since steel products for applications in the 
manufacture of road vehicles are superior to them in many sorts 
of respects. But if the general legislative conditions (e.g., 
upper limits on fuel consumption) are altered then a drastic 
change could occur also for such materials. 
  On the other hand, when high-performance materials are 
indirectly employed, i.e., via new systems in the manufacture of 
road vehicles, those systems are mostly realizable only through 
the utilization of high-performance materials. From the outset, 
cost and recycling motives are of secondary importance here. 
Therefore there are very good possibilities here for the use of 
all functional materials made out of polymers and ceramics as 
well as semiconductors. From a road vehicle manufacturing optic 
the following technologies are of special interest in the 
processing technologies sector: 


    -  further development of near-net-shape technologies 
  -  powder metallurgy 
  -  foundry technology 
  -  etc. 


    -  optimizing production and processing technologies with 
the goal of cost reduction, enhanced quality and waste reduction 
for basic materials, semi-finished products and components 
  -  technologies for surface treatment of materials 
  -  CAD/CAM 
  -  bonding techniques 
  -  development of materials recycling processes 
  - Machine building sector 
  The technical development of machine building is currently 
concentrated basically on integrating new technologies, 
especially in he (micro-) electronic and information technology 
sector into machine building products with the following broad 
themes being of particular interest: 


    -  electronic controls 
  -  sensor technology 
  -  advanced precision bearings 
  -  laser technologies 
  -  artificial intelligence 
  -  optoelectronics 
  -  robot technology 
  -  software developments. 
  Depending on whether structurally or rather functionally 
oriented applications are foremost in this qualitative survey, 
the result is starting points for product improvements using 
high-performance materials, especially from the following 
sectors: ceramics (coatings, bearings, ceramic cutting 
materials), composite materials (CFK components in highly 
stressed structures) and systems having a high amount of 
optical, electronic or magnetic materials (measurement and 
control engineering, sensors engineering). Through such product 
developments opportunities emerge for further differentiations 
and diversifications too for machine building in processing 
technologies: 


    -  further development of near-net-shape technologies 


    -  powder metallurgy 
  -  foundry technology 
  -  etc. 


    -  optimizing production and processing technologies with 
the goal of cost reduction and enhanced quality 
  -  CAD/CAM 
  -  coating technology 
  -  surface treatment of materials. 
  - Electrical engineering industry example 
  To be able to describe the importance of high-performance 
materials for the electrical engineering industry, it is 
necessary to distinguish two segments of electrical engineering 
products, since they levy different requirements on the 
materials that are used: 


    -  energy engineering 
  -  general electrical engineering. 


    -  Energy engineering 
  Unlike any other systems technology, energy technologies are 
very tightly linked to the political environment. This expresses 
itself, for example, in the form of the market prospects for 
traditional and new energy technologies being determined very 
greatly by the shaping of environmental legislation and the 
development of primary energy prices, that is, by factors over 
which the firms themselves have only slight influence. 
  Firms active in energy engineering therefore are primarily 
concentrated on (allowing for the above indicated marginal 
conditions): 


    -  increasing the efficiency of traditional energy systems 
  -  pushing the development and implementation of new energy 
systems 
  Increasing the efficiency of traditional energy systems is 
principally concentrated on converting the primary energy system 
that is used with as little loss as possible into useful energy 
in order thereby to realize an increase in the efficiency of the 
system as a whole. At present in industry the efficiency level 
is at approximately 10 percent (primary energy to useful 
energy). In this context, however, the following subsystems have 
to be distinguished, namely, energy acquisition, storage, 
conversion, and energy use. 
  The goal of developing and implementing new energy systems 
is 
to create energy systems that can be used economically as 
"inexhaustible" sources of energy. 
  The realization of such developments therefore basically 
depends on the availability of appropriate high-performance 
materials and processing technologies. Currently available 
high-performance materials are able only partially to satisfy 
the requirements for energy technologies that undergo advanced 
development or that are new. Advances in the sector of materials 
and processing technologies therefore are closely coupled with 
the realization of new energy systems and therefore with energy 
savings and efficient energy use. 
  In this respect, the following technological sectors in the 
energy engineering sector will have special importance in the 
future: 
  -photovoltaics 
  -solar cells 
  -high-performance heat pumps 
  -superconductivity 
  -(electro-) chemical energy storage devices (hydrogen 
storage 
device, battery systems) 
  -electrical and electromagnetic storage devices 
  -fusion technologies. 
  There is no question but that special importance will be 
attributed to high-performance materials in the above indicated 
technological sectors. Simply for more efficient use of solar 
energy it makes sense to further develop the production, 
advanced processing and systems integration of amorphous and 
polycrystalline silicon and (further) develop alternative 
photovoltaic systems (CuInSe[.sup]2[/], CdTe). 
  Among others, the following specific materials starting 
points emerge for realization of the fusion design: 


    -  advanced, high-temperature and radiation resistant 
steels 
  -  nickel-based superalloys 
  -  carbon-fiber reinforced plastics [CFK] for magnetic 
suspension 
  -  refractory metals (niobium, tantalum, molybdenum, etc.) 
  -  SiC, TiC coatings on metals and graphite 
  -  _g_-Li AlO[.sup]2[/] and Li[.sup]2[/]SiO[.sup]3[/] 
  -  high-performance ceramics (oxides and nitrides) 
  -  magnetic materials 
  -  superconducting materials. 
  - General electrical engineering 
  Even in the sector of traditional energy production in the 
context of increasing the efficiency level of stationary 
turbines there emerge a host of materials-based starting points 
for differentiating competitors. There are, for instance, 
concrete areas of application in traditional power plants and 
especially combination power plants where an increase in the gas 
input temperature of the gas turbines can yield significant 
increases in the thermodynamic efficiency level. 
  In the general electrical engineering field efforts are 
concentrated on making electrical engineering systems more 
effective, smaller and more reliable and enabling them to 
continue to be produced at as low a cost as possible. To realize 
this will, in the future, increasingly require high-performance 
materials and the processing technologies for them. 
  Semiconductor materials, high-performance functional metals, 
high-performance functional polymers, high-performance ceramics, 
superconductive materials and selective structural materials are 
especially important for general electrical engineering. The 
development and use of semiconductor materials resembles that 
for micro-electronics. 
  Magnetic materials and conductive materials are uppermost 
among the high-performance functional metals. Increasingly, 
among magnetic materials, the following materials will be of 
special interest: 


    -  metallic glass 
  -  permanent magnets 
  -  hard magnetic materials 
  -  magnetic powder 
  -  magnetic rotors 
  -  superconducting magnets 
  In the field of high-performance functional polymers the 
material's electrical conductivity or non-conductivity will be 
especially prized. For the most part, at present, duroplastic 
materials are being applied here. Because of the continuing 
increase in effectiveness, increased requirements for 
temperature resistance will be imposed on polymers in electrical 
engineering applications, and in the future that could lead to 
increased use of high-performance duroplasts. 
  In the development and use of high-performance functional 
ceramics in the general electrical engineering sector the 
principal attraction is electrical insulation, super conducting 
properties and piezo-electric properties. Of special importance 
here, for instance, are: 


    -  various high-performance ceramic substances 
  -  ceramic insulation coatings 
  -  superconducting ceramics 
  -  ceramic piezo-electric materials 
  From a general electrical engineering optic the following 
materials developments also appear meaningful: 


    -  improvement of the magnetic properties of magnetic 
materials and their integration into the system as a whole 
  -  development of high-temperature resistance, ceramic 
insulation 
coatings 
  -  development of new ceramic superconductors 
  -  development and optimization of composites that can 
simultaneously assume different functions, e.g., electrical 
insulation and heat conductivity. 
  - Electronic products example 
  The increasing automation and computerization of all sectors 
of our lives will lead to electronic products having a 
significant impact by the millennium on all internationally 
important branches. This development becomes clearer once all 
important key and leading-edge technologies of the specific 
branches are analyzed. The lion's share of the key and 
leading-edge technologies there is in fact directly tied in with 
electronic products. 
  It is anticipated that jobs in traditional branches will be 
lost to the further impact of electronic products. They probably 
will only partially be able to be offset by new jobs emerging in 
the electronics industry or the supply industry for it. The 
availability of specific high-performance electronic materials 
is a prerequisite for being able in the future to produce 
currently existing electronic products more efficiently and cost 
effectively. Two developments requiring high-performance 
materials will be considered and described more closely below. 
They are: 


    -  micro-electronics 
  -  optoelectronics. 
  - Micro-electronics 
  Current endeavors in micro-electronics are targeted on the 
ability to craft more effective, smaller and reliable complex 
electronic systems and simultaneously produce them at lower 
cost. High-performance materials, especially functional 
materials and the processing technologies for them, play a 
decisive role in this context. 
  According to chart 4.25 semiconductor materials, 
high-performance ceramics and glass and high-performance 
polymers are of interest for micro-electronic components and 
systems. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-123A>        Chart 4.25: Selective high-performance materials for use in electronic </FIG>


  Silicon (crystalline silicon, amorphous silicon, 
etc.)currently reigns supreme among semiconductor materials. In 
the opinion of the experts this will continue even into the 
future since considerable possibilities for advanced development 
still are associated with silicon technology. Other 
semiconductor materials like gallium arsenide, the most 
important of the II-V semiconductors is interesting only in 
micro-electronic systems niches where its speed (three to 10 
times greater than silicon) is fully effective. II-VI 
semiconductors, on the other hand, are mostly in the research 
stage. 
  High-performance ceramics and glass hold exceptional 
significance for micro-electronic components and systems. They 
are presently used mostly as insulators. Ceramic, 
superconducting materials are a promising field. Their use could 
resolve the issues both of a lossless power supply and heat 
buildup in electronic systems. 
  At present, polymers are mostly used for metal protection of 
chips. At the moment, this field of application is dominated by 
traditional polymers. Because of the trend to greater 
miniaturization and its associated greater heat buildup, 
enhanced temperature-resistant polymers, that is, 
high-performance polymers will be used in the future. There is 
also an endeavor to radically redesign chip structure through 
the combination of conductive and non-conductive polymer films 
and this will result in further opportunities for 
high-performance polymers. 
  - Optoelectronics 
  The markets for communications systems will continue to 
expand in upcoming years because of increasing demand for 
information. This is resulting in a growing interest in 
high-performance light transmission and optoelectronic systems 
that display a number of advantages compared with conventional 
copper wires: 
  -high bit transfer rates 
  -protection against interference 
  -weight savings 
  -protection against eavesdropping 
  -low attenuation of the transmitted signal. 
  To transmit light signals, the electric signals have to be 
converted into appropriate light signals by using, for instance, 
a laser. Those are then transmitted via a glass or polymer fiber 
to a decoder that reconverts the light signals into electric 
signals. Optical computers are a future goal of optoelectronics. 
  A plethora of high-performance materials are required for 
the 
realization of optoelectronic systems. Selective 
high-performance materials that hold special importance for 
optoelectronics are listed in chart 4.26. 
  According to chart 4.26, semiconductor materials, 
high-performance ceramics and glass and high-performance 
polymers are of interest for optoelectronic components and 
systems. Those are the same groups of materials as for 
micro-electronics, although optoelectronic systems levy other 
requirements on materials and this leads to the prioritizing of 
other materials. 
  Among semiconductor materials, gallium arsenide is far 
superior to silicon because of its good light emitting and 
absorbing properties. Gallium arsenide holds the greatest 
significance for optoelectronic systems. Other semiconductor 
materials are of only secondary importance. 
  In optoelectronic systems high-performance polymers are 
frequently used as a medium for light transmission. Because of 
the currently still very sizable light attenuation of polymer 
light conducting fibers, they are used only for Local Area 
Networks. Glass is preferred for longer routings because of its 
low light-attenuation property. 
  High-performance ceramics are used for the realization of 
optoelectronic ICs. In this way, high-performance materials are 
used directly in optoelectronic systems and these are then used 
in a large number of applied fields because of the expected 
sizable broad impact of optoelectronic systems. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-124A>        Chart 4.26: Selective high-performance materials for use in optoelectronic </FIG>


  The described possibilities for differentiation having 
materials relevance in the industrial segments that were also 
described, naturally have major implications for the business of 
the producer of basic materials for high-performance materials, 
that is, on the chemical and metal producing industries. Both 
industrial sectors therefore must see to it that the appropriate 
basic materials are available in sufficient quantities to meet 
user and supplier requirements in terms of quality and price. 
Since precisely those industries have to make a sizable R&amp;D 
outlay for the development of new production processes although 
they are situated right at the start of the net product chain 
and only enjoy low margins there, not only does the question 
arise at this point regarding official R&amp;D support as is the 
case to a considerable extent in the materials research program 
precisely for those industries, but also regarding strategic 
alliances and partnerships (in the development sector) that are 
likely to result in cost reduction and lowered risk with 
concomitantly more rapid market dissemination. The catalyst 
factor for establishing such alliances and even their 
coordination would be one of the most important tasks in any 
future support for materials technologies. 
Footnotes: 
  21. Based on the FhG-ISI definition, advanced technologies 
typically have at least 8.5 percent of turnover invested in 
R&amp;D 
  22. Based on the FhG-ISI definition, high-value technologies 
typically have between 3.5 and 8.5 percent of turnover invested 
in R&amp;D 
<H5>  5. Guidelines for Future Support of Materials Research in </H5>
Germany 
  Because of their strategic significance, their 
broad-spectrum 
nature and their potential, high performance materials and the 
associated manufacturing and processing technologies are among 
the most important key technologies supported by government. 
Even for nearly all the FRG's industrial manufacturing sectors, 
they are important factors in maintaining and developing future 
competitiveness, whether as the basis for establishing new 
technical designs or for improving existing technologies and 
systems. 
  Countering the great potential of high performance 
materials, 
their great significance for the competitiveness of individual 
companies, as well as the entire economy, are the frequently 
long times for dissemination into the respective markets, 
uncertainties surrounding the realization of radical new 
technical designs and the associated corporate risks. For this 
reason, as well as consideration of intensive government support 
activities in all important industrial countries, it both makes 
sense and is necessary to have a further government support 
initiative in pre-competitive sectors. 
  As an industrial policy activity, future support of 
materials 
research in Germany should include the following fundamental 
strategic goals: 


    -  safeguarding Germany's technological competence as a 
critical factor for success in international competitiveness 
  -  acquiring leading technology positions in selective fields of 
application for high performance materials that are 
strategically important for German industry 
  -  accelerating the dissemination of high performance materials 
and the components and systems produced from them into the 
appropriate market segments as well as assisting German industry 
to maintain and develop its international competitiveness 
  -  taking long term ecological factors into consideration 
chapter 
(5.1). 
  Any future support initiative should tie in with the results 
that have been realized so far under the materials support 
program and with a view towards a more intensive strategic 
orientation with precisely defined strategic goals, as well as 
reorientation of the topical foci and organization of program 
development and implementation, it should also encompass: 
  (1) focusing the program on application foci matching the 
chosen technology strategy (chapter 5.2) 
  (2) reorienting topical foci on materials as integral 
components of systems solutions and taking net product stages 
into consideration (chapter 5.3) 
  (3) prioritizing proven support instruments, especially 
direct support of specific combined projects in contrast to 
non-specific or indirect support activities that have turned out 
to be less efficient (chapter 5.2) 
  (4) substantive systematic and/or institutionalized 
alignment 
with other support activities (chapter 5.4) 
  (5) Adapting program organization to new requirements by 
establishing program management and program administration under 
the purview of the BMFT (chapter 5.3) 
  (6) establishing modern methods of R&amp;D control and 
project 
management for program management and administration (chapter 
5.3). 
<H5>  5.1 Strategic preliminary remarks </H5>
  The industrial nations of western Europe are currently 
facing 
crucial challenges in the sector of foreign, economic, 
structural and technological policy. This primarily entails 
completion of Europe's process of integration, the development 
and stabilization of efficient economic systems in the countries 
of central and eastern Europe and maintaining the 
competitiveness of western Europe's industry. 
  For the FRG in particular this entails: 


    -  completing the unification of Germany, allowing for the 
difficult process of restructuring in the new states of the FRG 
and 
  -  safeguarding the competitiveness of Germany's key branches on 
the international market. 
  R&amp;D and the technological progress resulting therefrom 
are 
indisputably major factors in safeguarding and developing the 
competitiveness of industrial outfits whose industries are 
internationally active in technologically promising markets. 
Continual R&amp;D is indispensable to ensure that the economy's 
net 
product is adequate even over the long term to be able to cover 
rising costs for growing social, economic and ecological 
demands. This surely entails both the efficiency of basic 
research and effective and efficient research on the verge of 
application. But quite certainly the ability to transfer 
know-how and results of R&amp;D as rapidly as possible into 
production processes and into market accessible products plays a 
major role. 
  As indicated in the previous chapter, the FRG occupies a 
leadership position in the R&amp;D sector alongside Japan and the 
U.S. Simultaneously, those nations have the top export 
statistics and enjoy absolute top positions among the world's 
leading industrial nations. In addition to this current balance, 
the strategic position of those countries, as well as the troika 
in general, has foreseeable effects on the future positioning of 
the indicated countries. Japan has bee able to realize a high 
level of industrial efficiency precisely in high technologies 
and, as a result, the ability virtually to optimize innovations 
having market and competitive impact. Japan, therefore, is 
currently, for example, the leader inmost sectors of electronics 
and information and communications technologies, while the U.S. 
and Europe plus Germany at best are able to fall back on 
strengths in specific sectors of such important technological 
fields. In Germany, the technologies for the production of 
semiconductor and electronic components are poorly developed and 
the effects are already being felt in the machinery and 
telecommunications industry. Even biotechnology, another of the 
twenty-first century's key technologies, has not been able so 
far to secure a foothold in Germany. 
  In the case of equally important materials technologies it 
has been possible in Germany at least to maintain its position 
relative to the leaders, Japan and the U.S. and in some sectors 
it remains abreast or has carved out strong niche positions. The 
FRG, therefore, is a major contender in the competition among 
the industrial states to develop and commercially exploit 
materials technology. The current materials research program 
could lay the basis for generally ensuring it a role to play in 
the top league of the materials nations. Unless the 
pre-requirements are comprehensively utilized and assisted over 
the long term with appropriate support activities there will be 
no success in successfully utilizing the potential that was once 
developed and definite backsliding will be preprogrammed. 
  The further development and support of materials technology 
are so important precisely because very sizable impetuses and 
spill-over effects on virtually all sectors of the processing 
industry result from them. Of all the key technologies at the 
close of the twentieth century, materials engineering is the one 
with the greatest degree of interlinkage with other engineering 
fields and with the highest degree of positive external effects. 
However, this means that independent development of materials is 
not profitable enough but can only be considered economically 
promising when viewed in association with subsequent systems 
activities and advanced processing methods. 
  This addresses the requirement for sustained assistance for 
the development of the supply of new materials and their 
utilization, especially considering g the extensive support 
activities in Japan and the U.S. Technology development and 
support therefore has to attain a critical mass, but 
simultaneously it has to be focused through an especially smart 
process on attractive systems markets and applied sectors in 
which national competitive advantages can be buttressed. 
  It is precisely the successful development of systems 
markets 
on the national level that facilitates high net product, 
generation of above-average yields and the re-accumulation of 
finances and impetuses in the national R&amp;D system. Japanese 
and 
U.S. materials developments are successful precisely where they 
are included in successful national growth and export sectors. 
Any support strategy therefore has to consistently apply the 
necessary R&amp;D measures in key technologies, but it must also 
quite decisively indicate the sectors in which the greatest 
prospects for success in the future commercial use of such key 
technologies are located, taking into account the problem of EC 
assistance. 
  Since sticking with basic technologies with their low 
potentials for differentiation and development does not 
constitute any long-term viable alternative, what will, instead, 
be crucial for the future will be the extent to which the FRG is 
able to assert itself in key and leading-edge technologies in 
strategically important fields of technology like 


    -  electronics 
  -  information and communications technologies 
  -  biotechnology 
  -  energy engineering 
  -  materials technologies 
  since these, at least for the most part, will be the basic 
technologies of the upcoming decade and will therefore impact 
the prosperity of entire branches. Ultimately it entails 
preparing and introducing the renunciation of old technologies 
and the development of a consensus on the prioritizing of high 
technologies. 
  In this context, the total net product chain of the 
respective advanced technologies, that is, from producer of 
basic materials through components manufacturer, process 
engineering and final user industries, should be involved in the 
formation of the consensus. Even though it remains a moot 
question whether successful industrial outfits have to research, 
develop, master and economically exploit every possible 
technology on their own or whether, in the context of an 
international division of labor it is not sufficient for 
individual technologies that they are able to use them, there is 
prevailing agreement that highly developed industrial countries 
need a balanced technological portfolio to safeguard their 
competitiveness. 
  It is crucial for the success of any national support 
strategy to determine the technological fields and applied 
sectors of materials engineering in which national strengths can 
be maintained or developed and where backsliding should be 
avoided and, if appropriate, it is hopeless any longer to chase 
after the train as it pulls away. 
  The coordination of nationally promising technological 
fields, applications and systems markets can only be introduced 
through a dialog involving the appropriate decision makers from 
the private sector, research and politics. The strategic goal of 
building a consensus among the major players is to elaborate and 
implement an appropriate technological strategy in all key and 
leading-edge technologies identified as critical in order to 
safeguard the impact of R&amp;D, to bring back into play the high 
development and investment costs that occasionally reach into 
the billions, in order to benefit from the learning curve 
effects of new technologies and to ensure early spin-offs. 
  The necessary strategic and consensus-oriented support 
policy 
in the materials technology sector and their application has to 
run the entire gamut of modern support instruments as has 
already successfully been practiced for years on a basis of each 
for its own. This means that regulatory interventions, financial 
stimuli, the development of an innovation-oriented 
infrastructure and the support of public demand for innovative 
products have to be employed to a balanced extent and proportion 
relative to one another. Their systematic application and their 
mutual coordination, as well as the assessment of their direct 
and indirect effects, however, seem still, in the future, to 
need further optimizing. Even the medium to long term effects on 
which companies and technological policy activities are focused, 
are presently at best qualitatively describable. 
  Ultimately, the complex technological policy toolkit and 
fundamental, strategic planning and action targeted on 
safeguarding the long-term competitiveness of Germany's industry 
is not possible without the knowledge and the inclusion of the 
respective parties and partners both in the official and in the 
industrial sectors. This means that the government's 
technological policy planning and the strategic planning of 
companies as management instruments have to be in a 
complementary relation to one another and this is thoroughly 
consistent with the principle that gives order to the market 
economy. 
  Therefore, technology policy resulting from such a 
complementary collaboration among all participants in an 
institutionalized dialog will incorporate the following 
principles: 


    -  the principle of the consistency of R&amp;D policy with 
other broad constitutional and political principles 
  -  the principle of limiting government interventions to 
exceptional cases each of which is subject to considerable 
startup pressure 
  -  the subsidiary principle, that is, solving problems on the 
lowest possible decision-making level and the one that is close 
to the taking of action 
  -  the principle of openness to innovations and maintenance of 
competitive structures in research and in the private sector 
  -  the principle of flexibility, of learning and tolerance for 
mistakes 
  -  the principle of the best possible coordination of the 
appropriate activities in a European and international context. 
<H5>  5.2 Most crucial guidelines and principles for designing </H5>
future materials research support 
  In the context of developing guidelines and principles for 
any future design for materials research, various possible 
procedures and alternative designs are roughly assessed and 
compared with one another. The alternatives range from stopping 
support all the way up to continuation of it with different 
support and procedural designs. 
  On the basis of the conclusion of our activities and talks 
with the experts, the hands-off alternative, namely, stopping 
support for materials research appears to be a purely 
theoretical variant that entails a great loss in effectiveness 
and risks. Besides the arguments described in chapter 5.1, 
putting a stop to support, precisely in today's difficult 
economic environment, would have definitely negative 
consequences for materials research. It would foreseeably entail: 
  - the shelving of firms' major R&amp;D projects involving 
medium 
to long term orientation 
  - the reduction of risky R&amp;D projects in industry 
although 
these are a prerequisite for the market introduction of 
promising products in eight to 10 years 
  - jeopardizing the just recently established cooperative 
structures involving industry, SMEs and academic research that 
were developed in the context of current combined research and 
  - ultimately, jeopardizing the current results of the MATFO 
program and as a result, ineffective use of support resources 
afterwards. 
  For this reason, in our opinion, it will be indispensable, 
even in the future, to solve the problems that need to be 
addressed, in close cooperation among the private economy, 
research institutions and support institutions. Based on 
experience, this cooperation will only come about if the 
participants simultaneously contribute financial and personnel 
resources. 
  Hence, various support designs and instruments are 
conceivable for future support of materials research: 
  1. improvement of the general conditions 
  2. infrastructural support 
  3. institutional support 
  4. indirect or indirectly specific support 
  5. direct project support. 
  Prioritizing one or more of those options and the respective 
mix of appropriate instruments primarily depends on which 
objectives and problems are foremost. Each of the various 
support policy instruments manifests a different effect relative 
to optimum support of the objectives formulated in chapter 5.1 
in the materials research sector and in terms of respectively 
efficient use of support resources (see chart 5.1). In order to 
be able to realize an appropriate weighting, the various forms 
of support are dealt with after being differentiated on the 
basis of their specific starting points. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-128A>        Chart 5.1: Effectiveness of different support instruments in the materials research </FIG>


  1. Activities to "improve general conditions" have rather 
high leverage, but are difficult to incorporate into a support 
design. Thus, there is no disputing the importance of legal 
regulations like emission regulations, use and production 
prohibitions, recycling regulations or even occupational safety 
and health measures have a great impact, both positive and 
negative, on the development and establishment of modern 
materials technologies. Even a shortening of the time period for 
the authorization process, the introduction of a standardization 
of, for instance, testing techniques, introduction of German 
industrial standards [DIN] and the harmonization of laws and 
regulations having materials relevance on the national and 
international level, particularly in a European context. Early 
inclusion of international experts from research and industry in 
the debate over new laws and ordinances and the extension of 
patent lifetimes in an international context are also starting 
points for the improvement of general conditions. 
  2. Infrastructural support through information and 
documentation facilities, patent information and assessment 
centers and technology transfer centers was already a component 
of the current MATFO program. Its primary goal was the exchange 
of information and know-how and the erection of demonstration 
centers. Its importance is deemed rather low by the materials 
experts we queried (see chapter 2, chart 2.4), not least because 
the main target group of those facilities, heavily 
technology-oriented SMEs, have not played a central role, at 
least in the past, in the materials research sector. Since the 
respective centers also are already in existence, in our 
opinion, there is only a slight need for support that should 
have as its goal, above all, familiarization and, consequently, 
greater use of those facilities. 
  3. Institutional support whose goal is the support and 
development of institutes set up specifically for materials 
research activities, e.g., large research institutions, is 
assigned little importance by materials experts in terms of a 
single objective that entails, above all, the effective transfer 
of the results of application-oriented research to production 
processes and ultimately to marketable products. This applies 
not least to the primarily scientific and theoretical focus of 
such institutions. In the case of the large research centers 
there is also the often limited structural flexibility inside 
such institutions due to their size and this makes it difficult 
to focus on the applied orientation of materials development and 
systems innovation. 
  4. Indirect support through tax breaks, special write-offs, 
investment incentives (subsidizing personnel and investment 
costs, etc., for certain R&amp;D fields) are, in our view, and in 
the opinion of the materials experts we polled, of only limited 
suitability for the current form of materials research support. 
These support instruments result in a very wide scattering of 
support resources and simultaneously reduced selectivity of the 
application of the resources. As a result of the broad leeway it 
allows in crafting innovative projects, goal establishment and 
monitoring of results, above all, becomes extraordinarily 
complicated. For this reason, this support instrument makes 
sense only in connection with very carefully selected support 
criteria entailing a high probability of direct dissemination of 
materials development into the production of marketable products. 
  5. In direct project support, on the other hand, precisely 
defined support goals and support criteria are possible. It 
facilitates targeted focusing of the applied resources that 
should be the principal characteristic of any future support 
design, considering the objectives in the materials research 
sector described in the introduction. Only with this support 
instrument can defined and quantifiable goals be established and 
monitored. This is an advantage that should be exploited without 
reservation for the efficient use of limited support resources. 
Consistent further development through supportive project 
management and R&amp;D control can continue definitely to 
increase 
the effectiveness of this support instrument. 
  6. Moreover, for about a decade now, indirectly specific 
support has been used in a number of technological fields 
(applied micro-electronics, production engineering, etc.). This 
is especially focused on the dissemination phase, is heavily 
medium-term oriented and typically involves low expenditure on 
testing and administration. Hence, this instrument has a 
targeted effect in terms of selecting a rather specific 
technology. Up until now the indirectly specific support 
instrument has still not been employed in Germany in the 
materials technology sector. 
  Against the backdrop of the results of this study, according 
to which the strengths of the currently determined research 
results are situated, above all, at the inception of the net 
worth chain in the basic research sector having an applied 
orientation, but where the effective transfer to specific 
applied fields is still pending, in our opinion, the most 
efficient support instrument by far is direct project support in 
a context elaborated and coordinated with all participants. It 
should be accompanied by measures to improve the general 
conditions and, with lesser emphasis, technology transfer and 
information exchange. In addition to this, consideration can be 
given to supplemental indirectly specific support for individual 
project components, especially where dissemination and the 
inclusion of SMEs are foremost. Still, the direct project 
support toolkit should still remain uppermost. 
  Above all, support of combined research with its associated 
R&amp;D cooperative activities has generally proven its worth and 
should, in any event, be continued. Incidentally, this is a 
development that can be observed internationally. 
  Assessment of the current materials research program has 
demonstrated, however, that any future support concept should 
entail some major reorientation activities: 


    -  greater strategic orientation with precisely defined 
strategic goals and systematic or institutionalized substantive 
coordination with other support activities in the materials 
sector 
  -  unambiguous focusing on projects and activities that 
correspond 
to the selected technological strategy and close the presently 
existing strategic gaps 
  -  directing the program towards applied foci in which basic 
research topics having an applied orientation are elaborated 
  -  establishing a mix of instruments whereby the different 
program 
foci can be supported in an optimum manner providing for 
targeting on international R&amp;D cooperative activities as well 
  -  management of the program using substantive and efficient 
program and project management 
  -  medium to long term integration of all support activities 
having materials relevance in a materials framework program 
involving uniform management and implementation. 
  To match the systems nature and the importance of applied 
orientation of materials research, any future supported should 
be designed as an "integrated program for materials and systems 
innovation". 
  In view of the high cost of development and the lengthy 
dissemination times in the current program and to ensure proven 
continuity over time, it makes sense to have another ten-year 
interval as the duration of the program. Henceforth, however, 
support should be crafted as two five-year phases with 
appropriate program assessment. A differentiated program 
structuring, as proposed in chart 5.2, should significantly 
contribute towards implementation of the recommended greater 
strategic focus of the program. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-131A>        Chart 5.2: Proposed timeline and milestones chart for any -future materials and systems </FIG>


  Before launching the first phase, the fundamental focus of 
the program should be agreed upon and established with 
strategic, technological and technology policy objectives. 
Concurrently, measurement and assessment criteria should be 
agreed upon for analysis and assessment of the first part of the 
program to be undertaken in the context of an interim 
assessment. The results of the interim assessment are then 
simultaneously the basis for possibly necessary course 
corrections or changes in the (strategic) objectives. 
  Just as in the current materials research program, regular 
symposiums could be held as supporting measures for such a 
concept. On such occasions, however, not only should information 
on projects be exchanged, but also the strategic aspects of 
international materials research and support for it and the 
resulting implications of the same as well as discussion of the 
program status and needed course corrections should be discussed 
during such symposiums. Another supporting measure besides 
support providing incentives for the participants to collaborate 
with the program is the elaboration of strategic data in the 
research and industrial implementation sector. A materials 
monitoring system [WMS] should be set up for this purpose, 
combining data on: 


    -  technology trends in the materials technology sector 
  -  market trends in major applied branches 
  -  data on competitor behavior 
  -  a comparison of support policy strategies in individual 
countries. 
  What matters most under the umbrella of WMS is that the 
resulting "Technology and Marketing Intelligence" turns out to 
be as undistorted, direct, product related and inclusive of the 
relevant knowledge platforms as possible. It should not be 
confused with the establishment of a data base system that turns 
out to be multi-phased, protracted and mostly neutralized. A 
model of the way a modern materials monitoring system should 
function is the data processing process introduced in Japan's 
support institutions and projects[.sup]23[/]. 
  Overall management of the materials monitoring system should 
reside with the above-mentioned program management. This 
acquires the necessary data through strategic study groups and 
the issuance of reports. Important data gathering activities 
should also include regular trips made by groups of researchers 
and industrialists to Japan, the U.S. and other countries of 
importance in materials research. But it is crucial from the 
outset that the necessary "Technology and Marketing 
Intelligence" is a substantial component of the top 
decision-making level of program management. It has to become a 
major agenda item for the "materials strategy" study group just 
as are the workshops on foci and areas of activity (see the 
following descriptions in chart 5.6). 
<H5>  5.3 Thematic foci for future materials research support </H5>
  The implementation of a future support program carrying out 
the tasks described in the previous chapter (5.2), requires a 
reorientation of subject and development goals. In this context, 
a new subject should range from a material's maximum properties 
all the way to materials as optimum systems components. This 
type of subject facilitates an equalization of materials 
development, design, configuration and other possible variables 
of a component and as a result also its ability to be integrated 
into a system. For this reason, any future program for materials 
and systems innovation should concentrate on foci in which the 
systems function depends to a great extent on materials' 
properties and that simultaneously assumes a key role in the 
FRG's competitive position. These include, for example: 


    -  energy engineering 
  -  transportation design 
  -  information and communication technology 
  -  micro-electronic systems 
  -  optoelectronic systems 
  -  medical engineering. 
  Undoubtedly one of the major challenges of the future under 
energy engineering will be, above all, the rational use of 
energy and the utilization of fossil energy sources employing 
new energy systems. Tackling this task is inconceivable without 
highly developed materials and their ongoing further 
development. In this context there will be different demands for 
different categories of materials for each of the various energy 
systems (e.g., advanced fossil power plant technologies, fuel 
cells, solar energy). The specific demand will result from the 
conditions under which the energy systems have to function. 
  For mobility, one of the hallmarks of modern societies, 
rapid 
and reliable means of transportation are essential. These 
increasingly have to address requirements for increased safety, 
fewer harmful emissions and more economical fuel consumption. 
Associated development aimed at weight savings or even new drive 
trains (such as zero-emission-vehicles) will call for a plethora 
of materials innovations, e.g., selection of materials for 
lightweight components, fuel cells, energy storage devices, 
magnetic propulsion systems, as well as materials solutions in 
new combustion designs. 
  To a special extent even information and communication 
technology products depend on systems-capable high-performance 
materials. They range from semiconductor materials, chip housing 
materials (ceramics, polymers, gold) for integrated circuits via 
glass, liquid crystals, magnetic materials as systems components 
all the way up to key materials for networks, just to mention a 
few at this point. There is not questioning the special 
importance of micro-electronic and optoelectronic systems and 
their enormous broad-spectrum character. However, this is a 
fundamental issue for the future structural positioning of the 
FRG. Discussing and responding to it are beyond the scope of 
this study. 
  The medical engineering sector places high demands on the 
ability of different types of materials to be integrated into 
systems. For example, in this critical branch, in the case of 
implants, it is not the maximum properties of the individual 
materials that is required but optimum coordination, design and 
quality control of the different materials. 
  The fresh focusing and structuring of a future support 
design, as proposed in chart 5.3 and favored by many materials 
experts, basically constitutes a shifting of the axes towards an 
applied and systems oriented structure involving issues that 
transcend materials compared with the current MATFO program with 
its materials-related structure. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-133A>        Chart 5.3: Proposed basic thematic structure for a future materials and systems innovation support </FIG>



  The individual program sectors having an applied orientation 
in this context are chosen in such a way that there is no direct 
link to a branch (to avoid support for branches). Instead, 
broad-spectrum functions are covered as much as possible since 
their positive impacts are capable of encompassing a large 
number of branches and consequently are likely to increase 
competitiveness in general. In the various sectors, it is 
possible to cover the entire net product chain from basic 
materials up to components and systems, respectively. Compared 
with basic materials, the market and turnover potential for 
components that is often higher by a factor of 500 to 1,000 
would justify not only the thematic implementation of a future 
support program but also the allocation of appropriate funding 
for research. 
  Essentially, where it makes sense, there should be a 
possibility for competition among various materials in the 
various net product stages in order to realize optimum 
solutions. On the component and systems levels the synergistic 
effects of complementary materials should also be exploited. In 
the future, as a reflection of specific systems requirements, 
there must be a targeted advanced development of materials 
property profiles (see chart 5.4). It is also necessary -- and 
this is the unequivocal result of our research -- to create the 
prerequisite conditions for future (market) dissemination of 
materials and systems innovations and therefore prioritization 
of topics such as: 


    -  component quality and reliability 
  -  consistency in the qualities of specific materials, 
semi-finished products and components 
  -  lowering of materials and processing costs 
  -  advanced development of processing technologies. 
  The issue of which components and systems should ultimately 
be included in the design of the new program, in addition to 
mere materials development, has to be resolved on the 
decision-making level of program management. This will initially 
entail considerable need for coordination with other support 
programs or timely discussion of initiatives. The average 
requirement for a future materials and systems innovation 
program, however, decisively depends on what systems entailing 
what technological complexity will be integrated in such a 
program, with the spectrum ranging from small micro-electronic 
systems that have not yet been covered in the in microsystems 
engineering program, all the way up to complex systems like 
alternative drive train designs. 
  Besides the sectors having an applied orientation, other 
program sectors, albeit with less emphasis, should be projected 
in which it is possible to seize upon new fields of application 
and other materials-based fundamental topics. 
  The limit for official support is, for instance, as 
currently 
in the materials research program, to be found in basic research 
having an applied orientation. Chart 5.5 schematically lists 
this for each stage of net product using appropriate 
hatch-marking with the support program being the link between 
institutionalized basic research (universities, MPG and DFG 
support) and industrial, applied research. In principle, each of 
the described net product stages terminates in a mature product 
that simultaneously constitutes the "raw material" for the next 
stage. During the development time of each product, in general, 
the basic research themes decrease in favor of 
application-oriented research themes. Ultimately, direct 
research support should always keep in view the basic nature and 
applied-orientation of basic research since applied research 
that is purely product related is essentially a corporate 
responsibility. Such basic and/or applied orientation research 
themes could be pursued both as projects along the net product 
chain as well as within each of the individual net product 
stages. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-135A>   Chart 5.4: Selective examples of properties-oriented thematic foci for a future support </FIG>




<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-136A>          Chart 5.5 Schematic illustration of the support focus of a future support design </FIG>


<H5>  5.4 Program organization and support principles </H5>
  Any future support design should have its goal the 
establishment of a strategically focused program organization 
guaranteeing both an appropriate prioritizing of themes and 
(over the medium term) a comprehensive, systematic management 
and coordination of all FRG activities in the materials research 
sector. 
  Program organization should provide three levels for 
realizing normative, strategic, and operative management (see 
chart 5.6). 
  - Program management: 
  The BMFT should set up a program management with a majority 
of the members from the BMFT. To ensure coordination of 
strategic issues at the highest level members from other 
pertinent ministries, e.g., the BMVg and BMWi, should also be 
represented. The program management committee will be assisted 
by a high level group of advisors whose members will be experts 
from industry, associations, and non-industrial research. 
  The responsibilities of the program management should be: 


    -  strategic focusing of the entire program after the 
pattern of respective European, U.S., and Japanese support 
programs and establishment of the general conditions 
  -  establishment of specific program objectives, establishment 
and 
organization of program sectors, engendering and dismantling 
major individual projects and groups of directly associated 
projects 
  -  implementation of a portfolio management as an apparatus of 
strategic management providing a target profile of the program 
structure and implementing target/attainment comparisons on the 
basis of criteria that are provided, for example 
  - basic/applied orientation 
  - attractiveness/risk profiles 
  - branch/application foci and 
  - research fields and program sectors. 
%supra-jurisdictional coordination of various BMFT program 
activities in the materials technologies sector that should be 
institutionalized on the department and division chiefs level 
and initially should be used to coordinate the various support 
activities for increased efficiency of official support 
activities 
%over the medium to long term, transfer of the management of all 
support activities having relevance for materials under a single 
authority. 
  - Program control 
  A fulltime program manager should be responsible for program 
control. His staff will manage the individual program sectors. 
The program manager will report to the program management 
committee. 
  In this way, program control is the link between the 
decision-making level and the operative level where the actual 
project activity occurs. The essential responsibility of program 
control should be program implementation in conformity with the 
goals. This is a responsibility that has both a strategic and an 
operative character. Program control will be assisted by 
alternating experts from the materials technologies sector 
(program foci and fields of activity workshops). 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-138A>        Chart 5.6: Proposed basic table of organization for a future support design </FIG>

  Concrete responsibilities of program control should be: 


    -  establishment of fields of activity under the program 
foci 
  -  project selection reflecting the strategic objective 
  -  preparing a decision on approval of major projects or groups 
of 
projects by the program management committee 
  -  Obtaining expert advice for a technical and scientific 
assessment of project applications 
  -  control and coordination of projects using R&amp;D control 
resources 
  -  portfolio management in individual program sectors and across 
program sectors. 
  The actual project activity should be carried out in fields 
of activity under program foci. Based on the experiences of the 
current program, the basic principles of any modern project 
management should be established in all projects. This 
presupposes appropriate 


    -  goal-oriented project definition (objectives, strategic 
significance, competitive environment, time and cost planning) 
  -  structural organization of the project (organizational 
structuring of the project with project managers and those 
responsible for the activity packages) 
  -  organization of the project cycle (preliminary project 
survey, 
project survey, milestones system, release of resources at major 
milestones, conclusion of the project) and 
  -  project control (portfolio analysis, budget planning and 
monitoring). 
  To meet the objectives in the best way possible on the 
operative, that is, the project level, and to resolve the 
putative tense relationship between basic research and applied 
industrial development, the materials and systems innovation 
program should project three parallel types of projects for 
support: 


    -  type A projects: projects having a broad-spectrum 
character and an applied orientation 
  -  type B projects: basic-oriented support involving long term 
potential for great usefulness 
  -  type S projects: special projects having a high level of 
innovation. 
  Type A projects should be allocated nearly 70 percent of 
support funding; type B projects, in turn, should henceforth be 
provided with approximately 20 percent of support funding. 
Additionally, about 10 percent of the budget should be set aside 
for special projects that are only inadequately covered by type 
A and B projects, but over the long term facilitate interesting 
and unconventional developments. For all three types of 
projects, support activities and projects have to be quite 
differently focused (see charts 5.7 and 5.8). 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-140A>        Chart 5.7: Proposed budget allocation for a future support design </FIG>

  - Type A projects: projects having a broad-spectrum 
character 
and an applied orientation 
  The future support focus of the BMFT's materials and systems 
innovation program should aim at application-oriented projects 
having a highly synergistic and broad-spectrum character. 
Projects should mainly be supported that generate know-how of 
interest equally to a number of firms and research institutes 
but that can be realized in an R&amp;D combine cost effectively 
and 
entailing coordination advantages. The requirement for official 
support in each individual instance must be justified through 
externalities and coordination advantages with the intervention 
of the BMFT. 
  The initiative for basic type A projects should chiefly come 
from committed industrial firms for whom the project has great 
strategic importance but that see recognizable advantages to 
including other (private and government) partners. The amount of 
support should basically total 50 percent. Some single 
industrial partner, the one with the greatest strategic interest 
and the greatest competence, should assume project management. 
Basic type A projects should have as their objective a salable 
product in a period of at most a decade. Particular attention 
should be given to the complementarity and perceptibly limited 
activity and competence sectors of the participating partners. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-141A>        Chart 5.8: Proposed types of projects in a future support design </FIG>


  Groups of expert advisors for basic type A projects should 
include applied-orientation scientists having industrial 
background knowledge. The process for selecting, awarding and 
controlling projects should be strictly selective and based on 
established guidelines emphasizing primarily market strategy 
criteria. 
  Three types of projects should be distinguished among basic 
type A applied-orientation support projects. Different 
objectives are uppermost in each of them and these therefore 
require a different type of support. This entails the following 
types of projects: 
  A1: vertical projects 
  A2: horizontal broad-spectrum projects and 
  A3: SME projects. 
  Based on the results of the MATFO program assessment the 
future support design should manifest the following changes in 
emphasis: 
  1. a much greater emphasis on vertical applied projects 
leading to market-oriented products and simultaneously 
innovations in a number of net product stages 
  2. additional, albeit less heavily pushed, support for 
materials-related horizontal broad-spectrum projects and 
  3. explicit support for SME projects in such fields of 
activity and based on support principles that are appropriate to 
the innovation goals and requirements of medium-size firms (see 
chart 5.9). 
  - A1:vertical projects 
  Approximately 30 to 40 percent of support financing in the 
future materials and systems innovation program should be 
focused on vertical projects with an applied orientation. In now 
wise, however, should such focusing be confused with "near 
market" projects. Many developments in the materials engineering 
sector require simultaneous developments in a number of process 
and net product stages and thereby occasion high project costs, 
risks and lead times. Although such complex developments are 
application oriented and linked to quite specific final 
applications, they are still far from being "near market" or 
"marketable without problems."[.sup]23[/] [footnote - The 
BMFT's list of criteria for determining the need for support 
should be reworked in view of this too lopsided treatment of the 
"near market" terminology]. Support for such complex, vertical 
projects does indeed appear indispensable, but it should still 
be well grounded in each instance. 
  Participation in vertical projects should extend to 
materials 
suppliers, processors and final consumers. The decisive factor 
should be at what processing stage the critical development 
steps occur and how urgent the need for coordination is. 
Participation should not be extended too broadly (a maximum of 
five firms). One of the firms, preferably the consumer firm, 
should assume project management. 
  - A2: horizontal broad-spectrum projects 
  About 20 to 25 percent of the budget of the future materials 
and systems innovation program should be allocated to horizontal 
broad-spectrum projects in which quite specific materials and 
individual net product stages are foremost. Participants should 
comprise materials suppliers, application-oriented institutes, 
processors and materials specialists from consumer firms. At 
this point there should be an opening projected in the direction 
of possible international cooperation. Uppermost should be the 
joint quest for fresh know-how involving all participants 
equally but that each, separately, could not address because of 
financial, informational or specific standardization 
restrictions. Such horizontal projects also justify support for 
50 percent of the development cost. 
  Horizontal projects are not without problems in their 
coordination and call for a very skillful selection of 
participants. Project selection, oversight and control also 
merit comparatively higher outlay on the part of the program 
management. 


<FIG ID=JPRS-EST-10L-143A>        Chart 5.9: Proposed project types in the context of applied-oriented broad-spectrum </FIG>

  - SME projects 
  SME support was originally one of the objectives of the 
1985-1994 MATFO program. Project analyses, however, indicated 
that the participation of SMEs turned out to be only very 
limited, contrary to original expectations. This was certainly 
due to the design of the current program (basic orientation, 
combined projects, focusing on capital intensive materials 
developments). 
  Reorientation under the future 1995-2005 materials and 
systems innovation program, however, should provide for 
definitely greater participation by SMEs in an amount totaling 
15 percent of total support volume. This can only be 
accomplished by shifting the program's focus and furnishing 
support instruments that are also actually compatible with the 
innovations requirements and characteristics of medium-size 
enterprises. 
  SMEs are especially promising in the following sectors as 
target groups for any future materials and systems innovation 
program: 


    -  as suppliers of development and production activities 
at specified processing stages (e.g., processors of composite 
materials, surface and solidification processes) 
  -  as specialized suppliers for preliminary products, equipment 
and services 
  -  as innovative users of new materials in the kind of sectors 
that are typified by low numbers of pieces or by highly 
specialized niche markets. 
  Before adopting the new materials and systems innovation 
program therefore, a targeted screening should be undertaken as 
to which of those three types of SMEs in which special niches 
are to be considered as target groups in Germany for a 
SME-oriented partial program. Then the support apparatus should 
be appropriately adapted to their specific requirements. This 
also means, in particular, greater flexibility in the choice of 
appropriate support instruments. The apparatus of indirectly 
specific support as a complement to project support may also be 
considered in this context for a more intensive expansion of 
specific new categories of materials and processing technologies. 
  There should be a targeted screening of type A1 A2 projects 
as to which SME-appropriate activities (supplies, services, 
applications) could be supported through complementary SME 
support in the arena of larger combined projects. In this 
context, even innovative support concepts (support of 
technologically oriented corporate institutes, providing share 
capital, supporting corporate ventures, etc.) should be 
consciously kept in view. 
  - Type B projects: support for basic research 
  Approximately 20 percent of the program's budget should be 
allocated to basic research problems and exploratory research 
designed for the long term. In the materials research sector 
there are subjects and problems of a highly basic nature that 
are only inadequately covered by existing support institutions. 
The BMFT should also assume overall charge of those long term 
topics that are highly relevant for future development and 
industrial application of new materials. But it should 
deliberately use other support instruments and selection 
principles for this purpose. 
  Under long-term, basic type B projects, there should be 
support for the acquisition of basic know-how that may lead over 
a period of 10 to 20 years to effective applications in very 
many sectors of the German economy. The total amount of support 
for this should be as much as 100 percent. "Systems leadership" 
should, to the extent possible, reside with a top level 
scientist. Industry may take on a tutorial function and should 
be represented in the group of expert advisors. The award, 
oversight and control process should involve as little 
bureaucracy as possible. 
  Under basic type B basically-oriented projects, the 
appropriate institutional framework, from the outset, should not 
be defined too narrowly. Individual research centers and centers 
of competence should be support as well as combined projects. In 
the context of basically-oriented combined projects, a number of 
basic research institutions, with as many complementary fields 
of competence as possible, should be motivated to cooperate over 
longer time periods. Even corporate basic research sectors could 
be actively included in such projects. In organizing such basic 
projects unqualified attention should also be given to openness 
and innovative promise. This argues against too lopsided support 
for established groups and the perpetuation of programs in the 
same circles of research. Deliberate reconsideration should be 
given to new foundations by institutes and to ad hoc institutes. 
The selection and approval should be done by peer groups and top 
level scientists but not only by the same groups repeatedly in 
order to facilitate the inflow of new ideas from "hangers-on" 
and "cross-thinkers." Participating peer groups and scientists 
should also be sought outside purely national groups. 
  In addition to the direct support instrument, either for 
individual or combined projects, it appears to make sense to us, 
above all in the SME sector, to have selective application of 
indirectly specific activities for the establishment of 
corporate foundations or investments in relevant materials 
sectors (e.g., limited assumption of personnel costs and 
investment costs, providing share capital, etc.). But this 
should be more accurately examined in the context of a 
strategic, prior assessment as well as the impact of possibly 
necessary indirect measures such as tax relief, or the 
harmonization of laws and regulations hindering innovation. 
  - Type S projects: special projects having a high level of 
innovation 
  About 10 percent of the program's budget should be set aside 
for special projects having a high level of innovation. This 
should afford the possibility of supporting unconventional but 
long-term implementable developments. The spectrum of 
possibilities ranges from support for especially innovative 
individual projects to support for ad hoc institutes for top 
ranking scientists from research and industry to strategically 
important study groups. This expression of direct project 
support should be open to all groups of participants ad provide 
for both individual research and combined research. Amounts of 
support should total between 30 and 100 percent depending on the 
respective proximity to application. 
<H5>  5.5 Supplemental strategies and recommended action for other </H5>
institutions 
  Materials research and technology are still laboring under 
continued insufficient coordination of the decision-making and 
action-taking platforms due to its broad-spectrum character, the 
numerous functions and responsibilities that have to be tackled 
simultaneously and because of the many layers of unresolved 
effects. In the support policy sector there are a number of 
federal jurisdictions involved. The states of the FRG play a 
major role and increasingly even European programs are 
important. The effectiveness of any future materials support 
program quite decidedly depends on the coordination among such 
federal, state and EC levels. 
  To this effect, the success of more intense coordination 
definitely depends on whether any single institution (e.g., the 
BMFT) succeeds in acquiring control over finance and information 
flows and to what extent two or more institutions can be induced 
into sustained cooperation. In terms of these two questions, the 
following sectors of activities should be 
distinguished[.sup]24[/]. 


    -  Activities that the BMFT can engage in on its own in 
the context of its purview and government funding 
  -  activities that the BMFT has to conduct in association and in 
coordination with one or more other federal authorities 
  -  activities that call for cooperation between the federal 
government and the state governments and, lastly, 
  -  activities that require cooperation among the federal 
government, the EC and other supranational institutions on the 
European and international levels. 
  These four sorts of activities are arranged according to the 
degree of difficulty it takes for effective coordination to be 
able to be realized. The coordination of the kinds of activities 
that the BMFT is able to deal with on its own could be 
comparatively free of problems. In contrast, if not insoluble, 
the coordination between national and European activities can be 
particularly difficult especially if the strategies of different 
action groups cannot be mutually harmonized and if undefined 
limits to competencies persist. 
  In the implementation of a support strategy, the BMFT should 
first "set the tone" when it alone has "full control of the 
baton." But making a start in its own house is not always as 
easy as might be initially expected, considering intrinsic 
limits in the internal organization of fields and programs. The 
BMFT encompasses relevant materials research activities 
distributed among various departments and divisions. Any 
effective future materials and systems innovation program will 
require intensive networking among those responsible for a 
number of programs. These include, for instance, the current 
MATFO program, the surface and thin film engineering program, 
microsystems engineering and selective sectors of the 
information engineering program. Also to be included are 
officials from the departments that oversee, among other things, 
relevant materials research activities for basic research. A 
stab also has to be made at effective cooperation among the 
various participating project sponsors. Cooperation encompassing 
divisions and project sponsors should be supported through 
jointly supported projects and common study groups under the 
topic of "key industries for increasing international 
competitiveness." 
  Materials technology and its application are also heavily 
influenced by activities that call for a linkage or coordination 
of a number of federal authorities. 
  To better coordinate the various authorities we propose two 
measures: first, interministerial working groups should be 
created to jointly come up with a solution for specific, 
operationally defined issues (e.g., on the topic of recyclable 
materials) and support joint projects. The authorities should 
also be incorporated into the broad group of advisors for the 
future materials research program described in section 5.3. 
  Greater coordination between federal and state levels also 
appears to be of major importance for the future materials 
research program. Over the past decade there has occasionally 
been unparalleled technology-policy federalism in the FRG. The 
federal government should be striving for better coordination 
here by consciously being attentive to actions complementary to 
state strategies. In this regard attention should be given to 
the following division of labor and synergistic relationship: 


    -  under the states, development of universities, basic 
research and support for regional innovation strategies 
  -  on the federal level, nationally important technology support 
programs, support for strategically important basic research 
sectors and coordination between national and European research 
policy. 
  The BMFT and other federal authorities possess highly 
effective instruments for being able to better coordinate the 
various research sectors (for instance, via the DFG and BMFT 
financing of basic research). But there must first be a strategy 
for this on the national level. Whoever develops the strategy 
more rapidly and more compatibly with the requirements will 
assume a leadership role in shaping the program. At the moment, 
individual states are planning intensive activities in the 
materials research support sector. Under the umbrella of a 
future materials and systems innovation program, the competence 
and responsibility should reside much more with the federation. 
A higher level of materials research and technology is primarily 
a national responsibility that must be effectively supported by 
the states but that should not principally be determined by them. 
  In the future materials and systems innovation program too, 
special attention should focus on greater coordination between 
national and European support. In the upcoming decade European 
research and technology policy will increasingly assume greater 
significance and require increasingly greater competencies 
compared to national measures. Even the materials research 
sector, in fact, will be one of the important foci of European 
research and technology policy. Hence, any national support 
program will have to be increasingly more intensely coordinated 
with strategies and reserved activities on the European level. 
  Greater coordination with European programs, however, should 
in no wise entail subordination of national programs. On the 
contrary, European research and technology policy can only 
continue to be strengthened if it is supported by highly 
developed national R&amp;D policies and if each of the leading 
states acts as a source of impetus using national activities. 
Within Europe, the FRG is the leading nation in important 
materials engineering sectors. The sectors in which we currently 
occupy a leadership position should be emphasized in order to 
develop national strategies and emphases on the basis of them. 
  Over the long-term it will be useful for the competitiveness 
of European industry and the competency of European materials 
research for national sectors of expertise and a greater 
division of labor to emerge on the basis of categories of 
materials and applied foci. In any event, this will be more 
productive than a more "leveling" strategy that reduces the 
level of research to a European average and in each country the 
same internationally insignificant research groups and supplier 
structures are established. The latter reflects past European 
materials engineering wherein each country endeavored to support 
more or less the same categories of materials and applied foci. 
Europe's future, however, lies in a greater degree of 
specialization, wherein the individual countries focus on quite 
specific fields in which they can make an appropriate impact in 
a global context. 
  In the period between 1993-2000, an appropriate European 
division of labor in the materials engineering sector will 
emerge only through an evolutionary process that will be 
typified by numerous iterations. Still, a minimum amount of 
"rational design" and effective strategizing appears to be 
indispensable. Therefore materials engineering in Europe will 
also be decidedly determined by the extent to which the decision 
makers from any single country actively shape European policy 
and have a targeted impact on the resulting division of labor. 
  More and more resources in the future will be allocated via 
European programs and the European element will have an 
increasingly greater impact on the shaping of national policy. 
In the future, there will be ever more demand for a proactive 
behavior with high support for European programs but building on 
a well-defined national strategy. The BMFT and the national 
institutes (project sponsors, expert advisory groups, 
institutes) should deliberately claim overall management of 
important parts of the European materials research program. 
There is merit in recommending a decision-making sequence in 
which materials research strategy continues to be defined on the 
national level before the next strategy-making step is taken on 
the European level. 
  Greater coordination of national and European materials 
research programs also means, in particular, targeted management 
on the partial program and project levels. The most important 
European programs and initiatives in materials research are 
BRITE/EURAM II, COST and EUREKA. National strategies that will 
be elaborated in the course of coming months in accordance with 
the methodology recommended in the preceding chapters, will have 
to stipulate especially who will be active in which program with 
which objective and in which way each single program will be 
supported through supplementary national activities. In this 
context, attention should be given to a balanced relation 
between the complexity and subsidiary aspects whereby important 
national and European materials research programs are mutually 
reinforced. 
  In the future, in order to effectively realize the required 
coordination among European, national and regional policies too, 
it will be essential in the future to commission an agency with 
systems management. Such systems management may be awarded 
either for materials research as a whole or just for program 
foci. Whatsoever shape appropriate coordination will assume on 
the European level in the second half of the nineties, FRG 
institutions should prepare in a timely fashion to assume a 
major role therein. Possible future systems managers may be 
chosen both from groups of private firms as well as public 
institutions. However, only institutions in those countries in 
which firms provide sizable funding for R&amp;D and in which 
there 
exists a strategically focused national R&amp;D support policy, 
will 
play any decisive role. 
Footnotes: 
  23. See, for example, the descriptions in FREEMAN (1988), 
GERYBADZE (1990) and OKIMOTO (1989) 
  24. This breakdown reflects the methodology already used for 
assessing the BMFT's data processing program. See ADL (1983, 
section 5.10) 
<H5>  Appendix </H5>
  A 1: List of tables 
  A 2: List of charts 
  A 3: Bibliography 
  A 4: List of firms and institutions 
  A 5: List of abbreviations 
  - List of general abbreviations 
  - List of specific abbreviations for materials 
<H5>  A 1 List of tables </H5>
  Table 2.1: Survey of budget allocation by major project 
categories 
  Table 2.2: Survey of budget allocation by groups of 
materials 
  Table 2.3a: Survey of budget allocation for specific 
materials on the basis of groups of recipients of the financing 
- industry's share 
  Table 2.3b: Survey of budget allocation for specific 
materials on the basis of groups of recipients of the financing 
- institutes' share 
  Table 2.4: Survey of budget distribution among applicant 
  Table 2.5: Survey of budget distribution among industrial 
recipients of financing 
  Table 2.6: Survey of budget distribution among different 
industrial sectors 
  Table 2.7: Selective examples of project results in the 
ceramics sector 
  Table 2.8: Selective examples of project results in the 
powder metallurgy sector 
  Table 2.9: Selective examples of project results in the 
high-temperature and specialty metal sector 
  Table 2.10: Selective examples of project results in the 
polymers sector 
  Table 2.11: Selective examples of project results in the 
composites sector 
  Table 3.1: The 50 companies with the highest turnover 
worldwide and the importance of materials research for those 
companies 
  Table 3.2: The 25 Japanese companies with the highest 
turnover and the importance of materials research for those 
companies 
  Table 3.3: The 25 U.S. companies with the highest turnover 
and the importance of materials research for those companies 
  Table 3.4: The 25 German companies with the highest turnover 
and the importance of materials research for those companies 
  Table 3.5: Most important MITI programs having greater 
importance for materials research 
  Table 3.6: Specific MITI materials research projects 
  Table 3.7: Materials research projects under the STA's 
"Special Coordination Fund for Promoting Science and Technology" 
  Table 3.8: Foci of EC research support in the third 
framework 
program 
  Table 3.9: Support sectors under the BRITE/EURAM II program 
  Table 3.10: Materials research projects under the COST 
initiative 
  Table 3.11: Materials research projects entailing German 
participation under the EUREKA initiative 
  Table 3.12: Interdisciplinary Research Councils [IRCs] in 
the 
new materials sector 
  Table 3.13: Allocation of support funding among various 
universities 
  Table 3.14: Distribution of MATFO projects among MPG 
institutes 
  Table 3.15: Distribution of MATFO projects among the 
Fraunhofer Society's Institutes 
  Table 3.16: Distribution of MATFO projects among 
universities 
and institutes in the new states of the FRG 
  Table 3.17: Survey of training in the materials sciences 
sector at German universities 
<H5>  A 2 List of charts </H5>
  Chart 2.1: Assessment of the importance of the materials 
research program's objectives 
  Chart 2.2: Assessment of the materials research program's 
goal attainment 
  Chart 2.3: Assessment of the importance of support 
principles 
relevant to materials research 
  Chart 2.4: Assessment of the importance of types of support 
relevant to materials research 
  Chart 2.5: Assessment of program organization and 
implementation in the materials research program 
  Chart 3.1: Selective research activities by Japanese firms 
in 
the high-performance materials sector 
  Chart 3.2: Selective research activities by Japanese firms 
in 
the electronic materials sector 
  Chart 3.3: Selective cooperative activities by Japanese 
firms 
in the materials technologies sector 
  Chart 3.4: Selective materials technologies having great 
importance for developments in specific sectors 
  Chart 3.5: R&amp;D allocations of selective Japanese 
ministries 
  Chart 3.6: Schematic depiction of the structural 
organization 
for materials research support in Japan 
  Chart 3.7: Basic ministerial activities for the realization 
of strategic goals in Japan's materials research 
  Chart 3.8: Schematic depiction of the structural 
organization 
for materials research support in the U.S. 
  Chart 3.9: Planned R&amp;D outlays of individual U.S. 
departments 
and agencies under the AMPP program 
  Chart 3.10: R&amp;D outlays for specific materials under 
the AMPP 
program 
  Chart 4.1: Types of technologies and their positioning in 
the 
technological life cycle 
  Chart 4.2: Comparative illustration of absolute outlays for 
R&amp;D in selective countries 
  Chart 4.3: Comparative illustration of relative R&amp;D 
outlays 
of selective countries in percent of GDP 
  Chart 4.4: Determining the relative technological position 
of 
the FRG in high-performance materials and their processing 
technologies 
  Chart 4.5: Schematic survey of the most important groups of 
materials 
  Chart 4.6: Projected international market volume for 
high-performance materials as basic materials and semi-finished 
products/components from high-performance materials 
  Chart 4.7: Materials-oriented division of high-performance 
ceramic materials 
  Chart 4.8: Important net product stages and processing 
principles in the production of ceramic components 
  Chart 4.9: Selective fields of application for 
high-performance ceramics 
  Chart 4.10: Projected international market volumes for 
high-performance ceramics as basic materials and semi-finished 
products/components from high-performance ceramic materials 
  Chart 4.11: Materials-oriented division of high-performance 
polymer materials 
  Chart 4.12: Important net product stages and processing 
principles in the production of high-performance polymer 
components 
  Chart 4.13: Selective fields of application for 
high-performance polymers 
  Chart 4.14: Projected international market volume for 
high-performance polymers as basic materials and for 
semi-finished products/components from high-performance polymers 
  Chart 4.15: Materials-oriented division of high-performance 
metallic materials 
  Chart 4.16: Important net product stages and processing 
principles in powder metallurgy 
  Chart 4.17: Selective properties and areas of application 
for 
high-performance metallic materials 
  Chart 4.18: Estimated international market volume of 
high-performance metallic materials as basic materials and 
semi-finished products/components from high-performance metals 
and alloys 
  Chart 4.19: Materials-oriented division of high-performance 
composite materials 
  Chart 4.20: Important net product stages and processing 
principles in the production of composite material components 
  Chart 4.21: Properties and applied fields for 
high-performance composite materials 
  Chart 4.22: Projected international volume of 
high-performance composites as basic materials and 
high-performance composite semi-finished products/components 
  Chart 4.23: Determining Germany's competitive position in 
internationally important branches 
  Chart 4.24: Illustration of the importance of 
high-performance materials technologies for selective branches 
  Chart 4.25: Selective high-performance materials for use in 
electronic systems 
  Chart 4.26: Selective high-performance materials for use in 
optoelectronic systems 
  Chart 5.1: Effectiveness of different support instruments in 
the materials research sector 
  Chart 5.2: Proposed timeline and milestones chart for any 
-future materials and systems innovation support design 
  Chart 5.3: Proposed basic thematic structure for a future 
materials and systems innovation support design 
  Chart 5.4: Selective examples of properties-oriented 
thematic 
foci for a future support design 
  Chart 5.5 Schematic illustration of the support focus of a 
future support design 
  Chart 5.6: Proposed basic table of organization for a future 
support design 
  Chart 5.7: Proposed budget allocation for a future support 
design 
  Chart 5.8: Proposed types of projects in a future support 
design 
  Chart 5.9: Proposed project types in the context of 
applied-oriented broad-spectrum projects 
<H5>  A 3 Bibliography </H5>
  Because of the large number of sources that was assessed for 
the drafting of this report, a listing of which would exceed the 
scope of this report, the bibliography has been limited to 
selective sources. 
  1. Aldinger, F.; Boecker, W.:Entwicklung nichtoxidischer 
Hochleistungskeramik - Forschung und technische Realisierung, 2. 
Symposium Materialforschung 1991 des BMFT, Projekttraegerschaft 
Material- und Rohstofforschung Forschungszentrum Juelich GmbH 
(1991) 153-154 [Development of Non-Oxide High-Performance 
Ceramics - Research and Technical Realization, Second BMFT 
Materials Research Symposium in 1991, Project Sponsorship of 
Materials and Raw Materials Research, Juelich GmbH Research 
Center] 
  2. Aldinger, F.; Cherdron, H.; Kuehnlein, K.; Riggs, J.: 
Materials Research Concepts in the Chemical Industry, Advanced 
Materials (1992) 138-142 
  3. Altenpohl, D.G.: Material in World Perspective, Springer 
Verlag Berlin, Heidelberg, New York 1980 
  4. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: Advanced Structural 
Ceramics Part 1: The Industry, Spectrum, Massachusetts, USA, 
August 1992 
  5. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: Advanced Ceramics, 
Part 2: World Market, Spectrum, Massachusetts, USA, August 1992 
  6. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: Bioactive Ceramics 
and Glasses, Futurescope, Massachusetts, USA, August 1989 
  7. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: Ceramic Packaging 
for 
Electronic Devices, Massachusetts, USA 
  8. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: Competitive Forces 
for Engineering Thermoplastics and their Impact on 
Profitability, Spectrum, Massachusetts, USA, January 1988 
  9. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: Diamond Film 
Technology in Japan, Futurescope, Massachusetts, USA, December 
1990 
  10. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: Electronic 
Materials 
for the Semiconductor Industry, Futurescope, Massachusetts, USA, 
May 1990 
  11. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: High Temperature 
Plastics - Emerging Applications and Markets, DR Reports, 
Massachusetts, USA, April 1989 
  12. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: High-Performance 
Plastic Films, Futurescope, Massachusetts, USA, January 1990 
  13. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: High-Performance 
Polymers in Electrical and Electronic Applications in Japan, 
Spectrum, Massachusetts, USA, April 1991 
  14. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: High-Performance 
Polymers in Opto-Electronic-Applications in Japan, Spectrum, 
Massachusetts, USA, June 1992 
  15. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: Intrinsically 
Conductive Polymers - Applications and Market trends, Spectrum, 
Massachusetts, USA, January 1992 
  16. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: Japanese Advanced 
Ceramics - Industry Structure and Growth Prospects, 
Massachusetts, USA, October 1988 
  17. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: Leadership in 2001 
- 
Technology and Market, Arthur D. Little 7th Annual Executive 
Forum, Boston, Mass., 01-03 June 1988 
  18. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: Markets and 
Applications for Ceramic Materials Part 1: Oxide Ceramics and 
Part 2: Nonoxide Ceramics, Spectrum, Massachusetts, USA, October 
1992 
  19. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: Molecular 
Composites 
- Potential Applications and Markets, Spectrum, Massachusetts, 
USA, March 1991 
  20. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: Orthopedic Implant 
Materials, Spectrum, Massachusetts, USA, March 1992 
  21. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: Outlook for 
Advanced 
Engineering Materials - Plastics, Composites and Ceramics, 
Impact, Massachusetts, USA, November 1986 
  22. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: Polymer Alloys and 
Blends - Reshaping Competition in the Plastics Industry, 
Futurescope, Massachusetts, USA, April 1990 
  23. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: Predicting 
Component 
Life - Critical to Product Design and Development, Spectrum, 
Massachusetts, USA, July 1988 
  24. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: Shape Memory 
Alloys, 
Spectrum, Massachusetts, USA, July 1988 
  25. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: The Impact of 
High-temperature Superconductors on the Chemical Industry, 
Spectrum, Massachusetts, USA, February 1988 
  26. Arthur D. Little Decision Resources: The Japanese 
Composites Industry - Poised for Changes in the Global Market, 
Spectrum, Massachusetts, USA, July 1992 
  27. Arthur D. Little International (editor): Management der 
F&amp;E-Strategie [R&amp;D Strategy Management], Verlag Gabler 
GmbH, 
Wiesbaden 1991 
  28. Arthur D. Little International (editor): Management der 
Geschaefte von morgen, 2. Auflage [Managing Tomorrow's 
Businesses, second edition], Verlag Gabler, Wiesbaden 1987 
  29. Arthur D. Little International (editor): Management der 
Hochleistungsorganisation [Management of the Highly Effective 
Organization], Verlag Gabler, Wiesbaden 1990 
  30. Arthur D. Little International (editor): Management des 
geordneten Wandels [Managing Orderly Change], Verlag Gabler, 
Wiesbaden 1990 
  31. Arthur D. Little International (editor): Management im 
Zeitalter der strategischen Fuehrung, 2. Auflage [Management in 
an Age of Strategic Leadership, second edition], Verlag Gabler, 
Wiesbaden 1988 
  32. Arthur D. Little International (editor): Das 
strategische 
Management von Technologie - Ueberblick ueber Konzepte und 
Methoden [Strategic Technology Management - Survey of Concepts 
and Methods], Wiesbaden 
  33. Arthur D. Little International: Moeglichkeiten und 
Anforderungen einer zukuenftigen Foerderstrategie auf dem Gebiet 
der Informationsverarbeitung in der Bundesrepublik Deutschland, 
Bericht an den Bundesminister fuer Forschung und Technologie 
[Possibilities and Requirements of a Future Support Strategy in 
the Field of Data Processing in the FRG, Report to the BMFT], 
Wiesbaden, April 1983 
  34. Arzt, E.: Metallische Hochleistungswerkstoffe fuer hohe 
Temperaturen: Grundlagen und Perspektiven, 2. Symposium 
Materialforschung 1991 des BMFT, Projekttraegerschaft Material- 
und Rohstofforschung Forschungszentrum Juelich GmbH (1991) 
102-116 [High-Performance Metallic Materials for High 
Temperatures: Fundamentals and Prospects, Second BMFT Materials 
Research Symposium in 1991, Project Sponsorship of Materials and 
Raw Materials Research Juelich Research Center] 
  35. Arzt, E.; Sanchez, J.; Nix, W.D.: Mechanische Festigkeit 
in kleinen Dimensionen als Grundlage fuer Werkstoffe der 
Mikrotechnik, VDI-Tagung Werkstoffe der Mikrotechnik, 
[Small-Dimension Mechanical Resistance as a Basis for 
Micro-Engineering Materials, VDI Seminar on Micro-Engineering 
Materials], Karlsruhe, October 1991 
  36. Aubert, J.E.; Andrikopoulos-Ileopoulos: Evaluation of 
Scientific and Technological Programmes and Policies: A 
Selection of Current Experiences in OECD Countries, STI Review 
Nr. 6, OECD, Paris (1989) 147-178 
  37. Bargel, H.-J.; Schulze, G. (editors): Werkstoffkunde 
[Materials Science], VDI Verlag GmbH, Duesseldorf 1988 
  38. Batelle Europe: Programmevaluation 
Duennschichttechnologien - Abschlussbericht Potential- und 
Diffusionsanalyse [Assessment of Thin-Film Technologies Program 
- Final Report on an Analysis of Potential and Dissemination], 
Batelle-Institut e.V., Frankfurt 1992 
  39. Batelle Europe: Schluesseltechnologien - Eine 
Herausforderung fuer die Unternehmensfuehrung [Key technologies 
- A Challenge for Corporate Management], Batelle Information, 
Bonn, Frankfurt, April 1988 
  40. Becher, P.F.; Swain, N.V.; Somiya, F.: Advanced 
Structural Ceramics, Materials research Society Symposium 
Proceedings, Vol. 78, Pennsylvania, USA, 1987 
  41. Berg, P.; Irl, S.; Naebauer, A.; Ruge, I.: 
Molekularelektronik - Informationstechniken mit molekularen 
funktionseinheiten, Untersuchung des Instituts fuer 
Festkoerpertechnologie der Fraunhofer-Gesellschaft [Molecular 
Electronics - Information Engineering with functional molecular 
units, a Study by the Fraunhofer-Gesellschaft Solid-State 
Technology Institute], Munich 1991 
  42. Besmann, Th. M.; Gallois, B.; Warren, J. (Eds.): 
Chemical 
Vapor of Refractory Metals and Ceramics II, Materials Research 
Society Symposium Proceedings, Vol. 250, Pennsylvania, USA, 1992 
  43. Bode, I. (editor): Kunststoffkautschuk-Produkte 
[Synthetic Rubber Products] '91, Verlag Hoppenstedt, Darmstadt, 
September 1991 
  44. Botzian, R.: Querschnittsgebiete der modernen 
Technikentwicklung - Die deutsche Rolle im internationalen 
Abstimmungsprozess, Stiftung Wissenschaft und Politik (SWP) 
Forschungsinstitut fuer internationale Politik und Sicherheit 
[Broad-Spectrum Fields of Modern Technical Development - 
Germany's role in the International Coordination Process, 
Science and Policy Foundation [SWP], Research Institute for 
International Policy and Security], Ebenhausen, January 1988 
  45. Brinker, C.J.; Clark, D.E.; Ulrich, D.R. (Eds.): Better 
Ceramics Through Chemistry III, Materials research Society 
Symposium Proceedings, Vol 121, Pennsylvania, USA, 1988 
  46. Brockhoff, K.: Forschung und Entwicklung, Planung und 
Kontrolle, 3. Auflage [R&amp;D, Planning and Monitoring, Third 
Edition], R. Oldenbourg Verlag, Munich, Vienna 1992 
  47. Buckley, A.: Polymers for Non-linear Optics, Advanced 
Materials (1992) 153-158 
  48. Buckley, P.J.: The Frontiers of International Business 
Research, mir Vol. 31, Special Issue, (1991) 7-22 
  49. Bundesanstalt fuer Materialforschung und -pruefung 
(BAM): 
Forschungsbericht [Federal Institute for Materials Research and 
testing [BAM]: Research Report] 181 - Industrial and Material 
Technology: Research and Development Trends and Needs, Berlin 
1991 
  50. Bundesanstalt fuer Materialforschung und -pruefung 
(BAM): 
Jahresbericht 1990 [Federal Institute for Materials Research and 
testing [BAM]: 1990 Annual Report], Berlin 1991 
  51. Bundesanstalt fuer Materialforschung und -pruefung 
(BAM): 
Materialforschung und Materialpruefung - Bedeutung, Tendenzen, 
Aufgaben, 2. Auflage [Federal Institute for Materials Research 
and testing [BAM]: Materials Research and Materials Testing - 
Significance, Tendencies, Responsibilities, Second Edition], 
Berlin, July 1987 
  52. Bundesanstalt fuer Materialforschung und -pruefung 
(BAM): 
Forschungsbericht 117 [Federal Institute for Materials Research 
and testing [BAM]: Research Report] - Materials technologies and 
Techno-Economic Development, Berlin, October 1985 
  53. Bundesminister fuer Forschung und Technologie: 
Bundesbericht Forschung [BMFT: Federal Technology Report] 1988, 
Bonn, April 1988 
  54. Bundesminister fuer Forschung und Technologie: 
Bundesbericht Forschung [BMFT: Federal Technology Report] 1993, 
Entwurf 1.1, Stand: [Draft Copy 1.1: Cutoff date:] 29 October 
1992 
  55. Bundesminister fuer Forschung und Technologie: 
Supraleitung - Foerderkonzept und Zwischenbilanz [BMFT: 
Superconductivity - Support Design and Interim Balance] 1991, 
Bonn, April 1991 
  56. Bundesminister fuer Forschung und Technologie: Zur 
technologischen Wettbewerbsfaehigkeit der deutschen Industrie 
[BMFT: the Technological Competitiveness of Germany's Industry], 
Bonn, April 1992 
  57. Bundesminister fuer Forschung und Technologie: 
Faktenbereicht 1990 - Zum Bundesbericht Forschung 1988 [BMFT: 
1990 Factual Report - the 1988 Federal Research Report], Bonn, 
April 1990 
  58. Bundesstelle fuer Aussenhandelsinformation 
(BFAI)[Federal 
Foreign Trade Information Center [BFAI]]: Japan - Forschung und 
Technologie [Research and Technology] 1990, Cologne, July 1991 
  59. Bundesstelle fuer Aussenhandelsinformation 
(BFAI)[Federal 
Foreign Trade Information Center [BFAI]]: USA - Forschung und 
Technologie [Research and Technology] 1990/1991, Cologne, August 
1991 
  60. Bundesverband der Deutschen Industrie e. V. (BDI): 
Industrieforschung - Die europaeische Technologiegemeinschaft im 
Ost/West-Technologietransfer [Federal Association of German 
Industry e.V. [BDI]: Industrial Research - the European 
Technological Community in the East/West Transfer of 
Technology], Cologne, 1992 
  61. Bundesverband der Deutschen Industrie e. V. (BDI): 
Industrieforschung - Schluesseltechnologien, BDI-Drucksache 
[Federal Association of German Industry e.V. : Industrial 
Research - Key Technologies, BDI document] Nr. 187, Cologne 1986 
  62. Bundesverband der Deutschen Luftfahrt-, Raumfahrt- und 
Ausruestungsindustrie e.V. (BDLI): BDLI- Werkstofftag [Federal 
Association of German Aerospace and Weapons Industry e.V. [BDLI] 
- BDLI Materials Seminar] 1991, Hamburg, 13-15 November 1991 
  63. Bunk, W.G.J.: Advanced Structural and Functional 
Materials, Proceeding of an International Seminar organized by 
DLR, Cologne, June 1991, Springer Verlag, Berlin, Heidelberg 1991 
  64. Buero fuer Technikfolgen-Abschaetzung des Deutschen 
Bundestages (TAB): Beobachtung der technisch-wissenschaftlichen 
Entwicklung - Arbeitsbericht [Federal Parliament's Bureau for 
the Assessment of the Consequences of Technology [TAB]: Tracking 
Technical and Scientific Development - Working Report] 6/91, 
Bonn, November, 1991 
  65. Cassidy, J.M.: Inhancing Future Competitiveness - The 
Japanese Government Promotion of Basic Research -, The National 
Science Foundation [NSF], National Institute of Science and 
Technology Policy, Science and Technology Agency, Japan, 
October, 1990 
  66. Centre for Exploitation of Science and Technology 
[CEST]: 
Materials Exploitation in the United Kingdom, December 1991 
  67. Center for Science and Technology for Development: 
Materials technology and Development, ATAS Bulletin, United 
Nations, New York, 1988 
  68. Cherdron, H.: Neue Entwicklungen bei Polymerwerkstoffen, 
Symposium Materialforschung 1988, Projektleitung Material- und 
Rohstofforschung (PLR) der Kernforschungsanlage [New 
Developments in Polymer Materials, 1988 Materials research 
Symposium, Materials and Raw Materials Research Project 
Management [PLR] of the Nuclear Research Facility] Juelich GmbH 
(1988) 23-25 
  69. Chiang, L.Y.; Chaikin, P.M.; Cowan, D.O. (Eds.): 
Advanced 
Organic Solid State Materials, Materials research Society 
Symposium Proceedings, Vol. 173, Pennsylvania, 1990 
  70. Chiang, L.Y.; Garito, A.F.; Sandman, D.J. (Eds.): 
Electrical, Optical and Magnetic Properties of Organic Solid 
State Materials, Materials Research Society, Symposium 
Proceedings Vol. 247, Pennsylvania, 1992 
  71. Claes, L.; Hanselmann, K.: Neue Biowerkstoffe - 
Degradierbare Materialien und bioaktive Oberflaechen, 2. 
Symposium Materialforschung 1991 des BMFT, Projekttraegerschaft 
Material- und Rohstofforschung Forschungszentrum [New 
Biomaterials - Degradable Materials and Bioactive Surfaces, 
Second BMFT Materials Research Symposium in 1991, Materials and 
Raw Materials Research Project Sponsorship Research Center] 
Juelich GmbH (1991) 155-180 
  72. Cohendet, P.; Ledoux, M.; Zuscovitch, E.: New Advanced 
Materials - Economic Dynamics and European Strategy - a Report 
from the FAST Programme of the Commission of the European 
Communities, Springer Verlag Berlin, Heidelberg, 1988 
  73. Commission of the European Communities, Joint Research 
Center: Institute for Advanced Materials - Annual Report 1990, 
Directorate-General Telecommunications, Information Industries 
and Innovation, Luxembourg 1991 
  74. Commission of the European Communities: BRITE/EURAM 
Programme - Synopsis of Current Projects 1989-1990, 
Directorate-General Telecommunications, Information Industries 
and Innovation, Luxembourg, 1990 
  75. Commission of the European Communities: BRITE/EURAM 
Programme - Synopsis of Current Projects 1990-1991, 
Directorate-General telecommunications, Information Industries 
and Innovation, Luxembourg, 1990 
  76. Commission of the European Communities: Evaluation of 
the 
European Advanced Material Research Programme - EURAM - 
(1986-1989), Luxembourg, 1989 
  77. Commission of the European Communities: Evaluation of 
the 
first BRITE Programme (1985-1988), Directorate-General 
telecommunications, Information Industry and Innovation, 
Luxembourg, 1988 
  78. Commission of the European Communities: The European 
Aerospace Industry - Trading Positions and Figures, 
Directorate-General International Market and Industrial Affairs, 
Brussels, March, 1991 
  79. Committee on Industry and Technology - FCCSET: Advanced 
Materials and Processing - Fiscal Year 1993 Programme, Office of 
Science and Technology Policy, Washington, DC, USA, April 1992 
  80. Cooke, Th.: Inorganic Fibres - A literature review, J. 
Am. Ceram. Soc., (1991) 2959-2978 
  81. Council of Competitiveness: A Competitive Profile of the 
Aerospace Industry, Washington, DC, USA, March, 1991 
  82. Council of Competitiveness: A Competitive Profile of the 
Chemical and Allied Products Industry, Washington, DC, USA, 
March, 1991 
  83. Council of Competitiveness: A Competitive Profile of the 
Computer and Software Industry, Washington, DC, USA, March, 1991 
  84. Council of Competitiveness: A Competitive Profile of the 
Construction Industry, Washington, DC, USA, March, 1991 
  85. Council of Competitiveness: A Competitive Profile of the 
Construction Industry, Washington, DC, USA, March, 1991 
  86. Council of Competitiveness: A Competitive Profile of the 
Drugs and Pharmaceuticals Industry, Washington, DC, USA, March, 
1991 
  87. Council of Competitiveness: A Competitive Profile of the 
Electronic Components and Equipment Industry, Washington, DC, 
USA, March, 1991 
  88. Council of Competitiveness: A Competitive Profile of the 
Machine Tool Industry, Washington, DC, USA, March, 1991 
  89. Council of Competitiveness: A Competitive Profile of the 
Motor Vehicle Industry, Washington, DC, USA, March, 1991 
  90. Council of Competitiveness: A Competitive Profile of the 
Telecommunications Industry, Washington, DC, USA, March, 1991 
  91. Council of Competitiveness: Gaining New Ground - 
technology Priorities of America's Future, Washington, DC, USA, 
March, 1991 
  92. Council of Competitiveness: Japanese Technology Policy: 
What's the secret? Washington, DC, USA, February, 1991 
  93. Department of Trade and Industry [DTI], Science and 
Engineering Research Council [SERC]: Industrial Materials for 
the Future?, HMSO, London, 1991 
  94. Deutsche Gesellschaft fuer Materialkunde [German Society 
for Materials Science] e.V.: DGM Aktuell, Oberursel, May, 1992 
  95. Dodwell Marketing Consultants: R&amp;D Activities of 
Major 
Japanese Chemical Companies - New Materials, Electronic 
Materials, Pharmaceuticals and Beal Technology, Tokyo, Japan, 
November, 1990 
  96. Dorn, R.: Neue Materialien fuer die Optoelektronik, 2. 
Symposium Materialforschung 1991 des BMFT, Projekttraegerschaft 
Material- und Rohstofforschung Forschungszentrum [New Materials 
for Opto-electronics, Second BMFT Materials Research Symposium 
in 1991, Materials and Raw Materials Research Project 
Sponsorship Research Center] Juelich GmbH (1991) 24-46 
  97. Doerrendaecher, Ch.; Oesterheld, W.; Wortmann, M.: Neue 
Werkstoffe - Eine Bewertung ihrer Chancen und Risiken, 
Informationen zur Humanisierung der Arbeit und zur 
Technologiepolitik Nr. 6, Deutscher Gewerkschaftsbund 
Bundesvorstand [New Materials - An Assessment of Their Prospects 
and Risks, Data for the Humanization of Labor and Technology 
Policy Nr. 6, German Federation of Trade Unions Federal Board of 
Directors], Duesseldorf, August 1989 
  98. Drechsler, K.; Martin, W.: Multifunktionale 
Werkstoffsysteme - Vom Vorbild in der Natur zu Anwendungen in 
der Technik [Multi-Functional Materials Systems - From Model in 
Nature to Applications in Engineering], 
Messerschmitt-Boelkow-Blohm GmbH, Munich, Zentralbereich Technik 
(Hrsg.), DGLR-Jahrestagung [Central Sector Engineering (Editor), 
DGLR annual session], Berlin, 10-13 September 1991 
  99. Economic Planning Agency [EPA]: Technologieprognose fuer 
das Jahr 2010 [Technology Prognosis for the Year 2010], Tokyo, 
April, 1992 
  100. Eisfeld, F. (Ed.): Keramikbauteile in 
Verbrennungsmotoren, Fortschritte der Fahrzeugtechnik Band 3 
[Ceramic Components in Combustion Engines, Advances in Vehicle 
Engineering, Volume 3] , Vieweg und Sohn Verlagsgesellschaft 
mbH, Braunschweig, 1989 
  101. Eyerer, P. (Ed.); Walter G.: Kunstoffe und Elastomere 
in 
Kraftfahrzeugen [Plastics and Elastomers in Motor Vehicles], 
Verlag W. Kohlhammer, Stuttgart, Berlin, Cologne, Mainz, 1985 
  102. Farrands, Ch.: New Materials in Manufacturing Industry 
- 
A European Overview, Special Report Nr. 2026, The Economist 
Intelligence Unit, London, March 1990 
  103. Felcht, U.-H.: Materials Research at Hoechst, Advanced 
Materials (1992) 133-135 
  104. Fraunhofer-Gesellschaft: Forschungsplan 1991, Abteilung 
fuer Forschungs- und Budgetplanung [Fraunhofer Society: 1991 
Research Plan, Research and Budget Planning Division] , Munich, 
1991 
  105. Fraunhofer-Institut fuer 
naturwissenschaftlich-technische Trendanalysen: TA-Relevanz 
ausgewaehlter Teilgebiete im Bereich neuer Werkstoffe, Gutachten 
im Auftrag des Bueros fuer Technikfolgen-Abschatzung des 
Deutschen Bundestages (TAB)[Fraunhofer Institute for Scientific 
and Technical Trends Analysis [TA]: the TA Relevance of 
Selective Partial Fields in the New Materials Sector, Report 
Commissioned by the Federal Parliament's Bureau for the 
Assessment of the Consequences of Technology (TAB)], Euskirchen, 
November 1991 
  106. Fraunhofer Institut fuer Systemtechnik und 
Innovationsforschung, prognos: F&amp;E-Kooperation von kleinen 
und 
mittleren Unternehmen - Evaluation der BMFT-Massnahmen auf 
diesem Gebiet -, Untersuchung im Auftrag des Bundesministeriums 
fuer Forschung und Technologie [Fraunhofer Institute for Systems 
Engineering and Innovation Research, Prognosis: SME R&amp;D 
Cooperation - Assessment of BMFT Activities in This Field -, 
Study Commissioned by the BMFT], Bonn, Basel/Karlsruhe, June, 
1991 
  107. Fraunhofer Institut fuer Systemtechnik und 
Innovationsforschung: Technologien des 21. Jahrhunderts - 
Auswertung japanischer und amerikanischer Studien, insbesondere 
auch unter dem Aspekt von Markt und Problemloesungspotentialen 
[Fraunhofer Institute for Systems Engineering and Innovation 
research: Twenty-First Century Technologies - an Assessment of 
Japanese and American Studies, Particularly from the Aspect Also 
of Market and Problem Solving Potentials], Karlsruhe, 12 June 
1992 
  108. Freeman, C: Technology Policy and Economic Performance, 
Lessons from Japan, London (1988) 
  109. Freitag, D; Binsack, R.: Wege zu neuen 
Polymerwerkstoffen, 2. Symposium Materialforschung 1991 des 
BMFT, Projekttraegerschaft Material- und Rohstofforschung 
Forschungszentrum [Approaches to New Polymer Materials, Second 
BMFT Materials Research Symposium in 1991, Materials and Raw 
Materials Research Project Sponsorship Research Center] Juelich 
GmbH (1991) 117-152 
  110. Frost &amp; Sullivan: The European Market for 
Engineering 
Thermoplastics, Frankfurt, summer 1991 
  111. Frost &amp; Sullivan: The European Market for fibre 
reinforced Plastics, Frankfurt, winter 91/92 
  112. Frost &amp; Sullivan: The European Market for 
High-Performance Composites, Frankfurt, spring 1990 
  113. Frost &amp; Sullivan: The European Market for Technical 
Ceramics, Vol. 1 and 2, Frankfurt, 1989 
  114. Frost &amp; Sullivan: The European Market for 
High-Performance Alloys, Frankfurt, June, 1990 
  115. Funatali, I.: Key Features in Applied R&amp;D of 
Advanced 
Ceramic Materials, Journal of the Austrian Ceramic Society, 
26 (1990) 93-126 
  116. Gerybadze A.: Technological Forecasting, in: Tschirly 
H., Hess, W., Lang, P.: Technologie-Management [Technology 
Management], Zurich (1990) 71-100 
  117. Gerybadze A.: The Implementation of Industrial Policy 
in 
an Evolutionary Perspective, in: Witt, V.: Explaining Process 
and Change Approaches to Evolutionary Economics, Ann Arbor, 
Michigan (1992) 151-173 
  118. Gerybadze A.: Sustainable Cooperation. The Economics of 
Collaborative Prospects, Networks and Strategic Alliances, 
Berlin, New York (1993) 
  119. Gleiter, H.: Nanostrukturierte Materialien, 
Physikalische Blaetter [Nano-Structured Materials, Physics 
Papers] (1991) 735-759 
  120. Good, M.L.: Chemical Research: The Heart of Materials 
Development, Advanced Performance Materials, in: Materials 
Futures: Strategies and Opportunities, Materials research 
Society, Pennsylvania (1988) 1-10 
  121. Goymann, St.: Ueberblick und Haupttrends im Bereich 
Energiespeicher, in: Technologievorausschau Energietechnik, 
Fraunhofer-Institut fuer naturwissenschaftlich-technische 
Trendanalysen [Survey and Principal trends in the Energy Storage 
Sector, in: Technology Forecast for Energy Engineering, 
Fraunhofer Institute for Scientific and Technical Trend 
Analysis], Euskirchen, 1991 
  122. Goymann, St.; Kersten, G.; Kohlhoff, J.; Kretschmer, 
Th.; Wessel, H.; Wiemken, U.: Ausgewaehlte Beitraege zu neue 
naturwissenschaftlichen und technologischen Entwicklungen, 
Fraunhofer-Institut fuer naturwissenschaftlich-technische 
Trendanalysen [Selective Contributions on New Scientific and 
Technological Developments, Fraunhofer Institute for Scientific 
and Technical Trend Analysis], Euskirchen, 1992 
  123. Greil, P.: Strukturkeramik mit hohem Potential - 
Chancen 
und Grenzen durch neue Herstelltechniken, Symposium 
Materialforschung, Projektleitung Material- und Rohstofforschung 
der Kernforschungsanlage [High-Potential Structural Ceramics - 
Prospects and Limits Using New Production Techniques, Materials 
research Symposium, Materials and Raw Materials Research Project 
Management of the Nuclear Research Facility] Juelich GmbH (1988) 
37-56 
  124. Greil, P.; Claussen, N.: Novel Processing and 
Properties 
of Platelet and Fibre Reinforced Composite Ceramics, Science of 
Engineering Ceramics, Koda, Japan, 21-23 October 1991 
  125. Grupp, H.; Legler, H.: Innovationspotential und 
Hochtechnologie -Technologische Position Deutschlands im 
internationalen Wettbewerb 1989/1990, Studie im Auftrag des 
Bundesministeriums fuer Forschung und Technologie, 
Fraunhofer-Institut fuer Systemtechnik und Innovationsforschung, 
Niedersaechsisches Institut fuer Wirtschaftsforschung, 
Gesellschaft fuer Wirtschaftsfoerderung und Marktplanung 
[Innovation Potential and High Technology - Germany's 
Internationally Competitive Technological Position 1989/1990, 
Study Commissioned by the BMFT, Fraunhofer Institute for Systems 
Engineering and Innovation Research, Lower Saxony Institute for 
Economic Research, Society for Economic Support and Market 
Planning], Karlsruhe and Hannover, August, 1991 
  126. Guo, J.: The Frontier of Research Science, Journal of 
Solid State Chemistry (1992) 108-114 
  127. Haerdtl, K.-H.; Hoffmann, B.: Elektronische Keramiken 
und Sensoren, Ingenieur-Werkstoffe [Electronic Ceramics and 
Sensors, Engineer Materials] (1991) 65-67 
  128. Haus der Technik e.V.: Kunststoffe im Fahrzeugbau, 
Unterlagen zur Veranstaltung am 01.-02. Oktober [House of 
Engineering e.V.: Plastics in the Manufacture of Vehicles, 
Organizational Report dated 1-2 October] 1991, Essen 
  129. Haeusler, J.: Industrieforschung in der 
Forschungslandschaft der Bundesrepublik - Ein Datenbericht, 
Max-Planck-Institut fuer Gesellschaftsforschung [Industrial 
Research in the FRG's Research Landscape - a Data Report, 
Max-Planck Institute for Social Research], Discussion Paper 
89/1, Cologne, 1989 
  130. Haeusler, J; Grande, E.: Forschung in der Industrie - 
Moeglichkeiten und Grenzen staatlicher Steurbarketi, 
Max-Planck-Institut fuer Gesellschaftsforschung [Research in 
Industry - Possibilities and Limits of Official Control, 
Max-Planck Institute for Social Research], Cologne, 1992 
  131. Hausner, H.; Spur, G.: Keramische Werkstoffe, in: Neue 
Werklstoffe -Fachaufsaetze zur Materialforschung [Ceramic 
Materials, in: New Materials - Expert Essays on Materials 
Research] VDW Frankfurt, BMFT (Ed.), Bonn (1986) 52-69 
  132. Heiduk, G.; Jamamura K. (eds.): Technological 
Competition and Interdependence - The Search for Policy in the 
United States, West Germany and Japan, University of Washington 
Press, 1990 
  133. Herold, F.; Schneller, A.: High-Performance Polymers, 
Advanced Materials (1992) 143-152 
  134. Hobbs, L.W.; Liedl, G.L. (eds.): Frontiers in Materials 
Education, Materials Research Society Symposia proceeding, Vol. 
66, Pennsylvania, 1986 
  135. Hondros, E.D.: Materials, Year 2000 - A perspective, 
llt. Y. of Materials and Product Technology, 1 (1986) 1-22 
  136. Huettinger, K.J.; Greil, P.: Keramische 
Verbundwerkstoffe fuer Hoechsttemperaturanwendungen, BDLI-Tagung 
[Ceramic Composites for Extremely High Temperature Applications, 
BDLI Seminar], Hamburg, 1991 
  137. Industrial R&amp;D Advisory Committee [IRDAC]: Opinion 
on 
the Creation of a European Cooperative Research Action for 
Technology "Craft," Commission of the European Communities, 
November, 1988 
  138. Industrial R&amp;D Advisory Committee [IRDAC]: Opinion 
on 
the First Report on the State of Science and Technology in 
Europe, Commission of the European Communities, April, 1989 
  139. Industrial R&amp;D Advisory Committee [IRDAC]: Report 
and 
Recommendations on Advanced Materials and Related Processes 
R&amp;D 
in Europe, Commission of the European Communities, January 1988 
  140. Ingenieur-Werkstoffe [Engineer Materials]: Trends '92, 
(1992) Nr. 1/2, VDI-Verlag 
  141. Institute for Future Technology: Future Technology in 
Japan - Forecast to the year 2015, Tokyo, September 1988 
  142. Irvine, J.; Martin, B.R.; Isard, P.: Investing in the 
Future - An International Comparison of Government Funding of 
Academic and Related Research, Edward Elgar Publishing Ltd., 
England, 1990 
  143. Janda, R.: Kunststoffverbundsysteme [Plastic Composite 
Systems], VCH Verlagsgesellschaft mbH, Weinheim, 1990 
  144. Janicki, G.; Bailey, V.; Schjelderup, H.: Advanced 
Materials: The Challenge for the Next Decade, 35th International 
SAMPE Symposium and Exhibition, Vol. 35, Book 1 and 2, Society 
for the Advancement of Material and process Engineering [SAMPE], 
Anaheim, California, USA, 1990 
  145. Japan Chemical Week (Eds.): Japan Chemical Annual 1989 
- 
Japan's Chemical Industry, the Chemical Dayly Co., Ltd., Tokyo, 
September, 1989 
  146. Japan Fine Ceramics Association: Annual Report for 
Overseas Reader - Fine Ceramics for Future Creation, 1990 
  147. Kaske, K.: Wege zu Unabhaengigkeit, highTech (1990-) 
106 
  148. Kelleher, P.G.: Report on the State of the Art - 
Injection Molding of Fibre Reinforced thermoplastics Part 1: 
Materials and Processes, Advances in Polymer technology (1990) 
219-230 
  149. Kellerer, H. Stand und Perspektiven moderner 
Verbundwerkstoffe, 2. Symposium Materialforschung 1991 des BMFT, 
Projekttraegerschaft Material- und Rohstofforschung 
Forschungszentrum [Status and Prospects for Modern Composite 
Materials, Second BMFT Materials Research Symposium in 1991, 
Materials and Raw Materials Research Project Sponsorship 
Research Center] Juelich GmbH (1991) 47-75 
  150. Kempter, K.: Elektrokeramik - Werkstoffe und Produkte, 
VDI-Seminar Keramische Bauteile [Electro-Ceramics - Materials 
and Products, VDI Seminar on Ceramic Components], Berlin, 27-28 
March 1990 
  151. Kersten, G.: Ueberblick und Haupttrends im Bereich 
Halbleitermaterialien und -technologien, in: 
Technologievorausschau Mikroelektronik/Elektronik, 
Fraunhofer-Institut fuer naturwissenschaftlich-technische 
Trendanalysen [Survey and Principal Trends in the Semiconductors 
Materials and Technologies Sector, in: Technology Forecast for 
Micro-Electronics/Electronics, Fraunhofer Institute for 
Scientific and Technical Trend Analysis], Euskirchen, 1991 
  152. Kersten, M. (Ed.): Jahrbuch Chemiewirtschaft [Chemistry 
Yearbook] 1991, Handelsblatt GmbH, Duesseldorf, VCH 
Verlagsgesellschaft, Weinheim, 1991 
  153. Kohlhoff, J.: Ueberblick und Haupttrends im Bereich 
Keramiken, in: Technologievorausschau 
Fertigung/Bearbeitung/Materialpruefung, Fraunhofer-Institut fuer 
naturwissenschaftlich-technische Trendanalysen [Survey and 
Principal Trends in the Ceramics Sector, in: Technology Forecast 
for Production/Processing/Materials Testing, Fraunhofer 
Institute for Scientific and Technical Trend Analysis], 
Euskirchen, 1991 
  154.Kohlhoff, J.: Ueberblick und Haupttrends im Bereich 
Keramiken, in: Technologievorausschau Werkstoffe/Fertigung, 
Fraunhofer-Institut fuer naturwissenschaftlich-technische 
Trendanalysen [Survey and Principal Trends in the Ceramics 
Sector, in: Technology Forecast for Materials/Production, 
Fraunhofer Institute for Scientific and Technical Trend 
Analysis], Euskirchen, 1990 
  155. Kohlhoff, J.: Ueberblick und Haupttrends im Bereich 
Metalle, in: Technologievorausschau Werkstoffe/Fertigung, 
Fraunhofer-Institut fuer naturwissenschaftlich-technische 
Trendanalysen [Survey and Principal Trends in the Metals Sector, 
in: Technology Forecast for Materials/Production, Fraunhofer 
Institute for Scientific and Technical Trend Analysis], 
Euskirchen, 1990 
  156. Kohlhoff, J.: Ueberblick und Haupttrends im Bereich 
Polymere, in: Technologievorausschau Werkstoffe/Fertigung, 
Fraunhofer-Institut fuer naturwissenschaftlich-technische 
Trendanalysen [Survey and Principal Trends in the Polymers 
Sector, in: Technology Forecast for Materials/Production, 
Fraunhofer Institute for Scientific and Technical Trend 
Analysis], Euskirchen, 1990 
  157. Kohlhoff, J.: Ueberblick und Haupttrends im Bereich 
sonstige neue Werkstoffe, in: Technologievorausschau 
Werkstoffe/Fertigung, Fraunhofer-Institut fuer 
naturwissenschaftlich-technische Trendanalysen [Survey and 
Principal Trends in the Other New Materials Sector, in: 
Technology Forecast for Materials/Production, Fraunhofer 
Institute for Scientific and Technical Trend Analysis], 
Euskirchen, 1990 
  158. Kohlhoff, J.: Ueberblick und Haupttrends im Bereich 
Verbundwerkstoffe, in: Technologievorausschau 
Werkstoffe/Fertigung, Fraunhofer-Institut fuer 
naturwissenschaftlich-technische Trendanalysen [Survey and 
Principal Trends in the Composite Materials Sector, in: 
Technology Forecast for Materials/Production, Fraunhofer 
Institute for Scientific and Technical Trend Analysis], 
Euskirchen, 1990 
  159. Kolafka, H. (ed.): Fortschritte bei der Formgebung in 
Pulvermetallurgie und Keramik, Pulvermetallurgie in Wissenschaft 
und Praxis Band 7 [Molding Progress in Powder Metallurgy and 
Ceramics, Powder Metallurgy in Science and Practice, Vol. 7], 
VDI Verlag, Duesseldorf, 1991 
  160. Kommission der Europaeischen Gemeinschaften, 
gemeinsames 
Forschungszentrum: Wissenschaft und Technologie fuer Europa 
[Commission of the European Communities, Joint Research Center: 
Science and Technology for Europe, Luxembourg, 29 November, 1988] 
  161. Kommission der Europaeischen Gemeinschaften: Erster 
Bericht ueber den Stand der Wissenschaft und Technologie in 
Europa (von der Kommission vorgelegt) [Commission of the 
European Communities: First Report on the Status of Science and 
Technology in Europe (submitted by the Commission), Luxembourg, 
29 November, 1988] 
  162. Kondo, T.: Status and Future Perspectives of Japanese 
Research for Structural Materials in Energy Technologies, JAERI, 
Japan, 14 January 1992 
  163. Koenig, W.; Grass, P.; Willerscheid, H.; Wulf, Ch.: 
Bearbeitung faserverstaerkter Kunststoffe, in: Neue Werkstoffe - 
Fachaufsaetze zur Materialforschung [Processing of Fiber 
Reinforced Plastics, in: New Materials - Expert Essay on 
Materials Research], VDW Frankfurt, BMFT (Ed.), Bonn (1986) 
78-93] 
  164. Koshorst, J.: Structures and Materials of the Year 
2010, 
9th Annual Symposium of the Royal Aeronautical Society of New 
Zealand, March, 1991 
  165. Kretschmer, Th.: Forschungs- und Technologiefelder der 
Zukunft - Analyse nationaler und internationaler Prognosen und 
Programme -, Fraunhofer-Institut fuer 
naturwissenschaftlich-technische Trendanalysen [Research and 
Technology Fields of the Future - Analysis of National and 
International Prognoses and Programs -,Fraunhofer Institute for 
Scientific and Technical Trend Analysis], Euskirchen, 1992 
  166. Kuecher, P.; Foell, H.: Definition, Charakterisierung 
und Bewertung von Materialien der Mikroelecktronik, 2. Symposium 
Materialforschung 1991 des BMFT, Projekttraegerschaft Material- 
und Rohstofforschung Forschungszentrum [Definition, 
Characterization and Assessment of Micro-Electronic Materials, 
Second BMFT Materials Research Symposium in 1991, Materials and 
Raw Materials Research Project Sponsorship Research Center] 
Juelich GmbH (1991) 3-23 
  167. 14. Kunststofftechnisches Koloquium: Forschung in 
anwendungsgerechter Form, Plastikverarbeiter [14th Plastics 
Engineering Colloquium: Research in Application Compatible 
Molds, Plastics Processor] (1988) 61-69 
  168. Kultusministerium Rheinland Pfalz (Hrsg.): 
Forschungsbericht [Rhineland-Palatinate Ministry of Culture and 
the Arts: Research Report] 1990 
  169. Kurth, W.: Technology and Shifting Comparative 
Advantage, STI Review Nr. 10, OECD, Paris (1992) 7-48 
  170. Lahmeyer International GmbH: Analyse der F&amp;E 
-Foerderung 
der Amerikanischen Bundesregierung, Bericht fuer das 
Bukndesministerium fuer Forschung und Technologie, Referat 024 
[Analysis of U.S. Federal Government's R&amp;D Support, Report 
for 
the BMFT, Dept. 024], Frankfurt, October 1986 
  171. Legler, H.; Grupp, H.; Gehrke, B; Schasse, U.: 
Innovationspotential und Hochtechnologie, 
Wirtschaftswissenschaftliche Beitraege [Innovation Potential and 
High technology, Economic Sciences Contributions], 
Physikaverlag, Heidelberg, 1992 
  172. Lemkey, F.D.; Fishman, S.G.; Evans, A.G.; Strife, J.R. 
(eds.): High Temperature/High Performance Composites, Materials 
Research Society Symposium Proceedings Vol., 120, Pennsylvania, 
1988 
  173. Lipowitz, J.: Polymer-Derived Ceramic Fibres, Ceramic 
bulletin, (1991) 1888-1894 
  174. Liu, C.T.; Kunsmann, H.; Otsuka, K.; Wuttig, N. (Eds.): 
Shape-Memory Materials and Phenomena - Fundamental Aspects and 
Applications, Materials Research Society Symposium Proceedings, 
Vol. 246, Pennsylvania, USA, 1992 
  175. Lorange, P.: New Strategic Challenges for the Materials 
oriented Firm: Requirements of Management to Steer toward the 
Year 2000, Materials research Society, Pennsylvania, 1988 
  176. Mack, M.: Oberflaechentechnik - Veschleissschutz, Die 
Bibliothek der Technik, Band [Surfaces Engineering - Wear 
resistance, Engineering Library, Vol.] 38, Verlag Moderne 
Industrie, Landsberg/Lech, 1990 
  177. Maier, H.R.: Technische Keramik als 
Innovationsgrundlage 
fuer die Produckt- und Technologieentwicklung in NRW: Studie, 
Stand der Entwicklung, Potentiale und Handlungsmoeglichkeiten, 
Ministerium fuer Wirtschaft, Mittelstand und Technologie des 
Landes Nordrhein-Westfalen [Technical Ceramics as the Basis for 
Innovation for Product and Technology Development in NRW: Study, 
Development Status, Potential and Action Possibilities, North 
Rheinland-Westphalia State Ministry for Economy, Medium-Size 
Business and Technology] Duesseldorf, 1992 
  178. Markl, H.: Forschungsfoerderung - Stets das gleiche, 
nie 
dasselbe, Forschung - Mitteilungen der [Research Support - 
Always Identical, Never the Same, Research - Bulletins of the] 
DFG 3 (1991) 
  179. Materials Research Society: Advanced Materials, 
MRS-Bulletin Vol. 17, May, 1992 
  180. Menges, G. und Ziegler, G.: Faserverbundwerkstoffe - 
Grundlagen und Einfuehrung in die Besonderheiten, Symposium 
Materialforschung 1988, Projektleitung Material- und 
Rohstofforschung der Kernforschungsanlage [Fiber Composite 
Materials - Fundamentals and Introduction to the Details, 1988 
Materials Research Symposium, Materials and Raw Materials 
Research Project Management of the Nuclear research facility] 
Juelich GmbH (1988) 57-128 
  181. Menges, G.; Kirberg, K.-W.: Faserverbundwerkstoffe, 
Kunststoffanwendungen fuer Hochleistungsbeanspruchungen, in: 
Neue Werkstoffe - Fachaufsaetze zur Materialsforschung [Fiber 
Composites, Plastics Applications for High Performance 
Requirements, in: New Materials - Expert Essays on Materials 
Research], VDW Frankfurt, BMFT (Ed.), Bonn (1986) 70-77 
  182. Messerschmitt-Boelkow-Blohm GmbH, Deutsche Aerospace: 
Faserverbundtechnologien Werk [Fiber Composite Technologies 
Plant] Augsburg 
  183. Messerschmitt-Boelkow-Blohm GmbH, Deutsche Aerospace: 
Wo 
steht die deutsche Werkstoffindustrie?, Vollversammlung der 
Herstellergruppe 4 "Werkstoffe", [What's the Status of Germany's 
Materials Industry?, General Meeting of Producer group 4 
"Materials,"] Bad Godesberg, 26 October 1989 
  184. Minister fuer Wissenschaft und Forschung des Landes 
Nordrhein-Westfalen: Forschung in Nordrhein-Westfalen 1988 - 
Forschungsbericht [North Rhine-Westphalia State Science and 
research Minister: Research in North Rhine-Westphalia, 1988 - 
Research report], Duesseldorf, March, 1989 
  185. Ministry of International Trade and Industry [MITI]: 
Research and Development Programme on Basic Technologies for 
Future Industries [JISEDAI Programme], Tokyo, Japan, 1991 
  186. Ministry of International Trade and Industry, Japan: 
MITI - Handbook 1990, Japan Trade and Industry Publicity, Tokyo, 
September 1990 
  187. Mitchel Market Report: Silicon Carbide, 2nd Edition, 
Vol. 1, Middle Essex/England 1988 
  188. Moecke, J.; Fuhrmann, U.: Epoxidharze, Bibliothek der 
Technik Band 1 [Epoxy Resin, Engineering Library, Vol. 1], 
Verlag Moderne Industrie, Landsberg/Lech 1990 
  189. Morrell, R. (Ed.): Advanced Engineering for Ceramics, 
British Ceramic Proceedings 46, The Institute of Ceramics, 
London, 1990 
  190. New Energy and Industrial Development Organization 
[NEDO]: Symposium on Industrial technology 1991 - Proceedings, 
Japan 
  191. Niederstadt, g.: Die Vielfalt der faserverstaerkten 
Polymere, Ein Sonderdruck aus Werkstoff und Innovation Ausgabe 
[The Diversity of Fiber-Reinforced Polymers, Special Materials 
and Innovation Publication Edition] 9-10/90, 11-12/91 and 1/91 
  192. Nippon Steel Corporation: Nippon Steel technical Report 
Nr. 33, Tokyo, April 1987 
  193. Nissen: Polymere Hochleistungsfaserverbundwerkstoffe, 
Vortrag auf dem "8. Wuerzburger Kunststoff-Forum", 
[High-Performance Fiber-Reinforced Polymer Composites, Lecture 
at the "8th Wuerzburg Plastics Forum,"] 19-20 May 1988 
  194. Noel, C.; Navard, C.: Liquid Crystal Polymers, Prog. 
Polym. Sci. (1991) 55-110 
  195. OECD: 1990/1991 OECD Economic Surveys - Germany, OECD 
Publications, Paris, 1991 
  196. OECD: Advanced Materials - Policies and Technological 
Challenges, OECD Publications, Paris, 1990 
  197. OECD: Basic Science and technology Statistics, OECD 
Publications, Paris, 1991 
  198. OECD: Choosing Priorities in Science and technology, 
OECD Publications, Paris, 1991 
  199. OECD: Choosing Priorities in Science and Technology, 
OECD Publications, Paris, 1991 
  200. OECD: Diffusion of Advanced Materials in the 
Transportation Sectors, Directorate for Science, Technology and 
Industry, Paris, September 1992 
  201. OECD: Evaluation of Research - A Selection of Current 
Practices, OECD Publications, Paris, 1987 
  202. OECD: Managing Manpower for Advanced Manufacturing 
Technology, OECD Publication, Paris, 1991 
  203. OECD: Reviews of National Science and Technology Policy 
- Italy, OECD Publications, Paris, 1992 
  204. OECD: Science and Technology Policy - Review and 
Outlook 
1991, OECD Publications, Paris, 1992 
  205. OECD: Science and Technology Policy Outlook 1988, OECD 
Publications, Paris, 1988 
  206. OECD: Technology and the Economy, The 
Technology/Economy 
Programme, OECD Publications, Paris, 1992 
  207. OECD: The New Technologies in the 90's - A 
Socio-Economic Strategy, OECD Publication, Paris, 1988 
  208. OECD: The Technology/Economy Programme -International 
Conference Cycle, OECD Publications, Paris, 1991 
  209. OECD: Wissenschafts- und Technologiepolitik - Bilanz 
und 
Ausblick 1991 [Science and Technology Policy - Review and 
Outlook 1991], OECD Publications, Paris, 1992 
  210. Office of Aeronautics and Space technology: 1991 - 
Integrated technology Plan - For the Civil Space Programme, 
National Aeronautics and Space Administration, Washington, DC, 
USA. 1991 
  211. Okimoto, D.I.: Between MITI and the Market - Japanese 
Industrial Policy for High Technology, Stanford University 
Press, Stanford, California, USA, 1989 
  212. Ostbayerisches Technologie-Transfer-Institut [OTTI]: 
Hochleistungspolymere, Beitraege zum Fachseminar [East Bavarian 
technology Transfer Institute [OTTI]: High-Performance Polymers, 
Contributions to the Experts Seminar] in Regensburg, 26 May 1992 
  213. Oesterreichisches Chemiefaser-Institut: 
Chemiefaserverstaerkte Kunststoffe - Composites, -28. 
Internationale Chemiefasertagung [Austrian Chemical Fiber 
institute: Chemical Fiber Reinforced Plastics - Composites, - 
28th International Chemical Fiber Seminar] Dornbirn, Vienna, 1989 
  214. Perlitz, M.: Wettbewerbsvorteile durch Innovation, in: 
Wettbewerbsvorteile und Wettbewerbsfaehigkeit [Competitive 
Advantages through innovation, in: Competitive Advantages and 
Competitiveness], Schaeffer Verlag, Stuttgart (1988) 47-65 
  215. Petzow, G.; Danzer, R.: Hochleistungskeramik, Studie im 
Rahmen des Projekts "Rohstoffe fuer Zukunftstechnologien" der 
Komission fuer Grundlagen der Mineralstofforschung der 
oesterreichischen Akademie der Wissenschaften, 
Max-Planck-Institut fuer Metallforschung, Institut fuer 
Werkstoffwissenschaft [High-Performance Ceramics, Study Under 
the "Raw Materials for Future Technologies" Project of the 
Commission for Basic Minerals Research of the Austrian Academy 
of Sciences, Max-Planck Institute for Metals Research, Institute 
for Materials Science], Stuttgart, April, 1990 
  216. Pipes, R.B.; Lagneborg, R. (Eds.): Materials Futures: 
Strategies and Opportunities; Proceedings U.S.-Sweden Joint 
Symposium, 350th Anniversary New Sweden Colony in North America, 
18-19 October 1988, Philadelphia, Materials research Society, 
Pennsylvania, 1988 
  217. Pompe, W.: Mikrostrukturelles Konstruieren - Ein Weg 
zur 
Verbesserung mechanischer Eigenschaften von Werkstoffen, 2. 
Symposium Materialforschung 1991 des BMFT, Projekttraegerschaft 
Material- und Rohstofforschung Forschungszentrum [Designing - An 
Approach Towards Improvement of Mechanical Properties of 
Materials, 2nd BMFT Materials Research Symposium in 1991, 
Materials and Raw Materials Research Project Sponsorship 
Research Center] Juelich GmbH (1991) 76-101 
  218. Prognos AG, Basel: Das Forschungs- und 
Technologiesystem 
in Japan, Teile I-IV und zusammenfassender Abschulssbericht, 
untersuchung im Auftrag des BMFT [Japan's Research and 
Technology System, Parts I-IV and Succinct Final Report, Study 
Commissioned by the BMFT] , Verlag TIV Rheinland, Cologne, 1983 
  219. Projektleitung Material- und Rohstofforschung [PLR]: 
Materialforschung - Programm des Bundesministers fuer Forschung 
und Technologie, Jahresberichte 1986-1991, im Auftrag des 
Bundesministers fuer Forschung und Technologie [Materials and 
Raw Materials Project Management: Materials Research - BMFT 
Program, 1986-1991 Annual Reports, Commissioned by the[BMFT], 
KFA Juelich GmbH 1986-1991] 
  220. Projektleitung Material- und Rohstofforschung [PLR]: 
Symposium Materialforschung 1988 des Bundesministers fuer 
Forschung und Technologie[Materials and Raw Materials Project 
Management: BMFT 1988 Materials Research Symposium], 12-14 
September 1988, Hamm/Westphalia, KFA Juelich GmbH 1988 
  221. Projekttraegerschaft Material- und Rohstofforschung 
[PLR]: 2. Symposium Materialforschung 1991 des Bundesministers 
fuer Forschung und Technologie [BMFT], [Second BMFT Materials 
Research Symposium in 1991, Materials and Raw Materials Research 
Project Sponsorship], 26-29 August 1991, Dresden, Juelich GmbH 
Research Center 1991 
  222. Rau, G.: Sensoren und Sensorsysteme, 
Fraunhofer-Institut 
fuer naturwissenschaftlich-technische Trendanalysen [Sensors and 
Sensor Systems, Fraunhofer Institute for Scientific and 
Technical Trend Analysis], Euskirchen, 1987 
  223. Razim, C. ; Kaniut, C.: Materials-Selection Trends at 
Mercedes Benz, Advanced Materials and Processes (1990) 43-47 
  224. Rhine, W.E.; Shaw, Th. M.; Gottschall, R.J.; Chen, Y. 
(Eds.): Synthesis and Processing of Ceramics: Scientific Issues, 
Materials research Society Symposium Proceedings, Vol. 249, 
Pennsylvania, USA, 1992 
  225. Rodriguez-Romereo, L.; Sanchez, M.P.: The Interrelation 
between R&amp;D and Technology Imports - The Situation in some 
OECD 
Countries, STI Review Nr. 9, OECD, Paris (1992) 41-64 
  226. Rothman, M.F.: Developments in High-Temperature Alloys, 
Metals, and Materials, February 1992 
  227. Ruland, W.: Carbon Fibres, Adv. Mater. (11) (1990) 
528-536 
  228. Saechtling, H.-J.: Kunststofftaschenbuch, 24. Ausgabe 
[Plastics Pocketbook, 24th Edition] , Carl Hanser Verlag, 
Munich,, Vienna, 1989 
  229. Schaefer, D.W.; Mark, J.E. (Eds.): Polymer Based 
Molecular Composites, Materials research Society Symposium 
Proceedings, Vol. 171, Pennsylvania, USA, 1990 
  230. Schatt, W.: Pulvermetallurgie Sinter- und 
Verbundwerkstoffe, 2 Auflage [Powder Metallurgy of Sinter and 
Composite Materials, 2nd Printing], Dr. Alfred Huethig Verlag, 
Heidelberg, 1986 
  231. Schmid, R.D.: Verbundforschung [Combined Research] in 
Japan, Nachr. Chem.Tech. Lap. (1991) 1126-1136 
  232. Schoenwald, B.:; Kuhn, J.: Technologie-Management am 
Beispiel neuer Werkstoffe, technische Mitteilungen [Technology 
Management on the Pattern of New Materials, Technical 
Reports],Krupp 2/89 
  233. Schreiber W. et al. : Faserverbundwerkstoffe im 
Automobilbau, Fachtagung Faserverbundwerkstoffe auf dem Weg in 
die Zukunft, Sueddeutsches Kunststoffzentrum [Fiber Composite in 
Automobile Manufacturing, Experts Seminar on Fiber Composites en 
Route to the Future, Southern Germany's Plastics Center], 
Ludwigshafen, Wuerzburg, 18-19 October 1989 
  234. Schreyer, P.: Competition Policy and Industrial 
Adjustment, STI Review Nr. 10, OECD, Paris (1992) 96-123 
  235. Science and Technology Agency [STA]: Its Growths and 
Activities 1990, Tokyo, Japan, 1990 
  236. Science and Technology Agency Japanese Government: 
White 
Paper on Science and Technology 1990, The Japan Information 
Center of Science and technology, Tokyo, 1990 
  237. Science and Technology Agency, Agency of Industrial 
Science and Technology, Japan: ISPRAM 1991 - The International 
Symposium on Pre-Standards research for Advanced Materials, 
Tokyo, 16-18 December 1991 
  238. Science and Technology Agency, Japanese Government: 
Expectations for Science and technology - the Source of a More 
Fulfilling Life, White Paper on Science and technology 1990, 
Japan Information Center of Science and Technology, Tokyo, 1990 
  239. Science and Technology Agency, Japanese Government: 
Globalization of Scientific and Technological Activities and 
Issues Japan is Encountering, White Paper on Science and 
technology 1991, Japan Information Center of Science and 
Technology, Tokyo, 1991 
  240. Seitz, E.: Advanced Ceramics for Structural 
Applications 
- R&amp;D in the Federal Republic of Germany, Projektleitung 
Material- und Rohstofforschung Forschungszentrum [Materials and 
Raw Materials Research Project Management Research Center] 
Juelich GmbH (1990) 
  241. Simon, H.; Bohnenkamp, J.: Wettbewerbsvorteile und 
Wettbewerbsfaehigkeit [Competitive advantages and 
Competitiveness], Schaeffer Verlag, Stuttgart, 1988 
  242. Socher, M.; Fleischer, T.: Neue Materialien - 
Politische 
Herausforderung und technologische Chancen, Vorlaeufiges Konzept 
fuer eine TA Studie [New Materials - Political Challenge and 
Technological Opportunities, Preliminary Design for a TA Study], 
TAB, Bonn, March, 1992 
  243. Spallek, M.: Market Prospects for Special glasses, IMAT 
'92 Conference: innovative Materials, Modena, Italy, 4-6 June 
1992 
  244. Spektrum der Wissenschaft: Sonderheft Neue Werkstoffe, 
[Science Spectrum: Special Issue on New Materials] Spektrum der 
Wissenschaft Verlagsgesellschaft mbH &amp; Co., Heidelberg, 1987 
  245. Steffens, H.-D.; Leidig, H.-J.; Fischer, O.; Milberg, 
J.; Rascher, R.: Technologie metallischer und keramischer 
Verbundwerkstoffe, in: Neue Werkstoffe - Fachaufsaetze zur 
Materialforschung [Technology of Metallic and Ceramic 
Composites, in: New Materials - Expert Essays on Materials 
Research], VDW Frankfurt, BMFT, (Ed.), Bonn (1986) 34-44 
  246. Stevens, C.: Changing Industrial Structures in OECD 
Countries, STI Review Nr. 9, OECD, Paris (1992) 7-40 
  247. Streck, W.R.: Chancen und Risiken neuer Werkstoffe fuer 
die bayerische Industrie, ifo-Studien zur Industriewirtschaft 
37, ifo-Institut fuer Wirtschaftsforschung [Opportunities and 
Risks of New Materials for Bavaria's Industry, ifo Studies on 
Industry 37, ifo Institute for Economic Research [IFO]] e.V., 
Munich, 1989 
  248. SV - Gemeinnuetzige Gesellschaft fuer 
Wissenschaftstatistik mbH: Forschung und Entwicklung in der 
Wirtschaft 1987 - Mit ersten Daten 1989 - Mit ersten Daten 1991, 
Arbeitsschrift [Public Society for Scientific Statistics mbH: 
Research and Development in the Economy 1987 - With Initial 1989 
Data - With Initial 1991 Data, Working Document] A, Essen 1990 
  249. SV - Gemeinnuetzige Gesellschaft fuer 
Wissenschaftstatistik mbH: Forschung und Entwicklung in der 
Wirtschaft 1989, Arbeitsschrift [Public Society for Scientific 
Statistics mbH: Research and Development in the Economy, Working 
Document] A 1991, Essen 
  250. TechCeram: Proceeding "Internationale Konferenz fuer 
technische Keramik" [International Conference on Technical 
Ceramics], Wiesbaden, 16-18 November 1987 
  251. Technische Rundschau, Schweizerischer Nationalfond 
(Hrsg.): Werkstoffe fuer die Beduerfnisse von morgen, 
Proceedings zu den Tagungen vom 29. November 1990 (Metalle), 17. 
- 18. April 1991 (Polymere) und 06. Juli 1991 (Keramik), Hallwag 
AG, Schweizerischer Nationalfond, [Technical Documentary, Swiss 
National Fund (Ed.): Materials for Tomorrow's Demands, 
Proceedings of the 29 November 1990 Seminar (Metals), 17-18 
April 1991 (Polymers) and 6 July 1991 (Ceramics), Hallwag AG, 
Swiss National Fund], Bern, 1991 
  252. Technische Universitaet Berlin: Fachgebiet Keramik im 
Institut fuer nichtmetallische Werkstoffe [Berlin Technical 
University: Ceramics Field in the Institute for Non-Ferrous 
Materials], Berlin, Oktober 1988 
  253. Theulon, H.: High Technology Materials, Recent 
Materials, in: STI Review Nr. 6, OECD, Paris (1989) 7-72 
  254. Thuemmler, F.: Engineering Ceramics, Journal of the 
European Ceramic Society (1990) 139-151 
  255. Toenshoff, H. K.; Hohensee, V.: Neue NE- und 
Metallegierungen - Stand der Kenntnisse, in: Neue Werkstoffe - 
Fachaufsaetze zur Materialforschung [New Non-Ferrous and Metal 
Alloys - Status of the Know-How, in: New Materials - Expert 
Essays on Materials Research], VDW Frankfurt, BMFT (Hrsg.), Bonn 
(1986) 22 - 33 
  256. TRlDELTA AG, Deutsche Keramische Gesellschaft, 
Fachinformationszentrum Technik: Keramik - Grundlagen, 
Technologien, Werkstoffe, Produkte [German Ceramic Society, 
Specialized Information Center for Engineering: Ceramics - 
Fundamentals, Technologies, Materials, Products], (1991) Heft 3, 
FIZ Technik 1991 
  257. U.S.-Department of Commerce: Advanced Materials, U. S. 
Industrial Outlook 1992 
  258. U.S.-Department of Commerce: Emerging Technologies - A 
Survey of Technical and Economic Opportunities, National 
Technical Information Service, Springfield, Spring, 1990 
  259. U.S.-Department of Defense: Critical Technologies Plan 
- 
For the Committee on Armed Services United States Congress, 15 
March 1990 
  260. U.S.-National Critical Technology Panel: Report March 
1991, Virginia, USA 
  261. U.S.-National Science Foundation (NSF): Federal Funds 
for Research and Development - Fiscal Year l989, 1990 and l991 - 
Surveys of Science Resources Series, Vol. 89 (1992) 
  262. U.S.-Office of Technology Assessment: Research Funding 
as an Investment - Can we Measure the Returns?, A Technical 
Memorandum, Washington DC, USA, April 1986 
  263. U.S.-Department of Energy: 12th Annual Report to 
Congress on the Automotive Technology Development Programme, 
Washington DC, USA, November 1990 
  264. Uranit: CFK-Technik [Uraninite: Carbon-Fiber Reinforced 
Plastics Engineering], Juelich 
  265. U.S. National Science Board: Science Indicators - The 
1985 Report 
  266. van Griethuysen, A J.: New Applications of Materials, 
Scientific and Technical Press Limited, Denhag, Netherlands 1987 
  267. VDI: Kunststoffe im Fahrzeugbau, Evolution statt 
Revolution, Tagung [Plastics in Vehicle Manufacturing, Evolution 
Instead of Revolution, Seminar] Mannheim 15-16 March 1989, 
VDI-Verlag Duesseldorf 1989 
  268. Verband der chemischen Industrie e. V. [VCI]: 
Forschungs- und Technologiepolitik aus Sicht des VCI [Chemical 
Industry Association e.V. [VCI]: Research and Technology Policy 
from the VCI's Optic], Frankfurt 
  269. Verband der Chemischen Industrie e. V.: 
Chemiewirtschaft 
in Zahlen, Ausgabe [Chemistry in Numbers, Edition] 1992, 
Frankfurt 
  270. Verie, Ch.: The Potential Impact of New Semiconductor 
Materials, STI Review Nr. 6, OECD, Paris (1989) 73 - 104 
  271. Vickery, G.: Advanced Manufacturing Technology and the 
Organization of Work, STI Review Nr. 6, OECD, Paris (1989) 105 - 
146 
  272. Vickery, G.: The European Experience in Advanced 
Electronics, STI Review Nr. 10, OECD, Paris (1992) 49 - 94 
  273. von Falkai, B.: Synthesefasern - Grundlagen, 
Technologie, Verarbeitung und Anwendung [Synthetic Fibers - 
Fundamentals, Technology, Processing and Application], Verlag 
Chemie, Weinheim, Florida, Basel, 1981 
  274. Wagner, A. (Ed.): Beitraege einer traditionellen 
Universitaet zur industriellen Innovation, Tuebinger 
Wirtschaftwissenschaftliche Abhandlungen [Contributions of a 
Traditional University to Industrial Innovation, Tuebingen 
Economic Transactions], J. C. B. Mohr (Paul Siebeck), Tuebingen 
1987 
  275. Wagner, R.: Stand und Perspektiven der Entwicklung 
metallischer Werkstoffe, Symposium Materialforschung 1988, 
Projektleitung Material- und Rohstofforschung der 
Kernforschungsanlage [Status and Prospects for the Development 
of Metallic Materials, 1988 Materials Research Symposium, 
Nuclear Research Facility Materials and Raw Materials Project 
Management] Juelich GmbH (1988) 26 - 36 
  276. Wanhill, R. J. H.; Bunk, W. J. G.; Wumm, J. G. (Eds.): 
Advanced Materials Research and Developments for Transport - 
Light Metals 1985, 26. - 28. November 1985, Strassburg, Les 
Editions de Pysiques, LES ULIS CEDEX, France, 1985 
  277. Wegner, G.: Untersuchungen ueber die zukuenftige 
Bedeutung der Molekularelektronik fuer die Informationstechnik, 
Max-Planck-Institut fuer Polymerforschung [Studies on the Future 
Importance of Molecular Electronics for Information Engineering, 
Max-Planck Institute for Polymer Research], Mainz, January, 1992 
  278. Weule, H.: Forschungs- und Entwicklungsstrategien im 
Unternnehmen, Fertigungstechnisches Koloquium 91, Schriftliche 
Fassung der Vortraege [Research and Development Strategies in 
the Firm, Production Engineering Colloquium 91, Written 
Compilation of the Lectures], Springer Verlag, 1991 
  279. World Economic Forum, IMD (Ed.): The World 
Competitiveness Report 1991, Geneva, Lausanne, June, 1991 
  280. World Economic Forum, IMD (Ed.): The World 
Competitiveness Report 1992 Geneva, Lausanne, June, 1992 
  281. Zelinski, B. J. J.; Brinker, C. J.; Clark, D. E.; 
Ulrich, D. R. (Eds.): Better Ceramics Through Chemistry IV, 
Materials Research Society Symposium Proceedings, Vol. 180, 
Pennsylvania, USA, 1990 
  282. Ziegler, G.: Entwicklungstendenzen der 
Hochleistungskeramik [High-Performance Ceramic Development 
Trends], cfi/Ber. DKG (1991) 72-79 
<H5>  A 4 List of Firms and Institutions </H5>
  We are particularly grateful to the firms and institutions 
listed below with whom we were able to hold many informative 
technical discussions during the elaboration of this report. 
  Agency of Industrial Science and Technology, Tokyo/Japan 
  Akademie der Wissenschaften [Academy of Sciences], Dresden 
  Albert-Ludwigs-Universitaet [University], Freiburg 
  Alusuisse-Lonza, Neuhausen a. Rh./Schweiz [Switzerland] 
  Asea Brown Boveri, Heidelberg 
  Audi, Ingolstadt 
  BASF, Ludwigshafen 
  Bayer, Krefeld-Uerdingen 
  Bergakademie Freiberg 
  Bosch, Stuttgart 
  Bundesanstalt fuer Materialforschung und -pruefung [Federal 
Institute for Materials Research and Testing], Berlin 
  Buero fuer Technikfolgen-Abschaetzung des Deutschen 
Bundestags [German Parliament's Bureau for the Assessment of the 
Consequences of Technology], Karlsruhe 
  Carl Freudenberg, Weinheim 
  Cerasiv, Plochingen 
  CEST, London/England 
  Cremer Forschungsinstitut [Research Institute], Rodental 
  Daimler-Benz, Stuttgart 
  Degussa, Hanau 
  Deutsche Airbus, Bremen 
  Deutsche Botschaft [German Embassy] Tokyo/Japan 
  Deutsche Botschaft [German Embassy] Washington/USA 
  Deutsche Forschungs- und Versuchsanstalt, Koeln [German 
Research and Experimental Institute, Cologne] 
  Deutsche Private Akademie fuer Technik [German Private 
Academy for Engineering] GmbH, Chemnitz 
  Deutsche Shell, Eschbom 
  Deutsches Kunststoffinstitut [German Plastics Institute], 
Darmstadt 
  Dornier, Friedrichshafen 
  Dr. Tillwich GmbH, Horb 
  DTI, London/England 
  DuPont Wilmington/USA 
  EC Commission, Brussels 
  EC Commission, Luxembourg 
  ESK, Kempten 
  Fraunhofer Institut fuer angewandte Materialforschung 
[Institute for Applied Materials Research] (IFaM), Bremen 
  Fraunhofer Institut fuer Silicatforschung [Institute for 
Silicate Research] (ISC), Wuerzburg 
  Fraunhofer Institut fuer Werkstofftechnik [Institute for 
Materials Engineering] (IWM), Freiburg 
  Fraunhofer Institut [Institute], Hamburg 
  GE Plastics/USA 
  GKSS Forschungszentnum [Research Center], Geesthacht 
  H.C. Stark, Goslar 
  Henkel, Duesseldorf 
  Hitachi/Japan 
  Hoechst Ceramtec, Marktredwitz 
  Hoechst, Frankfurt 
  Hoesch, Dortmund 
  Institut fuer Kunststoffverarbeitung, Technische Hochschule 
[Institute for Plastics Processing, Technical College] Aachen 
  Institut fuer Materialforschung und Anwendungstechnik 
[Institute for Materials Research and Applied Engineering] 
(IMA), Dresden 
  Institut fuer neue Materialien (INM), Universitaet des 
[Institute for New Materials [INM], University of] Saarlandes, 
Saarbrucken 
  Institut fuer Verbundwerkstoffe, Universitaet [Institute for 
Composite Materials, University of] Kaiserslautern 
  Institut fuer Wirtschaftsforschung [Institute for Economic 
Research] [ifo], Munich 
  Japan Research and Development Corporation, Tokyo 
  Japan Research Institute, Tokyo 
  Forschungszentrum [Research Center] Juelich GmbH 
  Krebsoge, Radevommwald 
  Krupp Forschung [Research], Essen 
  Krupp Pulvermetall [Metal Powder], Essen (tab) Krupp VDM, 
Altena (tab) MAN, Munich (tab) Max-Planck-Gesellschaft 
[Society], Halle 
  Max-Planck-Institut fuer Eisenforschung [Institute for Iron 
Research], Duesseldorf 
  Max-Planck-Institut fuer Metallforschung [Institute for 
Metals Research], Stuttgart 
  Max-Planck-Institut fuer Mikrostrukturtechnik [Institute for 
Micro-Structural Engineering], Halle 
  Max-Planck-Institut fur Polymerforschung [Institute for 
Polymer Research], Mainz 
  MBB, Munich 
  Mercedes Benz, Esslingen 
  Metallgesellschaft, Frankfurt 
  Ministerium fuer Wirtschaft und Verkehr [Ministry for 
Economy 
and Transportation], Munich 
  Ministerium fuer Wirtschaft, Bayern, Nordrhein-Westfahlen 
[Ministry for Economy, Bavaria, North Rhine-Westphalia], 
Schleswig-Holstein 
  Ministerium fuer Wirtschaft, Technik und Verkehr [Ministry 
for Economy, Engineering and Transportation], Hannover 
  Ministerium fuer Wissenschaft und Forschung [Ministry for 
Science and Research], Duesseldorf 
  Ministerium fuer Wissenschaft und Kunst [Ministry for 
Science 
and Art], Wiesbaden, Stuttgart 
  Ministerium fuer Wissenschaft und Weiterbildung [Ministry 
for 
Science and Advanced Training], Mainz 
  Ministry of International Trade and Industry, Tokyo/Japan 
  MTU, Munich 
  NASA, Washington DC, USA 
  New Energy and Industrial Development Organization/Japan 
  NISTEP, Tokyo/Japan 
  Oak Ridge National Laboratory, Tennessee/USA 
  OECD, Paris, France 
  Office of Management and Budget, Washington/USA Porsche, 
Weissach 
  Preussag, Berlin 
  Ruhr-Universitaet [University], Bochum 
  RWTH, Aachen 
  Schott, Mainz 
  Schweizer Verbund der Materialtechnik/Schweiz [Swiss 
Materials Engineering Combine/Switzerland] 
  Siemens, Munich, Erlangen 
  SPRU, Brighton/England 
  Stiftung Institut fuer Werkstoffe[Founding Institute for 
Materials], Bremen 
  Sueddeutsches Kunststoffzentrum [Southern Germany's Plastics 
Center], Wuerzburg 
  Sulzer Innotec,Winterthur/Switzerland 
  Technische Hochschule [Technical College], Zwickau 
  Technische Rundschau, Bern/Switzerland 
  Technische Universitaet [Technical University], Berlin 
  Technische Universitaet [Technical University], Chemnitz 
  Technische Universitaet [Technical University], Dresden 
  Technische Universitaet [Technical University], 
Hamburg-Harburg 
  Thyssen Stahl, Duisburg 
  Tokyo Institute of Technology/Japan 
  Tokyo University/Japan 
  Toray Industries, Tokyo/Japan 
  Tridelta, Hemmsdorf 
  Union Carbide Corp./USA 
  Universitaet [University of] Bayreuth 
  Universitaet [University of] Karlsruhe im 
Kernforschungszentrum [in the Nuclear Research Centers of] 
Karlsruhe 
  Universitaet [University of] Kiel 
  Universitaet [University of] Mainz 
  Universitaet [University of] Stuttgart 
  US-Department of Commerce, Washington/USA 
  US-Department of Energy, Washington/USA 
  VDI Verlag, Duesseldorf 
  VW, Wolfsburg 
  Wemhoener &amp; Popp, Aachen 
  Zentrum fuer Kunststoffe [Plastics Center], Erlangen 
  ZFW Dresden 
  Zimmer, Frankfurt 
<H5>  A 5 List of Abbreviations </H5>
<H5>  List of General Abbreviations </H5>
  AIST: Agency of Industrial Science and Technology 
  AMPP: Advance Materials and Processing Programme 
  ATP: Advanced Technology Programme 
  BAM: Bundesanstalt fuer Materialforschung und -pruefung 
[Federal Institute for Materials Research and Testing] 
  BIP: Bruttoinlandsprodukt [Gross Domestic Product] 
  BMFT: Bundesministerium fuer Forschung und Technologie 
[Federal Ministry for Research and Technology] 
  BMVg: Bundesministerium fuer Verteidigung [Federal Defense 
Ministry] 
  BMWI: Bundesministerium fuer Wirtschaft [Federal Ministry of 
Economy] 
  BRITE: Basic Research of Industrial Technologies of Europe 
  BSP: Bruttosozialprodukt [Gross Social Product] 
  CNRS: Centre National de la Recherche Scientifique COST: 
Cooperation europeenne dans la domaine de la recherche 
scientific et technique 
  DES: Department of Education and Science DLR: Deutsche 
Forschungsanstalt fuer Luft- und Raumfahrt [German Aerospace 
Research Institute] e. V. 
  DOA: Department of Agriculture 
  DOC: Department of Commerce 
  DOD: Department of Defense 
  DOE: Department of Energy 
  DOI: Department of Interior 
  DOT: Department of Transportation 
  DTI: Department of Trade and Industry 
  EPA: Environmental Protection Agency 
  ERATO: Exploratory Research for Advanced Technology EURAM: 
European Advanced Materials Research Programme 
  EWR: Europaeischer Wirtschaftsraum [European Economic Area] 
  FCCSET: Federal Coordinating Council for Science and 
Technology 
  FhG: Fraunhofer-Gesellschaft [Society] 
  FhI: Fraunhofer-Institut[e] 
  GICP: General Industrial Collaborative Programme 
  GKSS: Forschungszentrum [Research Center] Geesthacht GmbH 
  HHS: Department of Health and Human Science 
  IOM: Institute of Medicine 
  IRC: Interdisciplinary Research Council 
  JAERI: Japan Atomic Energy Research Institute 
  JRCD: Research Development Corporation of Japan 
  KFA: Forschungszentrum [Research Center] Juelich GmbH 
  KfK: Kernforschungszentrum [Nuclear Research Center] 
Karlsruhe GmbH 
  KMU's: Kleine und mittlere Unternehmen [Small and 
Medium-Size 
Enterprises] 
  MATFO: Materialforschung [Materials Research] 
  MHS: Metallische Hochtemperatur- und Sonderwerkstoffe 
[High-Temperature and Specialty Metallic Materials] 
  MITI: Ministry of International Trade and Industry 
  MOD: Ministry of Defense 
  MOE: Ministry of Energy 
  Monbusho: Nationales Erziehungsministerium [National 
Education Ministry] 
  MOT: Ministry of Technology 
  MPG: Max-Planck-Gesellschaft [Society] 
  MPI: Max-Planck-Institut[e] 
  MRT: Ministere de la Recherche et de la Technique 
  MST: Stiftung fur Materialwissenschaft und -technologie 
[Foundation for Materials Science and Technology] 
  MTD: Materials and Manufacturing Process 
  MTS: Measurement Technology Support 
  NAE: National Academy of Engineering 
  NAS: National Academy of Science 
  NASA: National Aeronautics and Space Administration 
  NCMC: National Critical Material Council 
  NEDO: New Energy and Industrial Development Organisation 
  NIRIM: National Institute for Research in Inorganic 
Materials 
  NIST: National Institute of Standards and Technology 
  NRIM: National Research Institute of Metals 
  NSF: National Science Foundation 
  OECD: Organisation for Economic Co-Operation and Development 
  OMB: Office of Management and Budget 
  OSTP: Office of Science and Technology Policy 
  OTA: Office for Technology Assessment 
  PCAST: President's Council of Advisors on Science and 
Technology 
  PIRMAT: Programme interdisciplinaire de recherche sur les 
materiaux 
  SERC: Science and Engineering Council 
  STA: Science and Technology Agency 
<H5>  List of Specific Abbreviations for Materials </H5>
  ABS: Acrylnitril/Butadien/Styrol 
[Acrylonitrile-Butadiene-Styrene] 
  AFK: Aramidfaserverstaerkter Kunststoff [Aramide-Fiber 
Reinforced Plastic] 
  BMI: Bismaleinimid [Bismaleinimide] 
  CAD: Computer-Aided-Design 
  CAM: Computer-Aided-Manufacturing 
  CFC: Kohlefaserverstaerkter [Carbon-Fiber Reinforced] 
Composite 
  CFK: Kohlefaserverstaerkter Kunststoff [Carbon-Fiber 
Reinforced Plastic] 
  CIM: Computer-Integrated-Manufacturing 
  COW: Cut-off-wavelength 
  CVD: Chemical vapor deposition 
  EP: Epoxidharze [Epoxy Resin] 
  GFK: Glasfaserverstaerkter Kunststoff [Glass-Fiber 
Reinforced 
Plastic] 
  IC: Integrated Circuit 
  IPN: Interpenetrierende Netzwerke [Inter-Penetrating 
Networks] 
  IR: Infrarot [Infrared] 
  LCP: Liquid Cristalline Polymers 
  MHS: Metallische Hochtemperatur- und Sonderwerkstoffe 
[High-Temperature and Specialty Metal Materials] 
  NE-Metalle: Nichteisenmetalle [Non-Ferrous Metals] 
  ODS: Oxiddispersionsgehaertet [Oxide-Dispersion 
Solidification] 
  PA: Polyamides 
  PAI: Polyamidimid [Polyamideimide] 
  PANI: Polyaniline 
  PAR: Polyarylate 
  PBI: Polybenzimidazol [Polybenzimideazole] 
  PC: Polycarbonates 
  PCB: Printed-Circuit-Board-Materials 
  PE: Polyethylene 
  PEEK: Polyaryletherketone 
  PEI: Polyetherimide 
  PEK: Polyetherketone 
  PES: Polyethersulfon [Polyethersulphone] 
  PET: Polyethylenterephtalat [Polyethyleneterephthalate] 
  PF: Phenolharze [Phenol Formaldehyde] 
  PI: Polyimid [Polymer SP] 
  PMMA: Polymethylmethacrylate 
  POM: Polyoxymethylene 
  PP: Polypropylene 
  PPO: Polyphenyloxide 
  PPS: Polyphenylensulfide 
  PPV: Polyphenylenevinylene 
  PS: Polystyrol [Polystyrene] 
  PSU: Polysulfon [Polysulphone] 
  PTFEE: Polytetrafluorethylene 
  PUR: Polyurethane 
  PVC: Polyvinylchloride 
  PVDF: Polyvinylidenfluorid [Polyvinyldifluoride] 
  PVF: Polyvinylfluoride 
  PY: Polypyrrole 
  SIMIT: Sized-Induced-Metal/Insulator-Transition 
  UP: Ungesaettigte Polyester [Unsaturated Polyester] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20505 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   31 December 1993 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Germany's Chances in High Tech Industries Viewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Germany's Chances in High Tech Industries Viewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94WS0180a Duesseldorf HANDELSBLATT in German 31 Dec 93 p 34 </F>
<F P=103> 94WS0180a </F>
<F P=104>  Duesseldorf HANDELSBLATT </F>
<F P=105>  German </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article with contributions by Ursula Bernhard, Wolfgang </F>
Gillmann, Siegfried Grass, Josef Hess, Siegfried Nagel, Georg 
Weishaupt: "Even the 100- 
  [TEXT] With the amendment of the 
genetic engineering law, representatives of the chemical 
industry believe that Germany as a business location will once 
again become attractive to researchers in genetic engineering, a 
field that represents one of the most dynamic tools for 
innovation. As a result of the reduced licensing and 
registration periods as well as the simplification of these 
procedures, German scientists will finally be able to 
reestablish contact with world-wide developments in this field. 
Professor Wolfgang Hilger, chairman of the board of Hoechst AG, 
has been a tireless advocate of genetic engineering over the 
past several years. He believes that its importance to 
industrial development is at least as great as that of 
microelectronics. 
  As a key technology, genetic engineering stimulates and 
influences many fields. It is indispensable in the struggle 
against disease, from research into its causes all the way to 
the treatment of patients. Agricultural scientists have great 
expectations of developing new varieties of plants that will not 
only produce higher yields, but will also make it possible to 
use more ecologically benign methods of crop and harvest 
protection. Biotechnical methods could make important 
contributions to resource and energy conservation. Genetic 
engineering could also lead to important advances in 
environmental technology, concerning the removal of wastes or 
contaminants in the soil, for example. 
  Whereas outside of Germany, particularly in the United 
States, research and its industrial application has progressed 
rapidly, Germany has almost inevitably fallen behind. The 
primary reason for this has been the movement of research 
efforts, young researchers, and even many firms out of Germany. 
It is unlikely that the production and research resources now 
located abroad will return, but at least Germany will be once 
again be on the list of potential locations for upcoming 
projects. 
  No other market is currently generating quite as much 
commotion as is the telecommunications market. With the ongoing 
breakup of state monopolies, more and more fields in Germany 
being opened to competition. For example, private businesses 
such as Mannesmann Mobilfunk and E-Plus have established their 
own mobile radio telephone networks. More and more private 
investors are also competing with the state-owned enterprise 
Telekom in the establishment and operation of satellite and, in 
the future, terrestrial data networks. 
  And this is not all. Even the state telephone monopoly is 
being increasingly eroded. Concerns such as Vebe, RWE, or Viag 
are joining with other companies to build extensive 
communications networks. They and other large enterprises use 
these networks for internal telephone traffic as well as for 
remote transmission of images and other data. They are preparing 
for 1 January 1998, when the telephone monopoly will be 
dissolved and they will apply for licensing as private telephone 
networks. 
  The reactions of the German communications firms to the 
opening of the market are mixed. On the one hand, new fields 
such as the mobile telephone market are opening up to them. On 
the other hand, foreign competitors are champing at the bit, 
eager to use their specialized know-how and more advantageous 
price/service ratio to snatch contracts away from German 
manufacturers. However, it is the German companies that profit 
the most from the enormous investments (approximately 60 billion 
German marks [DM]) made by Telekom in the new laender. 
  Information technology (hardware and software) and 
communications technology are drawing closer together. An 
information system should not only streamline operations, but 
also inform, in the original sense of the word. Data is 
exchanged on all levels. Increased cabling as well as the GSM 
(Global System for Mobile Communications) telephone networks 
will make it possible to transmit every piece of information to 
any location. Stimulus will also come from entertainment 
electronics --multimedia is the watchword here. Traffic control, 
metrology, control systems engineering, education, medical 
electronics -- researchers have plenty of ideas. 
  If the computer industry is still struggling with tremendous 
difficulties, it is primarily because it has not yet learned how 
to translate its many good ideas into marketable products. In 
their understandable enthusiasm for what is technically 
feasible, retailers and developers ignore the real needs of the 
users. 
  It is essential that the shift to 32-bit technology and 
significantly more powerful microprocessors result in genuinely 
new uses. The consumer will be happy to see prices continue to 
be driven lower by the entrance of alternatives such as those 
offered by AMD or IBM/Motorola into the PC (personal computer) 
market, which is still dominated by the intel-processors. Then 
it is up to the software developer to put life into this 
fascinating and affordable technology. 
  Even in the most devastating structural crisis, such as that 
in which the relatively young data-processing industry currently 
finds itself, companies that have a clear strategy and focus 
their goods and services on a well-defined market do well. It is 
the large traditional data-processing concerns, which have a 
particularly hard time adapting to new market conditions, that 
are currently struggling with heavy losses. The industry is 
entering a new era of integrated computer and communications 
products. It is predicted that by the year 2000 the number of 
radio data transmitters in use alone will exceed 20 million. 
Radio data transmission makes possible such operations as the 
wireless exchange of data and information via portable palmtop, 
notebook, and laptop computers. 
  The expected rise in the world's population and the rapid 
economic growth in Southeast Asia will bring with it a sharp 
increase in energy consumption over the next 30 years; the World 
Energy Conference predicts an increase of 52 percent. The demand 
for power plants will increase dramatically. The Lesser 
Developed Countries (LDCs) need new power plants, while the 
industrialized countries and eastern Europe primarily need to 
replace outdated facilities. Experts predict an annual new 
building capacity of 95,000 megawatts worldwide over the next 10 
years. This translates to contracts for approximately 300 new 
power plants, for which major power plant construction firms 
such as Siemens, ABB, GEC Alsthom, General Electric, and 
Matsushita will compete. 
  Even should the construction of new atomic power plants 
continue to be blocked, power plant construction will continue 
to be a growth sector. Conventional power plants have improved 
significantly over the past few years in terms of technology. 
The tapping of new gas fields combined with improvements in the 
efficiency of the gas turbines has given this field a tremendous 
boost. The double use of the combustion heat in "Gas and Steam 
Turbine Power Plants" (the GUD technique), also called 
combination power plants, has made it possible to achieve record 
efficiencies of nearly 60 percent. When combined with a heat 
coupling, efficiencies of 90 percent are within reach. This 
increases the earning power of modern power plants dramatically. 
  Nonetheless, it is price and low-cost financing that are the 
primary focus of worldwide competition. In addition, local 
manufacturing is being demanded, causing the major concerns to 
increasingly engage in joint ventures in the LDCs or Eastern 
Europe in order to stay in the market. 
  All the industrialized countries are promoting the key 
technology of material development. This is because improvements 
and innovations in materials can lead to better or more 
competitive products. Many products on the world market have 
become more durable as a result of such improvements, including 
automobiles, computers, communications and entertainment 
electronics, and even artificial organs and dentures. 
  German industry is still a leader in materials research and 
development (R&amp;D). However, experts surveyed for the new 
Federal 
Ministry of Research and Technology (BMFT) Delphi Study rank 
Germany third, behind the United States and Japan -- but still 
by no means out of the race. The consulting firm Arthur D. 
Little, which was contracted by the BMFT to evaluate its 
materials research program, assured the BMFT that the research 
fields into which it has channeled approximately DM2 billion 
since 1985 have been those that will enable Germany to maintain 
its leading position. 
  One of the goals recommended by the study -- in addition to 
higher technological and industrial productivity -- concerns 
materials research. This goal is the more careful consideration 
of long-term ecological consequences. In the past few decades, 
materials researchers have considered their primary job to be 
the development of materials that meet their requirements both 
reliably and as cheaply as possible. 
  Now, however, the effect that a material has on man and his 
environment are being taken into greater consideration, both 
with regard to manufacturing and to processing,. This is due in 
part to legislation such as product liability laws, emission 
standards, waste disposal laws, and other regulations. The 
disposal, whether monolithically or as a compound, of a material 
that can no longer function as a product should, if at all 
possible, generate a new product. This is the ideal championed 
by proponents of a consistent recycling program. 
  Cooperation between the state and parliament will result in 
continued and even more direct intervention where materials are 
concerned. A carbon dioxide or energy consumption surcharge -- 
regardless of its final form -- and a heat utilization 
regulation will not only penalize plants that must be licensed 
for their emissions, but, via the resulting higher prices, will 
also indirectly affect the materials market mechanisms. The 
adoption by the state of product-energy indicators --which are 
not yet being publicly discussed -- would have a tremendous 
influence on which materials are available. 
  Even the automobile, which has been around for over 100 
years, is subject to improvement. Since World War II, there have 
been many innovations that have genuinely benefited the 
consumer. Currently under development are an anti-theft device 
which operates on the redundancy principle, a driver- and 
passenger-side airbag, and an airbag for side impact protection. 
These useful developments are at first available only in 
top-of-the-line models, but are increasingly incorporated in the 
more economical models. In the case of the "active chassis," 
which permits even the rear wheels to be steered within a 
limited radius, engineers and marketing experts are not yet in 
agreement as to whether the cost-benefit ratio is acceptable. 
  For the future, the automobile industry is adjusting to the 
notion that both the government and the public will demand lower 
carbon dioxide emissions. However, this is only possible through 
a corresponding decline in consumption. Consequently, automobile 
manufacturers are presently leaning towards smaller automobiles 
and new, more efficient, engines such as the VW Diesel TDI 
(*turbo direct injection*) with direct injection. The three 
liters per 100 kilometers average consumption rate is within 
reach. 
  At the same time, the industry is adjusting to requirements 
such as those of California, which within a few years will 
require a certain percentage of newly licensed vehicles to 
consist of cars with 0 percent emissions. This is only possible 
with electric automobiles. Despite the new developments in 
batteries, which have made it possible for batteries to hold as 
much as four times the charge held by conventional lead 
batteries, pure electric vehicles are still hampered by their 
limited range. Furthermore, they are dependent upon recharging 
stations. Consequently, at the very best they are suitable for 
those downtown areas that will soon be off limits to gas- or 
diesel-powered vehicles. A possible solution to this problem is 
offered by vehicles with a hybrid drive, which would use an 
electric engine within city limits and a combustion engine 
outside of the city, whereby use of the combustion engine also 
recharges the electric engine. 
  There are also promising developments -- by Mercedes and 
BMW, 
for example -- that make it possible to use hydrogen gas 
produced from water via electrolysis as a fuel. Finally, there 
are devices to aid the driver in finding and reaching his 
destination. This can be accomplished either with the help of a 
city map loaded in an on-board computer or via a satellite link. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20506 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Germany: More Economical Research through Outsourcing Called </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Germany: More Economical Research through Outsourcing Called </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Possible 

<F P=102>   94WS0210A Stuttgart BILD DER WISSENSCHAFT in German Feb 94 
pp 90-91 </F>

<F P=103> 94WS0210A </F>
<F P=104>  Stuttgart BILD DER WISSENSCHAFT </F>
<F P=105>  German </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Michael Eyett and Jorg Thietke by Wolfgang </F>
Hess: "Lean Research follows Lean Production"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Contract Research as an Entrepreneurial Chance. Less money </H5>
for research and development does not automatically dictate a 
step backward for a company. Consultants of Prognos AG see in 
outsourcing a chance to become more successful by way of a 
decreasing trend in costs. 
<H5>  Michael Eyett is a physicist with a PhD. He was the </H5>
technology consultant at the VDI [Association of German 
Engineers] Technology Center in Duesseldorf. He has been a 
project manager for Prognos AG in Basle since 1991. 
<H5>  Jorg Thietke is a chemist with a PhD. He also worked at the </H5>
VDI Technology Center in Duesseldorf before he began as a 
project manager at Prognos Ag in 1991. 
  [Hess] German industry spends too little money for research 
and development. Do you believe this, Dr. Thietke? 
  [Thietke] I don't buy that lock, stock and barrel. The 
economy spent just under 56 billion marks for research and 
development -- R&amp;D for short -- in 1992. This continues to 
be a 
large amount. However, in contrast to earlier, the competitive 
pressure has changed and thus the pressure on the costs for 
research and development. Results that can be more quickly 
converted are expected today. 
  [Hess] Consequently, the size of R&amp;D outlays may not be 
used 
as the only indicator to measure the economic significance of 
research. 
  [Eyett] The effective and efficient acquisition of 
technologies for practical use is much more important. 
  [Hess] Have German companies become too complacent? 
  [Eyett] We find repeatedly that the greatest source of 
inefficiency in the area of research and development is setting 
hazy goals. Technology strategies should be matched to the 
company strategy. For example, take a sensor manufacturer who 
wants to offer his products for sale at the lowest price. The 
R&amp;D efforts of this company must consequently concentrate on 
shorter turn-around times, a lower reject rate, and higher 
reliability. Too great a fixation by R&amp;D on the further 
development of product features misses this business strategy. 
  [Hess] Are you saying that in industry often the wrong thing 
is being researched or developed? 
  [Eyett] In many companies, this is unfortunately correct. 
  [Hess] Can you be somewhat more specific? 
  [Eyett] I do not know of any empirical data. I believe, 
however, that more than half the companies suffer from the 
situation that the R&amp;D department is not working in accord 
with 
the company goals. 
  [Hess] Does this mean that even industrial researchers are 
sitting in an ivory tower? 
  [Thietke] I think so. Meanwhile, many companies have 
recognized this problem. This is one reason why R&amp;D is being 
decentralized more frequently and organized as a profit center. 
Such a profit center must finance itself by getting contracts 
from the operating sectors. 
  [Hess] Prognos AG has recently been advocating the 
outsourcing of research and development. What do you understand 
by this? 
  [Thietke] On the one hand, a company can do research and 
development alone. On the other, it is possible to acquire 
technologies under license. However, this only works if a 
developed technology is also available on the market. If this is 
not so, there is a third option known as outsourcing. This means 
getting the technology by awarding R&amp;D contracts to third 
parties. Ideally, this allows access to external know-how 
permitting a quicker, less expensive and lower risk development 
than would have been possible within the company. 
  In production, outsourcing is already practiced extensively 
by shifting component manufacture onto suppliers to an ever 
increasing degree. After reducing the manufacturing depth, 
optimization of the R&amp;D depth is the next step. Lean research 
and development follow lean production. 
  [Hess] To make progress with the development of a product, 
you need an intensive insight into the problems accompanying 
this. A company allowing insight into their blueprints opens the 
way for industrial espionage. 
  [Eyett] In those segments that a company counts among its 
technological core areas, thus to its main body of knowledge, 
the company must of course pay attention that not too much of 
the know-how leaves. This is especially the case for know-how 
that a company is counting on for its future competitiveness. 
  [Hess] Consequently, is outsourcing only considered if a 
product development is being started from scratch and thus no 
know-how can be lost? 
  [Thietke] That is one area. However, even outside the 
technology core areas--if the object is to round out the main 
body of knowledge of a company--outsourcing can be worthwhile 
from a cost perspective in the core business. If the core area 
of a company lies in the development of complex systems, 
individual components may be developed somewhere else without 
the company having to fear that the contractor will turn around 
and work itself up to become a direct competitor. 
  [Hess] Despite the advantages that you have pointed out, 
industry is exploring the path of outsourcing only cautiously. 
  [Eyett] That is not so. Of the almost 56 billion that German 
industry spent for R&amp;D in 1992, six billion flowed to 
external 
institutes or companies. I can confirm with numbers that 
outsourcing in the economy is becoming more popular. In the past 
15 years, the total R&amp;D outlay by German industry has 
tripled. 
However, the outlay for external R&amp;D increased tenfold in the 
same time. 
  [Hess] And how will Prognos AG earn money by outsourcing? 
  [Eyett] The matter of concern for us is strategic 
consulting. 
In this framework, we can support our customers in deciding what 
they should outsource and what not for reasons of company and 
technology strategy. We can also investigate the market to find 
out which third-party vendors can be brought on board at a 
reasonable cost for research and development projects. 
  [Hess] Please show us with an example how your outsourcing 
approach looks. 
  [Eyett] Let us take the following case. A company is a 
leader 
in the market of special optical systems and, with a lower 
priority, active in optical components and measuring technology. 
For producing the systems, both in-house developed components 
such as interference mirrors and coated precision mirrors are 
necessary as is sophisticated measuring technology. The decisive 
feature, however, is the precise knowledge of the system 
properties and of the precision mechanics. 
  Our analysis showed that here it would be best to turn the 
component development over to a supplier, thus to outsource. The 
analysis also showed that the capacities of the existing and 
absolutely necessary holographic and interferometry measurement 
devices could be better exploited by finding contracts from 
aerospace companies. Here, we speak of insourcing. The company 
could save costs by this optimized mix. 
  [Hess] Just how good externally developed products are can 
be 
proven by means of quality control. However, how do you check 
the intellectual performance of external researchers? 
  [Thietke] In the example described, a project close to 
development was involved. The quality of this project could be 
checked simply because the system vendor continued to have the 
optical measuring technology in-house. For outsourcing close to 
development, this is more difficult. The basis for the joint 
venture can then usually be service contracts. In such cases, 
project management and R&amp;D controlling similar to that used 
for 
internal central departments must be used. Most of such central 
departments are run as cost centers. 
  [Hess] Which branches are particularly suited to R&amp;D 
outsourcing? 
  [Eyett] The stronger a company is in the sector of high 
technology, the more R&amp;D outsourcing is used. 
Electrotechnology, 
electronics and the automotive industry make particularly 
extensive use of this potential. In Japan, for example, half the 
development cost for a new automobile is borne by the suppliers. 
In Europe, on the other hand, the portion provided by suppliers 
is less than one third. 
  [Hess] How is that? 
  [Eyett] The integration between research institutes and 
industry on the one hand and suppliers and consumers on the 
other is generally closer in Japan than here. Also, the interest 
in achieving a lofty goal together is very pronounced in Japan. 
In addition, the companies exert enormous pressure on the 
supplier. 
  [Hess] German industry is currently spending more than 50 
billion marks on research and development. How many billion 
marks could, in your opinion, be used to better effect if 
industry would make consistent use of R&amp;D outsourcing? 
  [Eyett] That depends greatly on the individual company. For 
a 
company that previously made no use at all of external 
technology sources, the potential for savings in the R&amp;D 
area is 
more than 20 percent. To estimate this potential savings over 
all branches using a non-representative basis of individual 
cases would not be reputable. You will not get a number on that 
topic from us. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20507 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   3 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   FRG Research Minister on Budget, Subsidies, Eastern Germany, </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    FRG Research Minister on Budget, Subsidies, Eastern Germany, </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Nuclear   Research 

<F P=102> 94WS0221A Munich SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG in German 3 Feb 94 p 10 </F>
<F P=103> 94WS0221A </F>
<F P=104>  Munich SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG </F>
<F P=105>  German </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with German Federal Minister for Research and </F>
Technology Paul Krueger by Martin Urban and Juegen Busche; place 
and date not given: "For me, research policy is not only a 
policy of subsidies."] 
  [TEXT] [Text below title quote] The CDU [Christian 
Democratic Union] politician credits Munich with being the site 
of Germany's most outstanding fusion research, but he also wants 
to place large-scale projects in the East. 
  [SZ--Sueddeutsche Zeitung] You did not get off scot-free 
from 
the last round of cutbacks; instead, you are now going to have 
to relinquish an additional 250 million marks from your tightly 
apportioned budget. How are you going to manage that without 
causing damage to German research? 
  [Krueger] For me, research policy is not only a policy of 
subsidies but involves much more. Its effectiveness cannot be 
secured just by money alone. The budget reduction in the Federal 
Ministry of Research and Technology will probably affect nearly 
all areas. In the area of personnel in the research 
installations, however, we will hardly be able to do any 
economizing, also because of the legal commitments in the 94th 
budget. That means that we will probably have to economize more 
sharply in the area of project funding, in the area of 
investments, in the area of materials and equipment in research 
facilities, and with international contributions. 
  [SZ] You wanted to save even more on space travel in any 
case 
than the Minister of Finance considers necessary. 
  [Krueger] The budget is not determined by the Federal 
Minister of Research alone but rather in the end by the 
Parliament. If it is up to me and my department, space travel 
will indeed share in the cut-backs. 
  [SZ] How does it look for fusion research? The decision on 
the W7X experiment, which the Institute for Plasma Physics is 
very interested in, still has to be made. Is the experiment 
going to be done, and if so, where? 
  [Krueger] I do believe that the W7X stellarator [experiment] 
will happen. That is, after all, a project which is currently 
being examined within the scope of the European fusion program 
and which, if necessary, could be sponsored via the EU. So I 
believe that the resources will be sufficient also for a 
medium-term realization of the W7X. 
  [SZ] Where? 
  [Krueger] Since we are planning to build a fusion site in 
Greifswald, Greifswald will probably be considered for this. We 
are trying over the long term to create an innovative landscape 
for research in Eastern Germany as well. That also means putting 
some large-scale equipment in the new states and not always just 
adding still more [pieces of equipment to areas] which already 
have a lot. 
  [SZ] Does that mean that the Max Planck Institute for Plasma 
Physics has its future already behind it? 
  [Krueger] I do not look at it that way. Because outstanding 
work has been done here. Even if the stellarator research is 
moved to Greifswald, important large-scale equipment for fusion 
research would remain in Garching and would make preliminary 
work for the world-wide ITER project possible. 
  [SZ] What are the scientists there supposed to do if they do 
not get the new experiment? The large ITER test reactor is only 
a hope. Apart from the fact that the next fusion reactor, if it 
is operated with radioactive tritium, would have to be approved 
in accordance with the Atomic Energy Law--and according to the 
explanation of the SPG [Social Democratic Party of Germany], 
this would not receive majority approval in Germany. 
  [Krueger] We'll have to wait and see about that. I think 
that 
Munich is currently the most outstanding site of fusion research 
in Germany, that Greifswald could be a complement to Munich, 
possibly as part of the Munich institute; and the nuclear 
research center in Karlsruhe will continue to have a future. 
  [SZ] From what you are not saying, it follows that the 
Juelich nuclear research installation no longer has any future 
in fusion research. 
  [Krueger] It has not been finally decided yet what will 
happen with Juelich after the fusion experiments which are 
currently running are completed. So I am not able to say 
anything definitive either. 
  [SZ] What is your position on the new atom reactor project 
in 
Garching? 
  [Krueger] First of all, we need clear decisions in Bavaria 
in 
this regard. In addition, we have to see what financing 
shortages we already have now in the area of funding for 
university or college construction. A new research reactor would 
have to be financed very substantially through the Law to 
Promote College Construction. We have announced support for when 
that time comes of a firm investment cost subsidy of 160 million 
and an operating cost subsidy of 80 million marks. And if the 
project does become definite, we will make this sum available. 
  [SZ] In the face of criticism from the USA, how do you, as a 
politician at the federal level, assess the problem of 
proliferation via the highly enriched nuclear fuel which is 
supposed to be used in Garching? 
  [Krueger] There are no official statements on the part of 
the 
American government regarding this. But we should not 
underestimate the public discussion about it. The [German] 
government does not see any proliferation. All of the nuclear 
fuel of the research reactor is completely subject to the 
security measures of the European Atomic Energy Community 
(EURATOM)and the International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEO). As 
soon as the FRM's concrete reality becomes apparent, we should 
try very quickly to reach a clarification of these questions 
with the American government. 
  [SZ] You want to shorten the road from basic research to 
production for the market. That leads among other things to [the 
situation] that large research facilities which are now suddenly 
supposed to being trying for marketability are in competition 
with the Frauenhofer Institutes, which have traditionally been 
there to carry out applied research. 
  [Krueger] I do not see direct competition here. 
  [SZ] It will be seen and spoken of that way on both 
sides. 
  [Krueger] We want to help those sections of the large 
research facilities which are already more oriented toward 
applications to be given work which is line with our strategy, 
which we recognize as significant for the future. 
  [SZ] Are you considering doing something to help foster 
independance for the generation of college graduates in, for 
example, the chemical industry, where there are almost no jobs 
to be found now? 
  [Krueger] We are thinking a great deal about how we can 
support the basic requirements for livelihood. There is a whole 
series of programs for this. Right now in the new states, where 
the deficit is the greatest, these special subsidies for 
technologies extend to supporting the start-up of 
technology-oriented businesses. 
  [SZ] Subsidies also through the FMRT [Federal Ministry of 
Research and Technology]? 
  [Krueger] Yes. Although I doubt that young graduates are in 
the position to already be starting businesses. What is 
important is that we in general take more graduates into 
businesses. We are currently giving intensive thought to 
possibly also creating new incentives in innovative areas in 
industry in order to be able to place good graduates of colleges 
and universities. 
  [SZ] How is your collaborative work with the Ministry of 
Education going? 
  [Krueger] Smoothly and well. Better coordination of the 
research facilities would be necessary, particularly the 
facilities on the so-called "blue list." 
  [SZ] Since, as you said at the beginning, you now 
necessarily 
have to limit project research, a whole series of small 
businesses which live off of projects in, for example, energy 
research for the Ministry of Research will either go under or 
substantially down-size and will in any case have to let people 
go. 
  [Krueger] Funding from the FMRT should in any case only be 
jump-start financing, not a long-term subsidy. I hope that 
through the many measures we are undertaking we will help 
industry work more closely with research facilities and also 
with business facilities which are active in research. I hope 
that we are more successful than we have been in the past. 
  [SZ] Would a change in the guidelines for granting funds be 
necessary in this regard? 
  [Krueger] I hope that industry comes to the position of 
giving away more contracts to third parties--that is, of using 
commissioned or contracted research more intensively. At this 
point only two percent of the total research expenditures of 
business and industry is used for contracts [for research] to 
third parties. That seems to me to be too little. Otherwise, it 
cannot be the case that the government, at least with the budget 
reductions, has to see to it that private research facilities 
are receiving project funding right along with public research 
facilities. 
  [SZ] On the other hand, it is surely important that we do 
not 
thoughtlessly risk the expert knowledge we have available. And 
what you are now allowing to fall apart will take a long time to 
rebuild in better times. 
  [Krueger] I can only spend the money that I have. 
  [SZ] Do you think that your demand that research 
expenditures 
be offset by taxes beginning in 1995 still has a chance, and how 
should the finance minister who is then in office balance that 
out? 
  [Krueger] We are working on creating a preferential system 
for research and development with regard to taxes. How this will 
look is currently being worked out among the Federal Ministry of 
Research and the other departments, particularly the Federal 
Ministry of Finance. 
  [SZ] Do you consider it possible to recoup from businesses 
which are now doing well financially thanks to government 
funding of research some of the money which the government gave 
them? 
  [Krueger] We are already doing that. 
  [SZ] Where? 
  [Krueger] The good businesses spread things out, since 
according to the funding requirements of the FMRT they have to 
grant licenses to competitors. The government joins in the 
revenue. By the way, we have the highest tax rates in the world. 
  [SZ] They affect the good and the bad. 
  [Krueger] I do not view [the idea which] you are addressing 
to be a very good solution now, because it is very difficult to 
prove in individual cases how large the portion of the FMRT 
research subsidy was in concrete product developments. I think 
we should stay with our role as sponsor. 
  [SZ] It is often said about universities that students in 
Ph.D. programs must be increased, must be supported more. What 
is your view? 
  [Krueger] We still need a variety of measures regarding how 
we can do better at fostering future workers, including members 
of the elite. That, however, costs money. 
  [SZ] People have placed their hopes in the restructuring of 
the East German universities. 
  [Krueger] We created the innovation courses for East 
Germany. 
They are approved so far. Another matter is the funding program 
"Cooperation in Research" begun in September 1993. Among other 
things, this deals with the funding of research and development 
personnel transfers between businesses and research facilities 
done to maintain a kind of an intellectual transfer of 
technology. That is a very efficient form of technology transfer. 
  [SZ] Will you have to put the brakes on the Max Planck 
Society in their efforts to develop activities in the new states? 
  [Krueger] The Max Planck Society has our pledge to 
financially cover all measures which are tackled there. It is, 
however, to be feared that the building of new Max Planck 
Institutes will be more difficult to manage than the financing. 
  [SZ] Does that have something to do with the problems of the 
states? 
  [Krueger] It has first of all to do with the fact that it is 
difficult to summon qualified people to settle in the new states 
before general conditions are created which the scientists 
accept. 
  Interviewers were Martin Urban and Juergen Busche. 
  [Photo Caption] Minister Paul Krueger: "We are giving a 
great 
deal of thought to how we can support the basic requirements for 
livelihood." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20508 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   3 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   France: Government Report Launches Debate on National S&amp;T </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    France: Government Report Launches Debate on National S&amp;T </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Policy 

<F P=102>   94WS0222A Paris LE MONDE in French 3 Feb 94 p 11 </F>
<F P=103> 94WS0222A </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE MONDE </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article entitled: "Francois Fillon Launches the National </F>
Debate on the Future of Research"; first paragraph is LE MONDE 
introduction] 
  [Text] The minister of higher education and research, 
Francois Fillon, made public a 60-page report on the broad goals 
of French research on Tuesday, 1 February. Sixty thousand copies 
of the document are expected to circulate in research circles, 
kicking off the minister-initiated national discussion that will 
culminate in a great parliamentary debate in June. 
  In January, 1982, Jean-Pierre Chevenement, then minister of 
research and technology under the Mauroy government, inaugurated 
the "National Research and Technology Days." Twelve years later, 
Francois Fillon has borrowed the formula to "survey the state of 
French research" and "collectively define strategic priorities." 
The national research debate was announced last May and aims to 
"wipe the slate clean and redefine priorities." It was 
ultimately postponed until last fall, when a group of experts 
headed by atomic energy high commissioner Roger Dautray compiled 
a preliminary report. 
  The first draft of the expert report was written between 14 
September and 3 December, 1993, and barely scratched the 
surface. Overly concerned about circumscribing the debate, its 
authors were careful not to make any final decisions or suggest 
priorities or strategies. The only exception was a series of 
remarks and questions on the prickly issue of higher education 
and research organizations, and how to reconcile cutting-edge 
research with mass university education. 
  Since then, various people involved in research have 
enriched 
the report with their thoughts, desires, and questions 
concerning universities, research organizations, big 
institutions (Academy, College of France, Parliamentary Office 
of Science and Technology), manufacturers, and trade unions. 
  Six regional symposia to be held between mid-February and 
mid-March in Marseille, Grenoble, Bordeaux, Strasbourg, Lille, 
and Le Mans will base their work sessions on the report, which 
features four main chapters[.sup]1[/]: 
  -- Basic research. In the opinion of the 
reporters, France, despite several weaknesses, "is active on 
most basic research fronts, and is well-positioned to compete 
internationally." But they emphasize the need to raise questions 
about how to "maintain research's vitality and dynamism." 
  Examples of such questions include how to combat the 
"persistent inadequacy of engineering sciences"; how to spur 
research professors and researchers to "take risks"; how to 
increase the ability of research organizations, whose resources 
are mostly allocated to "personnel and other fixed 
expenditures," to take initiatives; and how to keep budgets for 
big programs and equipment from adversely affecting small 
science. Regional symposia participants will try to answer those 
questions. 
  -- Science and society. Aware that research often 
leads to "results that transform personal and collective life," 
the reporters believe "the scientific community cannot remain 
indifferent to the expectations or criticisms of citizens." 
Accordingly, they recommend more communication, through a 
broader inclusion of learned societies and Parliament in 
discussions. They also suggest that scientists listen more 
carefully and "pay greater heed to human and social sciences, 
which, by shedding light on the factors that determine 
scientific and technical creativity and on society's demands, 
can bolster interaction [between laymen and researchers]." 
  -- Research, technologies, and companies. To no 
one's surprise, the report's findings here are "worrisome." 
French companies spend only 1.3 percent of GDP on research, 
against approximately 1.9 percent in competitor countries. The 
report stresses, for instance, that German industry conducts 
nearly twice as much research and development work as its French 
counterpart, and employs twice as many researchers. Moreover, 
although "the big state-led and -supported programs (in 
aeronautics, space, nuclear power, telecommunications, and so 
on) have scored many successes," their "effect is only decisive 
in their own industry" and "spills over very little into others." 
  Isn't it time, the reporters wonder, to question the 
relevence of objectives and the methods used to achieve them? 
Shouldn't S&amp;T policy seek to revitalize the technological 
fabric 
of small and medium-size companies; inject a little science into 
traditional industries such as construction, public works, 
agriculture and food, etc.; and redefine research priorities for 
higher education and the big professional schools? 
  -- Higher education and research organizations. A 
significant amount of research, especially basic research, is 
conducted in establishments of higher education and specialized 
organizations. But in the opinion of the reporters, particularly 
Academy of Sciences president Jacques Friedel, higher education 
must adapt to future needs without delay. 
  Put another way, the reporters suggest that there may be a 
need to team up with regions, companies, and local government 
agencies to create short, accessible technology-training 
programs better suited to mass education. This would not be done 
at the expense of university research, whose level would be 
maintained through the development of centers of excellence. The 
reporters seem to favor such a shift, just as they appear open 
to the idea of more overlap between the research and teaching 
communities. 
  This contrasts with their December observation that "the 
notion floated by some of a future merging of the two 
professions would require an exhaustive study to assess its 
relevence and feasibility." The reporters tried to soften their 
remarks on the question this time around, for it is a sensitive 
one. The new document states that "without abandoning a system 
of research organizations that has proven its worth," we must 
"think about how we can incorporate that system into the 
university fabric." 
  NOMINATION: Jacques Joussot-Dubien as the 
vice-president of the Higher Council on Research and 
Technology. Higher education and research minister Francois 
Fillon installed the new Higher Council on Research and 
Technology (CSRT) on Tuesday, 1 February. The research minister 
is the lawful president of this body, which elected 65-year-old 
Jacques Joussot-Dubien as vice-president. The CRST was created 
in 1982 to advise the government on important science and 
technology choices, and consists of 40 members who sit for 
two-year terms. [Jacques Joussot-Dubien, born in Oran, Algeria 
on 12 April, 1928, specializes in photochemistry and lasers. He 
is a professor at the University of Bordeaux-I, director of the 
Wave/Matter Interaction Physics Laboratory of the Bordeaux 
National Advanced School of Chemistry and Physics, and an 
elected correspondent of the Academy of Sciences as of 1980. 
Joussot-Dubien was research director at the central 
administration of the National Education Ministry from 1986 to 
1988.] 
Footnotes 
1. Plus a very short fifth chapter on regions, Europe, and the 
world. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20509 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   French Minister Outlines S&amp;T Information Program </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    French Minister Outlines S&amp;T Information Program </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94WS0224A Paris AFP SCIENCES in French 27 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94WS0224A </F>
<F P=104>  Paris AFP SCIENCES </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "Fillon Announces Measures To Improve </F>
Dissemination of Scientific Information"] 
  [Text] Paris - On 26 January, in a report at the council of 
ministers, The minister of higher education and research, 
Francois Fillon, submitted measures aimed at improving the 
dissemination of scientific and technical information. 
  Fillon pointed out: "New data bases will be created in 
sectors where French research excels, in strategic sectors and 
in areas where research underlies major impacts on 
industry." 
  The minister also reported the upcoming creation of a 
"high council for scientific and technical information 
that will recommend major guidelines" to be developed in 
respect to scientific and technical information. "A very 
large number of scientific and technical information 
scholarships will be allocated." 
  Following is the passage in the council of ministers' 
communiqu containing Fillon's report: 
  The dissemination of scientific and technical knowledge is a 
factor in economic development and job creation. Our national 
independence in this area, therefore, needs to be guaranteed. 
Such dissemination should also help propagate French language 
and science. 
  1) If need be, existing data bases will be improved and 
upgraded. New data bases will be created in areas where French 
research excels, in strategic sectors and and in areas where 
research underlies major impacts on industry. The objective is 
to have data bases on a level that compares with the best data 
bases in the world. 
  French scientific journals will be given assistance to 
attribute an international dimension to their dissemination. 
  2) There will be improved accessing of information by 
researchers and firms. Techniques for the use of computer 
systems that make it possible to tap into data bases will be 
simplified. Encouragement will be provided for the use of high 
transfer rate data exchange systems that are being set up on an 
international scale. 
  3) A High Council for Scientific and Technical Information 
will recommend broad guidelines for action in this area. The 
role and missions of the Scientific and Technical Information 
Institute and the Agency for the Dissemination of Technological 
Information will be precisely defined. Contracts concluded by 
the government with research organizations and with 
establishments of higher learning will specify the latters'' 
missions in respect to information. 
  Students will be better trained in research and use of 
scientific and technical data. A very large number of scientific 
and technical information scholarships will be allocated. 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20510 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpest008___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   German Research Minister on Strengths, Weaknesses in High </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    German Research Minister on Strengths, Weaknesses in High </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Tech   Industries 

<F P=102> 94WS0227A Duesseldorf WIRTSCHAFTSWOCHE in German 14 Jan 94 p 
73 </F>

<F P=103> 94WS0227A </F>
<F P=104>  Duesseldorf WIRTSCHAFTSWOCHE </F>
<F P=105>  German </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Research Minister Paul Krueger by Stefan </F>
Wichmann and Burkhard Boendel: "Firm Barriers"; date and place 
not given] 
  [Text] 
  -- Minister, the number of German patents is dropping, fewer 
and fewer German researchers are winning the Nobel prize, 
business investments in research and development are 
shrinking--is there any way to stop Germany's descent to 
second-class technological status? 
  [Krueger] I doubt that we are on a descent. But we have 
problems with the economic climate which have a negative effect 
on the research climate in Germany. The economic setting and the 
state of the market are influencing the tempo of converting 
research results into successful products. We aren't weak at all 
in basic research. In gene technology or microelectronics, for 
example, we still have a high international standing. 
  -- Then perhaps you are thinking of the fact that we are 
falling behind the U.S. and Japan, with virtually no chance of 
catching up? 
  [Krueger] No, the pinch only comes in converting knowledge 
into products and markets. That has to happen more rapidly. And 
a sometimes near-hysterical reaction to technical developments 
in this country is a stumbling block. 
  -- Can you give examples? 
  [Krueger] Plenty of them. The high temperature reactor, 
where 
we were world leaders, was done in by a lack of political 
acceptance. Or take the example of gene technology, where young 
researchers see no opportunities because of the long wait for 
approval and emigrate. Many things set the wrong mood, for 
instance when scientists working in health research are 
subjected to threats because they have to carry out experiments 
on animals in order to help human beings. 
  -- But popular initiatives can't bear the whole blame for 
the 
crisis. Even in uncontroversial technologies the dynamics of 
innovation are weakening in this country. 
  [Krueger] That varies a great deal from one industry to 
another. Engineering, for example, is still innovative. In some 
ways even too innovative, almost too perfect. That drives up 
costs and weakens our competitiveness. Innovation at all costs 
is not good. We often make complicated things, but the Japanese 
usually make what is more saleable. 
  -- How can that be changed? 
  [Krueger] What is needed is a closer link between basic 
research and industry. Maybe it would also be more efficient if 
more basic research were conducted within industry itself. Often 
the two sides no longer understand one another. In the last few 
years a real language barrier has arisen and it has to be 
overcome. 
  -- You took over the idea of a strategic circle from your 
predecessor--a mini-MIDI or round of talks? 
  [Krueger] Neither one. I want to initiate a strategic dialog 
between research, industry and politics on two levels with 
differing goals. On the upper level is the strategic circle, 
where the concerns are research processes and across-the-board 
problems like acceptance, legal requirements, training the next 
generation, the tempo of innovation and the like. 
  -- And the second level? 
  [Krueger] That is made up of several dialog circles in which 
the nature of future research and development trends will be 
discussed. They should come up with answers, for example to the 
question of what technologies and products are of basic 
significance for the future development of our society. These 
circles will be made up of new experts in each case. Only the 
basic structure will remain unchanged. Representatives of the 
economy, science and politics will share their experiences, 
enhanced by external studies and reports. 
  -- Which research areas do you think most significant? 
  [Krueger] Germany cannot afford to neglect any key area. For 
example, we need to catch up in biotechnology and in almost all 
application areas of microelectronics. In information technology 
we have lost a lot of ground. I will pay particular attention to 
software development, where we can draw on our knowledge of 
systems. 
  -- And you hope to achieve this with antiquated support 
mechanisms and structures? 
  [Krueger] We are already thinking of innovations. For one 
thing, we have already developed concrete ideas about tax 
incentives for research and development. We are discussing this 
with the finance minister at the moment. In the new Federal 
Laender we have set up a broad spectrum of programs which 
provide a basis for the existence of innovative mid- level 
companies. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20511 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   17 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   German Space Agency Announces 1994 Program </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    German Space Agency Announces 1994 Program </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94WS0250B Paris AFP SCIENCES in French 17 Feb 94 p 12 </F>
<F P=103> 94WS0250B </F>
<F P=104>  Paris AFP SCIENCES </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Unsigned article: "Germany To Participate in 500 Space </F>
Projects in 1994"] 
  [Text] Bonn--Germany plans to participate in 500 
space research projects throughout 1994 in a context of 
international cooperation along with its financial contribution 
to the ESA mission, the German Space Agency 
(DARA) announced on 16 February. 
  "These various projects have one point in common and 
that is that they are very interesting in terms of the 
development of high technologies," emphasized Mr. 
Jan-Baldem Mennicken, DARA director-general, during a press 
conference in Bonn. 
  According to Mr. Mennicken, out of the budget of DM1.6 
billion allocated by the German Research Ministry, about 1.1 
billion will be devoted to ESA projects, while the rest, about 
500 million, will go to national programs and German research 
institutes. 
  In 1994, German space research will emphasize mobility 
(through the Ariane and Express programs), 
communications (TUBSAT-B), health 
(MIR-92E), safety, energy, and high-tech procedures, 
on the one hand, and observation of the Earth, the water, the 
climate, the atmosphere, and the planets (Galileo, 
Ulysses, Mars-94), on the other hand. 
  The two main projects to be launched will be the 
X-SAR Earth observation program, carried out together 
with Italy and the United States, and the Crista Spas 
climatological research mission endowed with DM40 million. The 
X-SAR ultra-sensitive radar "will not confine itself to 
observing the surface but will also measure the degree of 
humidity in the air," Mr. Heinz Stoewer, project manager, 
said in briefing the press. X-SAR will be tested on 7 April, and 
for a second time, on 18 August on board a shuttle. 
  The Crista Spas mission is intended to collect data on 
climate changes as well as on gases that are dangerous to the 
ozone layer over a period of 10 days ("as against 6 months 
for a conventional satellite"). It will be launched in 
October 1994 in connection with the flight of the American 
shuttle STS-66. 
  Here is another important project in which the Germans will 
participate: the Russian Mars-94 operation whose 
takeoff is scheduled for October from Baikonur; its purpose is 
to take soil samples on the red planet in cooperation with the 
French, the Americans, and the Russians. Germany will make as 
important a contribution as will France with 14 experiments. 
  Furthermore, the ISAN mission, intended to put the 
finishing touches on integrated aerial navigation systems with 
satellite surveillance during all flight phases, 
"describes the joint effort by the enterprises and the 
universities," Mr. Stoewer noted. 
  Germany, he pointed out furthermore, will conduct 
discussions 
with the Americans, particularly to have German astronauts 
included in future shuttle missions. Besides, an ESA cosmonaut, 
undoubtedly the German Ulf Merbold, should participate in the 
sixth Russian-European Euro-Mir mission which will 
take off from Baikonur in September; it will include major 
German participation with 11 experiments in human physiology. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20512 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   02 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Germany: 900-Million DM Approved for JESSI </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Germany: 900-Million DM Approved for JESSI </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94WS0262B Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER ZEITUNG/BLICK DURCH DIE 
WIRTSCHAFT in German 02 Mar 94 p 8 </F>

<F P=103> 94WS0262B </F>
<F P=104>  Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER ZEITUNG/BLICK DURCH DIE 
WIRTSCHAFT </F>

<F P=105>  German </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> ["Krueger: Funding Earned Mostly by Microelectronics </F>
Systems"] 
  [Text] BONN (dpa). It is now the opinion in Bonn 
that the European JESSI Program, which has been plagued by birth 
pangs, is finally on the right road to reinforcing the 
participating European industries against Japanese and American 
competition. In an interim report on the support program through 
1996, the German Minister of Research, Paul Krueger, emphasized 
that Germany's strengths lie in specialized areas of 
microelectronics. 
  Chips alone do not create profits, but rather the systems in 
which they are used, Krueger argues. Owing to a good mixture of 
both large and medium-sized companies, Germany enjoys a high 
potential in system engineering. The concurrent development of 
systems and the chips used in them provides opportunities for 
Germany industry. 
  Among the particular strengths of German industry, Krueger 
named high-frequency analog technology, sensor development, and 
applications-specific memory chips. The Federal Republic is weak 
where solutions are sought in the market solely with available 
processors and applications programs. 
  Besides Germany, France, Italy, The Netherlands, Great 
Britain, and the European Research Cooperative Venture Eureka 
now participate in JESSI (the Joint European Submicron Silicon 
Initiative). Funding to the amount of DM900 million, of which 
half will be provided by industry and half by the various 
governments and Brussels, will be available to the 140 
participating enterprises in 1994. 
  The Ministry of German Research will provide DM 104 million. 
The total volume of the world market for microelectronic 
components in the year 2000 is estimated to be at about DM250 
billion. In 1980, it was about DM24 billion. 
  Krueger considers the anti-blocking system (ABS), mobile 
telephony, and digital radio transmission as examples of 
successful applications of microelectronic developments. 
Siemens's decision to establish a new microchip development and 
production capability in Dresden signals a new initiative for 
Germany and Europe. 
  The new 64-Mbit chip, which is being developed jointly with 
America's IBM, will be produced in Dresden. This superchip, 
which can store 6,000 DIN-A4 pages of text in an 11 x 18-mm 
area, is one of the original priority goals of the JESSI Program. 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20513 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpest008___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   03 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Germany Creates Research Council </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Germany Creates Research Council </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94WS0272B Paris AFP SCIENCES in French 03 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94WS0272B </F>
<F P=104>  Paris AFP SCIENCES </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "Germany: Creation of Research Council"] </F>
  [Text] Bonn--The German Government decided on 24 February 
to create a Council on Research, Technology, and Innovation to 
be headed by Chancellor Helmut Kohl, chancellery spokesman 
Dieter Vogel has announced. 
  The council, which will bring together representatives from 
the research community, industry, trade unions, and the 
government, is expected to contribute to better cooperation 
between research and industry with the object of enhancing 
German competitiveness, according to Paul Kruger, minister for 
research, and Mr. Anton Pfeifer, state minister for the 
chancellery. It should begin its work sometime this spring. 
  The council, Mr. Pfeifer noted, will focus on facilitating 
improved dialogue between research institutes and economic 
operators on research policy objectives, identifying priorities, 
proposing research projects, and fostering stronger cooperation 
at the German, European, and global levels. To support increased 
cooperation, personnel exchanges between research institutes and 
economic operators will be expanded. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20514 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   30 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Germany: Research Minister Hopes To Pass 20 EU Programs </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Germany: Research Minister Hopes To Pass 20 EU Programs </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   AU3103095094 Munich SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG in German 30 Mar 94 
p 27 </F>

<F P=103> AU3103095094 </F>
<F P=104>  Munich SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG </F>
<F P=105>  German </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> ["froe"-signed report: "Krueger Facing Difficult </F>
Negotiations on European Research Programs"] 
  [Text] Bonn -- As chairman of the Council of Research 
Ministers of the European Union [EU] during the second half of 
the year, FRG Research Minister Paul Krueger (Christian 
Democratic Union) wants to pass, if possible, all 20 programs of 
the EU's Fourth Research Framework Program. This involves 
approximately 24 billion German marks for 1994-98. However, it 
remains to be seen whether Krueger will achieve this goal. It 
is expected that the minister has to set priorities to ensure 
the smooth continuation of EU-financed projects with German 
participation, for instance in information technology. It is 
also expected that there will be differences of opinion on 
industrial policy. 
  Last week, the Mediation Committee, which consists of the 12 
EU research ministers and 12 representatives of the European 
Parliament, agreed on the 1994-98 EU research budget. The 
Fourth Research Framework Program, which unites all research 
activities of the European Union, will allocate 12.3 billion 
ECU. In addition, in 1996 another 0.7 billion ECU can be 
approved, the use of which is to be made dependent on the 
economic situation. 
  After a formal confirmation of the results achieved in the 
Mediation Committee by the Council of Ministers and the 
parliament, the committee can now present the 20 specific 
programs, with which the framework program is to be implemented. 
According to the Research Ministry, 1.25 billion of the 12.3 
billion ECU will go to Euratom (840 million ECU for fusion 
research, 414 million ECU for nuclear safety) and 9.4 billion 
ECU to the actual technical programs. 
  A total of 3.4 billion ECU are to be allocated to 
information 
and communications technology, followed by about 2 billion ECU 
for industrial technologies, which include material research, 
aviation research, and the fields of measuring and testing. In 
the program for non-nuclear energies, (about 1 billion ECU) 60 
percent are to be used for renewable energies and 40 percent for 
research and development work for energy saving. Approximately 
1 billion ECU are planned for environment, climate, and ocean 
research. 
  In the FRG Research Ministry it is assumed that, within the 
framework of the Program for Industrial Technologies, the 
committee will also suggest means to promote the automobile 
industry. This, however, will probably provoke a controversy 
over European industrial policy, because, in contrast to France 
or Italy, for instance, the FRG rejects specific promotion of 
the automobile industry or other industrial branches for reasons 
of order policy. 
  Still, in the ministry it is not expected that the 
automobile 
industry will get nothing at all. The Research Ministry also 
expects differences of opinion regarding the item "International 
Cooperation" amounting to 540 million ECU. While the southern 
EU countries are striving for more intensive cooperation with 
Latin America, Krueger primarily thinks of cooperation with the 
countries in Central and Eastern Europe. 
  First tenders for project proposals are to be issued at the 
end of 1994 and the beginning of 1995. The projects are 
assessed anonymously. Even though Krueger will try to have all 
20 programs passed during the second half of 1994, when Germany 
will hold the EU presidency, it remains to be seen whether this 
will be possible. Thus, Krueger must set priorities to get as 
many programs as possible passed. Of particular importance is 
the smooth EU financing of projects in the field of information 
technology with German participation. The passing of the 
environmental program is considered to be politically important. 
The EU decisions also have an effect on the EU's Common 
Research Office. It operates eight institutes in four 
countries, including an institute in Karlsruhe. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20515 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   European Commission Technology Transfer Director Assesses </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    European Commission Technology Transfer Director Assesses </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Programs 

<F P=102>   BR1103110194 Brussels INNOVATION &amp; TECHNOLOGY TRANSFER in 
English Feb 94 p 5 </F>

<F P=103> BR1103110194 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels INNOVATION &amp; TECHNOLOGY TRANSFER </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed interview with European Commission DG XIII/D </F>
Director Dr. A.S. Strub: "Dissemination and Exploitation: A 
Greater Emphasis" -- first paragraph is INNOVATION &amp; 
TECHNOLOGY 
TRANSFER introduction] 
  [Text] Activity 3 of the Fourth Framework Programme is 
devoted to the diffusion and optimisation of results, and will 
further integrate all the EC's efforts in these areas under one 
programme. According to Dr. A.Strub, Director of DG XIII/D 
(Dissemination and Exploitation of RTD Results, Technology 
Transfer and Innovation), this will consolidate and enhance 
Europe's ability to convert its undoubted scientific prowess 
into internationally competitive products and services. 
  [INNOVATION &amp; TECHNOLOGY TRANSFER] Is this the first 
time 
that the dissemination and exploitation of research results has 
been given such priority? 
  [Strub] Yes, certainly. Dissemination and exploitation is 
now one of the four major headings of the Fourth Framework 
Programme, giving these themes a much higher profile. What we 
are seeing here is the continuation of a long-term trend. As 
each Framework Programme succeeds its predecessor, the role of 
dissemination and exploitation has become more prominent. On 
the other hand, the current situation is that the funds proposed 
under this heading of the Fourth Framework Programme are not as 
high as the European Commission originally proposed, or as the 
European Parliament wished. 
  Nevertheless, I expect that the dissemination and 
exploitation work which was begun under the Second Framework 
programme, and is now being developed and expanded under the 
Third, will make further strides forward under the Fourth. 
  [INNOVATION &amp; TECHNOLOGY TRANSFER] What, in your view, 
are 
the main features of Activity 3? 
  [Strub] From my point of view, one of the main features is 
the inclusion of work which up to now has been done under SPRINT 
[Strategic Program for Innovation and Technology Transfer]. 
Both SPRINT and VALUE [program for the dissemination and 
utilization of research results in science and technology] are 
run from within my Directorate, and both programmes operate in 
the technology transfer area. VALUE concentrates on promoting 
the dissemination and exploitation of the results of 
Community-funded research, whereas SPRINT has a brief which is 
much broader -- to contribute towards the creation of a better 
environment in Europe for innovation and technology transfer. 
  Up to now the administrative basis of the two programmes 
have 
been quite different, with VALUE within the framework programme 
system and SPRINT outside it. The two programmes have much in 
common and many shared interests, and the physical proximity of 
the two management teams means that coordination and cooperation 
between them is excellent. But having both under the same 
administrative `root' will further improve coherence between the 
two programmes and facilitate the undertaking of integrated 
joint projects. 
  By the way, this poses a nomenclature problem. Should we 
keep the names VALUE and SPRINT, which everyone knows, or should 
we find a new name to cover both activities and to demonstrate 
that they are merged? 
  Another point worth noting is that the network of 
organisations set up under the THERMIE [European Technologies 
for Energy Control] programme to promote energy technologies is 
also put under Activity 3. That adds even more opportunities 
for a shared approach. 
  [INNOVATION &amp; TECHNOLOGY TRANSFER] How will the 
financial 
environment for SME's [small and medium-sized enterprises] and 
European industry in general be improved to make taking up new 
technologies easier and more attractive? 
  [Strub] One of the objectives of Activity 3 is to improve 
the financial environment for the dissemination of technology. 
there will be two main strands to this. 
  One will target the interface between the financial world 
and 
innovative firms. The aim will be to improve communication 
across this interface, and facilitate investment in 
technological project. SPRINT has already done some work in this 
area -- the SPRINT Investment Fora, for example. 
  The other strand will involve pilot financial schemes 
specifically aimed at encouraging SMEs to make use of research 
results and new technological developments. The SPRINT 
Technology Performance Financing Scheme, which has been a 
forerunner in this area, will be continued. We still hope that 
-- notwithstanding the reluctance of some Member States -- the 
Commission will also be authorised to try out a new financial 
`instrument,' and that the funds finally made available to 
Activity 3 will allow it. This instrument is intended to 
improve the possibilities for financing the uptaking of 
technologies and RTD results by SMEs and will be adapted to the 
needs and practices of each Member State. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20516 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   3 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   France: French Participation in STRIDE Program Reviewed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    France: French Participation in STRIDE Program Reviewed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   BR1103134094 Paris ELECTRONIQUE INTERNATIONAL HEBDO in 
French 3 Mar 94 p 42 </F>

<F P=103> BR1103134094 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris ELECTRONIQUE INTERNATIONAL HEBDO </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Report signed RF: "240 Million French Francs To Wake </F>
Small- and Medium-Sized Companies Up to Innovation"] 
  [Text] Electronics is well-represented in the French 
projects involved in the European Community's STRIDE [Science 
and Technology for Regional Innovation and Development] program. 
This program aids in the promotion of technological innovation 
with small and medium-sized companies and industrial concerns in 
those regions of Europe that are "slow developers" or which have 
been affected by industrial decline. The Fourth STRIDE 
Conference recently held in Metz gave an overview of the 104 
French projects involved in STRIDE. Running since 1992, these 
projects, which should be completed in a few months' time, are 
worth a total of 240 million French francs. Aid awarded by the 
program goes mostly to bodies such as chambers of commerce or 
teaching establishments looking to develop awareness and 
training programs in technological innovation aimed at local 
industry. 
  Daniel Moers of ANVAR [National Agency for the 
Implementation 
of Research], one of the French program coordinators, said: "In 
France, STRIDE has already reached thousands of companies. 
Thanks to STRIDE, we are seeing an increasing number of small 
and medium- sized companies and industrial groups coming to 
ANVAR for aid for innovation." 
  With 26 projects, the Nord-Pas-de-Calais region is one of 
the 
main beneficiaries of STRIDE in France. Among the bodies in 
this region implementing STRIDE projects are the Nord 
Electronics and Microelectronics Institute and the Lille 
University of Science and Technology, which runs a number of 
awareness and training programs for small- and mid-sized 
companies in the field of "intelligent instrumentation." 
  Another major French beneficiary of STRIDE is the Lorraine 
reiogn, which has 19 projects. These include training programs 
in electronics, home automation, and production automation 
organized by the Metz-based center for the research and 
application of technology for the Lorraine crafts industry. 
  Other French regions have also started up STRIDE projects. 
In Saint-Etienne, for example, the ARUFOG (association for the 
research and use of optical fibers and guided optics) is 
encouraging small and mid-sized companies to start using 
innovative optical instrumentation and photonics technology for 
industrial control. The Dantec high school in Lannion is working 
with local companies to heighten their awareness of laser 
technologies and to encourage the use of lasers. At Dijon, the 
regional agency for technological development is working to 
spread the use of high-energy technologies to the small and 
medium-sized companies of Burgundy, while in Besancon the 
technical center for the clock and watchmaking industry is 
establishing an awareness program in the use of microelectronics. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20517 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Germany: Lower Saxony Minister Opposes Transrapid Train Route </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Germany: Lower Saxony Minister Opposes Transrapid Train Route </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   AU1103151194 Hamburg DIE WOCHE in German 10 Mar 94 p 9 </F>
<F P=103> AU1103151194 </F>
<F P=104>  Hamburg DIE WOCHE </F>
<F P=105>  German </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Lower Saxony's Transport Minister Peter </F>
Fischer by Guenter Heismann; place and date not given: "`There 
Will Be Problems'"] 
  [Text] [Heismann] The cabinet has decided to build the 
Transrapid magnetic levitation [railroad] system between Berlin 
and Hamburg. 
  [Fischer] It is a bad decision. The Transrapid may be a 
highly interesting piece of technology that can sell on 
international markets. This is why a pilot track has to be 
built. But I do not think that densely populated regions in 
Germany are suitable for this. This technology is meant to 
connect urban centers located far apart, with comparatively 
thinly populated areas between them. It is only in such regions 
that the fast magnetic levitation train can demonstrate its 
biggest advantage -- speed. 
  [Heismann] There were also plans for a pilot track between 
Hamburg and Hanover. 
  [Fischer] The former Lower Saxony government initiated a 
regional planning procedure in 1989 to determine the route, 
which failed. There was no administrative district, either 
Christian Democratic Union or Social Democratic Party 
controlled, that would have accepted the track. They all stood 
up in unison and asked: What would we get out of it? Nothing. 
The procedure was ended after a few weeks. 
  [Heismann] The people living near the track would have had 
only the noise, but no benefit, because the train only stops at 
the terminal points. 
  [Fischer] The Transrapid cannot be integrated into our 
country. It is a completely new system that we have to put on 
top of the existing transportation networks -- railroads and 
freeways. 
  [Heismann] The magnetic levitation train does not go into 
the city centers. 
  [Fischer] We examined this in Hanover in 1988. We would 
have had to tear down entire rows of houses. The track could 
not be built above the existing railroad track either. We would 
have had to dig a tunnel from the suburbs to the city center. 
  [Heismann] What would have been the cost for this? 
  [Fischer] The tunnel would have cost up to an additional 
billion German marks [DM]. The situation in Berlin and Hamburg 
will be similar. The DM5.6 billion in public funds could have 
been used much more sensibly; on the federal railroads for 
instance. The wheel-rail system still has a lot of potential. 
Just take the ICE high-speed train. This system gets into the 
city centers on the existing tracks. 
  [Heismann] You still consider the magnetic levitation train 
to be promising technology. But industry will need a 
functioning route to demonstrate the technology if it wants to 
sell the Transrapid. 
  [Fischer] We need a region that is suitable for this 
technology, like the Moscow-St. Petersburg route. These are two 
urban centers of some 10 million inhabitants each. There is a 
sufficient distance of over 600 kilometers between them, which 
means that the Transrapid could go at full speed for some time. 
  [Heismann] Who could pay for this? Russia does not have any 
money. 
  [Fischer] If industry is really interested in a 
demonstration track, it will have to invest. The cabinet's 
decision harms the idea of the Transrapid. There will be a 
revolt along the track. The Monday before last I talked to my 
colleague Peer Steinbrueck from Schleswig-Holstein. His 
government is against the project. And we will also vote against 
the Transrapid route between Berlin and Hamburg in the Bundesrat. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20518 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   17 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   German Government To Accelerate Transrapid Project </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    German Government To Accelerate Transrapid Project </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   BR0303152794 Bonn DIE WELT in German 17 Feb 94 p 13 </F>
<F P=103> BR0303152794 </F>
<F P=104>  Bonn DIE WELT </F>
<F P=105>  German </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Richard Schulz: "Bonn Intends To Speed Up </F>
Transrapid Construction -- Opportunities for Lodging Objections 
To Planning and Route Will Be Restricted"] 
  [Text] The planning and construction of the Transrapid line 
between Hamburg and Berlin will be speeded up by law. The 
cabinet in Bonn will discuss a Transport Ministry bill to this 
effect at the end of the current month. It follows in the wake 
of the transport route acceleration act, which is already in 
force and which restricts opportunities for those affected to 
lodge objections. 
  The bill provides that opposition proceedings against a 
planning decision or planning license will not delay the 
building of the magnetic levitation railway. To date, it has 
only been possible to build transport routes in western Germany 
after all the complaints, for example those lodged by people 
living close to the proposed route, have been heard. 
  Objections to the project or route lodged after the deadline 
will not be taken into consideration at all, whether they be 
justified or not. Substantial shortcomings in the weighing-up 
process or a failure to observe procedural or formal rules will 
only give rise to the revocation of the planning decisions "if 
they cannot be remedied by amending the plans or by recourse to 
a complementary procedure." 
  Authorities involved in the building of the Transrapid line 
will be obliged to work more quickly. They must file their 
comments with the Federal Railways Office within three months at 
the latest. The office will act as both planning and 
adjudicating authority. 
  Local authorities will lay the building plans open to public 
inspection within three weeks of receiving them. The 
adjudicating body musty conclude its deliberations within three 
months of the deadline for lodging objections. 
  As the bill has already been examined for compliance with 
legal formalities, and as the other federal ministers are in 
agreement, it is considered a foregone conclusion that the 
cabinet will pass the bill. There is no need for the Bundesrat 
to give its consent. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20519 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   EC Allows Extension of Special Measures for Industrial </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    EC Allows Extension of Special Measures for Industrial </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Research   in Eastern Germany 

<F P=102> BR0403160794 Bonn TECHNOLOGIE-NACHRICHTEN 
MANAGEMENT-INFORMATIONEN in German 14 Jan 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> BR0403160794 </F>
<F P=104>  Bonn TECHNOLOGIE-NACHRICHTEN 
MANAGEMENT-INFORMATIONEN </F>

<F P=105>  German </F>
BFN 

  [Text] The Commission of the European Union has just agreed 
to the extension of three special measures designed to promote 
industrial research in the new federal laender. These funding 
measures, which are specially tailored to the needs of small- 
and medium-sized enterprises [SMEs], were launched back in 1990 
and 1991 and have already achieved initial positive results in 
terms of the stabilization of industrial research in the new 
federal laender. The [word omitted in original] of industrial 
research in the new federal laender was primarily up to private 
industry, stressed Federal Research Minister Dr. Paul Krueger, 
although the radical changes that the new laender were currently 
undergoing necessitated a substantial commitment on the part of 
the state over a transitional period. The three special 
measures concerned consist in: 
  1. Funding for R&amp;D Staff Expansion 
  SME's receive subsidies equivalent to 50 percent of the 
salaries of scientists and engineers newly recruited to set up 
or expand their in-house R&amp;D capability. Since 1990, 932 
mainly 
small, innovative businesses have been funded to the tune of 45 
million German marks [DM], making it possible to secure 2,800 
industrial research jobs. 
  The deadline for applications for inclusion in this measure 
has been extended to 31 December 1995. 
  2. Contract Research East 
  Also since 1990, SME's have been receiving 50-percent 
subsidies when they award R&amp;D contracts to specialized 
R&amp;D 
contractors in Germany and abroad. This offer of funding has to 
date been taken up by 863 businesses for 1,273 R&amp;D contracts. 
Subsidies totaling DM110.4 million have thus set contracts for 
an overall value of DM225 million in motion. 
  3. Contract Research West-East 
  This measure supports research facilities and firms that 
obtain R&amp;D contracts from elsewhere, in particular from the 
original federal laender and eastern Europe, with 35- to 
40-percent subsidies. The rate of take-up is particularly 
brisk, and the trend is extremely satisfactory. The measure 
helps the research facilities in the new federal laender to 
adapt to market requirements. Since 1991, 485 facilities have 
taken advantage of this program to win a total of 1,024 R&amp;D 
contracts for an overall value of DM208 million, the BMFT 
[Federal Ministry of Research and Technology] share amounting to 
DM80.8 million. Between them, these two varieties of contract 
research contributed to the preservation of about 2,000 jobs in 
industry-oriented research in 1993. 
  The deadline for applications for inclusion under these two 
measures has been extended to 31 December 1994, after which 
firms may apply to the nationwide "Joint Research in the SME 
Economy" program, which has recently been relaunched by the BMFT 
and, if initial impressions are anything to go by, is really 
gathering momentum. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20520 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   29 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Netherlands: Strong Financial Support for Biotechnology </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Netherlands: Strong Financial Support for Biotechnology </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Research 

<F P=102>   BR2202140394 Rijswijk BIONIEUWS in Dutch 29 Jan 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> BR2202140394 </F>
<F P=104>  Rijswijk BIONIEUWS </F>
<F P=105>  Dutch </F>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Large Boost To Biotechnology </F>
Research"] 
  [Text] Three ministries and the NWO [Dutch Organization for 
Pure Scientific Research] are jointly donating 22 million 
guilders [G] to stimulate industrially relevant university 
biotechnology research. Biotechnology is also to receive 
another G45 million in subsidies from ICES [expansion not given] 
funding to improve the knowledge infrastructure. 
  After three years of negotiations, three ministries, six 
universities, NWO and NIABA [Netherlands Industrial and 
Agricultural Biotechnology Association] have agreed to set up 
and subsidize ABON [Association of Biotechnology Research 
Schools in the Netherlands]. During the NBC5 [Fifth Netherlands 
Biotechnology Congress], ABON will present an overview of 
current and future activities. 
  The association can count on strong government subsidies. 
The five research schools participating in ABON will receive 
subsidies of G22 million over five years: G10 million from the 
Economic Affairs Ministry, five million guilders from the 
Education and Science Ministry, five million guilders from the 
NWO and two million guilders from the Agriculture Ministry. The 
subsidies will be matched by the participating universities. 
The total amount of 44 million guilders will create around 65 
full-time research jobs in universities, in DLO [Agricultural 
Research Department] and TNO [Netherlands Organization for 
Applied Scientific Research]. 
  The investment plan follows the main lines of the project 
areas suggested by the NIABA, namely: "structure function 
relations," "research of plant resistance," "metabolic pathway 
engineering" and "integrated bioprocess development." 
  The four areas have been elaborated into a number of themes 
which are both scientifically challenging and interesting for 
the industry. Each area will have one or two research schools 
managing the projects. In turn, each school has appointed a 
professor to "lead" the projects. 
  In order to ensure that industry has input into the 
activities, ABON will have a "Scientific and Industrial Advisory 
Council" which will issue binding advice. 
<H5>  Cooperation </H5>
  The ABON unites five biotechnology research schools: 
  -- BioCentrum Amsterdam; 
  -- Biotechnological Sciences Delft Leiden (BSDL); 
  -- Experimentele Plantwetenschappen (EPW, of Wageningen); 
  -- Voeding, Levensmiddelen, Agrobiotechnologie en Gezondheid 
(VLAG, of Wageningen); 
  -- Groningen Biomolecular and Biotechnology Institute (GBB). 
  The BioCentrum Amsterdam will concentrate on fundamental and 
applied research. The connecting theme will be the growth and 
development of living organisms including yeast and bacteria. 
  The BSDL will deal with three areas: industrial plant 
biotechnology, environmental biotechnology and industrial 
biotechnology. 
  GBB will concentrate on the atomic structure and function of 
biomacromolecules. 
  EPW will gather knowledge on four themes: the development of 
plants and differentiation; disease and resistance to disease; 
metabolism and energy location in plants; plant biotechnology. 
  VLAG will cover the entire agricultural area and more 
specifically three core themes: nutrition and health; food 
technology and food; food resources and agro-biotechnology. 
<H5>  Knowledge Infrastructure </H5>
  In addition to the ABON, there is more good news for 
biotechnology. Last week the cabinet approved two major 
biotechnology projects to strengthen the knowledge 
infrastructure: biotechnological soil purification will get G25 
million, while biotechnology's material infrastructure can 
expect G20 million. 
<H5>  Soil Purification </H5>
  Universities (including Groningen), large technological 
institutes, engineering consultants and companies will 
participate in the first project covering biotechnological soil 
purification. TNO, Grondmechanica Delft and Heidemij have 
developed a program for cleaning up polluted business land on 
site, called NOBIS [Netherlands research program for 
biotechnological on-site cleaning]. The goal is to develop the 
biotechnological clean-up of polluted soil using micro-organisms 
to break down the pollution. 
<H5>  Material Infrastructure </H5>
  The second biotechnology project in ICES is called MIBITON. 
The cabinet wants it to strengthen the material infrastructure 
of biotechnology research in the Netherlands. MIBITON is a 
positive reaction by the cabinet to a proposal from ABON and 
NIABA. These two bodies have drawn up a joint investment 
program for the coming five years which includes a one-time 
boost from the government, the G20 million mentioned above. 
This amount will be supplemented with industrial resources 
worth around G12.5 million in the form of the revolving fund for 
industrial investments. In order to effectively monitor these 
investments, NIABA and ABON will set up the PPSB foundation 
[public-private biotechnology cooperation] in close consultation 
with the government. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20521 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 December 1993 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Germany: Social Democratic Party Proposes R&amp;D Priorities </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>     Germany: Social Democratic Party Proposes R&amp;D Priorities </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
for 
   1994 

<F P=102> BR2402114194 Bonn TECHNOLOGIE-NACHRICHTEN 
MANAGEMENT-INFORMATIONEN in German 27 Dec 93 pp 2-3 </F>

<F P=103> BR2402114194 </F>
<F P=104>  Bonn TECHNOLOGIE-NACHRICHTEN 
MANAGEMENT-INFORMATIONEN </F>

<F P=105>  German </F>
BFN 

  [Text] The SPD [German Social Democratic Party] 
parliamentary group presented its research and technology plan 
for the 1994 government program to the public on 10 December. 
Its research spokesman Josef Vosen described the three most 
important political measures of the coming years as follows: 
  -- The government and industry must provide more funds again 
for research and technology; 
  -- All the legal and administrative obstacles in the Federal 
Republic of Germany must be removed in order to facilitate 
innovation, and 
  -- A broad, consensus-oriented dialog among industry, 
scientific organizations, unions and government must be promoted 
concerning the future trend of technological developments and 
the specific measures to be taken. 
  "We must also put research and technology to the service of 
ecological renewal," emphasized Vosen. The SPD intends to 
target the following areas: 
<H5>  Ecological Renewal </H5>
  This should extend to research for new environment 
technologies, energy saving and renewable energies, for reactor 
safety, and the safe handling of radioactive wastes. Research 
into improving the safety of nuclear technology must be 
safeguarded and continued. 
  The main objective must be to achieve a general reduction in 
emissions and a kind of recycle economy. Ecological renewal 
will also strengthen competitiveness considerably and act as a 
precautionary measure. 
<H5>  Improving Competitiveness </H5>
  The SPD intends to improve the competitiveness of German 
industry and of medium-sized firms in particular, by targeting 
funds on key technologies of the 21st century, such as 
information and communications technology, production 
engineering and manufacturing, transportation (water, ground, 
air, space), biotechnology and genetic engineering, materials 
research including superconductors, and laser technology. 
  They expect a major commitment from industry in this 
respect. 
<H5>  New Methods </H5>
  A dialog on technology policy should be developed, in which 
important representatives from industry, scientific 
organizations, unions, and other social groups make proposals to 
parliament as to the common steps that must lead to the future. 
  Technology transfer from basic research to the application 
stage will be improved by new methods. 
  Moreover, tax procedures related to research promotion will 
be introduced. 
  The research capacities in the new German laender will 
rapidly be brought in line with those which are customary in the 
old laender. 
  A structure committee will be engaged to prepare a report on 
the current tasks, organization, and funding of major research 
establishments. 
<H5>  Strengthening Preventive Measures </H5>
  The SPD intends to resume research into ways of making 
working life more humane. The opportunities opened up by 
biotechnology and genetic engineering for new drugs and 
high-yield useful plants will be utilized by increased funding. 
The risks of biotechnology and genetic engineering will be 
monitored carefully. 
  In the field of preventive health, the SPD intends to try to 
reduce the risks presented by Aids, rheumatism, cancer, and 
heart and circulatory diseases by taking new research 
initiatives. 
<H5>  Safeguarding the Advance of Knowledge </H5>
  The scope and funds for basic research will be safeguarded, 
and the evaluation of the consequences of technology will be 
extended. 
<H5>  Filling in the Funding Gaps </H5>
  The SPD intends to make good the substantial deficit in the 
research budget that has been incurred in recent years by 
providing DM1 billion for all these measures. It also aims to 
provide better funding in the Fourth European Framework Program 
for Research and Technological Development. 
  Details about the research and technology plan of the SPD 
parliamentary group together with documentation on R&amp;T 
initiatives (1991-1993) of the SPD can be obtained from the 
service department of the SPD parliamentary group, Bundeshaus 
53113 Bonn, Tel. 0228/167133, fax 0228/1686800. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20522 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 December 1993 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Germany: Biotech Jurisdiction To Be Reorganized </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Germany: Biotech Jurisdiction To Be Reorganized </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   BR2402114794 Bonn TECHNOLOGIE-NACHRICHTEN 
MANAGEMENT-INFORMATIONEN in German 27 Dec 93 pp 5-6 </F>

<F P=103> BR2402114794 </F>
<F P=104>  Bonn TECHNOLOGIE-NACHRICHTEN 
MANAGEMENT-INFORMATIONEN </F>

<F P=105>  German </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] The federal government will continue to support 
biotechnology and genetic engineering in North Rhine Westphalia. 
Consequently, official responsibility for these areas, 
previously fragmented, will be concentrated and made more 
efficient. In the future, genetic engineering facilities in 
North Rhine Westphalia will be approved solely by the North 
Rhine Westphalian Office for Environmental Protection in Essen. 
This office reports directly to the Federal Ministry for the 
Environment. 
  Matthiesen expressly called for a more objective discussion 
about the application of biotechnology and genetic engineering. 
The minister cited the applications in which the federal 
government considers there are great opportunities for 
biotechnology and genetic engineering. Research and application 
should be welcomed: 
  -- In areas where plant protection agents are exploited, 
hence reducing the pollution of waters by increasing [plant] 
resistance; 
  -- If vaccines can be produced to facilitate the control of 
epidemics and reduce the costs; 
  -- If the slaughter of animals, for example in connection 
with animal tests, can be greatly reduced, or replaced 
altogether; 
  -- If feed additives for useful animals are produced on a 
large scale, making it possible to increase the value of the 
feed by natural methods and hence reducing substantially the 
volume and nitrogen content of liquid manure; 
  -- If biological, "gentle chemistry" is carried out, 
enabling 
substantial energy savings to be made and thus reducing 
emissions and the production of wastes; 
  -- If genetic and biological engineering processes are used 
to identify environmental poisons (bioindicators), or to remove 
them in a controlled manner by specific degradation processes. 
  "I am against any application where animals are deformed to 
become yield machines by intervention in their genetic make-up. 
We should also reject applications where genetically-engineered 
growth and production promoters turn a dairy cow into a 
`turbocow'," declared Matthiesen. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20523 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   France: No Privatization for Aerospatiale Until 1995 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    France: No Privatization for Aerospatiale Until 1995 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   BR0103134294 Paris LE QUOTIDIEN DE PARIS in French 1 Mar 94 
p 9 </F>

<F P=103> BR0103134294 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE QUOTIDIEN DE PARIS </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Prime Minister Edouard Balladur confirmed in 
Toulouse yesterday that "there currently are no privatization 
plans for Aerospatiale." 
  Talking to the deputies of the Midi-Pyrenees region within 
the framework of the nationwide debate on reorganizing national 
and regional authority, which should result in a proposal in the 
spring on a reorganization strategy, Mr. Balladur stressed that 
it was important "in the future for Aerospatiale to be able to 
enter into alliances essential to its development," adding that 
"the government will examine this issue in due time." 
  In addition, the prime minister explained that the 2 
February 
decision by the government to increase Aerospatiale's capital by 
2 billion French francs was indicative of "its willingness" to 
support this sector even under "difficult budgetary conditions." 
Aerospatiale features on the list of public companies which the 
government plans to privatize. However, several members of the 
government have repeatedly said that Aerospatiale's 
privatization is not planned before 1995. 
  President Francois Mitterrand himself opposes this 
privatization on national interest grounds. Mr. Balladur 
remarked that "he did not see any need to keep bringing up this 
issue, which is not on the agenda right now and not for some 
more years to come." 
  Speaking in more general terms, he assured that the 
government is "very alert" to difficulties encountered by 
[defense] companies and that he "vigorously supports corporate 
reconversion processes, closely scrutinizes corporate social 
plans, and strengthens national companies whenever possible." 
Moreover, with regard to the more equal geographic distribution 
of public research in France, the prime minister explained that 
"it is not a matter of finding new research facilities in the 
provinces," but "rather of defining the conditions that would 
allow scientists from these regions to successfully take part in 
international competition." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20524 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   EU S&amp;T Research Committee Backs East-West Joint Research </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    EU S&amp;T Research Committee Backs East-West Joint Research </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   BR0203092194 Brussels EUROTECH FORUM JOURNAL in English Feb 
94 pp 3-4 </F>

<F P=103> BR0203092194 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels EUROTECH FORUM JOURNAL </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "COST Meeting"] </F>
  [Text] A meeting of the senior officials of the Committee 
on Scientific and Technical Research (COST) took place in 
Brussels on 20-21 January. The meeting was chaired by Mr. N. 
Roulet. 
  There was agreement on COST's policy on possible 
enlargement. 
Almost as a precursor to this, the Committee decided on 
participation from non-COST countries in its 78 ongoing actions 
from: 
  -- the Cluj-Napoca Technical Research University of Rumania 
and the Radio Research University of Rumania and the Radio 
Research and Devlopment Institute from Moscow in Action 235 
(Radio propogation effects on next-generation fixed-service 
terrestrial communication systems); 
  -- the University of Melbourne in Action 240 (Techniques for 
modelling and measuring advanced photonic telecommunication 
components); 
  -- the Institute of Terrestrial Magnetism of Izmiran 
(Russia) 
in Action 238 (Prediction and Retrospective Ionospheric 
Modelling over Europe (PRIME). 
  The Committee also had an extensive exchange of views on the 
different sectors in which COST is particularly active. These 
included materials science, biotechnology, transport and 
telecommunications. It was also decided to establish two 
working parties on procedures and the ways of improving the 
methods of this cooperation system. These will report to the 
next meeting of the Committee. One working party will examine 
the suggestions for improving the procedures, while the other 
will review the actual role of the Senior Officials Committee. 
  Eight new actions were decided upon, including: 
  -- continuous speech recognition over the telephone (COST 
Action 250); 
  -- management and information application development (COST 
Action C4). 
  On the central issue of the meeting, enlargement, the Senior 
Officials decided that: 
  -- COST should retain its identity as a dynamic mechanism 
for 
enhancing scientific and technical collaboration across Europe; 
  -- COST will continue its policy of openness along the lines 
of the Ministerial Resolution of the Vienna Conference; 
  -- Each request for participation as a full member will be 
examined on a case-by-case basis, taking into account the 
manageability of the COST system; 
  -- Such requests will be considered on the basis of mutual 
benefit and institutes of research of the countries concerned 
should be encouraged to participate in individual actions. The 
participation in individual COST actions will be the appropriate 
way to evaluate scientific interest and mutual benefit before a 
decision on the entry of a new member; 
  -- A COST Ministerial conference in 1996 could be a 
framework 
to confirm possible decisions of the COST Senior Officials 
Committee concerning the enlargement of COST. If that is the 
case, the countries concerned should be invited to participate 
as observers at COST after the decision of the COST Senior 
Officials Committee; 
  -- Cost will continue to inform non-COST countries about its 
activities. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20525 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   EC Auditors Review ESPRIT Research Program </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    EC Auditors Review ESPRIT Research Program </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   BR0203094894 Brussels EUROTECH FORUM JOURNAL in English Feb 
94 pp 1-3 </F>

<F P=103> BR0203094894 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels EUROTECH FORUM JOURNAL </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "ESPRIT: The Final Judgement"] </F>
  [Text] The EC Court of Auditors' special report no 6/93 is 
to be welcomed as a timely assessment of the European Union's 
information technology research programme, ESPRIT. A searching 
audit of the programme by the EU's hard-nosed financial 
watchdog, coming towards the end of the ESPRIT's current 
life-cycle, is a positive move which might have usefully been 
carried out in the programme's earlier days. 
  The views of this lesser-known EU institution, charged with 
the job of ensuring accountability, must be implemented as the 
new information technology programme unfolds under the Fourth 
Framework programme. 
  Yet there is not all that much new in what the Court of 
Auditors had to say. Most of the sharp-edged and incisive 
points they make about ESPRIT have been made many times before 
-- some almost from the programme's inception. Many of these 
points have been reiterated over and over in this very editorial 
column. 
  The Court of Auditors' Report is like the summing-up of a 
judge at the end of a lengthy trial, a summing up that takes 
account of evidence and opinions garnered over many years. 
  One issue that stands out is that of precompetitive 
research. 
The ESPRIT programme early on developed an ideological 
attachment to this, which suggested that the exploitation of 
research results would be an act of dangerous intervention. 
That this issue still has to be questioned after all this time 
is hard to believe. 
  However, it has to be acknowledged that progress has been 
made. The transfer from DG XIII to DG III ended ESPRIT's 
experience of existing in an isolated empire, opening the 
programme up to broader economic, industrial and other 
considerations. 
  With the approach of the Fourth Framework, it is to be hoped 
that the summing-up of the eminent judges in Luxembourg will 
prove final and that the programme under its new name can start 
a new life without making the same mistakes over again! 
<H5>  Single Market Strategy </H5>
  As mentioned in the last issue of the Eurotech Forum, the EC 
Commission has devised an elaborate framework to consolidate and 
to regulate the Single Market. This is known as "Making the 
Most of the Internal Market": Strategic Programme. 
  According to the Commission, it decided "to prepare a 
strategic programme for the completion, the management and the 
future development of the internal market, which can serve as a 
guide to the main priorities of the Community in this area and 
as a means of measuring the progress of the Community towards 
its objectives." 
  They also add that "an overall plan for the implementation" 
of the internal market is desirable. The Commission wants to 
see this come about by an endorsement from the Council of the 
general orientation provided in the strategic programme and by a 
firm undertaking by the Council to accelerate discussion on the 
seventeen legislative proposals from the 1985 White Paper that 
are still before it, with a view to their final adoption before 
the end of 1994. 
  The strategic programme is divided into specific categories. 
Section A, which is the completion of the basic legal framework 
calls for the adoption of the legislative proposals that still 
have to be agreed so that the basic legal infrastructure for the 
single market can be established and which will serve to expose 
regulated sectors to competition. 
  This includes the adoption of the outstanding measures from 
the 1985 White Paper, in the areas of company law, taxation and 
intellectual and industrial property. Action to ensure the free 
movement of persons as well as measures to introduce competition 
into the regulated sectors of energy, telecommunications and 
postal services are envisaged. 
  Section B deals with managing the single market. This aspect 
of the strategy is about the need to ensure conformity and 
transparency in the transposition of Community directives into 
national law and the need to ensure quality in enforcement. 
Measures will be introduced to support administrative 
cooperation, including proposals on the development of a 
communication and data exchange network for Union administration. 
  Means of redress, such as providing access to justice and 
judicial cooperation, will be developed, as will the importance 
of evaluating Community rules. The "practical performance of 
the legislation" and "the broader business and economic impact" 
will be assessed. In this context, existing networks will be 
used. 
  A major study on the economic effects of the internal market 
will get underway in 1994 with likely publication in 1996. 
Improvements to the INTRASTAT system are also envisaged. 
  Section C is about developing the single market. This will 
take steps to ensure transparency and the application of the 
principle of proportionality in preparing new Community 
legislation. Regarding communication and information measures, 
the Commission will devise "a coherent strategy involving 
Community institutions, national administrations and 
non-governmental organisations in a systematic and coordinated 
way." 
  Moves to improve the business environment will deal with the 
application of competition policy, improving cross-border 
payments, further proposals on transport, promotion of 
Union-wide protection of intellectual and industrial property, 
improving company law, the creation of a favourable tax regime 
for business, covering action on both direct and indirect 
taxation, the upgrading of European standardization and 
conformity assessment and quality systems. 
  Further improving the environment for the consumer and the 
relationship between sustainable development and the internal 
market as also included, as is the establishment of 
trans-European networks. The strategic programme points to the 
convergence of interests and coordination and action designed to 
stimulate private investment and to ensure technical 
interoperability, and proposals on the "early development of 
telematic networks between administrations." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20526 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   EC Auditors Review ESPRIT Research Program </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    EC Auditors Review ESPRIT Research Program </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   BR0203095194 </F>
<F P=103> BR0203095194 </F>
<F P=104></F>



<TEXT>
BFN 

    [Text] Section D seeks to promote a dynamic and open 
external policy. Under this heading are issues like the 
management of the Union's external frontier and the completion 
of the common commercial policy in the context of the internal 
market. 
  Section E points to an ongoing process of evaluation of the 
strategic programme. The annual report on the internal market 
is considered as the principal mechanism for this. 
<H5>  Standards Upgraded by Strategic Programme </H5>
  The strategic programme points to standards as being a key 
component in Europe's unified market, vitally important for the 
implementation of policy in a wide range of areas. 
  "European standardization and conformity assessment 
instruments are an invaluable tool in the implementation of 
other policies, including environment, energy, food quality, 
safety at the workplace, and trans-European networks." 
  The Commission, so as to exploit the potential contribution 
of European standardization to the effective functioning of the 
internal market, proposes: 
  -- to undertake a review of the way in which European 
standardization could be financed over the medium term. This 
will aim to identify ways in which the resources invested by 
member states, the Community and the private sector in national 
and European standardization can be best harnessed for the 
purposes of developing a standardization system which meets the 
requirements of European integration. 
  -- increasing transparency to ensure, for example, that a 
wide- ranging public enquiry takes place on the technical merit 
of proposals for European standards. The development of 
mutually agreed work programmes is another aspect of the overall 
approach. 
  -- standards and research as they ensure the effectiveness 
of 
European telecommunications. Moreover, the Commission is 
beginning to work on the formulation of a Union quality policy 
which is due to be finalised by the end of 1994. 
<H5>  JRC Future Role Mapped Out </H5>
  The Council adopted on 14 January the conclusions on the 
role 
of the Joint Research Centre (JRC). 
  This reaffirms the need for the JRC to strengthen its 
competitive nature on the basis of a genuine customer/contractor 
relationship. Contributing to a Community research policy, 
especially in sectors where it has special, if not unique, 
skills and in areas where its neutrality is needed for 
scientific and technical support for Community policies, is 
recognised as important for the JRC. 
  The Council points to the need to support new ways forward 
for the JRC, saying that it should "progressively enter the 
competitive arena, generally in networks with other 
laboratories, in specific programmes under the framework 
programmes to which it can contribute, and for activities 
providing scientific and technical support for Community 
policies of a kind suitable for that competitive approach. It 
emphasizes that funding decisions under the framework research 
programmes (1994-1998) should reflect that objective." 
  It was agreed that the proportion of JRC activities in the 
framework programmes to be carried out in the competitive system 
should average 24 percent for the EC framework programme and 10 
percent for the EAEC [European Atomic Energy Community] 
framework programme for the period from 1995 to 1998. 
  The Council also agreed on a set of guidelines for defining 
the JRC's activities, especially regarding its contribution to 
the framework research programmes (1994-1998). 
  It also wants the Commission to submit a progress report on 
the implementation of these conclusions to the European 
Parliament and the Council in 1996, involving an opinion from 
the Board of Governors, allowing the Council to make an 
assessment. 
  The Council also asserts that "the JRC should be a driving 
force in improving links between research laboratories and 
institutes in all the Community's regions." 
  The guidelines set out the terms and conditions under which 
the JRC will operate up to 1998. 
  Regarding institutional activities, these will be entirely 
funded from the framework programmes. The JRC will also be 
involved in institutional RTD [research and technological 
development] activities "which contribute to the implementation 
of the Union's research policy." This also implies scientific 
and technical support in which the Directorates-General will use 
the JRC as a service provider. 
  The Council permits JRC establishments to form networks with 
research institutes in any of the member states. They also make 
provision for the JRC to engage in competitive activities 
outside the framework programmes on behalf of third parties, 
including work in the context of member states' RTD programmes. 
The JRC will also be able to participate in other Community 
activity such as PHARE [Poland-Hungary Actions for Economic 
Reconversion], etc. 
  Regarding budgetary provisions, the JRC will charge 
100% of 
its costs for its involvement in competitive support activities 
in the framework programmes. Within the framework programmes 
(1994-1998), the JRC will be provided with an operational budget 
of an overall amount of 875 million ECUs (300 million ECUs for 
nuclear activities and 575 million ECUs for non-nuclear 
activities), which will cover the total funding of its 
institutional activities and, in the case of competitive 
activities, the costs not covered by shared-cost contracts. 
  Within the Framework programmes will be two operational 
programmes for the JRC, one for nuclear and the other for non- 
nuclear activities. Competitive work will begin on 1 January 
1995 and proceed in line with the framework programmes 
(1994-1998). 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20527 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   EC Auditors Review ESPRIT Research Program </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    EC Auditors Review ESPRIT Research Program </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   BR0203095294 </F>
<F P=103> BR0203095294 </F>
<F P=104></F>



<TEXT>
BFN 

    [Text] 
<H5>  Auditors Report Critical of ESPRIT </H5>
  The EC Court of Auditors has issued a report, highly 
critical 
of the European Union's information technology programme, 
ESPRIT. The Luxembourg-based institution believes that the EU's 
flagship research programme has problems with its managerial 
approach, could be more innovative technologically and is too 
closely wedded to the concept of pre-competitive research. The 
report also points to a lack of speed and an insensitivity to 
the needs of small- and medium-sized enterprises (SMEs). 
  Whilst recognising the contribution that ESPRIT has made to 
the information technology industry in Europe, it feels that 
some of the programme's internal procedures are inadequate and 
that this must be highlighted. 
  The auditors' report is critical of the failure to fully 
exploit ESPRIT's results, pointing out that this is what, in 
essence, funds the programme. Attempts to redress this 
fundamental flaw in ESPRIT III, by means of "targeted projects," 
do not go far enough, the report claims. 
  The EU's financial watchdogs are concerned about the lack of 
continuity between the pre-competitive research level and the 
point at which results are used. The Court points out that the 
Commission is willing to devote significant resources to 
market-led activities such as technology transfer, etc, when 
they are clearly separate from research, but are unwilling to do 
the same when it is a matter of extending a research activity to 
a competitive level. The Court of Auditors firmly believes that 
the pre-competitive issue has to be looked at to prevent it from 
undermining the EU's research efforts. 
  The auditors also believe that further thought must be given 
to the relationship between other aspects of policy, such as 
competition and industrial policy and research, as well as 
consideration of worldwide developments and the strategies of 
Europe's industrial rivals. 
  Moreover, it is felt that SMEs should be better facilitated 
within the ESPRIT programme. Procedures for contractors are 
considered to be too slow and complex. Payment periods are also 
said to be too slow. It is suggested too that the Commission 
should look more closely at the selection of coordinators for 
leading research consortia. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20528 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   29 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   European Molecular Biology Laboratory in Trouble </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    European Molecular Biology Laboratory in Trouble </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   BR0303104294 Rijswijk BIONIEUWS in Dutch 29 Jan 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> BR0303104294 </F>
<F P=104>  Rijswijk BIONIEUWS </F>
<F P=105>  Dutch </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Hayo Canter Cremers: "EMBL Finds Itself in </F>
Turbulent Waters"] 
  [Text] The EMBL [European Molecular Biology Laboratory] is 
facing difficult times. Indeed, it looks as if Spain, like 
Italy, is going to leave the EMBL. Netherlands representatives 
within the European Molecular Biology Organization [EMBO] fear 
that this domino effect will affect basic research, because even 
the German, French, and British are complaining. 
  Unlike in the Netherlands, in most countries the 
contribution 
to the EMBL is drawn from the local research budget. Together, 
these contributions constitute an annual budget of approximately 
70 million guilders. However, since the pressure from the 
current economic recession in Europe causes compulsive 
economizing, many countries want to see a greater return on 
their considerable investments. 
  The funds are managed by the European Molecular Biology 
Conference [EMBC] and the EMBL Council, which comprises 
representatives from the various countries involved. The 
representatives for the Netherlands are Professor Dr. Peter van 
der Vliet (Physiological Chemistry, Utrecht University) and 
Marga Vintges M.Sc. (Science Policy, Education and Science 
Ministry). 
  Van der Vliet is not enthusiastic about the increasing 
hesitation on the part of the various member states. "I find 
their attitude rather short-sighted. In most countries, the 
emphasis is shifting to short-term, application-oriented 
research, but important new results are achieved on the basis of 
long-term, basic research, such as that carried out at the EMBL. 
Normally, the best researchers are needed for basic research, 
and they cannot be selected on the basis of political decisions. 
<H5>  No Money Available </H5>
  The EMBL has been dogged by financial shortages for some 
time 
now. Frustration at the limited budget available for new 
projects was the reason why in April of last year, Swedish 
Professor Dr. Lennart Philipson, the man behind the eminence of 
the EMBL, unexpectedly resigned. At his instigation, the 
Council regularly agreed to take on new projects, but a number 
of countries refused to make enough money available to carry 
them out. Consequently, the projects had to be cancelled. 
  Philipson's successor, Greek Professor Dr. Fotis Kafatos, is 
expected to be more successful, notably because he has better 
contacts with the European Union [EU] officials who have a great 
deal of money to distribute. 
  The attractiveness of the EMBO, the governing organization, 
is also under threat, for it is facing growing competition from 
similar programs initiated by the EU and by individual European 
countries. In many cases, these programs offer more favorable 
conditions. For instance, unlike the EMBO, the European Union 
offers allowances for chemicals, and higher salaries. 
<H5>  Quality Is the Watchword </H5>
  The EMBO was set up in 1969, when one of its primary 
objectives was to become the face of basic research on molecular 
biology in Europe. It was also supposed to counterbalance U.S. 
organizations in the same area. 
  Primarily thanks to political and diplomatic support from 
Switzerland, the organization quickly received contributions 
from many countries, including the Netherlands. 
  Quality is the watchword for all activities undertaken at 
the 
EMBO. With its 32.2 citations per publication, the EMBL in 
Heidelberg ranks among the top five laboratories scoring the 
highest impact figures in the world. The "EMBO JOURNAL" is one 
of the most influential scientific journals. Its impact figure 
of 12.4 means that of all journals in the molecular biology 
sector it must bow only to CELL (which has an impact figure of 
30.2). In addition, EMBO scholarships are recognized as a mark 
of quality. Hence its researchers are welcomed with open arms 
in most laboratories. 
  Furthermore, the research groups which are allied to the 
organization, but accommodated in the European Synchotron 
Radiation Facility in Grenoble and the Hamburg Synchotron 
Laboratory, enjoy international recognition. The many small 
workshops and laboratory courses that are organized thanks to 
the financial support of the EMBO, satisfy a great need, and 
contribute greatly to the good contacts maintained between 
European researchers. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20529 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   19 February 1993 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE ALLIANCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   France: Northern Telecom, Matra Alliance Developments </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    France: Northern Telecom, Matra Alliance Developments </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   93P60168 Paris 01 Informatique in French 19 Feb 93 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> 93P60168 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris 01 Informatique </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Text] The strategic alliance between Northern Telecom and 
Matra Group resulted in new developments concerning the Canadian 
company's Meridian autoswitches and Matra's Matracom 6500s. 
Envisaged among the joint developments will be the combining of 
PABX (private automatic branch exchange) wireless operations and 
Matra PABX systems in September, and adopting the QSIG (quality 
standard inspection g?) interoperability standard for PABX 
systems in early 1994. Differences in ATM strategies will stay 
unchanged: Matra is interested in private networks, Northern 
Telecom in public ATM networks. However, a common association 
will be created for exploiting WAN (wide area network) 
communications. For the "private" ATMs, Matra is relying on a 
U.S.-produced component, based on a switch that is still under 
development. This equipment should connect the Ethernet networks 
and the ATM-card-equipped PABX 6500s by way of a 34-MBPS ATM 
link. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20530 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   17 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE ALLIANCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   U.S.-Italian Cooperation in Building HT Superconducting </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    U.S.-Italian Cooperation in Building HT Superconducting </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Cables 

<F P=102>   94WS0213A Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER ZEITUNG/BLICK DURCH DIE 
WIRTSCHAFT in German 17 Jan 94 p 10 </F>

<F P=103> 94WS0213A </F>
<F P=104>  Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER ZEITUNG/BLICK DURCH DIE 
WIRTSCHAFT </F>

<F P=105>  German </F>
CSO 

  [TEXT] An initial test cable should be ready for use in one 
year--Large-scaled use not for 50 years. 
  After about five years in development, the North American 
company American Superconductor in Westborough, Massachusetts, 
has introduced the prototype of a superconducting high-current 
cable made of high-temperature superconductors (HTSC) and 
measuring one meter [in length]. An initial test cable with a 
total length of about 30 meters should be completed in about one 
year in cooperation with the Italian company Pirelli Cable in 
Milan. 
  This cable will then be able to be used for the first time 
in 
practical tests in power supply companies. It is hoped that in 
two years a one hundred meter long cable will be completed, 
which could then be put into trial operation. The cable 
corresponds approximately to the requirements for smaller power 
supply grids in terms of currents to be carried and the 
resultant magnetic field intensity. 
  The developer reports that a direct current of 2,300 amps 
per 
fiber can be transmitted, which is approximately double the 
value of comparable HT superconductors from other developers. 
The magnetic fields in the order of 0.2 tesla resulting at these 
current intensities are sustained without the superconductor 
breaking at operating temperatures of 77 kelvin. 
  The cable now being introduced consists of oxides of 
bismuth, 
strontium, calcium and copper, which are filled in power form in 
tubes made of silver and then subjected to the required heat and 
acid treatment. Finally the tubes are drawn out to fine 
filaments with a diameter of 200 micrometers using a drawing 
process developed [by the producer]. 
  The test cable is then weaved together by hand from hundreds 
of the fine fibers. The North American superconductor company 
has so far been able to produce a filament of this type with a 
total length of nearly 1,000 meters. 
  In this collaboration, the Italian cable producer took on 
the 
task of putting together the cable with the electric and thermal 
isolation. The cable is to have a hollow space at its center 
through which the liquid nitrogen used for cooling will be 
pumped. 
  Pirelli also intends to develop with an Italian engineering 
company a new machine which can weave the fine filaments 
together automatically. 
  Energy experts estimate that power supply companies will be 
able to install the first shorter lengths of direct current 
cable in ten years at the earliest; however, the behavior of the 
cable will have to be closely monitored for some years before it 
can live up to all the technical and safety requirements. 
  [Experts] are also of the view that it will not be for about 
50 years at the earliest that we can think of replacing the 
high- voltage operated alternating current transmission supply 
lines with superconducting direct current cable, according to 
the American Superconductor Corporation (Westborough, 
Massachusetts 01581, USA). 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20531 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpest008___94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   19 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE ALLIANCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Germany: Bonn Leads Research in High-Efficiency Diode </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Germany: Bonn Leads Research in High-Efficiency Diode </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Lasers 

<F P=102>   94WS0213B Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER ZEITUNG/BLICK DURCH DIE 
WIRTSCHAFT in German 19 Jan 94 p 8 </F>

<F P=103> 94WS0213B </F>
<F P=104>  Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER ZEITUNG/BLICK DURCH DIE 
WIRTSCHAFT </F>

<F P=105>  German </F>
CSO 

  [TEXT] Hopes for a major advance in technology and 
development--America's lead to be overtaken. 
  Thirty-four years after the discovery of the first laser, 
another generational shift in high-efficiency lasers is again 
approaching with the transition from tube technology to 
semi-conductor technology, or from gas laser to diode laser. In 
the areas of entertainment electronics and communications and 
information technology, the replacement of tube technology with 
semiconductor technology has already made possible and produced 
revolutionary developments. 
  It is expected that a similar major advance in technology 
and 
development in [the area of] high-efficiency lasers will 
fundamentally shape future laser equipment technology and open 
up new fields of application. The German government intends to 
support this development with the joint Laser 2000 program, 
which Federal Minister of Research and Technology Paul Krueger 
has now introduced in Bonn. 
  Preparing the generational shift in technology with 
high-efficiency lasers is the object and goal of the pilot 
project, already started at the beginning of the year, on 
high-efficiency diode lasers and diode-pumped solid-state 
lasers. It has to do with developing a small, compact, 
high-efficiency, low- maintenance laser. It is expected that 
such an generation of lasers will open up broad markets. 
Materials processing in particular is being considered in this 
context, as well as using laser technology for television. 
  Substantial work was already done on the high-efficiency 
diode laser in the second half of the 1980's in America under 
the strictest secrecy in the Lawrence Livermore National 
Laboratory within the framework of the former SDI program. One 
important field of application which stands in the forefront is 
automobile manufacturing. The German government is hoping that 
with the current Laser 2000 program the present lead by the 
United States will be overtaken. So the project will be oriented 
toward the needs of industry. A project advisory council was 
formed representing Siemens, Janoptik, Rofin-Sinar, Haas Laser, 
Adlas and Baasel [as written] Lasertechnik. The pilot project is 
currently made up of three joint projects in industry and four 
joint research [projects]. 
  Parallel to this, the four joint research projects will deal 
with basic research themes such as the preliminary research in 
securing technical scientific alternatives--for example, new 
technologies for high-efficiency diode lasers and new 
ytterbium-base solid-state lasers. 
  The work of the four joint research projects is being 
financed with about 30 million German marks through the Federal 
Ministry of Research and Technology. For the three joint 
industry projects, financing in the amount of 35 million German 
marks is being projected, to which the Federal Ministry of 
Research will contribute around 19 million German marks. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20532 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE ALLIANCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   France: Alcatel Alsthom To Buy 17 Percent of Framatome </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    France: Alcatel Alsthom To Buy 17 Percent of Framatome </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94WS0233C Paris LE MONDE in French 15 Feb 94 p 19 </F>
<F P=103> 94WS0233C </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE MONDE </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "Alcatel Alsthom Expected To Acquire 17 Percent of </F>
Framatome"] 
  [Text] Framatome's revamped capital structure is beginning 
to take shape. In an interview published Monday 14 February by 
LES ECHOS, Phillippe Rouvillois, administrator general of the 
CEA [Atomic Energy Commission] and head of CEA Industrie--which 
as owner of a 36 percent interest in Framatome is the the 
nuclear boiler maker's biggest public-sector 
shareholder--described in broad outline the purpose of 
negotiations now under way with Alcatel Alsthom. 
  In accordance with the wishes expressed by the state (LE 
MONDE of 23-24 January), "it is envisaged that public-sector 
participation will be reduced to that of a blocking minority," 
or 34 percent of the stock, Mr. Rouvillois confirmed. EDF 
[French Power Company] will keep its current 10 percent share, 
he said. On the other hand, according to Mr. Rouvillois, CEA-I 
is expected to transfer "a little more than 10 percent of 
Framatome's stock," reducing its own interest to less than 25 
percent, while Credit Lyonnais surrenders its 5 percent holding. 
  The state, which now controls Framatome indirectly with its 
51 percent share, will give up 17 percent and offer it to 
Alcatel-Alsthom, Mr. Rouvillois said. In the past, 
Alcatel-Alsthom, owner of a 44 percent interest in Framatome, 
had been keen to acquire the additional 7 percent of stock 
needed to constitute a 51 percent controlling interest. Could it 
be that Mr. Suard's group is being backed into a corner? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20533 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94029" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE ALLIANCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Daimler Benz's Aim To Obtain Majority Shares in CGS Rumored </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Daimler Benz's Aim To Obtain Majority Shares in CGS Rumored </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94WS0241C Paris LE MONDE in French 21 Feb 94 p 13 </F>
<F P=103> 94WS0241C </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE MONDE </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "Daimler Wants To Become Controlling Shareholder </F>
of Cap Gemini Sogeti"] 
  [Text] Daimler Benz just can't get enough of Cap Gemini 
Sogeti [CGS], at least to judge by what executives of the German 
colossus in Stuttgart are saying. Since July 1991, Daimler Benz, 
as a partner of the French computer services group, has held a 
34 percent interest in Sogeti, which is CGS's holding company. 
But now, by converting a stockholder loan into shares and by 
exercising, in a new stock issue, the subscription rights it 
obtained as part of the partnership accord negotiated between 
the two groups, it has the chance to acquire a controlling 
majority of CGS as of 1 February 1995. 
  Though all this is still a year ahead, rumors are already 
flying. Last week the rumor mill was stirred up again by 
publication of CGS's earnings statement for 1993, which showed a 
loss of 434 million [French] francs. Daimler Benz attitude 
toward CGS is unambiguous, according to sources at the company's 
Stuttgart headquarters. The group says it does not want to 
withdraw from the French company but rather is looking for a 
partner that will help out on capital acquisition but allow it 
to operate the French concern. Daimler Benz says it will 
entertain offers from any potential partner. Matra and France 
Telecom are among the names being mentioned. If unsuccessful in 
its quest for an ally, Daimler Benz will decide next year 
whether or not to exercise its option to acquire a 51 percent 
interest. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20534 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94030" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   02 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE ALLIANCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Siemens-IBM-Toshiba Cooperation in 64-Mbit Chip Development </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Siemens-IBM-Toshiba Cooperation in 64-Mbit Chip Development </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94WS0262C Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER ZEITUNG/BLICK DURCH DIE 
WIRTSCHAFT in German 02 Mar 94 p 8 </F>

<F P=103> 94WS0262C </F>
<F P=104>  Frankfurt/Main FRANKFURTER ZEITUNG/BLICK DURCH DIE 
WIRTSCHAFT </F>

<F P=105>  German </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> ["Sampling the 64-Mbit Chip"] </F>
  [Text] Scha. FRANKFURT. The first, fully 
functional 64-Mbit memory chips, developed jointly by Siemens 
and IBM, have now been delivered to key customers. The sampling 
and examination of the chips should provide information on what 
and where changes are to be made. In its newsletter of January 
1994, Siemens reported that following a successful pilot run, 
the technology will be converted into a production line, which 
will require investments of about one billion US dollars. 
Subsequent technological advances, such as the joint development 
by IBM, Siemens, and Toshiba of circuits having structural 
widths of 0.25 micrometers, will then be undertaken in Dresden 
as well. The market research company, Dataquest, predicts that 
by 1997, as many as 40 million 64-Mbit chips may have been sold 
on the world market. 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20535 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpest008___94031" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   3 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE ALLIANCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Rhone-Poulenc, SNIA Merge Polyamide Activity </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Rhone-Poulenc, SNIA Merge Polyamide Activity </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94WS0274B Paris L'USINE NOUVELLE in French 3 Mar 94 p 44 </F>
<F P=103> 94WS0274B </F>
<F P=104>  Paris L'USINE NOUVELLE </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Jacqueline Mattei: "Advanced Plastics: </F>
Rhone-Poulenc and SNIA Become Partners"--first paragraph is 
L'USINE NOUVELLE introduction 
  [Text] Rhone-Poulenc and SNIA [expansion not given] (Fiat 
group) increase their collaboration on polyamides, a sector 
where their product lines complement each other. 
  After carpet fibers and yarns, followed by textile yarns, 
Rhone-Poulenc and the Italian company SNIA (Fiat group) are 
pooling their efforts in the field of advanced polyamide 
plastics. Their 50-50 subsidiary, Nyltech (800 people, sales of 
1.2 billion francs [Fr]) will rank third in Europe, behind BASF 
[Baden Aniline and Soda Factory] and DuPont. 
  The European advanced plastics market represents 700,000 
tons, and polyamides account for one half of that. Their 
characteristics (resistance to impact and high temperatures) 
favor their use in automobile (underhood parts) and electrical 
(circuit-breakers, switches) engineering. These are weighty 
sectors where large manufacturers--like Valeo (automobile 
equipment) or Legrand (electrical equipment)--look for suppliers 
of a size commensurate with theirs and offering products 
suitable for their specific applications. 
  The product lines of SNIA and Rhone-Poulenc complement each 
other (one offers polyamide 6, the other polyamide 66), which 
precisely will enable them to broaden their offers to automobile 
equipment manufacturers. 
<H5>  No Rationalization in Sight </H5>
  The creation of a joint-venture with a bare-bones structure 
should also reduce overheads and improve the profitability of 
this activity, which suffered from the slump affecting the 
European automobile industry. On the other hand, no 
rationalization is expected for the time being. 
  The new entity will have four production plants: those of 
SNIA at Ceriano Laghetto, Italy, and Manchester, New Hampshire 
(United States); those of Rhone-Poulenc at Saint-Fons (Rhone) 
and in Taiwan. It will also inherit Longma, a joint-venture that 
the French group just set up in China, near Shangai: a 
bridgehead for future expansion in Asia. It will also have two 
development centers, at Saint-Fons and at Freiburg (Germany). 
  The two companies have already formed two joint-ventures: 
Novalis for polyamide carpet fibers and yarns, and Nylstar for 
textile fibers. This third partnership proves that collaboration 
goes on satisfactorily. Another sign is Fiat's (symbolic) 
acquisition of an interest in Rhone-Poulenc. 
  Polyamides account for one half of the sales of 
Rhone-Poulenc's fibers and polymers branch (which amounted to 
Fr11.2 billion last year). The three partnerships cover about 50 
percent of its polyamide activities. 
  The two companies, however, may not be able to carry their 
collaboration any further! Rhone-Poulenc also produces 
industrial yarns and is integrated upstream, which is not the 
case of SNIA. 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20536 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpest008___94032" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE ALLIANCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Co-Chairmen Appointed for French-German Telecom Joint </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Co-Chairmen Appointed for French-German Telecom Joint </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Venture 

<F P=102>   BR1003090694 Chichester INTERNATIONAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS 
INTELLIGENCE in English 14 Feb 94 p20 </F>

<F P=103> BR1003090694 </F>
<F P=104>  Chichester INTERNATIONAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS 
INTELLIGENCE </F>

<F P=105>  English </F>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed Article: "France Telecom and Deutsche </F>
Bundespost Telekom Announce Appointment of Co-Chairmen for Joint 
Venture"] 
  [Text] France Telecom and Deutsche Bundespost Telekom have 
announced the appointment of Jean Arnould and Norbert Knoppik as 
co-Chairmen of the business communications joint-venture they 
announced in December last year. 
  The yet-to-be named joint-venture, to be headquartered in 
Brussels, will provide telecommunications services for 
multinational corporations, as well as companies and business 
users involved in international activities. It is expected to 
become operational in early 1995 and in the first year of 
operation the two partners expect it to generate some ECU1.5 
billion in revenues. The venture will make approximately ECU 
1,000 million in investments during the next five years and its 
workforce will number 4,000 persons. 
  Jean Arnould has worked at France Telecom since 1975 when he 
was head of Industrial Development within the International 
Affairs division. He was subsequently appointed Regional 
Director for Alsace, Lorraine, Nord Pas-de-Calais and 
Rhones-Alpes. Since 1993, he has been Deputy Director for the 
Southeast France Sector. 
  Dr. Knoppik joined DBT in 1990 as Head of the Satellite and 
International Cable Systems Division. He played a decisive role 
in the development of the Trans-Europe Line (TEL) cable system 
project and is currently Head of DBT's International Networks 
Division. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20537 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94033" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE ALLIANCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   UK, Germany: Rolls Royce, MTU Form Research Joint Venture </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    UK, Germany: Rolls Royce, MTU Form Research Joint Venture </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   BR1603150894 Brussels INNOVATION &amp; TECHNOLOGY TRANSFER in 
English Feb 94 pp 21-22 </F>

<F P=103> BR1603150894 </F>
<F P=104>  Brussels INNOVATION &amp; TECHNOLOGY TRANSFER </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Advanced Testing for Advanced </F>
Materials"] 
  [Text] In a model of how European industries can exploit 
the expertise of the Joint Research Centre (JRC), the UK's 
Rolls-Royce and Germany's Motoren und Turbinen Union have joined 
forces through the Third Framework Programme, using the JRC's 
Institute for Advanced Materials (IAM) as a subcontracting 
laboratory. 
  The international recession and defence cutbacks have 
intensified international competition in aeroengine 
manufacturing, which is divided between a small number of 
European and American firms. To remain competitive, Rolls-Royce 
is focusing on making engines as fuel-efficient and as cheap to 
maintain as possible. Motoren und Turbinen Union GmbH (MTU), 
which is Rolls-Royce's major partner on the upcoming 
Eurofighter's engines, faces similar challenges. Both see using 
advanced materials as essential to their future as hi-tech 
manufacturers. 
<H5>  Turbine Blades: Critical Components </H5>
  In an aircraft engine, fuel and compressed air explode 
inside 
combustion chambers at high temperature and pressure. The 
resulting gases are ejected out the back, propelling the 
aircraft forward. However, as they leave the combustion chamber 
they also drive a set of turbine blades, which transfer energy 
to the front of the engine to compress incoming air. 
  The mechanical load, or stress, on these turbine blades 
varies enormously, and these stresses occur over a wide range of 
temperatures, with blade surface temperatures approaching to 
within a few hundred degrees of the material's melting point. 
Due to their extreme operating conditions, their importance to 
safety and the inexact understanding of their lifetime, the 
blades are regularly checked and replaced when any structural 
faults, such as microcracks, are detected. 
  Engine efficiency is proportional to the temperature inside 
the combustion chamber, so improving engine requires turbine 
blades which can withstand higher temperatures and whose 
lifetime is more exactly understood, reducing the need for 
maintenance checks. Blades must also be as light as possible, to 
keep engine weight to a minimum. 
<H5>  Industry Link -- Up Through JRC </H5>
  According to British materials scientist Andy Bennett, 
"Rolls-Royce had worked on isothermally testing potential 
turbine blade materials, where samples were stress-tested at one 
temperature. However we needed a thermo-mechanical fatigue, or 
TMF, testing laboratory, which would put the materials under 
similar conditions to those found in the engine itself. We 
decided to subcontract to an existing laboratory, and the IAM 
was the obvious choice -- their resources, both human and 
technical, make them the best in Europe." 
  The IAM knew that MTU were also interested in this field, 
and 
put the companies in touch with one another. Together with 
Spanish modelling institute Centro de Estudios e Investigaciones 
Tecnicas de Guipuzcoa (CEIT), they formed a project under the 
EC's Industrial Technologies and Advanced Materials Programme 
(BRITE/EURAM II), with the IAM as a subcontracting laboratory. 
Project BREU-0338, as it became, was launched in 1991 for four 
years, with Rolls-Royce as the prime partner. 
<H5>  Thermo-Mechanical Testing </H5>
  A turbine blade consists of two main components: a metal 
core, or substrate is a single crystal of a "super alloy," while 
the coatings are composed of one or more elements which are 
easily oxidised, forming a protective oxide layer. 
  The IAM test equipment simulates the behaviour of the blade 
under its operational conditions in the laboratory, and observes 
the growth of any cracks. The sample is heated by 
electromagnetic induction, while the strain is produced by a 
hydraulic piston and measured with an extensometer. A load cell 
measures the stress applied by the piston. 
  In this way the researchers can measure the 
substrate-coating 
combination's actual stress-strain-temperature relationship, 
which is crucial to predicting the blade's lifetime. 
  According to IAM project scientist Dr. Johan Bressers, one 
of 
the most important and unique features of the system is that it 
investigates non-intrusively. 
  "We have developed a computer vision system, composed of an 
optical microscope coupled to a video camera, which monitors the 
sample for microcrack initiation and growth," he explains. 
"This system captures, digitises and displays images of the 
sample in real-time, and can either scan the entire surface or 
concentrate on a particular region with a magnification of up to 
1000 times." 
  This enables the operators, if they wish, to find cracks as 
they appear and focus in on them for more detailed analysis. 
Usually, however, the scanning pattern is programmed in 
advance, so the equipment needs no supervision. 
  This system compares well to the "replica technique," which 
is traditionally used to monitor surface damage. The replica 
technique requires that the test be halted so that the surface 
of the sample can be replicated by means of an acetate film. 
This has to be done dozens of times for each test, a laborious, 
resource- intensive process which can also compromise the 
results. 
  After the test is completed the data is analysed to produce 
a 
crack growth history of the primary crack, the one which leads 
to total breakdown. At this stage the important data are when 
the cracks appeared, how fast they grew, and whether they joined 
together. 
  The sample is also analysed using electron microscopy and a 
scanning electron microprobe, which also provides information on 
its micro-chemistry. This three-dimensional information on the 
crack helps to identify and analyse the mechanisms which affect 
crack growth, as well as the crucial question of why some cracks 
grow from the coating into the substrate and others do not. 
<H5>  Lifetime Prediction Model </H5>
  Working together, Rolls-Royce and MTU identified two 
substrates and three coatings to be tested in this way. The IAM 
laboratory has already performed 55 of the 80 tests, and has 
also finished a literature survey of over 30 different models, 
selecting one for further development. 
  "The test data will form an invaluable database, giving us a 
feel for how changes in operating conditions, coating materials 
and other parameters affect blade performance," explains Mr. 
Bennett. "It will, for the first time, give us an 
understanding behind the data. CEIT's work has also been 
important. Previous models were very material-specific, but 
CEIT has focused attention on which phenomena and parameters are 
the most important. This should eventually lead to a general 
model which can be applied to a wider range of materials, 
because we will be working from a better understanding of the 
material mechanics." 
  The final goal is a lifetime prediction model, enabling the 
industrial partners to select better materials for new engines, 
although neither MTU nor Rolls-Royce expect the project to 
result in an `off-the-shelf' product. "By giving us a good 
picture of the behaviour of these materials under these 
conditions, the project will make the first step towards a more 
general model," stresses MTU scientist Dr. Affeldt. "Our 
company laboratory will continue the work for our specific 
needs." 
  Rolls-Royce has similar plans, and may continue its 
collaboration with the IAM. "We found the IAM very focused to 
our engineering needs." Andy Bennett adds, "so in the future we 
may enter into a private arrangement where the IAM tests our 
more confidential materials, those closer to the edge of 
development." 
  The IAM has also launched several sub-projects within their 
own research programme to provide, as Dr. Brassers explains, "a 
better basis for the mechanistic understanding and the 
mechanism-informed modelling of blade lifetimes. These projects 
will help us prepare for contracts for manufacturers of 
land-based turbines, such as in power plants, as there's no 
reason why we cannot serve these industries as well." 
<H5>  The JRC in Brief </H5>
  The Joint Research Centre is a European scientific and 
technical research centre established by the EC. The four 
research sites in Belgium, Germany, Italy and the Netherlands 
house eight institutes: The Central Bureau for Nuclear 
Measurements, The Institutes for Transuranium Elements, Advanced 
Materials, Systems Engineering and Informatics, Safety 
Technology, Remote Sensing Applications and Prospective 
Technological Studies, and the Environment Institute. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20538 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94034" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   20 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE ALLIANCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   France: Dassault Buys Controlling Interest in Military </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    France: Dassault Buys Controlling Interest in Military </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Circuit   Firm 

<F P=102> BR2502092194 Paris LA LETTRE DU GIFAS in English 20 Jan 94 p2 </F>
<F P=103> BR2502092194 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LA LETTRE DU GIFAS </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Dassault Electronique To Become </F>
Major Shareholder in SOREP S.A. Group"] 
  [Text] DASSAULT ELECTRONIQUE has concluded an agreement 
with the major shareholders of SOREP S.A. under which it will be 
taking over 2/3 of equity in SOREP S.A. 
  SOREP, located at Chateaubourg, in the vicinity of Rennes, 
specializes in the development and production of hybrid circuits 
and ASICs for military, civil and space applications as well as 
for telecommunications and oil prospecting. Since its founding 
in 1978, SOREP has been an important partner of DASSAULT 
ELECTRONIQUE in microelectronic activities. 
  In 1993, SOREP S.A. had a revenue of 101 million FF (period 
ending 31 August 1993). It is a 100-percent shareholder in the 
EDGETEK Co., 43 percent in ERULEC and 56 percent in SOREP Inc. 
in the U.S.A., in partnership with SCHLUMBERGER. 
  The SOREP Group as a whole generates an annual revenue of 
nearly 230 million FF and employs around 450 persons. 
  For the DASSAULT ELECTRONIQUE Group, this outside growth 
operation is the culmination of a long production partnership 
and complementary microelectronic action. The SOREP Group will 
keep its identity and independence and under this alliance will 
acquire new facilities to develop its own microelectronic 
service activities for the benefit of customers in France and 
other countries. 
  The DASSAULT ELECTRONIQUE acquisition, made in complete 
agreement with the management of SOREP, will become effective 
during the month of January 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20539 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94035" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   1 March 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE ALLIANCES </F>
<H3> <TI>   France: Aerospatiale, SAFT Merger for Thermal Batteries </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    France: Aerospatiale, SAFT Merger for Thermal Batteries </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   BR0103134194 Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES in French 1 Mar 94 p 
12 </F>

<F P=103> BR0103134194 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LA TRIBUNE DESFOSSES </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Aerospatiale and SAFT [Portable and Fixed 
Accumulator Company] have created the Aerospatiale-Batteries 
(ASB) Company, whose main activity will be the design, 
production, and marketing of thermal batteries, which are 
essential components of autonomous energy supply systems of 
tactical missiles in flight. 
  Anticipating an annual turnover of 80 million French francs, 
ASB, 71.8 percent of which is owned by Aerospatiale, will become 
the largest company in Europe and the second largest in the 
world in this sector, after the U.S. company Eagle Picher. 
  Thermal batteries are also used in aeronautics and space 
applications and in power supplies of security systems. 
Aerospatiale Espace et Defense has ordered a thermal battery 
from ASB for supplying power to a system designed to avoid all 
risks of collision between the Ariane 5 launcher and its 
strap-on boosters at the moment of separation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20540 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94036" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   4 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE STRATEGIES </F>
<H3> <TI>   France: Aerospatiale Receives Two-Billion-Franc State Aid </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    France: Aerospatiale Receives Two-Billion-Franc State Aid </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94WS0222B Paris LE MONDE in French 4 Feb 94 p 15 </F>
<F P=103> 94WS0222B </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE MONDE </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article entitled: "Aerospatiale Awarded Two Billion Francs </F>
[Fr] in State Aid"] 
  [Text] French defense and economic ministers announced on 
Wednesday, 2 February that state-owned Aerospatiale company will 
receive capital funding of Fr2 billion. Although initial 
discussions had centered around the figure of Fr3 billion, the 
aeronautics firm (60 percent owned by the state, 20 percent by 
Credit lyonnais, and 20 percent by a public holding company, 
SOGEPA) said it was satisfied with the decision. "The state 
shareholder's decision will enable Aerospatiale to take full 
advantage of the market's gradual recovery, notably through such 
new programs as the Airbus A-330 and A-340," the ministers 
commented in a communique. 
  The aeronautics industry has been hard hit by the slump in 
sales, and the Fr2 billion in government funds will bring a 
much-needed injection of oxygen. In 1993, Aerospatiale faced 
"abominable" civil markets, "stable" military ones, and "fairly 
good" demand for space products and services, said its CEO Louis 
Gallois when he presented the group's results on 5 January. This 
forced the manufacturer to cut back employee hours and eliminate 
1,145 jobs, including 500 in its Eurocopter subsidiary, in 1993. 
Aerospatiale's deficit reached Fr2.38 billion, and the company 
expects to break even again in 1995 at the latest. 
  The Fr2 billion in fresh capital should enable the company 
to 
pursue the reduction of its debt, which it trimmed from Fr16 to 
13 billion over the last two years, and to increase its equity, 
which now totals Fr6 billion. The cash should also help 
Aerospatiale expand its programs, several of which--both civil 
and military--the manufacturer is now studying with its European 
partners. Examples include the Ariane 5 rocket, the Tiger NH-90 
and C-120 helicopters, the ATR-82, the Airbus A-319, the 
proposed FLA military transport plane, and Airbus A-330-340 
spinoffs. Aerospatiale announced in January that it was 
considering allowing capital investments by outside partners, 
either this year or in 1995, provided that the state remained 
majority shareholder. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20541 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94037" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE STRATEGIES </F>
<H3> <TI>   French Auto Makers Target Non-European Markets </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    French Auto Makers Target Non-European Markets </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94WS0226B Paris L'USINE NOUVELLE in French 27 Jan 94 p 29 </F>
<F P=103> 94WS0226B </F>
<F P=104>  Paris L'USINE NOUVELLE </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Alain-Gabriel Verdevoye: "French Automobile </F>
Manufacturers Investing Outside of Europe"] 
  [Text] Peugeot and Citroen are deploying in Egypt, 
India, and China, where Renault will join them. Renault also has 
its sights set on Turkey and Argentina. But the Japanese are 
watching. 
  A few cable lengths distant from the Pyramids, Peugeot 
opened 
the doors of its Cairo plant to the press on 26 January, for the 
launching of its "made in Egypt" 405. More that 1,000 405's are 
to be assembled there this year, and 10,000 a year at full 
capacity, by an Egyptian-American joint venture that also 
assembles Jeeps. By 1995, Peugeot aims to capture some 25 
percent of the Egyptian market for personal automobiles. Running 
close behind, Citroen will begin assembling its AX compacts in 
February, with their replacement, the ZX's, slated to follow 
shortly thereafter. Anticipated production: 20,000 units by 
1998. Citroen's share of the local market is expected to match 
Peugeot's, at around 30 percent. Despite the fundamentalist 
threat, PSA [Peugeot SA] is banking on this small, growing 
market, still free of strong Japanese competition. 
<H5>  Markets Neglected by Japanese </H5>
  The French automobile industry has also chosen to break new 
ground in China and India. Citroen plans to manufacture 150,000 
ZX's a year beginning around mid-1995 in two new plants in the 
center of China. The AX's replacement could be produced there. 
Meanwhile, a few ZX's are being assembled in temporary plant 
facilities. Some ten or so French suppliers are in the process 
of setting up installations there. Some 40 or more are expected 
to follow. 
  Peugeot is increasing the capacity of its Canton plant, with 
plans calling for a capacity of 50,000 vehicles by 1995. A basic 
agreement has been signed for the building of a second 
ultramodern plant capable of manufacturing 100,000 Peugeot 405 
sedans annually by the year 2000. Renault, for its part, plans 
to start production of its Trafic minibus at Xiaogan, not far 
from the Citroen plant, around the end of this year. In India, 
Peugeot plans to produce 60,000 Peugeot 309 sedans annually, 
near Bombay, beginning around the end of 1994. Citroen is 
negotiating to assemble its C 15 commercial vehicles there. 
  Although the French manufacturers are exploring the 
promising 
new markets still being neglected by the Japanese, they are by 
no means forsaking their traditional bases. In Turkey, 
Oyak-Renault, a subsidiary 57-percent owned by Renault, has 
invested 2 billion francs[Fr] to modernize its Bursa plant and 
manufacture its R19. Another strategic region for the French is 
Argentina, and specifically from the standpoint of penetrating 
the Brazilian market. Renault plans to increase its non-European 
production by 16 to 17 percent in 1994. And Citroen is planning 
to double its non-European production. Nevertheless, the French 
automobile makers manufacture only a small proportion of their 
vehicles outside of the Old Continent: Renault 15 percent, 
versus 30 percent for Nissan outside of Japan. "We do not have 
funds of our own to spend several billions in risky operations," 
says Renault, "and we lack engineers and available marketers." 


PRINCIPAL OPERATIONS ABROAD 

Companies/Countries    Capital      Types of     Production    Share of Local 
                       Stake in     Vehicles     1993          Market 
                       Local        Assembled    (units)       (percent) 
                       Assembler 
                       (percent) 

RENAULT 

SOUTH AMERICA 

Argentina              23           R9 - R11 -   95,000        26 
                                    R12 - R19 
                                    - R21 
                                    -Trafic 

Colombia               24           R9 - R21     12,000        9 

Venezuela              -            R9 - R21 -   2,000         Insignificant 
                                    R19 
                                    (start-up 
                                    phase) 

FAR EAST - INDIA 

China                  45           Trafic       Start-up in   - 
                                                 1994 

Taiwan                 -            R9 - R19 -   7,500         6 
                                    Express - 
                                    Twingo (in 
                                    1994) 

MIDDLE EAST 

Turkey                 57           R9 - R11 -   132,000       30 
                                    R12 - R21 
                                    - R19 (in 
                                    1994) 

AFRICA 

Morocco                -            R4 - R5 -    6,500         45 
                                    R9 - R19 - 
                                    R21 

PEUGEOT 

SOUTH AMERICA 

Argentina              -            405 - 504    45,000        12.5 
                                    - 505 

FAR EAST - INDIA 

China                  22           405 - 504    21,000        12 
                                    - 505 

Taiwan                 -            405          4,000         3 

India                  50           309          (Start-up     - 
                                                 in 1994) 

MIDDLE EAST 

Egypt                  -            405          Start-up in   - 
                                                 1994 

Iran                   -            405 -        20,000        30 
                                    205(in 
                                    1994) 

AFRICA 

Morocco                -            106 - 205    3,500         25 
                                    - 309 - 
                                    405 - 504 
                                    - 306 (in 
                                    1994) 

Nigeria                40           504 - 505    9,000         35 

CITROEN 

SOUTH AMERICA 

Uruguay                -            ZX -         3,000         3 
                                    Xantia (in 
                                    1994) 

FAR EAST - INDIA 

China                  -            ZX           7,000         4 

MIDDLE EAST 

Egypt                  -            AX - ZX      Start-up in   - 
                                                 1994 

AFRICA 

Morocco                -            AX - ZX -    3,000         20 
                                    C15 

The three French automobile makers sold 513,000 cars outside of Europe in 
1993. Sales volume is expected to increase significantly in the future, 
thanks to China, Egypt, Turkey, and Argentina. 

Source: Peugeot - Renault - Citroen - L'USINE NOUVELLE 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20542 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94038" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   16 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE STRATEGIES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Netherlands: Fokker Reduces Production by 20 Percent </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Netherlands: Fokker Reduces Production by 20 Percent </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94WS0233A Paris LE MONDE in French 16 Feb 94 p 22 </F>
<F P=103> 94WS0233A </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE MONDE </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Christian Chartier: "Fokker Axes 1,900 Jobs, </F>
Cuts Production 20 Percent"] 
  [Text] Amsterdam--Citing "market decline" and "price 
erosion," Dutch airplane builder Fokker announced on Monday 14 
February a new reorganization plan--the third in 2 years, and 
the most "dramatic." 
  The plan, which was expected as a follow-up to the 
resignation of the company president 2 weeks ago (see LE MONDE 
of 1 February), calls for a 20 percent drop in production, which 
is slated to fall from 50 to about 40 aircraft per year, and an 
almost proportionate cut in the number of employees. 
  Some 1,900 positions of the company's 10,500 positions will 
be eliminated (it had employed 12,800 as of December 1991), thus 
doubling the scope of initial personnel retrenchment plans for 
1994. Assembly lines will suffer the largest number of cuts 
(1,400), but management is also taking hits. Some property 
disinvestments will follow, further reducing Fokker's overhead. 
Finally, the company is going to take a close, hard look at its 
contracts with suppliers. The big question is whether the 
Amsterdam builder will succeed in reducing its costs for the 
airframes provided by Deutsche Aerospace (DASA), currently at a 
price well above the world average: 37 percent higher in the 
case of the F-70, and 57 percent in the case of the F-100. The 
contract antedates DASA's takeover of Fokker but has never been 
amended, a fact that leads some Dutch journalists to speculate 
the company is being set up for "strangulation" by its 
"predator-savior." The airframe surcharge is responsible for all 
but a few million florins of the 450-million loss Fokker is 
expected to post for 1993. 
  But Fokker, like every other aviation builder, is buffeted 
by 
turbulent winds: The airlines, overequipped and locked in a 
price war, are not modernizing their fleets, and builders are 
intensifying the competition to hang onto market shares. Fokker 
does not expect real recovery before 1996, but says it is 
convinced it will weather the storm and keep its reputation for 
building innovative models. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20543 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94039" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   16 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE STRATEGIES </F>
<H3> <TI>   France: CEA-Industrie Divests Itself of Partnerships </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    France: CEA-Industrie Divests Itself of Partnerships </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94WS0233B Paris LE MONDE in French 16 Feb 94 p 22 </F>
<F P=103> 94WS0233B </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE MONDE </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Caroline Monnot: "CEA-Industrie Disengages From </F>
Framatome, Oris, Sopha, and Cisi"] 
  [Text] CEA-Industrie is losing its vocation as an 
industrial group. Industry Minister Gerard Longuet set the tone 
almost as soon as he arrived at the ministry. Eight months 
later, the pace of divestment is accelerating. In the meantime, 
Philippe Rouvillois, administrator general of the Atomic Energy 
Commission, became head of CEA-I and proceeded to quash the 
grandiose dreams of Jean-Claude Hirel. Mr. Rouvillois confirmed 
the news officially in LES ECHOS on Monday 14 February. 
  Data processing services (Cisi) and medical technologies 
(Oris and Sopha Medical) will no longer be development axes for 
a CEA-I whose role henceforth is clearly to be nothing more than 
a portfolio company. "In the more or less short term, we 
envisage no longer having majority positions in those companies 
but retaining interests as a minority shareholder," says CEA's 
administrator general, evincing an uncanny comprehension of the 
wishes of his tutelary minister. 
  Cisi, whose "facilities management" division--which 
completely or partially administers computer and data processing 
systems for third parties--has already been transferred to a 
joint subsidiary in partnership with Bull, is far from lacking 
suitors of its own. And Sagem is keenly interested in the 
medical technologies. 
  But that still leaves the nuclear technologies and 
components 
divisions, which Mr. Rouvillois notes are "two major hubs." 
Concerning the former, CEA-I here again--under duress--has 
abjured even a minor role, except perhaps to offer 
representatives of the state some seats on the board of 
directors. 
  COGEMA [General Nuclear Materials Company], one of CEA-I's 
most important investments, escaped its orbit early last summer 
by linking up with Total, in a move the government fully 
approved. Mr. Rouvillois also currently is negotiating 
disengagement from Framatome in favor of the Alcatel-Alsthom 
group. 
  The proceeds from these multiple divestments could be used, 
in a best-case scenario, to help semiconductor maker 
SGS-Thomson--of which CEA-I is a major shareholder--back to 
vigorous health and support its ambitious plans. 
  Thereby preserving a semblance of utility for a corporate 
structure which at the moment would appear to have no vocation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20544 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94040" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   19 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE STRATEGIES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bull's CEO Sees Privatization Process Starting in 1994 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Bull's CEO Sees Privatization Process Starting in 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94WS0241A Paris LE MONDE in French 19 Feb 94 p 19 </F>
<F P=103> 94WS0241A </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE MONDE </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Caroline Monnot: "Privatization of Bull Should </F>
Begin by End of Year"] 
  [Text] Timing is nearly always important. With 2 weeks to 
go before a decisive meeting with the European commission, 
Jean-Marie Descarpentries has decided to break his silence. On 1 
March, Bull's new CEO is supposed to explain the recovery 
measures he envisages and convince European Commissioners who 
are both irritated and of course skeptical. At stake is an 8.6 
billion [French] franc [Fr] recapitalization, decided last fall 
by the authorities, which touched a raw nerve in Brussels. 
Patently less than convinced by Paris's pledge that this would 
be the "very last" capital infusion, the Commission, which has 
been waiting for Bull's strategic plan since last July, has put 
a freeze on the second capital tranche, which would supplement 
the initial Fr4.5 billion released in December 1993. 
  At this point, a public relations campaign would seem 
imperative for Bull. Since mere protestations of good faith 
would be unavailing, Mr. Descarpentries went straight to the 
point in what was his first official meeting with the press 
since 17 February, when he was named for the job: Bull's 
privatization is to be launched sometime this year, he said. The 
head of the state-owned computer group also has a fairly clear 
idea who the group's shareholders will be 2 years down the road: 
Employees will own as much as 20 percent; three industrial ("and 
preferably financial") partners with prior experience in 
cooperative ventures with Bull will each own 15 percent; the 
state--"a fabulous shareholder," notes Mr. Descarpentries--will 
keep as much as a 15 percent interest; and the rest will go on 
the open market. 
  Privatization would have to be implemented in several 
phases. 
For Jean-Marie Descarpentries, the entry of industrial partners 
is especially opportune because it will be accompanied by a 
capital infusion, to be effected once the enterprise's balance 
sheet is rectified. Nevertheless, in the next few months, and as 
an earnest of its good faith vis-a-vis Brussels, "up to 10 
percent of the group's stock" will be made available to 
employees, and "between 10 and 20 percent" to the first 
industrial partner. Bull's CEO broadly hinted that Japan's NEC, 
a longtime partner of Bull--and one that closely followed the 
state-owned group's recapitalization last fall--strikes him as a 
solid candidate. He also wants France Telecom, which already 
owns a 17 percent share in the state-owned computer group, to 
keep its place at the table. According to Mr. Descarpentries, it 
is time for the two enterprises, which in the past have had an 
"almost neurotic" relationship, to turn over a new leaf. "There 
are many joint projects for us to develop." The third candidate 
might be Hewlett Packard (United States), with which Bull says 
it is already discussing various industrial plans. But IBM, 
which signed a financial and industrial partnership accord with 
Bull over 2 years ago, is clearly being pushed out of the 
picture. In private, Mr. Descarpentries is rather harshly 
critical of that partnership. Also, the Bull CEO mentioned a 
possible merger of Zenith Data Systems and Packard Bell, with 
stock in the new entity to be listed on the Paris Exchange. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20545 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94041" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE STRATEGIES </F>
<H3> <TI>   France: Renault Privatization Considered </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    France: Renault Privatization Considered </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94WS0241B Paris LE MONDE in French 21 Feb 94 p 13 </F>
<F P=103> 94WS0241B </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE MONDE </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "AGF and Renault on Fast Track"] </F>
  [Text] Are AGF and Renault next in line for privatization? 
That was the distinct impression left by Economic Affairs 
Minister Edmond Alphandery on Friday 18 February when he 
appeared as a guest on "Forum RMC-L'EXPRESS": It's clear the 
government has no intention of sitting on its hands. "After UAP, 
which is already in the pipeline, we will announce other 
privatization projects in the weeks to come," he indicated. 
Commenting on the separation of Renault and Volvo (LE MONDE of 
19 February), the minister added that "the way was now open for 
privatization of Renault." "AGF and Renault are definite 
candidates," confirmed Mr. Alphandery, explaining that the 
government "likes to keep several irons in the fire." 
  No reference was made during the program to Bull Group, the 
computer manufacturer whose new CEO, Jean-Marie Descarpentries, 
had announced the previous day plans to open the group's stock 
to the public this year. A visibly irritated Bercy [i.e. the 
Economic Affairs Ministry] issued an official clarification in a 
communique Friday evening. "No decision has yet been made" on 
the timetable or modalities for [privatization of] the computer 
builder, the ministry said. The privatization commission has not 
yet considered the Bull dossier, it also noted. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20546 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94042" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   28 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE STRATEGIES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Germany: Struggling DASA Pins Hopes on New Sales, Military </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Germany: Struggling DASA Pins Hopes on New Sales, Military </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Transport   Program 

<F P=102> 94WS0279A Duesseldorf HANDELSBLATT in German 28 Feb 94 p 11 </F>
<F P=103> 94WS0279A </F>
<F P=104>  Duesseldorf HANDELSBLATT </F>
<F P=105>  German </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Wieland Schmitz: "DASA Hopes for a Successor to </F>
the Transall Transport: Mehdorn Sees Obstacles To Space 
Cooperation With Boeing: Support Policy Must Be Restructured"] 
  [Text] HANDELSBLATT, 28 February 1994 MUNICH. 
The European, and especially the German, air and space industry 
has experienced a crisis year. Even the near future does not 
look much better. International airlines cancel about as many 
aircraft contracts as they award. Military aircraft production 
is suffering drastically reduced procurement, and the 
governments in the United States and Japan are even more 
concerned about these industries than is the German government. 
  The consequences for DASA (Deutsche Aerospace AG), under 
whose roof almost 70% of the German aviation and space 
industry 
is concentrated, are now known. By 1996, DASA will shut down six 
plants; it will give up three more sites and reduce its work 
staff by another 10,300, down to a total of 70,000 remaining 
positions. But even these drastic measures will only stabilize 
the situation for Daimler's subsidiary under the most optimistic 
premises. 
  In a conversation with Handelsblatt, Hartmut Mehdorn, 
DASA's chairman for the aviation sector, said: "The measures we 
have announced will only suffice if there is a positive decision 
for the construction of the European fighter aircraft, if our 
remaining development departments continue with the FLA (future 
large aircraft) project, and if we can build 120 to 130 Airbuses 
a year. If any one of these premises falls through, we shall 
have other problems to confront and for which we will require 
help." 
  A further setback looms for the already markedly reduced 
production of the Airbus. The only current major, hotly 
contested contract for commercial aircraft--Saudi Arabia's $6 
billion U.S. dollar order for some 50 to 60 aircraft--will, in 
the opinion of experts in the aviation field, go exclusively to 
U.S. producers. As a result, production by the Airbus partners 
(DASA, Aerospatiale, British Aerospace, Casa) will sink still 
further because part of that contract had already been included 
in their plans--over optimistically it now seems. But the 
Europeans have still not abandoned all hope because President 
Clinton's (who personally fought for this business) announcement 
that Boeing and McDonnell-Douglas had won the entire contract 
has not yet been officially confirmed. As Mehdorn puts it, "the 
door is still not closed." 
  Cost of the Jaeger 90 Can Provoke New Arguments 
  More hopeful is the belief that Bonn will make a positive 
procurement decision for the EFA fighter aircraft (Jaeger 90). 
Since DASA's public announcement of a substantial reduction in 
its work force, there have been an increasing number of signals 
from Bonn indicating that no foreign-built competitor aircraft 
will be purchased. However, the costs involved in the 
construction of the high-tech Jaeger 90 could well provoke new 
discussions. Mehdorn said: "On the basis of 1988 cost estimates, 
the EFA will cost DM57.8 million. That amount represents the 
`fly-away' cost for which the industry is responsible and which 
really cannot change very much. We are not responsible for the 
higher system costs, which include the logistics expenditures of 
the customer over the entire service life." In DASA's opinion, 
there is considerable room for savings in the system costs, 
which have been put at about DM130 million. The cost 
negotiations between Bonn and the EFA Consortium, set for 1995, 
should provide fireworks both because of the inflation-driven 
cost increases since 1988 as well as because of the greater 
costs resulting from technical and bureaucratic delays. 
  If the decision is positive for EFA, then the production 
capacities can--to a considerable degree--be fully utilized. 
That, however, does not hold for the development departments. 
Consequently, Mehdorn is relying on the "future large aircraft," 
a tactical military transport successor to the aging 
German-French Transall aircraft. This new four-engine heavy 
cargo aircraft (payload 25 tons), which will also be offered for 
commercial use, must, in the opinion of DASA planners in Germany 
and France, be ready by the year 2002. This means that the 
program has to be approved in 1994. 
  Mehdorn wants to win Bonn over to the FLA and to this end 
proposes a revolutionary way for the military to procure it. "We 
want this to be different from the EFA process. We have proposed 
to make this aircraft efficient and inexpensive from the 
industrial point of view." We can do this if the governments 
involved dispense with their conventional comprehensive, 
detailed technical specifications and merely prescribe "what the 
aircraft must be able to do." DASA and Aerospatiale, as well as 
partners who join in the venture later, will develop, build, and 
finance "structures as in the Airbus project, using available 
Airbus components." The aid that would still be required from 
the government could then be limited to DM25 million yearly, a 
credit pledge, and a guaranteed procurement. 
  However, Mehdorn does not believe that even a successor to 
the Transall will ensure the continued existence of a German 
aviation industrial capability in the long term. To do that, the 
entire financial support policy would have to be restructured 
and intensified. He wants a yearly budget of at least DM300 
million for "technology projects." In this way, Mehdorn 
believes, the aviation and space industry could retain its 
capability and participate in a market, which is estimated to 
reach a volume of DM800 billion in the next 20 years. Moreover, 
new aircraft programs would have to be indirectly subsidized, as 
in the United States, because direct development subsidies would 
be greatly reduced. "To match the United States in these 
matters, we need an advance development program borne entirely 
by the government," DASA's chairman asserts, estimating that 
U.S. subsidies via NASA in 1993 and 94 amounted to about $1 
billion U.S. dollars annually and another $1.6 billion dollars 
annually via the Air Force. 
  Although no specific amounts of financial subsidies are 
available in the case of Japan, the upcoming competitor against 
the European aviation and space industry, DASA believes that the 
accumulation of patents identified indicate that aviation and 
space is Japan's "next strategic attack point." In order to meet 
this attack, Mehdorn asserts that, in addition to financial 
outlays, Germany needs an "integrated aviation support 
structure, in which industry, the universities, the major 
research institutes, the DLR (German Aerospace Research 
Institute), and the various responsible ministries all 
participate." 
  The Americans, especially Boeing, the world's leading 
producer of commercial aircraft, which is already cooperating 
closely with Japanese companies, are serving as midwives at the 
birth of the Japanese aviation and space industry. So as not to 
have that developing alliance become a competitor against the 
European Airbus partners right from its inception, the head of 
DASA, Juergen Schrempp, entered into an agreement with Boeing to 
establish a joint working group, consisting of the Airbus 
partners and Boeing, to make a feasibility study for one of the 
most ambitious aircraft projects ever--a large 500 to 600-seat 
aircraft. The feasibility study, which was ready in March, 
concluded that "owing to the enormously high costs of 
development, estimated at $10-12 billion U.S. dollars, a project 
of this nature could only be undertaken on a worldwide basis. It 
is still problematical as to whether joint trans-Atlantic 
measures will follow from that conclusion." Mehdorn concludes: 
"Just as there are opponents in this country to cooperation with 
Boeing, there are opponents to cooperation with Europe at 
Boeing." 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20547 </DOCNO>
<HT>      "jpest008___94043" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE STRATEGIES </F>
<H3> <TI>   France: Alcatel Restructures Radio, Space, Defense </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    France: Alcatel Restructures Radio, Space, Defense </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Activities 

<F P=102>   BR1103110594 Chichester ITI INTERNATIONAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS 
INTELLIGENCE in English 21 Feb 94 p1 </F>

<F P=103> BR1103110594 </F>
<F P=104>  Chichester ITI INTERNATIONAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS 
INTELLIGENCE </F>

<F P=105>  English </F>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "France -- Alcatel To Reorganise </F>
Radio Communications Activities"] 
  [Text] On March 1st, Alcatel's activities in the fields of 
traditional radio communications and mobile, space and defence, 
presently part of the Alcatel Radio Space &amp; Defense product 
group, will adopt a new organisational structure. Three groups 
will be created: 
  1. Alcatel Mobile Communications: This group will cover the 
whole of mobile communications - the fixed networks utilising 
cellular technology, radio systems and also GSM terminals, PMR 
and DECT. It will be directly responsible for the corresponding 
activities in Alcatel companies in Belgium, France, Germany, 
Italy and Spain. The group will be headed by Peter Radley as 
President, and Luc Vigneron as Executive Vice President. 
  2. Alcatel Radio Transmission Systems: This group will cover 
all microwave and earth station activities. It will be directly 
responsible for the corresponding activities in Alcatel 
companies in France, Germany, Italy, North America and Spain. 
Domenico Ferraro has been appointed President of the group, 
while Christian Pinon has been appointed Executive Vice 
President. In addition, Mr. Ferraro becomes President of a new 
holding company which will control all Alcatel's Italian 
activities with the exception of cables. 
  3. Alcatel Space &amp; Defense: This group will cover all 
the 
activities of Alcatel in space communications and observation 
systems, scientific satellites, as well as C31, navaids and 
defence communications systems. It will co-ordinate the 
corresponding activities of the Alcatel subsidiaries in Belgium, 
Denmark, France, Germany, Italy, Norway, Spain, Switzerland and 
Taiwan, Jean-Claude Husson has been appointed President of the 
group. 
  Jacques Imbert, formerly President of Alcatel Radio Space 
&amp; 
Defense, has been appointed Executive Vice President-Strategy 
and Development of Alcatel Alsthom. He will also maintain his 
present responsibilities for the coordination of defence 
activities for the Alcatel Alsthom group, Jean Guibourg, 
formerly Executive Vice President of Alcatel Radio Space &amp; 
Defense, has been appointed Director of Alcatel Alsthom 
headquarters. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20548 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94044" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE STRATEGIES </F>
<H3> <TI>   France: Dassault 1993 Figures Show Return to Profitability </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    France: Dassault 1993 Figures Show Return to Profitability </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   BR1103112994 Paris LA LETTRE DU GIFAS in English 10 Feb 94 p2 </F>
<F P=103> BR1103112994 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LA LETTRE DU GIFAS </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Dassault Eletronique: Report for </F>
1993"] 
  [Text] In 1993, Dassault Electronique Group had a 
consolidated revenue of 3.9 billion francs, as per prognostics, 
slightly above the 1992 level. Orders represented 5.2 billion 
francs, a more than 25-percent growth over the preceding year. 
These excellent results reflect export orders for equipment to 
be medium term delivered. As of 31 December 1993, order books 
also showed significant growth, having for the first time 
reached 9 billion francs (not including price revisions). 
Turnover of the Dassault Electronique parent firm was 2,770 
billion francs in 1993, practically the same as in 1992 (2,791 
billion francs) for booked orders worth 4,145 billion francs, a 
40-percent increase over 1992 (2,970 billion francs). During 
the October 1993 meeting of the Board of Administration, the 
Chairman, Bertrand Daugny announced that the Group had returned 
to profitability in 1993. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20549 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94045" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   17 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE STRATEGIES </F>
<H3> <TI>   France: SGS-Thomson Number Two Looks Ahead With Confidence </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    France: SGS-Thomson Number Two Looks Ahead With Confidence </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   BR2502091194 Paris ELECTRONIQUE INTERNATIONAL HEBDO in 
French 17 Feb 94 p 8 </F>

<F P=103> BR2502091194 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris ELECTRONIQUE INTERNATIONAL HEBDO </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with SGS-Thomson "number two" Piero Martinotti by </F>
Jean-Pierre Della Mussia; place, date not given: "Martinotti: 
`SGS-Thomson Will Now Remain Profitable'" -- first paragraph is 
ELECTRONIQUE INTERNATIONAL HEBDO introduction] 
  [Text] SGS-Thomson did not win shares in the semiconductor 
market in 1993 because it is not present in the DRAM [dynamic 
random access memory] or 486 [processor] segments, which 
experienced the strongest growth. However, it outperformed the 
rest of the market in most of the sectors in which it is active. 
Piero Martinotti, SGS-Thomson's "number two," considers that 
his company will continue to make progress. 
  [Della Mussia] In 1992, you covered 2.7 percent of the world 
market. You also covered 2.7 percent in 1993. Are you still 
aiming to cover 5 percent of the world market? How do you hope 
to achieve that? 
  [Martinotti] Indeed, 5 percent is a limit above which a 
general semiconductor company can obtain structural stability. 
In my opinion, this percentage can even fall to 4 percent, 
since our Japanese competitors now have to generate some cash 
flow, which was not previously the case; they therefore have 
fewer financial options. We are concerned with maintaining our 
momentum: The semiconductors market is set to double every 
seven years; our challenge is to try and double our revenues 
every five years while accepting that there will be no capital 
increases, that is to say relying solely on our current 
strengths and existing product catalogue. However, our 
shareholders could decide on faster growth by increasing the 
company capital. 
  I reckon that one-third of our 1993 profits were due to a 
favorable economic climate and two-thirds can be put down to 
internal action. Now, even if the market goes into decline, we 
will remain profitable in all our product lines and continue to 
win shares in the market. Moreover, our debt/equity ratio of 
just 0.285 gives a certain financial flexibility. Once again, 
however, it is up to our shareholders to decide whether we 
should grow faster, with possible takeovers of other companies. 
For example, this would be the case if we decided to 
manufacture 486 circuits. 
  The favorable economic situation means that we envisage 
making shareholders' equity investments in the region of $550 
million this year. If there were a crisis, we would scale down 
our ambitions to maintain the cash-flow. 
  [Della Mussia] You still rank in the same position among the 
world's semiconductor companies. Why? 
  [Martinotti] NS and Philips are ahead of us, but the gap is 
closing. Be patient. 
  [Della Mussia] SGS-Thomson still has an enormous number of 
factories in the world. Is that not a handicap? 
  [Martinotti] If we were starting again from scratch, we 
would 
doubtless shed four factories. However, we have to live in a 
real world. That is why we are reinvesting in Rennes, simply 
because, at the current time, Rennes is very profitable and will 
most likely remain profitable for another four or five years. 
At the moment we are reinvesting, too, in Rousset for five-inch 
chip manufacture in the area made available by the closure of 
the four-inch production line, in particular with an EEPROM 
[electrically erasable programmable read-only memory] technology 
for microcontrollers that we will transfer from Agrate. 
  [Della Mussia] Will the Mitsubishi-Hitachi agreement on 
flash 
memory influence your strategy in this area? 
  [Martinotti] Our strategy with regard to Mitsubishi remains 
unchanged, even if our developments were delayed by a few months 
and the Hitachi agreement has complicated our relations 
slightly. We have decided on the NOR technique, but we do have 
access to the DINOR and AND techniques. We will make our choice 
in due course. In any case, we have already defined with 
Mitsubishi the products that we want to manufacture together and 
we are currently making our technologies compatible. [Martinotti 
ends] 
<H5>  SGS Bets on the Future -- Investment in 1999 </H5>
  $480 million 
  85 percent up over 1992 
  23 percent of sales 
  8 percent more than the industry average 
  World number nine (in dollars) 
<H5>  Research and Development in 1999 </H5>
  $300 million 
  20 percent up over 1992 
  15 percent of sales 
  2 percent more than the industry average 
  World number 10 (in dollars) 
  327 patents registered 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20550 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94046" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   27 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE STRATEGIES </F>
<H3> <TI>   France: CELERG Becomes Europe's Largest Missile Motor </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    France: CELERG Becomes Europe's Largest Missile Motor </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Manufacturer 

<F P=102>   BR2502091894 Paris LA LETTRE DU GIFAS in English 27 Jan 94 </F>
<F P=103> BR2502091894 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LA LETTRE DU GIFAS </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Aerospatiale and SNPE Expand Scope </F>
of CELERG"] 
  [Text] In 1992, AEROSPATIALE and SNPE formed a joint firm 
known as the CELERG Co. specialized in motors for tactical 
missiles and rockets. In its initial form, CELERG centralized 
all the conceptional and marketing facilities of the two parent 
firms. In a recently signed memorandum of understanding, 
AEROSPATIALE and SNPE have added production and fabrication 
facilities to their joint venture. These facilities will 
include the production of propellants and engine integration. 
They will be located at Saint-Medard-en-Jalles (Gironde) and 
Angouleme for SNPE and at Bourges for AEROSPATIALE. 
  CELERG is now the leading European manufacturer of power 
plants for missiles and tactical weapons systems, with a size 
comparable to that of its major American competitors. 
  AEROSPATIALE and SNPE thereby reinforce their partnership 
while enhancing the position of CELERG, a subsidiary to which 
additional French or foreign partners will be added to obtain a 
truly significant dimension in Europe, benefiting by important 
commercial and technical synergies. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20551 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94047" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   26 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE STRATEGIES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Germany: DASA Works Council Presents Plan To Avoid Staff </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Germany: DASA Works Council Presents Plan To Avoid Staff </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Layoffs 

<F P=102>   BR0103125094 Munich SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG in German 5-6 Feb 
94 p 31 </F>

<F P=103> BR0103125094 </F>
<F P=104>  Munich SUEDDEUTSCHE ZEITUNG </F>
<F P=105>  German </F>
BFN 

  The group works council of Munich-based German Aerospace AG 
(DASA), which is threatened with mass layoffs, has called for an 
emergency state program in favor of regions and locations 
particularly affected. At a two-day meeting in Bonn also 
attended by Bundestag deputies and members of the Federal 
Government, the workers' representatives also appealed for 
measures that would safeguard the German aerospace industry in 
the long term. Speaking with journalists on Friday, group works 
council chairman Alois Schwarz called for a program funded to 
the tune of 2 or 3 billion German marks [DM] as a "start to 
medium- to long-term planning." 
  The management of Daimler group-owned DASA had announced, 
last fall, that at least 16,000 jobs would be lost and six 
factories closed. This, claims a group works council statement, 
would jeopardize the very being of the DASA group. The 
incomparably high innovation and investment outlay in this 
sector could not be met by the industry alone; targeted funding 
by the Federal Government was needed. The state had to maintain 
control over production for military purposes; the laws of the 
market economy should not be the only guiding principle of 
business; parliament and the government should create the 
premises that would at least maintain the German aerospace 
industry at its current level. From the political point of 
view, the technical expertise DASA represented was just as worth 
preserving as the coal, steel, and shipbuilding industries or 
agriculture. 
  The group works council summarized its long-term demands 
under seven heads: 
  1. Financing of a research and development technology 
program, for example for new materials for use in aircraft, 
helicopters, and spacecraft. Schwarz criticized the fact that, 
although a new fiber- reinforced composite had led to the 
development of a new automobile steering wheel column, the 
automobile industry had not adopted the new material; 
  2. Support for passenger aircraft construction; 
  3. Definition of projects and programs for unmanned defense 
systems; and 
  4. Interceptors and transport aircraft. The Luftwaffe should 
state its requirements for helicopters and other transport 
aircraft. Oskar Pauli (Dornier, Friedrichshafen), seconded by 
the CDU/CSU [Christian Democratic Union/Christian Social Union] 
deputy Bundestag floor leader, Kurt Faltlhauser (CDU), called 
for the decision on the F-90 to be brought forward and taken 
before the end of 1994: If the decision were not taken for 
another two years, DM75 million would be required just to 
preserve capacity; 
  5. Close coordination of the Bundeswehr's maintenance and 
logistics work with the industry; 
  6. Improvement of German companies' capacity for 
international collaboration within the EU; and 
  7. A diversification and conversion (swords to plowshares) 
funding program; the funds available under EU programs should be 
used and not be allowed to lapse. 
  Schwarz criticized the fact that, although up to 10 
conversion products had already been available from MBB 
[Messerschmidt- Boelkow-Blohm] in Ottobrunn and Garching in the 
eighties, the management had dropped these lines when MBB had 
been taken over by Daimler-Benz in 1988, pending the formation 
of the new group. The result had been a stagnation in the 
conversion effort. The products developed at that time were no 
longer salable, said Schwarz, criticizing the company 
management's poor judgment: "There is a glut on the market." 
Schwarz said that only entirely new products, in civil 
aviation, for instance, held out prospects of success, but this 
would require massive financial aid both from the group's parent 
company, Daimler, and from the state. 
  Pauli expressed satisfaction at the response of the 
politicians attending the conference; in addition to 
Faltlhauser, these included the Federal Government aerospace 
coordinator, Reinhard Goehner (CDU), and SPD [Social Democratic 
Party of Germany] floor leader Hans-Ulrich Klose. "What we have 
seen today is a great coalition in favor of research and 
technology," said Pauli, summing up the views expressed by the 
politicians. A step forward had been taken. It would have to 
be followed up firmly over the following weeks and months. 
Pauli criticized the planned DM1.25-billion cut in the defense 
budget and the DM250-million cut in the research budget. When 
savings had to be made, the aerospace industry was always first 
in line. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20552 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94048" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   15 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> CORPORATE STRATEGIES </F>
<H3> <TI>   Dutch Biotech Company Reorganizes R&amp;D </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Dutch Biotech Company Reorganizes R&amp;D </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   BR0203151294 Rijswijk BIONIEUWS in Dutch 15 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> BR0203151294 </F>
<F P=104>  Rijswijk BIONIEUWS </F>
<F P=105>  Dutch </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

<F P=106> [Article signed RBE: "Gist Incorporating R&amp;D in </F>
 Divisions"] 
  [Text] Since 1 January, Gist-brocades, a biotechnology 
company from Delft, has been operating with a thoroughly 
decentralized research unit. Most of the R&amp;D has been 
incorporated in the five departments or business units. This 
makes the divisions' R&amp;D responsibility complete. While the 
initial goal of decentralization was to guide research and the 
use of its results in the proper direction, it now also deals 
with the management of the researchers themselves. 
  This step can be regarded as the final phase of the process 
which was initiated in 1990 to make R&amp;D more market-oriented. 
From that moment on, the it was no longer the R&amp;D 
organization 
that determined which research had to be done, but the 
departments. The technology manager was assigned the important 
role of watching the long-term developments of customers and 
competitors, and deciding which developments were interesting 
for the departments involved. In cooperation with the 
department's management, he determined the R&amp;D policy. 
  R&amp;D was organized by project. The researcher was given 
clearly outlined objectives, but continued to work within the 
central R&amp;D organization. R&amp;D became the strategic 
partner of 
the departments. Thinking along with the customerswas essential. 
<H5>  Cut and Paste </H5>
  Throughout 1993, however, it became clear that efficiency 
still needed to be improved. Corporate strategist Joop Roels 
says that this is mainly due to external circumstances: "Fierce 
technological competition constantly forces you to seize upon 
new developments very fast, to take immediate advantage of 
market opportunities, and to work cheaper. As it turned out, 
creating an organization which was even more efficient than 
before, was only possible by incorporating research people and 
resources in the departments wherever possible. In genetic 
engineering terms, this means cuts in R&amp;D, and then pasting 
in 
the divisions." This reshuffle of over 500 researchers did not 
involve any layoffs. 
  The reorganization, which was carried out within three 
months, resulted in five units with an integrated research 
activity: Industrial Pharmaceutical Products Division (IPPD, 
penicillins and cephalosporins); Bakery Ingredients Division 
(BID, yeast and other bakery ingredients); Business Unit Savory 
Ingredients (BUSI, yeast extracts and other flavoring 
substances); Bio-Specialties Division (BSD, industrial enzymes); 
Corporate New Business Development (CNBD, development of new 
products, which fall outside the four above-mentioned core 
activities). 
  The part of the research which could not be decentralized 
for 
reasons of efficiency, for instance the test plants and 
analysis, is incorporated in a central technical cluster, which 
supports the divisions. 
<H5>  Expansion </H5>
  According to Roels, the reorganization of R&amp;D has 
contributed 
to giving Gist-brocades a good position for the company's next 
evolutionary phase, which is expansion. "The departments are 
now well positioned. The company has clearly opted for those 
areas, in which it is strong or thinks it is strong. This 
knowledge makes it possible for the company to gradually expand 
its business. We will shun neither major acquisitions nor 
partnerships, whenever the opportunity arises." Roels advocates 
a balance between inventing and purchasing, when it comes to 
acquiring the required technology as effectively as possible. 
"Why bother to learn the technology yourself, if good 
technology is available outside the company?" 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20553 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpest008___94049" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-EST-94-008 </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Europe/International Economic Competitiveness </ABS>
<DATE1>   22 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WEST EUROPE </F>
<F P=101> EUROPE-ASIA RELATIONS </F>
<H3> <TI>   UK: Honda Announces Complete Withdrawal From Rover </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    UK: Honda Announces Complete Withdrawal From Rover </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   93P60168 Paris LE MONDE in French 22 Feb 94 p 20 </F>
<F P=103> 93P60168 </F>
<F P=104>  Paris LE MONDE </F>
<F P=105>  French </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Text] In a 21 February announcement in Tokyo, Honda 
confirmed its intention to withdraw the 20 percent share it held 
in Rover's capital. This announcement has been made during the 
discussions begun on the same morning between BMW's CEO Bernd 
Pischetsrieder and his Hoda counterpart Nibuhiko Kawamoto.Since 
the announcement of the sale by Rover to BMW of the 80 percent 
previously owned by Airbus, Honda did not hide its 
dissatisfaction. The Japanese manufacturer, Rover's partner 
since 1979, considers itself visibly betrayed. Therefore, the 
announcement on Monday, 21 February, expressing the company's 
intention to withdraw from Rover's capital, did not come as a 
surprise. The consequences of this position industrially and 
commercially may be quite risky, since Honda has not been just a 
financial partner (to Rover) but an industrial ally as well. 
Thus, this collaboration has to be renegotiated also. In the 
future--the announcement stated--we will reexamine the diverse 
technical contracts with Rover. Until now, Honda's policies in 
Europe have been based on this collaboration with Rover. In the 
future, we intend to set up independent production units 
(solely) through our own resources. Up to the present, Rover 
has been producing for Honda some vehicles (the Concerto model 
in particular) intended for the European market, while Honda had 
conceived severel models of the Rover series, the Rover 200, 
400, 800, and the new Rover 600. Beyond this, the Japanese 
manufacturer had supplied the British company with several 
strategic components, such as gear boxes. The cooperation 
extended also to commercial interests; in Japan Honda has been 
selling the 4x4 Land Rover Discovery model under its own trade 
mark.The renegociation of agreements existing between the two 
firms could profoundly disrupt Rover's production. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20554 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpjst014__l94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-JST-94-014-L </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Japan Electric Vehicle, Other Automotive Technology Developments </ABS>

<DATE1>   21 October 1993 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<H3> <TI>     Company Develops EV Recharging Equipment </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Company Develops EV Recharging Equipment </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94FE0228A Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN in Japanese 21 Oct 93 
p 1 -- FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> 94FE0228A </F>
<F P=104>  Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN </F>
<F P=105>  Japanese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Text] The Nippon Protector Co. Ltd. (president: Yoshio 
Sakai; TEL 06-384-3371), a maker and distributor of battery 
rechargers, has developed a compact sealed-type battery 
recharger that is waterproof and designed to be used in electric 
vehicles. Calculations done by the company indicate that the 
battery recharger can provide enough power for an 
electric-powered light van to travel up to 10 km with one 
15-minute charge, and 40 km with a one-hour charge. The company 
reported that this was half the time that conventional battery 
rechargers took. It plans to put the battery recharger into 
full-scale production by summer of next year in hopes of selling 
it to auto manufacturers. The price of the recharger is still 
undecided at this time. 
  The newly developed battery recharger employs a direct 
high-frequency switching system, and has an 87 percent energy 
efficiency. The company said that it does not use a condenser to 
switch from AC to DC power. This enabled them to make the 
recharger lighter. It uses a 30-amp constant-current recharging 
system that enables recharging at places where single-phase 200V 
outlets are available. It has a built-in microprocessing unit 
that starts recharging automatically. The battery recharger 
weighs 17 kilograms, and at 50 cm x 26 cm x 56 cm, is one-third 
the size of a conventional recharger. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20555 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpjst014__l94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-JST-94-014-L </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Japan Electric Vehicle, Other Automotive Technology Developments </ABS>

<DATE1>   7 October 1993 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<H3> <TI>     University, Company Developing Thin-Film EV Battery </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    University, Company Developing Thin-Film EV Battery </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94FE0228B Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN in Japanese 7 Oct 93 p 
6 -- FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> 94FE0228B </F>
<F P=104>  Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN </F>
<F P=105>  Japanese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Text] A new secondary battery for electric vehicles has 
been put on the market which can be recharged at 10 times the 
speed of conventional nickel-cadmium batteries. It is a 
thin-film battery that was jointly developed by Dr. Noboru 
Koyama and associates at the Tokyo University of Agriculture and 
Matsushita Electric Industrial Co., Ltd. (president: Y. 
Morishita), and what is interesting about the battery is the 
fact that the composite electrodes are made with organic sulphur 
compounds. It is much lighter than conventional batteries, and 
would last 10 times longer if it were the same weight. When it 
becomes commercially available, it will help further the use of 
electric cars in which one of the major stumblingblocks has been 
how far the car can travel on one recharge. A secondary battery 
is charged and discharged based on combinations of chemical 
reactions that take place between the positive and negative 
electrode. Dr. Koyama and associates resolved the delayed 
reaction problem that had been plaguing batteries by focusing on 
an organic compound (dimercapto-thiazole) in which thiols were 
linked in thiazole chains, and formed a composite material for 
the electrode by mixing highly superconductive polyaniline with 
fine carbon particles. He and his associates prototyped a 1-cm 
thin-film lithium battery that consisted of the composite 
electrode that they developed, a solid gel electrolyte, and a 
negative electrode (lithium foil). They then investigated the 
energy capacity of the battery that tells them how much work the 
battery can perform per kilogram of mass on one recharge. 
Results of tests confirmed that the battery had 10 times the 
energy capacity of commercially available NiCad batteries, and 
five times the capacity of batteries which use only polyaniline. 
Moreover, the company found that by adding diethyl carbonate to 
ethylene carbonate to form the solid electrolyte that they could 
apply high voltages to the battery for 4.3V recharges, and speed 
up the time it takes to recharge the battery. Furthermore, the 
new battery demonstrated the ability to maintain 80 percent 
capacity after 50 repeat charges/discharges, showing the kind of 
durability required for use commercially. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20556 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpjst014__l94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-JST-94-014-L </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Japan Electric Vehicle, Other Automotive Technology Developments </ABS>

<DATE1>   20 August 1993 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<H3> <TI>     Kyushu Company Develops EV Motor </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Kyushu Company Develops EV Motor </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94FE0228C Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN in Japanese 20 Aug 93 
p 1 -- FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> 94FE0228C </F>
<F P=104>  Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN </F>
<F P=105>  Japanese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Text] The QM Software Co., Ltd. (Onga-machi, Fukuoka 
Pref.; president: Eiji Ishii), a developer of mechatronic 
equipment, has developed a low-cost energy-efficient method for 
controlling electric vehicles that employs a general-purpose AC 
motor (3-phase AC induction motor). The drive units of electric 
vehicles are usually DC motors, but QM Software has reportedly 
solved the problem of control at low speed that has been 
plaguing AC motors, and is now able to use that motor in 
electric cars. The company is also looking at the idea of 
forming ties with a car manufacturer in order to commercialize 
the motor. 
  In order to test the motor, it outfit an electric car and 
golf cart with the motor, a controller, and battery. The motor 
used in the electric car had a maximum 10 kW output (15 hp) and 
could achieve a maximum speed of 40 km/hr. The motor used in the 
golf cart had a 2.2 kW maximum output (3 hp), a maximum 40 km/hr 
driving speed, and a hill-climbing ability less than 20 km/hr. A 
general-purpose motor is a lot cheaper and more durable than a 
DC motor, but at low speeds it is hard to control due to its 
rotational unevenness. QM Software, however, has perfected a way 
of achieving smooth control at low speeds by a method known as 
"vector control," which it has applied to this motor. The 
president of QM Software, Eiji Ishii, said that speed variations 
per rpm (revolutions per second) in a four-electrode motor were 
less than 0.1 percent, which is quite stable. Because the motor 
generates strong torque (rotational force) at low speeds, it 
enables quick acceleration and is good for climbing hills. 
  A general-use motor also has the ability to generate 
electricity when going downhill or decelerating, so by returning 
this electricity to the battery, it is able to conserve large 
amounts of energy. Compared to an electric vehicle equipped with 
a similar size DC motor and battery, a car outfitted with this 
AC motor can travel far greater distances. 
  In addition to the electric vehicle and golf cart, the 
company is also working on a monorail transport vehicle for golf 
courses that it plans to outfit with the same motor. Putting the 
motor into commercial mass production is beyond their 
capability, so it plans to link up with different manufacturers 
who have expertise in that area. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20557 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpjst014__l94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-JST-94-014-L </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Japan Electric Vehicle, Other Automotive Technology Developments </ABS>

<DATE1>   17 August 1993 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<H3> <TI>     Kyushu Company's President on Electric Vehicles </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Kyushu Company's President on Electric Vehicles </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94FE0228D Tokyo NISHINIHON SHIMBUN in Japanese 17 Aug 93 p 7 
-- FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> 94FE0228D </F>
<F P=104>  Tokyo NISHINIHON SHIMBUN </F>
<F P=105>  Japanese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Text] 
<H5>  Development of Smooth-Running High-Efficiency Motor </H5>
<H5>  Fierce Competition Among Auto Manufacturers </H5>
  The electric car has many major auto manufacturers fighting 
furiously among themselves to develop a future vehicle that can 
meet strict environmental standards. Some of the heat from that 
competition is directed at us, QM Software Co., Ltd., a 
developer and manufacturer of computer application equipment 
located in Onga-machi, Fukuoka Prefecture. There is no end to 
the visits paid to our company by people from other companies 
wanting to see the electric vehicle that 31-year-old Eiko Sato 
and his staff have been developing. 
  The reason for these visits has to do with the drive motor 
that QM developed in-house. Unlike conventional electric 
vehicles, the car which we developed is equipped with an AC 
rather than a DC motor. We solved the major problem surrounding 
the AC motor which had been weak rotational force. A high degree 
of stability is assured now when the electric car is accelerated 
or when it starts up a hill, shown by the fact that the car can 
travel from 0 to 50 km/hr in 5 seconds. 
<H5>  More Work Needed on Riding Comfort </H5>
  Sato is the leader of a young staff of researchers. The 
staff 
has been working on the electric car for the past year and a 
half. Other than having installed an AC drive motor once in a 
50cc motorcycle, this was the first time to install such a motor 
in a car. 
  Sato and his staff got into this for the fun of it in the 
beginning, but no sooner had the research got underway when they 
discovered that they were able to produce a cheaper and a 30 
percent more energy-efficient electric car than other auto 
manufacturers. 
  With this motor, the battery does not need to be recharged 
as 
much, which was a complaint often heard about the electric car, 
so it is actually quite heartening to think that a product we 
made could actually contribute toward the widespread use of the 
electric car. 
  Although the performance of the motor is as good as 
anticipated, it is still hard to achieve smooth starting and 
stopping when applying the accelerator and brake, so riding 
comfort is not yet what it could be. 
<H5>  With No Textbook, Work Done by Trial and Error </H5>
  Prior to this project, Sato and his staff had been working 
on 
an industrial robot research project entitled "Making Machines 
Move Faster with Greater Precision." 
  An automobile takes ambiguous human commands (analog 
signals) 
such as pressure on the accelerator, and converts these to 
computerized digital signals. This information in turn is 
conveyed to the tires to make fine movements. 
  My role in this has been to make sure we could achieve the 
same riding comfort as a gasoline-powered car, and see to it 
that human commands (analog signals) can be communicated to the 
high-performance motor. 
  There have been no textbooks available to teach us how to 
build the electric car, and there has been very little 
information available publicly, so everything we have done has 
been by trial and error. 
<H5>  Wanting To Be a Global Player </H5>
  Sato and others in charge of this project firmly believe 
that 
the day will come when the electric car is widely used 
throughout Japan, which is poor in natural energy resources. 
They also envisage a day in the future when our children will 
point at the electric car and say that we had a hand in building 
that car. 
  Since we can set the number of rpms at which the control 
motor runs based on the distance between the car and on objects 
in front of the car as detected by sensors, there is a growing 
possibility that sometime in the future we will see a driverless 
electric car. 
  That is why there is so much research being done on 
recharging methods. One of the sources of headaches is the 
limited number of places where cars can be test driven. We are 
getting more confident, however, over the fact that major car 
manufacturers have shown a great deal of interest in the 
technology we have developed. 
  Sato and his research staff say that their research has only 
just begun. The problem with that, however, is that we are still 
just a small company and they cannot hope to suddenly jump up 
and become a major global player. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20558 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpjst014__l94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-JST-94-014-L </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Japan Electric Vehicle, Other Automotive Technology Developments </ABS>

<DATE1>   17 August 1993 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<H3> <TI>     Kyushu Electric Research Institute Working To Extend EV </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Kyushu Electric Research Institute Working To Extend EV </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Battery   Life 

<F P=102> 94FE0228E Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN in Japanese 17 Aug 93 p 
14 -- FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> 94FE0228E </F>
<F P=104>  Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN </F>
<F P=105>  Japanese </F>
CSO 

  [Text] The Kyushu Electric Research Institute has developed 
a testing and evaluation system for EV (electric vehicle) 
batteries and has started trying to extend the life of those 
batteries, which it believes is one of the keys to the 
widespread use of electric-powered vehicles. 
  The institute has devised a system whereby the life of an EV 
battery can be tested and evaluated for actual road conditions 
inside a laboratory. In this system, a battery is placed inside 
the test equipment, and an external device is used to input 
changes in accelerator pressure (discharge), temperature, 
humidity, and vibrations for actual driving conditions in 
Fukuoka City. The system can evaluate 30 different batteries 
simultaneously, so it is a lot faster and much more labor-saving 
than actual on-road testing. Battery makers do not as yet have 
such a testing and evaluation system. 
  Lead batteries used to be used in electric vehicles, but 
they 
could only go about 70 km on a one recharge for in-city driving. 
When a nickel-zinc battery is used, that figure goes as high as 
140 km, but these batteries have a short lifetime and are twice 
as expensive. If the life of a nickel-zinc battery could be 
extended, it would mean that a new battery would not be needed 
and that the total cost could be reduced, thereby making such a 
battery more practical to use. 
  The institute wants to extend the life of existing 70-cycle 
nickel-zinc batteries to 400 cycles, with one cycle being one 
complete charge and discharge. Working from a 4-year plan that 
starts this year, the institute has said it will investigate the 
optimum configuration for the battery by changing the makeup of 
the electrode plates and the electrolyte concentration in the 
battery. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20559 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpjst014__l94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-JST-94-014-L </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Japan Electric Vehicle, Other Automotive Technology Developments </ABS>

<DATE1>   28 May 1993 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<H3> <TI>     M&amp;C To Sell Rapid Recharging Device </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    M&amp;C To Sell Rapid Recharging Device </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94FE0228F Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN in Japanese 28 May 93 p 
13 -- FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> 94FE0228F </F>
<F P=104>  Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN </F>
<F P=105>  Japanese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Text] The M&amp;C Co. (4-4-63 Miyabara, Yodogawa-ku, 
Osaka-shi; president: Y. Shimomoto) has developed and will soon 
put on the market a rapid battery recharger that is able to 
recharge different types of batteries including open and sealed 
type lead batteries in less than one hour (photograph [not 
reproduced] shows super high-speed recharger). The device has 
made it possible for batteries to be recharged in shorter 
periods of time by supplying large amounts of recharge current 
intermittently. Demand for the rapid recharging device is 
expected in electric vehicles, forklifts, and in certain types 
of robots. There are seven types of rechargers corresponding to 
several battery voltages ranging from 12V-192V and costing 
between &yen;500,000-&yen;5,000,000. It used to take about 10 
hours to recharge the 96V-120V batteries used in electric cars, 
but now this can be done in less than an hour. When supplying 
large current loads during rapid recharging, the terminal 
assemblies of the battery tend to become overheated and damaged. 
The rapid recharger avoids this by intermittently supplying and 
cutting electric current while monitoring the terminal voltages 
of the battery. Doing this not only prevents the terminal 
assemblies from overheating, but also enables rapid recharging 
by breaking down the oxide film on the surface of the electrode 
to make the current flow easier. The intermittent charging 
periods are automatically calculated by computer. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20560 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpjst014__l94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-JST-94-014-L </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Japan Electric Vehicle, Other Automotive Technology Developments </ABS>

<DATE1>   26 May 1993 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<H3> <TI>     Tohoku Electric Power Co. Beginning R&amp;D on </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>     Tohoku Electric Power Co. Beginning R&amp;D on </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Nickel-Hydrogen 
   EV Battery 

<F P=102> 94FE0228G Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN in Japanese 26 May 93 p 
24 -- FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> 94FE0228G </F>
<F P=104>  Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN </F>
<F P=105>  Japanese </F>
CSO 

  [Text] The Tohoku Electric Power Co. has started to develop 
a large-capacity nickel-hydrogen battery to see if it can 
increase the distances electric cars are able to travel. Its 
goal is to achieve twice the energy density per battery weight 
of conventional batteries, and to increase the distance an 
electric vehicle can travel on a single recharge to more than 
200 km. No company has ever manufactured a large-capacity 
nickel-hydrogen battery, so one has never been used in an 
electric vehicle. Tohoku Electric says it will first manufacture 
a nickel-hydrogen battery for driving distances of 120 km, and 
present that battery at the Tokyo Motor Show in October. 
  The nickel-hydrogen battery that Tohoku Electric will 
develop 
will be made from a nickel-based hydrogen occluded alloy. As far 
as performance, its goal is to achieve a battery capacity 
between 200A-300A, energy density per liter between 120W-150W, 
and energy density per kilogram between 60W-80W. It will be 
almost twice as powerful as the conventional lead storage 
batteries being used in electric cars. In developing the 
battery, it will be working jointly with the Furukawa Battery 
Co., Ltd. 
  Though development of the battery is targeted for completion 
in 1994, one of the first steps will be to put a somewhat less 
inferior prototype of the battery into a hybrid electric vehicle 
called the WAVE, and present it at the Tokyo Motor Show in 
October. 
  A nickel-hydrogen battery is a rechargeable battery that 
uses 
a hydrogen occluded alloy for the negative pole and nickel for 
the positive pole, and because of characteristics such as high 
energy density and low-temperature operating capabilities, it is 
suitable for use in those electric cars used in cold areas such 
as the Tohoku region of Japan. Another advantage of the 
nickel-hydrogen battery is that there is no worry about cadmium 
pollution, which is one of the major concerns of nickel-cadmium 
batteries. 
  One of the problems with a nickel-hydrogen battery, however, 
is the difficulty of making a large-capacity battery. The only 
nickel-hydrogen batteries that have been used commercially so 
far have been the triple dry-cell types used in home video 
cameras and cellular telephones. 
  In 1991, Tohoku Electric succeeded in making a prototype of 
a 
large-capacity 200A nickel-hydrogen battery, but the energy 
density of this battery was less than that of a lead storage 
battery, so the distances that an electric car or vehicle using 
this battery could travel on a single recharge were rather 
short. Following that, it set its sights on developing a 
high-density nickel-hydrogen battery by improving the 
performance of the hydrogen occluded alloy and devising a new 
electrode manufacturing technique. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-20561 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpjst014__l94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-JST-94-014-L </AU>
JPRS 
Science &amp; Technology 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Japan Electric Vehicle, Other Automotive Technology Developments </ABS>

<DATE1>   5 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<H3> <TI>     Pioneer Electric Corp. Executive on Car Navigation </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Pioneer Electric Corp. Executive on Car Navigation </PHRASE></F></HT>


<TEXT>
Developments 

<F P=102>   94FE0228H Tokyo GIJUTSU TO KEIZAI in Japanese Oct 93 pp 
12-21 -- FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLY </F>

<F P=103> 94FE0228H </F>
<F P=104>  Tokyo GIJUTSU TO KEIZAI </F>
<F P=105>  Japanese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yushiyuki Kosaka, New Media Division, Pioneer </F>
Electronics Corporation] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  1. Social Awareness </H5>
  The number of motor vehicles in Japan as of March 1993, 
excluding two-wheeled vehicles, was about 62 million (39 million 
passenger cars). That figure is approximately 21 million 
vehicles more than it was 10 years ago (passenger cars 
accounting for 13 million of that increase). 
  The Ministry of Construction, meanwhile, is planning to 
spend 
about &yen;76 trillion on road maintenance and improvements in 
the 11th in a series of five-year plans on road maintenance that 
starts this year. 
  Also, in April of this year, an additional 6,000 kilometers 
of roads were promoted to the status of national highways, and 
next year, 10,000 additional kilometers of roads are scheduled 
to be promoted to primary regional highways. 
  The road extensions currently include 6,000 kilometers for 
high-speed expressways such as the Meishin (Nagoya Kobe) and 
Tomei (Tokyo Nagoya), and 130,000 kilometers for metropolitan 
and prefectural roads. Including all other roads, the total 
number of road extensions will come to 1.1 million kilometers. 
  Sometime this fiscal year, a portion of the Tokushima 
Highway 
will be open to traffic in Tokushima Prefecture. This will mean 
that all prefectures and metropolitan areas throughout Japan 
will be connected by high-speed expressways. 
  Adding on new roads like this, however, results in increased 
demand on the roads including more things shipped by motor 
vehicle, more economic activities including private business, 
and more leisure activities that traditionally were not done by 
means other than motor vehicle. When we add on to that the 
lack of geographical knowledge, it only adds that much more time 
to get to one's destination. 
  That being the case, if there were an appropriate support 
system, that is, if a traffic information system were available 
that included a car navigation system, drivers would then be 
able to select the most convenient and lightest traveled routes 
to get to their destination. 
  If there were a substantial number of cars using such a 
system, it would help ease traffic congestion, help conserve 
energy by cutting down on traveling times, and cut down the 
number of traffic accidents. 
<H5>  2. Automobiles in the Electronics and Information Age </H5>
  It is becoming more and more common now to see basic 
functions of the automobile such as "driving," "turning," and 
"stopping" being controlled electronically by on-board 
computers. This includes electronic control of the engine, 
automatic transmission, suspension, and brakes. All these, 
moreover, are becoming part of one integrated system. 
  It is also common now to have comfort features such as 
air-conditioning and stereo systems in the car be controlled by 
microcomputers, so when we talk about electronics in 
automobiles, there is a mile of difference between the 
automobiles of 30 years ago that used diodes in the AC 
generators and transistors in the AM radios. 
  Generally speaking, people want the inside of their homes 
and 
the inside of their cars to have similar environments. The CD 
(compact disk) made its debut in 1981, and later, in 1984, the 
CD player found its way into the automobile. It is not unusual 
now to see automobiles equipped with auto-changing CD players. 
In the section below, we will discuss the role of the CD player 
in the implementation of a car navigation system. 
  This system not only pertains to audio but to video as well. 
The idea of putting televisions in cars has been around for 
quite some time, but what is truly remarkable is to see a 
million small liquid crystal televisions being sold each year, 
and most of them are said to be used in automobiles. Besides TV 
broadcasts, these miniature televisions are also being used as 
monitors that reproduce images taken by no more than a video 
camera. 
  The liquid crystal display is also one of the key elements 
used in displaying the electronic maps (digital maps) in car 
navigation systems. 
  Traffic information is at the head of the list as far as 
information needed by a car driver. Most drivers have been 
getting traffic information either from AM or FM radio stations, 
or from display boards and roadside broadcasts on 1620 kHz as 
they pass through different areas. 
  These ways of acquiring traffic information, however, are 
unsatisfactory in terms of timing and relevancy of the 
information given. If a car is equipped with a car phone or 
portable cellular phone, it is possible to get traffic 
information via a telephone service provided by the Japan 
Traffic Information Center, but it will take more time before 
ordinary drivers have access to mobile telephones in their cars. 
  Starting in April of next year, a system is scheduled to be 
instituted for selling mobile telephones (these are now leased 
from telephone companies), so this along with a new rate 
structure should make it a lot easier for people to use mobile 
telephones in the future. 
<H5>  3. Navigation System </H5>
  As far as traffic information is concerned, the ideal 
situation is for drivers to be able to obtain the information 
they need at the time they need it, but the complex network of 
roads in Japan makes it necessary for cars to have road maps or 
driver guides in the door pockets. In recent years, we are 
seeing more and more road signs being put up as the new road 
construction continues, but it is very rare, indeed, for the 
driver of a car to be able to find the sign they want at the 
time they need it. 
  Moreover, to turn the pages of a map while driving at night 
just to confirm one's location is dangerous and very hard to do. 
At times such as this, there is nothing more convenient than to 
have your location displayed on a map automatically, and be able 
to make decisions immediately based on the direction you are 
heading and the surrounding geographical conditions. 
  With ships and airplanes, needless to say, navigation is 
taken care of by electronic navigation methods, but car 
navigation is a rather recent phenomenon which only got started 
in the 1970s and was put into service in 1987. 
  A compact disk is the best form of media when it comes to 
storing digital maps containing digitalized road map 
information, so not only have CD players been commercialized but 
are suddenly finding altogether new uses. Initially, CRTs were 
used for the color display units that display the maps, but most 
now are liquid crystal displays. 
  At the present time, car navigation systems are broadly 
divided into two types of electronic navigation methods, namely, 
self-contained navigation (dead-reckoning navigation) and GPS 
(global positioning system) navigation. 
  In the self-contained navigation system, the position of the 
car has to be input before the car is started, but in the 
electronic navigation system, data on the absolute position of 
the car can be obtained continuously. The systems that car 
manufacturers are installing in their cars tend to combine both 
the self-contained system and the global positioning system. 
Also, the after-market systems that can be purchased at any car 
supply store and be installed by hand are generally based on the 
GPS method (cf. Table 1). 



<FIG ID=JPRS-JST-014L-05A>      Table 1. Car Navigation System </FIG>

  I would now like to introduce some of the main features of 
car navigation systems now on the market. 
  (1) Can set destination and routing freely and always 
display 
the direction in which you are heading. Has an audio feature 
that lets you know when you are turning left or right. 
  (2) Can file coordinates while driving which can then be 
used 
again on the return trip or future trips. 
  (3) Can easily access maps from reference lists when looking 
up maps of destinations (3,000 cities, towns, and villages; 
9,000 train stations, golf courses, and expressway ICs, SAs, and 
PAs). 
  (4) System also provides service information about hotels, 
restaurants, art galleries, museums, and sports facilities by 
means of still pictures, graphics, and audio. 
  (5) Besides general road maps, there are city maps available 
that feature lots of local information, and also CDs that 
contain special resort guide information. 
  (6) In addition to maps, there is also a full lineup of CDs 
including games and "karaoke" singing that people can enjoy once 
they reach their destination. 
<H5>  4. Digital Maps </H5>
  A database of digital maps was started in 1984 as the result 
of a project undertaken by the Ministry of Construction and 
private companies entitled "A Road/Vehicle Information System," 
which came out of an immediate need for data on national roads 
and highways. In 1988, the Japan Digital Road Map Association 
was formed. It is made up of members from automotive, 
electrical, surveying, and map-related companies, and has been 
at work preparing, updating, and making the database available. 
This database has basically digitalized many of the 1:25,000 
topographical maps produced by the Ministry of Construction's 
Geographical Survey Institute (4,400 maps to cover all Japan). 
  The most recent database contained a total number of 2,200 
digitalized 1:25,000 topographical maps, or 50 percent of the 
total number of maps, and covering 80 percent of the population 
distribution. The remaining areas are maintained by 1:50,000 
topographical maps. The contents of the database consists of a 
network of roads that is formed by digitalizing the linear 
latitude and longitude changes in the road, and by linking these 
numbered nodes together with links connecting the nodes. 
  The areas maintained by 1:25,000 topographical maps include 
all roads classified as more than 3 meters wide, and the areas 
maintained by 1:50,000 topographical maps include all roads 
classified as being more than 5 meters wide. Needless to say, 
the data includes rivers, shoreline routes, and railway lines. 
  Furthermore, these roads being living entities, are rebuilt 
and changed almost every year, so hundreds of revisions have to 
made in the topographical maps themselves, and the database must 
accurately reflect these new changes and revisions. 
  A database such as the one described above is, simply 
speaking, only an output map made up of lines, so is incomplete 
in terms of being a navigational tool. Therefore, the map must 
be set up in such a way that the person driving the car is able 
to confirm his/her location easily with the display. The work in 
this area cannot be done without the cooperation of map makers, 
so we at Pioneer have been working together with the Hokkaido 
Chizu in the manufacture of navigational maps. 
  Out of that work has come a CD-ROM disk which contains a 
complete record of map data, but we are also marketing a 
navigation system that uses IC cards as recording media. 
<H5>  5. Position Sensors and Global Positioning System </H5>
  In Section 3, we touched on the different car navigation 
systems, but as Table 1 shows, we are unable to obtain data on 
absolute position with the self-contained navigation system. 
  The position of a car in a self-contained system is 
calculated by geomagnetic sensors that calculate the azimuth, 
speed sensors that calculate the distance the car has traveled, 
and gyros that detect turning angles. There are instances also 
in which the wheel velocity and steering are used as aids in 
calculating the turning angle. A map-matching technology is also 
used for restoring the car's position based on road data and 
pattern verification when there are errors produced, such as the 
car leaving the road. 
  Next, we outline the Global Positioning System which has 
recently been attracting a good deal of attention. 
  This is an excellent system that lets you know in real time 
your latitude and longitude coordinates at any point on the 
earth. 
  More specifically, it is a global positioning system using 
artificial satellites that the Department of Defense of the U.S. 
Government has been working on for the past 20 years or so, and 
is formally called NAVSTAR/GPS (Navigation System with Time and 
Ranging/Global Positioning System). The system consists of 24 
satellites each equipped with atomic clocks (orbiting the earth 
about every 12 hours in 6 orbital tracks at altitudes of 20,000 
km), five monitoring stations, and a control station. 
  There are L1 radio signals for standard positioning and L2 
signals for high-precision positioning, but the L2 is 
exclusively from military use (Figures 1 and 2 [figures not 
reproduced]). 
  The positioning system works by calculating the distance 
between a moving vehicle and the satellite in real time based on 
the propagation time of signals received from three to four 
satellites, and establishing the real position of the moving 
vehicle. 
  (1) When three satellites are used, two-dimensional 
positioning (latitude, longitude) is possible. 
  (2) When four satellites are used, three-dimensional 
positioning (latitude, longitude, and altitude) is possible. 
  From the data received, we can also determine traveling 
direction, speed, and time. 
  There are a total of 24 satellites in operation at present 
including the first experimental satellites, so it is possible 
to have 24-hour tracking (Table 2). 



  ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table 2. GPS Launches                                                        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Block I Satellites (Experimental Satellites)                                 | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Satellite No.            |Launch Date              |Current Status           | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|4                        |02-22-1978               |No                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|7                        |05-13-1978               |No                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|6                        |10-06-1978               |No                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|8                        |12-10-1978               |No                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|5                        |02-09-1980               |No                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|9                        |04-26-1980               |No                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|10                       |02-19-1981               |No                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|11                       |07-14-1983               |No                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|13                       |07-13-1984               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|12                       |09-08-1984               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|3                        |10-09-1985               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Block II Satellites (Commercial Satellites)                                  | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Satellite No.            |Launch Date              |Current Status           | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|14                       |02-14-1989               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|2                        |06-10-1989               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|16                       |08-18-1989               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|19                       |10-21-1989               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|17                       |12-11-1989               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|18                       |01-24-1990               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|20                       |03-26-1990               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|21                       |08-02-1990               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|15                       |10-01-1990               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|23                       |11-26-1990               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|24                       |07-03-1991               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|25                       |02-23-1992               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|28                       |04-10-1992               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|26                       |07-07-1992               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|27                       |09-09-1992               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|01                       |11-22-1992               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|29                       |12-18-1992               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|22                       |02-03-1993               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|31                       |04-04-1993               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|07                       |05-13-1993               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|09                       |06-26-1993               |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|05                       |09--1993                 |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|30                       |10--1993                 |Yes                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  The system is still in the experimental mode, but a formal 
announcement is due with regards to the first stage of operation 
which is scheduled to take place at any time. The operation is 
not scheduled to be completed until all 24 Block II satellites 
are in place. 
  An advanced positioning system such as this should be useful 
in a wide range of activities including, tracking moving 
vehicles, surveying, and supporting disaster prevention work 
(predicting earthquakes and volcanic eruptions). 
  In 1990, Mazda and Pioneer jointly became the first in the 
world to come out with a car navigation system. 
  This is a system that the U.S. Government developed and is 
controlled and operated by the United States, so it is important 
in terms of the user that the use of the system be appropriate 
and that care be taken not to cause any new trade frictions. 
  For that reason, GPS makers and users in Japan are planning 
to form the Satellite Positioning System Association whose job 
it will be to begin conducting international exchanges, 
researching appropriate uses of the system, and providing 
accurate information. 
<H5>  6. Future Car Navigation and Road Traffic Information Systems </H5>
  Making cars more intelligent and informed contributes to 
road 
safety and smoother traffic flow, so that is why there is so 
much research being done in this area. 
  One of the things that current navigation systems have been 
able to provide is information on surrounding geographical 
conditions and the distance and direction to one's destination. 
  As explained in Section 2, dynamic traffic information is 
presently being provided by audio systems from radio broadcasts 
or telephone services, or by display boards along the roads, but 
to enable more effective use of the information collected, and 
to provide drivers with a system that they can use anytime and 
anyplace, a new organization called the VICS (Vehicle 
Information and Communication Systems) Promotion Council was 
formed in 1991 with the cooperation of the National Police 
Agency, the Ministry of Posts and Telecommunications, and the 
Ministry of Construction. 
  This will be a system that uses radio beacons, light 
beacons, 
and FM multipliers (a new broadcasting method in which 
characters, graphics, and additional information is multiplexed 
and sent out on FM radio broadcasts) installed along roads and 
highways to be used to send information to drivers on traffic 
jams, time requirements, traffic regulations and warnings. 
  We have been studying different modes of display from simple 
ones that display only written characters to more complex ones 
that involve navigational maps. A public demonstration of the 
system is being planned for November of this year, but when this 
system is in place, we expect it will dramatically improve the 
decision-making ability of drivers. 
<H5>  7. Conclusion </H5>
  As we have explained in the foregoing, this car navigation 
system was developed for commercial use by concentrating a 
diverse range of technologies. At the present time, there are 
about 300,000 systems in use. We believe that the market for 
this product will continue to expand, and that we will see 
further technical innovation. 
  If there are more cars on the road equipped with car 
navigation systems and data terminals, it will likely lead to 
smoother traffic, therefore, we are trying to make the system as 
easy and as simple to use as possible. 
  Meanwhile, we continue to see more and more mobile-type 
management systems, which are applications of car navigation 
technology, being used in business (trailer trucks, taxis, 
police cars, etc.). 
  For example, positional information on the location of a 
vehicle is sent by radio from a GPS transceiver in the moving 
vehicle to an operational control center. The center uses that 
information to ascertain the position and operating status of a 
number of moving vehicles, so is able to immediately send 
appropriate instructions and messages. This area should see an 
enormous amount of growth in the future. (Yushiyuki Kosaka) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>
